<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20020703144015.txt.gz
TIME:20020703144015
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
OMB APPROVAL       
OMB Number: 3235-0060  
Expires: March 31, 2003     
Estimated average burden  
hours per response  . . 1.25 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.    
Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
        Reference is made to the press release of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued on July 1, 2002, which contains information meeting the requirements of this Item 5, and which is incorporated herein by this reference. A copy of this press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.
 
Item 7.    
Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
None.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
Date: July 3, 2002
 

 
Sstuewe@AdvanceAutoParts.com
Advance Auto Parts
(540) 561-3281
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced it has amended its Credit Agreement dated November 28, 2001 which matures on November 30, 2007 and has closed on a new $250 million Tranche C term loan, which replaces its existing Tranche B term loan.            
Roanoke, Virginia, July 1, 2002
 
The Tranche B loan was initially issued for $305 million. Since the beginning of 2002, the Company has prepaid the outstanding balance to $265 million from free cash flow. As part of the closing of the Tranche C loan, the Company will repay the remaining balance of Tranche B with the proceeds from the Tranche C loan, as well as, with $15 million of free cash flow.            
 
Along with a more favorable interest rate on Tranche C, the amendments to the loan agreement includes the modification of various provisions to reflect the Company's strong operating results.
 
"Since November 2001, when we completed our Credit Agreement, Advance Auto Parts has produced strong cash flow and has completed a successful secondary offering," said Jim Wade, the Company's President and Chief Financial Officer. "We are very pleased that due to our strong financial performance we were able to close on a more advantageous term loan at a favorable rate."
 
JP Morgan Securities Inc. was the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner on this transaction.            
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. is based in Roanoke, Va., and is the second largest auto parts chain in the nation. With approximately 2,400 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, the Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at www.advanceautoparts.com.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and
Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20020816140841.txt.gz
TIME:20020816140841
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
 
Item 9.    Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On August 14, 2002, Lawrence P. Castellani and Jimmie L. Wade, chief executive officer, and president and chief financial officer, respectively, of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance"), each filed a Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission"), copies of which are attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated herein by reference, pursuant to an Order of the Commission dated June 27, 2002 (File No. 4-460).
 
In addition, reference is made to the press release of Advance, issued on August 14, 2002, which contains, among other things, information regarding Advance's second quarter financial results. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.2.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings
 
I, Larry P. Castellani, as the Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., state and attest that:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Statement Under Oath of Principal Executive Officer and Principal Financial Officer Regarding Facts and Circumstances Relating to Exchange Act Filings
 
I, Jimmie L. Wade, as the Chief Financial Officer of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., state and attest that:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.2
 
 
 
 
  Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced it achieved an increase of 57.1% in earnings per diluted share to $0.77 for the second quarter ended July 13, 2002, before integration expenses and the extraordinary item, compared to $0.49 for the same quarter last year. Including integration expenses, earnings per share rose 30.6% to $0.64. After integration expenses and an extraordinary item, earnings per share declined 10.2% to $0.44.
Roanoke, Virginia, August 14, 2002
 
Year-to-date earnings per share before integration expenses and the extraordinary item, climbed 111.1% to $1.33 compared to $0.63 last year. Including integration expense, earnings per share rose 61.9% to $1.02. After integration expenses and the extraordinary item earnings per share rose 25.4% to $0.79.
 
During the second quarter, the Company incurred pre-tax integration expenses of $7.6 million and $18.2 million year-to-date. These expenses are related to the integration of Discount Auto Parts, which was acquired on November 29, 2001. As previously announced, the Company believes that total integration expenses for the year will not exceed $40 million.
 
During the quarter, the Company recorded an after-tax extraordinary loss of $7.6 million from the extinguishment of debt. These charges resulted from the Company negotiating a more favorable $250 million Tranche C loan, pre-paying in full its $305 million Tranche B loan, repurchasing approximately $37 million in face value of bonds and pre-paying $23 million on its Tranche A loan. The extraordinary loss includes un-amortized deferred loan fees and related refinancing fees on the credit facilities; and un-amortized discounts, un-amortized deferred loan fees and premiums paid to repurchase the bonds.
 
Second quarter sales increased 30.5% to $792.7 million compared with $607.5 million last year. Same store sales for the Advance Auto Parts stores grew 5.0% for the second quarter compared to 6.8% in the comparable period last year. The Discount Auto Parts stores, that are not yet in the reported comparable store base, produced a comparable store sales increase of 3.7% during the second quarter compared to 1.8% last year.
 
Year-to-date sales rose 34.4% to approximately $1.8 billion from $1.3 billion last year. Same store sales rose
 
6.5% for the first two quarters compared to 6.2% last year. The majority of same stores sales gains, both in the second quarter and year-to-date, were generated from an increase in customers with the remainder being produced from an increase in transaction size.
 
Operating income, before integration expenses, increased 78.3% to $64.9 million from $36.4 million in the comparable period last year, generating an operating margin increase of 220 basis points to 8.2% from 6.0% last year. Including integration expenses, the Company reported a 57.4% increase in operating income to $57.2 million, producing a 120 basis points increase in operating margin to 7.2%. Year-to-date operating income, before integration expenses, rose 98.8% to $123.8 million from $62.3 million last year, generating an operating margin increase of 220 basis points to 6.9% compared to 4.7% last year. Including integration expenses, operating income rose 69.6% to $105.6 million, which produced a 120 basis point increase in operating margin to 5.9%.
 
Net income, before integration expense and the extraordinary item, rose 99.9% in the second quarter to $28.2 million from $14.1 million in the comparable quarter last year. Including integration expense and the extraordinary item the Company reported a 12.9% increase in net income to $15.9 million. Year-to-date net income, before integration expense and the extraordinary item, increased 164.3% to $47.6 million from $18.0 million last year. Including integration expense and the extraordinary item the Company reported a 55.8% increase in net income to $28.0 million.
 
During the seasonally strong second quarter, the Company generated $75 million in free cash flow. The Company has raised its fiscal year free cash flow guidance to a range of $100 million to $110 million from $90 million to $100 million.
 
Advance Auto Parts Chief Executive Officer, Lawrence P. Castellani, and President and Chief Financial Officer, Jimmie L. Wade, certified today, in conjunction with the filing of its Form 10-Q, the Company's reports filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to a recent order by the Commission requiring sworn statements from these officers. This filing was 13 days ahead of the due date of August 27, 2002.
 
Commenting on the second quarter results, Mr. Castellani said, "Our team members produced solid results, including an increase of 220 basis points in operating margin. We will continue to focus on increasing our operating margins, integrating Discount Auto Parts, and using our free cash flow to reduce our debt."
 
On July 26, 2002, the Company closed its acquisition of approximately 55 Trak Auto Parts stores in the northern Virginia, Washington D.C. and eastern Maryland market. The Company anticipates that it will successfully convert each of the locations to Advance Auto Parts by year-end, including enhanced inventory selection and state-of-the-art store systems.
 
With respect to the outlook for the remainder of fiscal 2002, the Company raised its earnings per diluted share guidance to a range of $2.53 to $2.60 per share before integration expense and the extraordinary item for 2002. For the fiscal year 2003, the Company believes it can achieve a 25% increase in earnings per share.
 
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, August 15, 2002 at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its second quarter results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The
 
call will be archived on the Company's website: http://www.advanceautoparts.com/ until September 11, 2002.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. is based in Roanoke, Va., and is the second largest auto parts chain in the nation. With approximately 2,400 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, the Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at www.advanceautoparts.com.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20021119131553.txt.gz
TIME:20021119131553
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
Reference is made to the press release of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance"), issued on November 18, 2002, which contains information regarding Advance's fiscal third quarter financial results. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
Roanoke, Virginia, November 18, 2002
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced its earnings per diluted share increased 73.6% to $0.92 for the third quarter ended October 5, 2002, before integration expenses and an extraordinary item, compared to $0.53 for the same quarter last year. After integration expenses and the extraordinary item, earnings per diluted share rose 45.3% to $0.77.
 
Year-to-date earnings per diluted share, before integration expenses and the extraordinary item, increased 94.8% to $2.26 compared to $1.16 last year. After integration expense and the extraordinary item, earnings per diluted share rose 35.3% to $1.57.
 
The Company incurred pre-tax integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition of $8.2 million during the third quarter and $26.4 million during the first three fiscal quarters. The Company anticipates its total integration expenses to be approximately $3 million lower than originally announced and will be approximately $37 million for 2002.
 
During the quarter, the Company recorded an after-tax extraordinary loss of $0.3 million from the extinguishment of debt including un-amortized discounts and premiums paid to repurchase $3.5 million face value of its 10.25% senior subordinated notes.
 
Third quarter sales increased 31.7% to $788.7 million, compared to $598.8 million last year. Same store sales grew 5.5% for the third quarter compared to 7.1% in the comparable period last year. Discount Auto Parts stores, which are not yet in the reported comparable store base, produced a comparable store sales increase of 6.3% during the third quarter compared to 2.4% last year.
 
Year-to-date sales rose 33.6% to approximately $2.6 billion from $1.9 billion last year. Same store sales rose
 
6.2% year-to-date, compared to 6.5% last year. The majority of same stores sales gains were generated from an increase in customers, with the remainder being achieved through an increase in transaction size.
 
Operating income, before integration expenses, increased 90.7% to $70.8 million from $37.1 million in the comparable period last year, generating an operating margin increase of 280 basis points to 9.0% from 6.2% last year. Including integration expenses, the Company reported a 68.4% increase in operating income to $62.5 million, producing a 170 basis points increase in operating margin to 7.9%. Year-to-date operating income, before integration expenses, rose 95.8% to $194.6 million from $99.4 million last year, generating an operating margin increase of 240 basis points to 7.5%, compared to 5.1% last year. Including integration expenses, operating income rose 69.2% to $168.1 million, which produced a 140 basis point increase in operating margin to 6.5%.
 
Net income, before integration expense and the extraordinary item, rose 121.3% in the third quarter to $33.7 million from $15.2 million in the comparable quarter last year. Including integration expenses and the extraordinary item, the Company reported a 86.2% increase in net income to $28.3 million. Year-to-date net income, before integration expense and the extraordinary item, increased 144.6% to $81.3 million from $33.2 million last year. Including integration expense and the extraordinary item, the Company reported a 69.7% increase in net income to $56.4 million.
 
The Company generated $22.3 million in free cash flow in the third quarter and $166.9 million during the first-three quarters. The Company anticipates generating $100 to $110 million in free cash flow in 2002.
 
Commenting on the third quarter results, Lawrence P. Castellani, the Company's Chief Executive Officer, said, "Generating an operating margin increase of 280 basis points in the third quarter demonstrates that our new initiatives, including our exciting new store format, our labor management system, and our proprietary electronic catalog are generating results. Our team members are dedicated to our three key goals, which are to increase our operating margins, successfully integrate Discount Auto Parts, and use our free cash flow to pay down our debt."
 
The Company is reaffirming its earnings per diluted share guidance of $0.38 to $0.42 per share, before integration expenses and extraordinary items, for the fourth quarter of 2002. For the fiscal year 2003, the Company believes it can achieve a 25% increase in earnings per diluted share.
 
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, November 19, 2002, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its third quarter results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website: http://www.advanceautoparts.com until December 16, 2002.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. is based in Roanoke, Va., and is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 5, 2002, the Company had 2,393 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors
 
listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do notinclude the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20021122114804.txt.gz
TIME:20021122114804
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.    Other Events and Required FD Disclosure.
 
On November 22, 2002, in connection with our proposed registered offering of 9,442,331 shares of our common stock, of which 8,593,937 shares are to be offered by certain selling stockholders and 858,394 shares are to be offered by us and one of the selling stockholders to cover over-allotments of shares, if any, Deloitte & Touche LLP completed an audit of our consolidated financial statements as of October 5, 2002 and for the forty weeks then ended. A copy of our audited consolidated financial statements is filed as Exhibit 99.1 to this Form 8-K and is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference.
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)    Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
 
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. and Subsidiaries:
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheet of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. and subsidiaries as of October 5, 2002, and the related statement of operations, stockholders' equity, and cash flows for the forty week period then ended. These financial statements are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements based on our audit.
 
We conducted our audit in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States of America. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audit provides a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
In our opinion, such consolidated financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. and subsidiaries as of October 5, 2002, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for the forty week period then ended in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America.
 
D & T LLP
ELOITTE
OUCHE
 
McLean, Virginia
November 15, 2002
 
 
To the Board of Directors and Stockholders of
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.:
 
We have audited the accompanying consolidated balance sheets of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (a Delaware company) and subsidiaries (the Company), as of December 29, 2001, and December 30, 2000, and the related consolidated statements of operations, changes in stockholders' equity and cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 29, 2001. These financial statements and the schedules referred to below are the responsibility of the Company's management. Our responsibility is to express an opinion on these financial statements and schedules based on our audits.
 
We conducted our audits in accordance with auditing standards generally accepted in the United States. Those standards require that we plan and perform the audit to obtain reasonable assurance about whether the financial statements are free of material misstatement. An audit includes examining, on a test basis, evidence supporting the amounts and disclosures in the financial statements. An audit also includes assessing the accounting principles used and significant estimates made by management, as well as evaluating the overall financial statement presentation. We believe that our audits provide a reasonable basis for our opinion.
 
In our opinion, the financial statements referred to above present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. and subsidiaries as of December 29, 2001, and December 30, 2000, and the results of their operations and their cash flows for each of the three years in the period ended December 29, 2001, in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States.
 
As explained in Note 2 to the financial statements, effective December 31, 2000, the Company changed its method of accounting for certain cooperative advertising funds.
 
Our audit was made for the purpose of forming an opinion on the basic financial statements taken as a whole. The schedules listed in the index to financial statements and schedules are presented for purposes of complying with the Securities and Exchange Commission's rules and are not part of the basic financial statements. These schedules have been subjected to the auditing procedures applied in the audits of basic financial statements and, in our opinion, fairly state in all material respects the financial data required to be set forth therein in relation to the basic financial statements taken as a whole.
 
A A LLP
RTHUR
NDERSEN
 
Greensboro, North Carolina,
    March 5, 2002.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
1.    Organization and Description of Business:
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance") conducts all of its operations through its wholly owned subsidiary, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated and its subsidiaries ("Stores"). Advance and Stores (collectively, the "Company") maintain a Retail and Wholesale segment within the United States, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Retail segment operates 2,393 retail stores, which includes 1,936 stores operating under the "Advance Auto Parts" trade name, in 37 states in the Northeastern, Southeastern and Midwestern regions of the United States and the District of Columbia and 419 stores operating under the "Discount Auto Parts" trade name primarily in the state of Florida. These stores offer automotive replacement parts, accessories and maintenance items, with no significant concentration in any specific area. Additionally, the Retail segment operates 38 stores under the "Western Auto" trade name, primarily located in Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, which offer certain home and garden merchandise in addition to automotive parts, accessories and service. The Wholesale segment consists of the wholesale operations, including distribution services to approximately 430 independent dealers located throughout the United States, primarily operating under the "Western Auto" trade name.
 
2.    Summary of Significant Accounting Policies:
 
Accounting Period
 
The Company's fiscal year ends on the Saturday nearest the end of December.
 
The results of operations for the forty week periods are not necessarily indicative of the operating results to be expected for the full fiscal year.
 
Principles of Consolidation
 
The consolidated financial statements include the accounts of the Company and its wholly owned subsidiaries. All significant intercompany balances and transactions have been eliminated in consolidation.
 
Use of Estimates
 
The preparation of financial statements in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States of America requires management to make estimates and assumptions that affect the reported amounts of assets and liabilities and the disclosure of contingent assets and liabilities at the date of the financial statements and the reported amounts of revenues and expenses during the reporting period. Actual results could differ from those estimates.
 
Cash, Cash Equivalents and Bank Overdrafts
 
Cash and cash equivalents consist of cash in banks and money market funds. Bank overdrafts include net outstanding checks not yet presented to a bank for settlement.
 
Vendor Incentives and Change in Accounting Method
 
The Company receives incentives from vendors related to cooperative advertising allowances, volume rebates and other miscellaneous agreements. Many of the incentives are under long-term agreements (terms in
 
 
excess of one year), while others are negotiated on an annual basis. Certain vendors require the Company to use cooperative advertising allowances exclusively for advertising. These restricted cooperative advertising allowances are recognized as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses as advertising expenditures are incurred. Unrestricted cooperative advertising revenue, rebates and other miscellaneous incentives are earned based on purchases and/or the sale of product. The Company records unrestricted cooperative advertising and rebates earned as a reduction of inventory and recognizes the incentives as a reduction to cost of sales as the inventory is sold. The Company recognizes other incentives earned related to long-term agreements as a reduction of cost of sales over the life of the agreement based on the timing of purchases. These incentives are not recorded as reductions to inventory. The amounts earned under long-term arrangements not recorded as a reduction of inventory are based on estimates of total purchases that will be made over the life of the contracts and the amount of incentives that will be earned. The incentives are generally recognized based on the cumulative purchases as a percentage of the total estimated purchases over the life of the contract. The Company's margins could be impacted positively or negatively if actual purchases or results differ from its estimates but over the life of the contract would be the same. Short-term incentives are recognized as a reduction to cost of sales over the course of the annual agreement and are not recorded as reductions to inventory.
 
Amounts received or receivable from vendors that are not yet earned are reflected as deferred revenue in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Management's estimate of the portion of deferred revenue that will be realized within one year of the balance sheet date has been included in other current liabilities in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Total deferred revenue is $22,584 and $17,046 at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001. Earned amounts that are receivable from vendors are included in receivables, net on the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
 
Effective December 31, 2000, the Company changed its method of accounting for unrestricted cooperative advertising funds received from certain vendors to recognize these payments as a reduction to the cost of inventory acquired from these vendors. Previously, these funds were accounted for as a reduction to selling, general and administrative expenses as advertising expense was incurred. The new method was adopted to better align the reporting of these payments with the Company's and the vendors' use of these payments as reductions to the price of inventory acquired from the vendors. The effect of the change for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2001 was to decrease income from continuing operations by $3,680, or $0.13 per diluted share. The effect of the change for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2001 was to increase income from continuing operations by $358, or $0.01 per diluted share. The cumulative effect of retroactive application of the change on the year ended December 29, 2001 was to reduce income before extraordinary item by approximately $2,065, net of $1,360 income tax, or $0.07 per share. The pro forma amounts shown on the statement of operations have been adjusted for the effect of retroactive application of the new method on net income and related income taxes for all periods presented.
 
Pre-opening Expenses
 
Pre-opening expenses, which consist primarily of payroll and occupancy costs, are expensed as incurred.
 
 
 
Advertising Costs
 
The Company expenses advertising costs as incurred. Advertising expense incurred was approximately $57,519 and $49,636 for the forty week periods ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, respectively. Advertising expense incurred was approximately $56,698, $53,658 and $65,524 in fiscal 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively.
 
Merger and Integration Costs
 
As a result of the Western merger and the Discount acquisition, the Company incurred, and will continue to incur through fiscal 2003 in connection with the Discount acquisition, costs related to, among other things, overlapping administrative functions and store conversions that have been expensed as incurred. These costs are presented as expenses associated with merger and integration in the accompanying statements of operations.
 
Warranty Costs
 
The Company's vendors are primarily responsible for warranty claims. Warranty costs relating to merchandise and services sold under warranty, which are not covered by vendors' warranties, are estimated based on the Company's historical experience and are recorded in the period the product is sold.
 
Revenue Recognition and Trade Receivables
 
The Company recognizes merchandise revenue at the point of sale to a retail customer and point of shipment to a wholesale customer, while service revenue is recognized upon performance of service. The majority of sales are made for cash; however, the Company extends credit to certain commercial customers through a third-party provider of private label credit cards. Receivables under the private label credit card program are transferred to the third-party provider on a limited recourse basis. The Company provides an allowance for doubtful accounts on receivables sold with recourse based upon factors related to credit risk of specific customers, historical trends and other information. This arrangement is accounted for as a secured borrowing. Receivables and the related secured borrowings under the private label credit card were $19,171 and $16,400 at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, respectively, and are included in accounts receivable and other current liabilities, respectively, in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets. Additionally, at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, Discount had $2,518 and $3,457, respectively, in trade receivables under their commercial credit program.
 
Change in Accounting Estimate
 
In July of fiscal 2000, the Company adopted a change in an accounting estimate to reduce the depreciable lives of certain property and equipment on a prospective basis. The effect on operations for fiscal 2000 was to increase depreciation expense by $2,458 for fiscal 2000. At October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, the effected assets were fully depreciated.
 
Earnings Per Share of Common Stock
 
Basic earnings per share of common stock has been computed based on the weighted-average number of common shares outstanding during the period. Diluted earnings per share of common stock reflects the increase
 
 
in the weighted-average number of common shares outstanding assuming the exercise of outstanding stock options, calculated using the treasury stock method. There were 124 average outstanding stock options considered antidilutive for either part or all of the forty week periods and not included in the calculation of diluted net income (loss) per share for the forty week period ended October 5, 2002. There were 350, 509, 1,566 and 230 antidilutive options for the forty weeks ended October 6, 2001 and the fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000, respectively.
 
Hedge Activities
 
On September 25, 2002, the Company entered into a hedge agreement in the form of a zero-cost collar, which protects the Company from interest rate fluctuations in the LIBOR rate on $150 million of the Company's variable rate debt under its senior credit facility. The collar consists of an interest rate ceiling at 4.5% and an interest rate floor of 1.56% for a term of twenty-four months. Under this hedge, the Company will continue to pay interest at prevailing rates plus any spread, as defined by the senior credit facility, but will be reimbursed for any amounts paid on the LIBOR rate, in excess of the ceiling. Conversely, the Company will be required to pay the financial institution that originated the collar if the LIBOR rate is less than the floor.
 
In accordance with Statement of Financial Accounting Standard, or SFAS, No. 133, "Accounting for Derivative Instruments and Hedging Activities," the fair value of the hedge arrangement is recorded as an asset or liability in the accompanying consolidated balance sheet at October 5, 2002. The Company has assumed no ineffectiveness in this hedge and plans to use the "matched terms" accounting method as provided by Derivative Implementation Group, or DIG, Issue No. G20, "Assessing and Measuring the Effectiveness of a Purchased Option Used in a Cash Flow Hedge". Under this method, the Company will include all adjustments to fair value in other comprehensive income (loss) caption of stockholders' equity on the consolidated balance sheet. Any amounts received or paid under this hedge will be recorded in the statement of operations as earned or incurred.
 
Recent Accounting Pronouncements
 
In June 2001, the Financial Accounting Standards Board, or FASB, issued SFAS No. 141, "Business Combinations" and No. 142, "Goodwill and Other Intangible Assets," SFAS No. 141 addresses accounting and reporting for all business combinations and requires the use of the purchase method for business combinations. SFAS No. 141 also requires recognition of intangible assets apart from goodwill if they meet certain criteria. SFAS No. 142 establishes accounting and reporting standards for acquired goodwill and other intangible assets. Under SFAS No. 142, goodwill and intangibles with indefinite useful lives are no longer amortized but are instead subject to at least an annual assessment for impairment by applying a fair-value based test. SFAS No. 141 applies to all business combinations initiated after June 30, 2001. SFAS No. 142 is effective for existing goodwill and intangible assets beginning as of December 31, 2001. SFAS No. 142 is effective immediately for goodwill and intangibles acquired after June 30, 2001. For the forty week period ended October 6, 2001, the Company had amortization expense of approximately $296, related to existing goodwill of $3,426 at October 6, 2001. For fiscal year 2001, the Company had amortization expense of approximately $444 related to existing goodwill of $3,251 at December 29, 2001. Such amortization has been eliminated upon adoption of SFAS No. 142. The Company implemented SFAS No. 142 during the first quarter of 2002. The implementation had no material impact on the Company's financial position or the results of its operations.
 
 
In June 2001, the FASB issued SFAS No. 143, "Accounting for Asset Retirement Obligations." SFAS No. 143 establishes accounting standards for recognition and measurement of an asset retirement obligation and an associated asset retirement cost and is effective for fiscal year 2003. The Company does not expect SFAS No. 143 to have a material impact on its financial position or the results of operations.
 
In August 2001, the FASB also issued SFAS No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets." This statement replaces both SFAS No. 121, "Accounting for the Impairment of Long-Lived Assets and for Long-Lived Assets to Be Disposed Of" and Accounting Principles Board (APB) Opinion No. 30, "Reporting the Results of OperationsReporting the Effects of Disposal of a Segment of a Business, and Extraordinary, Unusual and Infrequently Occurring Events and Transactions." SFAS 144 retains the basic provisions from both SFAS 121 and APB 30, but includes changes to improve financial reporting and comparability among entities. The provisions of SFAS 144 are effective for fiscal years beginning after December 15, 2001. The Company adopted SFAS No. 144 with no material effect on its financial position or the results of its operations.
 
In April 2002, the FASB issued SFAS No. 145, "Rescission of FASB Statements No. 4, 44 and 64, Amendment of FASB Statement No. 13 and Technical Corrections." As a result of rescinding FASB Statement No. 4, "Reporting Gains Losses from Extinguishment of Debt," gains and losses from extinguishment of debt should be classified as extraordinary items only if they meet the criteria in APB No. 30. This statement also amends FASB Statement No. 13, "Accounting for Leases," to eliminate an inconsistency between the required accounting for sale-leaseback transactions and the required accounting for certain lease modifications that have economic effects that are similar to sale-leaseback transactions. Additional amendments include changes to other existing authoritative pronouncements to make various technical corrections, clarify meanings or describe their applicability under changed conditions. The Company will adopt the provisions of SFAS No. 145 during the first quarter of fiscal 2003. For the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company recorded extraordinary losses on the extinguishment of debt, net of tax, of $8,694. Accordingly, reclassifications of these losses to income from continuing operations will be made throughout fiscal 2003 to maintain comparability for the reported periods.
 
In June 2002, the FASB issued SFAS No. 146, "Accounting for Costs Associated with Exit or Disposal Activities." This statement nullifies Emerging Issues Task Force Issue No. 94-3, "Liability Recognition for Certain Employee Termination Benefits and Other Costs to Exit an Activity (including Certain Costs Incurred in a Restructuring)." This statement requires that a liability for costs associated with an exit or disposal activity be recognized when the liability is incurred instead of at the date an entity commits to an exit plan. The statement is effective for exit and disposal activities entered into after December 31, 2002. The Company does not expect adopting this statement will have a material impact on its financial position or the results of its operations.
 
Reclassifications
 
Certain items in the financial statements for fiscal 2001, 2000 and 1999 and for the forty weeks ended October 6, 2001 have been reclassified to conform with the 2002 presentation.
 
 
 
3.    Acquisitions:
 
Discount Acquisition
 
On November 28, 2001, the Company acquired 100% of the outstanding common stock of Discount Auto Parts, Inc., or Discount. Discount's shareholders received $7.50 per share in cash plus 0.2577 shares of Advance common stock for each share of Discount common stock. The Company issued 4,310 shares of Advance common stock to the former Discount shareholders, which represented 13.2% of the Company's total shares outstanding immediately following the acquisition.
 
Discount was the fifth largest specialty retailer of automotive parts, accessories and maintenance items in the United States with 671 stores in six states, including the leading market position in Florida, with 437 stores. The Discount acquisition further solidified the Company's leading market position throughout the Southeast. The Company also expects to achieve ongoing purchasing savings and savings from the optimization of the combined distribution networks and the reduction of overlapping administrative functions as we convert the Discount stores to Advance stores.
 
In connection with the Discount acquisition, the Company issued an additional $200,000 face value of 10.25% senior subordinated notes and entered into a new senior credit facility that provides for (1) a $180,000 tranche A term loan facility and a $305,000 tranche B term loan facility and (2) a $160,000 revolving credit facility (including a letter of credit sub-facility). Upon the closing of the Discount acquisition, the Company used $485,000 of borrowings under the new senior credit facility and net proceeds of $185,600 from the sale of the senior subordinated notes to, among other things, pay the cash portion of the acquisition consideration, repay all amounts outstanding under the Company's then-existing credit facility, repay all outstanding indebtedness of Discount and purchase Discount's Gallman distribution facility from the lessor.
 
In accordance with SFAS No. 141, the acquisition has been accounted for under the purchase method of accounting and was effective for accounting purposes on December 2, 2001. Accordingly, the results of operations of Discount for the period from December 2, 2001 are included in the accompanying consolidated financial statements. The purchase price has been allocated to the assets acquired and liabilities assumed based upon estimates of fair values. The initial purchase price allocation resulted in excess fair value over the purchase price of $75,724, and was allocated proportionately as a reduction to certain noncurrent assets, primarily property and equipment. During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company reduced the excess fair value by $18,709 due to purchase accounting adjustments primarily made to adjust the fair market value of certain inventory and equipment and the related deferred income tax effects. The purchase price was $481,624 (including acquisition costs incurred during the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 of $647), which primarily consisted of the issuance of 4,310 shares of Advance common stock and 575 options to purchase shares of Advance common stock, cash consideration for $7.50 per share and the "in the money" stock options of $128,479, repayment of Discount's existing debt and prepayment penalties of $204,711 and the purchase of Discount's Gallman distribution facility from the lessor for $34,062. The cost assigned to the 4,310 shares of common stock is $106,025 and was determined based on the market price of Discount's common stock on the approximate announcement date of the acquisition. The cost assigned to the 575 options to purchase common stock is $1,104 and was determined using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model with the following assumptions: (i) risk-free interest rate of 3.92%; (ii) an expected life of two years; (iii) a volatility factor of 40%; (iv) a fair value of common stock of $24.60; and (v) expected dividend yield of zero. The following table summarizes the amounts assigned to assets acquired and liabilities assumed at the date of the acquisition, including additional purchase accounting adjustments through October 5, 2002.
 
 
 
 
Total acquisition costs related to the transaction were approximately $9,451. During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and the fiscal year ended December 29, 2001, the Company also incurred $26,442 and $4,854, respectively, of merger and integration and merger-related restructuring expenses. These expenses represent non-recurring costs associated with integrating the Discount operations.
 
In addition to the acquisition costs, the Company incurred $20,803 of costs and fees, of which $20,140 has been recorded as deferred debt issuance costs and $663 as stock issuance costs related to registering shares in connection with the Discount acquisition.
 
The following unaudited pro forma information presents the results of operations of the Company as if the acquisition had taken place at the beginning of the applicable period:
 
 
 
 
The pro forma amounts give effect to certain adjustments, including changes in interest expense, depreciation and amortization and related income tax effects. These amounts are based on certain assumptions and estimates and do not reflect any benefit from economies that might be achieved from combined operations. Additionally, these results include the non-recurring items separately disclosed in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations. The pro forma results of operations have been prepared for comparative purposes only and do not purport to be indicative of the results of operations that actually would have resulted had the Discount acquisition occurred on the date indicated, or which may result in the future.
 
Trak Acquisition
 
On July 23, 2002, the Company announced that it had received bankruptcy court approval to acquire certain assets of Trak Auto Corporation, or Trak, including the leases on 55 stores in Virginia, Washington, D.C. and Maryland. The closing of the acquisition occurred July 26, 2002, although the legal transfer and conversion of these stores will take place through the end of November 2002. On September 20, 2002, the Company agreed to acquire two additional Trak stores. Under these agreements, the Company will pay up to $16,000 to purchase inventory and fixtures for all the acquired stores. The acquisition will be accounted for under the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, each store's results of operations will be included in the Company's financial records from the date each store is transferred to the Company. As of October 5, 2002, the Company had taken ownership and converted 22 of the 57 stores, assumed the respective lease obligations and had paid $2,764 for inventory and fixtures.
 
Carport Acquisition
 
On April 23, 2001, the Company completed its acquisition of Carport Auto Parts, Inc., or Carport. The acquisition included a net 30 retail stores located in Alabama and Mississippi, and substantially all of the assets used in Carport's operations. The acquisition has been accounted for under the purchase method of accounting and, accordingly, Carport's results of operations have been included in the Company's consolidated statement of operations since the acquisition date.
 
The purchase price of $21,533 has been allocated to the assets acquired and the liabilities assumed based on their fair values at the date of acquisition. This allocation resulted in the recognition of $3,695 in goodwill, of which $444 was amortized during fiscal 2001.
 
4.    Closed Store and Restructuring Liabilities:
 
The Company's restructuring activities relate to the ongoing analysis of the profitability of store locations and the settlement of restructuring activities undertaken as a result of mergers and acquisitions, including the fiscal 1998 merger with Western Auto Supply Company, or Western, and the fiscal 2001 acquisitions of Carport and Discount. The Company recognizes a provision for future obligations at the time a decision is made to close a facility, primarily store locations. The provision for closed facilities includes the present value of the remaining lease obligations, reduced by the present value of estimated revenues from subleases, and management's estimate of future costs of insurance, property tax and common area maintenance. The Company uses discount rates ranging from 6.5% to 7.7%. Expenses associated with the ongoing restructuring program are included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations. From time to time these estimates require revisions that affect the amount of the recorded liability. The effect of these changes in estimates is netted with new provisions and included in selling, general and administrative expenses in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
 
 
Closed Store Liabilities
 
During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company closed or relocated nine of the 12 stores identified in fiscal 2001 as not meeting profitability objectives and decided to close or relocate 49 additional stores that did not meet profitability objectives, 28 of which were closed at October 5, 2002. As part of the integration of Discount, the Company has closed substantially all of the Advance Auto Parts stores that were identified in overlapping markets with certain Discount Auto Parts stores at December 29, 2001.
 
In connection with the Western merger and the Discount acquisition, the Company assumed the restructuring reserves related to the acquired operations. As of October 5, 2002, these restructuring reserves relate primarily to ongoing lease obligations for closed store locations.
 
A reconciliation of activity with respect to these restructuring accruals is as follows:
 
 
As of October 5, 2002, these accruals represent the current value required for certain facility exit costs, which will be settled over the remaining terms of the underlying lease agreements. This liability, along with those associated with mergers and acquisitions, is recorded in accrued expenses (current portion) and other long-term liabilities (long-term portion) in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
 
Restructuring Associated with Mergers and Acquisitions
 
As a result of the Western merger, the Company established restructuring reserves in connection with the decision to close certain retail stores, to relocate certain Western administrative functions, to exit certain facility leases and to terminate certain team members of Western. Additionally, the Carport acquisition resulted in
 
 
restructuring reserves for closing certain acquired stores not expected to meet long-term profitability objectives and the termination of certain administrative team members. At October 5, 2002, the remaining liabilities associated with these activities primarily relate to the settlement of facility exit costs.
 
As of the date of the Discount acquisition, management formalized a plan to close certain Discount Auto Parts stores in overlapping markets or stores not meeting the Company's profitability objectives, to relocate certain Discount administrative functions to the Company's headquarters and to terminate certain management, administrative and support team members of Discount. During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company reduced its purchase price liabilities for severance and relocation costs by $2,715, primarily for voluntary terminations and certain Discount team members that accepted positions with the Company. The Company also reduced its liabilities for store and other exit costs, previously recorded in purchase accounting, by $1,042 as a result of executing lease buyouts or subleases. At October 5, 2002, 107 Discount stores were closed, 105 of which were closed during the first three quarters of fiscal 2002. The Company has substantially completed the closure of Discount Auto Parts stores in overlapping markets. Additionally, the Company has finalized its plan for termination of Discount team members and expects to terminate the last team members in 2003. Additional liabilities for severance, relocation, store and other facility exit costs may result in an adjustment to the purchase price.
 
A reconciliation of activity with respect to these restructuring accruals is as follows:
 
 
Other exit cost liabilities will primarily be settled over the remaining terms of the underlying lease agreements.
 
 
 
5.    Receivables:
 
Receivables consist of the following:
 
 
6.    Inventories, net
 
Inventories are stated at the lower of cost or market. Inventory quantities are tracked through a perpetual inventory system. The Company uses a cycle counting program to ensure the accuracy of the perpetual inventory quantities and establishes reserves for estimated shrink based on historical accuracy of the cycle counting program. Cost was determined using the last-in, first-out, or LIFO, method for approximately 90% of inventories at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, and the first-in, first-out, or FIFO, method for remaining inventories. An actual valuation of inventory under the LIFO method can only be made at the end of each fiscal year based on the inventory levels and costs at that time. Accordingly, interim LIFO calculations are based on management's estimates of expected fiscal year-end inventory levels and costs. The Company capitalizes certain purchasing and warehousing costs into inventory. Purchasing and warehousing costs included in inventory, at FIFO, at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, were $67,192 and $69,398, respectively. The nature of the Company's inventory is such that the risk of obsolescence is minimal. In addition, the Company has historically been able to return excess items to the vendor for credit. The Company does provide reserves where less than full credit will be received for such returns and where the Company anticipates that items will be sold at retail for prices that are less than recorded cost. Inventories consist of the following:
 
 
Replacement cost approximated FIFO cost at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001.
 
 
 
During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2001, the Company recorded a non-recurring expense of $10,493 ($9,099 in gross profit and $1,394 in selling, general and administrative expenses) related to the Company's supply chain initiatives. These initiatives will reduce the Company's overall inventory investment as a result of only offering selective products in specific store locations or regions. The gross profit charges relates primarily to restocking and handling fees associated with inventory identified for return to the Company's vendors. Additionally, the general and administrative expenses included costs associated with the relocation of certain equipment from a distribution facility closed as part of these initiatives.
 
7.    Property and Equipment:
 
Property and equipment are stated at cost, less accumulated depreciation and amortization. Expenditures for maintenance and repairs are charged directly to expense when incurred; major improvements are capitalized. When items are sold or retired, the related cost and accumulated depreciation are removed from the accounts, with any gain or loss reflected in the consolidated statements of operations.
 
Depreciation of land improvements, buildings, furniture, fixtures and equipment, and vehicles is provided over the estimated useful lives, which range from 2 to 40 years, of the respective assets using the straight-line method. Amortization of building and leasehold improvements is provided over the shorter of the estimated useful lives of the respective assets or the term of the lease using the straight-line method.
 
Property and equipment consists of the following:
 
 
Depreciation and amortization expense was $71,455 and $53,629 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, respectively. Depreciation and amortization expense was $70,745, $66,826 and $58,147 for the fiscal years ended 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively. The Company capitalized approximately $1,481 and $17,862 of primarily third party costs incurred in the development of internal use computer software during the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001 and $19,699, $9,400 and $561 during fiscal years 2001, 2000 and 1999, respectively.
 
8.    Assets Held for Sale
 
The Company applies SFAS No. 144, "Accounting for the Impairment or Disposal of Long-Lived Assets," which requires that long-lived assets and certain identifiable intangible assets to be disposed of be reported at the
 
 
lower of the carrying amount or the fair market value less selling costs. At October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, the Company's assets held for sale were $38,569 and $60,512, respectively, primarily consisting of real property acquired in the Western merger and Discount acquisition.
 
During fiscal 2001, the Company recorded an impairment charge of $12,300, to reduce the carrying value of certain non-operating facilities to their estimated fair market value. $4,700 of the charge represents the write-down of a closed distribution center acquired as part of the Western merger included in the Wholesale segment. $4,600 represents the reduction in carrying value of the former Western Auto corporate office also acquired in the Western merger. The facility, which is held in the Wholesale segment, consists of excess space not required for the Company's current needs. The remaining $3,000 represents a reduction to the carrying value of a recently closed distribution center in Jeffersonville, Ohio, held in the Retail segment, that was identified for closure as part of the Company's supply chain review. The carrying value for these properties included in assets held for sale was $8,900 and $13,800 at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, respectively. The reduction in these book values represents the Company's best estimate of fair market value based on recent marketing efforts to attract buyers for these properties.
 
During fiscal 2000, the Company also recorded an impairment related to the Western Auto corporate office space. The impairment charge of $856 reduced the carrying value to $8,000.
 
9.    Other Assets:
 
As of October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, other assets include deferred debt issuance costs of $15,554 and $25,790, respectively (net of accumulated amortization of $5,523 and $3,597, respectively), relating primarily to the financing in connection with the Discount acquisition and the fiscal 1998 recapitalization. Such costs are being amortized over the term of the related debt (5 years to 11 years). Other assets also include the non-current portion of deferred income tax assets.
 
10.    Accrued Expenses:
 
Accrued expenses consist of the following:
 
 
 
 
11.    Other Long-term Liabilities:
 
Other long-term liabilities consist of the following:
 
 
12.    Long-term Debt:
 
Long-term debt consists of the following:
 
 
 
 
Senior Debt:
 
During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company repaid a portion of its tranche A and tranche B term loan facilities and refinanced the remaining portion of its tranche B term loan facility under its existing senior credit facility by amending and restating the credit facility to add a new $250,000 tranche C term loan facility. The borrowings under the tranche C term loan facility were used to refinance the tranche B term loan facility. The tranche B term loan facility was initially issued for $305,000 in fiscal 2001 in connection with the Discount acquisition and had a balance of $265,000 prior to the refinancing. In conjunction with the extinguishment of this debt, the Company wrote-off deferred financing costs in accordance with Emerging Issues Task Force Issue No. 96-19, "Debtor's Accounting for a Modification or Exchange of Debt Instruments". The write-off of these costs are classified as an extraordinary loss of $5,155, net of $3,268 income taxes, in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations. At October 5, 2002, the credit facility provided for (1) $339,484 in term loans, consisting of a $89,611 tranche A term loan facility and a $249,873 tranche C term loan facility and (2) $160,000 under a revolving credit facility (which provides for the issuance of letters of credit with a sublimit of $35,000). As of October 5, 2002, the Company had no borrowings outstanding under the revolving credit facility and had $27,265 in letters of credit outstanding, which reduced availability under the credit facility to approximately $132,735.
 
The amended tranche A term loan facility amortization schedule currently reflects required repayments of $1,549 on May 31, 2003, $7,804 on November 30, 2003, $12,418 in May and November 2004 and $13,956 each May and November during 2005 and 2006 through maturity on November 30, 2006. Under the amended credit facility, the tranche C term loan facility requires scheduled repayments of $2,183 semi-annually beginning November 30, 2003 through May 31, 2007, and the Company will be required to pay the remaining balance at maturity on November 30, 2007.
 
The interest rates on the tranche A term loan facility, the revolving credit facility and tranche C term loan facility are based, at the Company's option, on either an adjusted LIBOR rate, plus a margin, or an alternate base rate, plus a margin. The interest rates under the tranche A term loan facility, the revolving credit facility and the tranche C term loan facility are subject to adjustment according to pricing grids based upon the Company's leverage ratio (as defined in the Company's credit facility). The initial margins for the tranche A term loan facility and the revolving credit facility are 3.50% and 2.50% per annum for the adjusted LIBOR rate and alternate base rate borrowings, respectively, and can step down incrementally to 2.25% and 1.25% per annum, respectively, if the Company's leverage ratio is less than 2.00 to 1.00. The initial margins for the tranche C term loan facility are 2.5% and 1.5% per annum for the adjusted LIBOR rate and alternative base rate borrowings, respectively, and can step down to 2.25% and 1.25% per annum, respectively, if the Company's leverage ratio is less than 2.00 to 1.00. The initial margins for the tranche C term loan facility can step up to a maximum of 3.00% and 2.00% per annum, respectively, if the Company's leverage ratio is greater than 3.50 to 1.00. Subsequent to October 5, 2002, the Company applied for a reduction in the rates based on the Company's leverage ratio being 1.95 to 1.00 at October 5, 2002. A commitment fee of 0.50% per annum will be charged on the unused portion of the revolving credit facility, payable quarterly in arrears.
 
Borrowings under the senior credit facility are required to be prepaid, subject to certain exceptions, with (1) 50% of the Excess Cash Flow (as defined in the senior credit facility) unless the Company's Leverage Ratio at the end of any fiscal year is 2.0 or less, in which case 25% of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year will be required to be repaid, (2) 100% of the net cash proceeds of all asset sales or other dispositions of property by the
 
 
Company and its subsidiaries, subject to certain exceptions (including exceptions for reinvestment of certain asset sale proceeds within 270 days of such sale and certain sale-leaseback transactions), and (3) 100% of the net proceeds of certain issuances of debt or equity by the Company and its subsidiaries. The Company was required to make an Excess Cash Flow prepayment of $228 for fiscal 2001 in first quarter of fiscal 2002 under the then current credit facility.
 
Voluntary prepayments and voluntary reductions of the unutilized portion of the revolving credit facility are permitted in whole or in part, at the Company's option, in minimum principal amounts specified in the senior credit facility, without premium or penalty, subject to reimbursement of the lenders' redeployment costs in the case of a prepayment of adjusted LIBOR borrowings other than on the last day of the relevant interest period. Voluntary prepayments under the tranche A term loan facility and the tranche C term loan facility will (1) generally be allocated among those facilities on a pro rata basis (based on the then outstanding principal amount of the loans under each facility) and (2) within each such facility, be applied to the installments under the amortization schedule within the following 12 months under such facility and all remaining amounts will be applied pro rata to the remaining amortization payments under such facility.
 
The senior credit facility is guaranteed by the Company and by each of its existing domestic subsidiaries and will be guaranteed by all future domestic subsidiaries. The senior credit facility is secured by a first priority lien on substantially all, subject to certain exceptions, of the Company's properties and assets and the properties and assets of its existing domestic subsidiaries (including Discount and its subsidiaries) and will be secured by the properties and assets of its future domestic subsidiaries. The senior credit facility contains covenants restricting the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to, among other things, (1) declare dividends or redeem or repurchase capital stock, (2) prepay, redeem or purchase debt, (3) incur liens or engage in sale-leaseback transactions, (4) make loans and investments, (5) incur additional debt (including hedging arrangements), (6) engage in certain mergers, acquisitions and asset sales, (7) engage in transactions with affiliates, (8) change the nature of the Company's business and the business conducted by our subsidiaries and (9) change the holding company status of Advance. The Company is required to comply with financial covenants with respect to a maximum leverage ratio, a minimum interest coverage ratio, a minimum current assets to funded senior debt ratio, a maximum senior leverage ratio and maximum limits on capital expenditures.
 
On December 31, 1997, the Company entered into an agreement with McDuffie County Authority under which bond proceeds of $10,000 were issued to construct a distribution center. Proceeds of the bond offering were fully expended during fiscal 1999. These industrial development revenue bonds currently bear interest at a variable rate, with a one-time option to convert to a fixed rate, and are secured by a letter of credit. Subsequent to October 5, 2002, the Company repaid the indebtedness in full.
 
Subordinated Debt:
 
The 1998 Senior Subordinated Notes, or the Notes, and the 2001 Senior Subordinated Notes, or the New Notes, are both unsecured and are subordinate in right of payment to all existing and future Senior Debt. The Notes and New Notes are redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, at any time on or after April 15, 2003. The New Notes accrete at an effective yield of 11.875% less cash interest of 10.250% through maturity in April 2008. As of October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, the New Notes have been accreted by $1,474 and $309, respectively, with corresponding interest expense of $1,165 and $309 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and fiscal year ended December 29, 2001, respectively.
 
 
 
Upon the occurrence of a change of control, each holder of the Notes and the New Notes will have the right to require the Company to repurchase all or any part of such holder's Notes and New Notes at an offering price in cash equal to 101 percent of the aggregate principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest and liquidated damages, if any, thereon to the date of purchase.
 
The Notes and the New Notes contain various non-financial restrictive covenants that limit, among other things, the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to issue preferred stock, repurchase stock and incur certain indebtedness, engage in transactions with affiliates, pay dividends or certain other distributions, make certain investments and sell stock of subsidiaries.
 
During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company repurchased and retired a portion of the Notes and New Notes at prices ranging from 106 to 107 percent on the total face value purchased of $24,135. Additionally, during the third quarter of fiscal 2002, the Company repurchased and retired a portion of the Notes and New Notes at prices ranging from 106 to 107 percent on the total face value purchased of $3,505. The premiums paid and the write-off of the related deferred financing costs are classified as an extraordinary loss of $2,383, net of $1,511 income taxes, in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
During fiscal 2000, the Company repurchased on the open market $30,550 face value of Notes at a price ranging from 81.5 to 82.5 percent of their face value. Accordingly, the Company recorded a gain related to the extinguishment of this debt of $2,933, net of $1,759 provided for income taxes and $868 for the write off of the associated deferred debt issuance costs.
 
The Discount Debentures, or the Debentures, are subordinated to substantially all of the Company's other liabilities. The Debentures are redeemable at the option of the Company, in whole or in part, at any time on or after April 15, 2003. The Debentures accrete at a rate of 12.875%, compounded semi-annually, to an aggregate principal amount of $95,550 by April 15, 2003. Cash interest will not accrue on the Debentures prior to April 15, 2003. Commencing April 15, 2003, cash interest on the Debentures will accrue and be payable, at a rate of 12.875% per annum, semi-annually in arrears on each April 15 and October 15. As of October 5, 2002, the Debentures have been accreted by $29,484 with corresponding interest expense of $8,969 and $8,417 recognized for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, respectively. As of December 29, 2001, the Debentures have been accreted by $35,357 with corresponding interest expense of $11,159, $9,853 and $8,700 recognized for the fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000.
 
Upon the occurrence of a change of control, each holder of the Debentures will have the right to require the Company to purchase the Debentures at a price in cash equal to 101 percent of the accreted value thereof plus liquidated damages, if any, thereon in the case of any such purchase prior to April 15, 2003, or 101% of the aggregate principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest and liquidated damages, if any, thereon to the date of purchase in the case of any such purchase on or after April 15, 2003. As Advance may not have any significant assets other than capital stock of Stores (which is pledged to secure Advance's obligations under the senior credit facility), the Company's ability to purchase all or any part of the Debentures upon the occurrence of a change in control will be dependent upon the receipt of dividends or other distributions from Stores or its subsidiaries. The senior credit facility, the Notes and the New Notes have certain restrictions for Stores with respect to paying dividends and making any other distributions.
 
 
 
The Debentures contain certain non-financial restrictive covenants that are similar to the covenants contained in the Notes and the New Notes.
 
During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company also repurchased and retired a portion of the Debentures at prices approximating 100 percent of the total face value purchased of $16,450. The premiums paid and the write-off of the related deferred financing costs are classified as an extraordinary loss of $1,155, net of $734 income taxes, in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations.
 
As of October 5, 2002, the Company was in compliance with the covenants of the senior credit facility, the Notes, the New Notes and Debentures. Substantially all of the net assets of the Company's subsidiaries are restricted at October 5, 2002.
 
The aggregate future annual maturities of long-term debt, net of the unamortized discount related to the Notes, New Notes and the Debentures, are as follows:
 
 
13.    Stockholder Subscription Receivables:
 
The Company established a stock subscription plan in fiscal 1998, which allows certain directors, officers and key team members of the Company to purchase shares of common stock. The plan requires that the purchase price of the stock equal the fair market value at the time of the purchase and allows fifty percent of the purchase price to be executed through the delivery of a full recourse promissory note. The notes provide for annual interest payments, at the prime rate (4.75% at October 5, 2002), with the entire principal amount due in five years. As of October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, outstanding stockholder subscription receivables were $1,819 and $2,676, respectively, and are included as a reduction to stockholders' equity in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
 
 
 
14.    Income Taxes:
 
Provision (benefit) for income taxes for the forty week periods ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001 (unaudited) and the fiscal years ended 2001, 2000 and 1999 consists of the following:
 
 
 
 
The provision (benefit) for income taxes differed from the amount computed by applying the federal statutory income tax rate due to:
 
 
Deferred income taxes are recognized for the tax consequences in future years of differences between the tax bases of assets and liabilities and their financial reporting amounts at each period-end, based on enacted tax laws and statutory income tax rates applicable to the periods in which the differences are expected to affect taxable income. Deferred income taxes reflect the net income tax effect of temporary differences between the bases of assets and liabilities for financial reporting purposes and for income tax reporting purposes. Net deferred income tax balances are comprised of the following:
 
 
The Company incurred financial reporting and tax losses in 1999 primarily due to integration and interest costs incurred as a result of the fiscal 1998 Western merger and the 1998 recapitalization. At October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, the Company has cumulative net deferred income tax assets of $4,140 and $32,096, respectively. The gross deferred income tax assets also include federal and state net operating loss carryforwards, or NOLs, of approximately $8,179. These NOLs may be used to reduce future taxable income and expire periodically through fiscal year 2020. The Company believes it will realize these tax benefits through a combination of the reversal of temporary differences, projected future taxable income during the NOL carryforward periods and available tax planning strategies. Due to uncertainties related to the realization of certain deferred tax assets for NOLs in various jurisdictions, the Company recorded a valuation allowance of $1,335 as of October 5, 2002 and $1,554 as of December 29, 2001. The amount of deferred income tax assets realizable, however, could change in the near future if estimates of future taxable income are changed.
 
 
 
Temporary differences which give rise to significant deferred income tax assets (liabilities) are as follows:
 
 
These amounts are recorded in other current assets, other current liabilities and other assets in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets, as appropriate.
 
The Company currently has four years that are open to audit by the Internal Revenue Service. In addition, various state and foreign income tax returns for several years are open to audit. In management's opinion, any amounts assessed will not have a material effect on the Company's financial position or results of operations.
 
Additionally, the Company has certain periods open to examination by taxing authorities in various states for sales and use tax. In management's opinion, any amounts assessed will not have a material effect on the Company's financial position or results of operations.
 
15.    Lease Commitments:
 
The Company leases store locations, distribution centers, office space, equipment and vehicles under lease arrangements that extend through 2024, some of which are with related parties. Certain terms of the related-party leases are more favorable to the landlord than those contained in leases with non-affiliates.
 
 
 
At October 5, 2002, future minimum lease payments due under non-cancelable operating leases are as follows:
 
 
At October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, future minimum sub-lease income to be received under non-cancelable operating leases is $8,309 and $8,935, respectively.
 
Net rent expense for forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001 and the fiscal years ended 2001, 2000 and 1999 was as follows:
 
 
Contingent facility rentals are determined on the basis of a percentage of sales in excess of stipulated minimums for certain store facilities. Most of the leases provide that the Company pay taxes, maintenance, insurance and certain other expenses applicable to the leased premises and include options to renew. Certain leases contain rent escalation clauses, which are recorded on a straight-line basis. Management expects that, in the normal course of business, leases that expire will be renewed or replaced by other leases.
 
Rental payments to related parties of approximately $3,085, $3,143, $3,824, $3,921 and $3,998 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, and fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000, respectively, are included in net rent expense.
 
 
 
16.    Installment Sales Program:
 
A subsidiary of the Company maintains an in-house finance program, which offers financing to retail customers. Finance charges of $2,984 and $2,523 on the installment sales program are included in net sales in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, respectively. Finance charges of $3,343, $3,063 and $2,662 on the installment sales program are included in net sales in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000, respectively. The cost of administering the installment sales program is included in selling, general and administrative expenses.
 
17.    Subsequent Events:
 
On November 1, 2002, the Company filed a registration statement on Form S-3 with the United States Securities and Exchange Commission to register the sale of 9,442,331 shares of its common stock, of which 8,596,937 shares will be offered by certain selling stockholders and 858,394 shares will be offered by the Company and one of the selling stockholders to cover over-allotments of shares, if any. The Company will not receive any of the proceeds from the shares sold in the offering by the selling stockholders.
 
Additionally, on November 1, 2002, the Company purchased $10,000 of indebtedness under the McDuffie County Authority industrial revenue bonds, from which the proceeds were used to construct one of the Company's distribution centers. The Company has leased this facility since its opening in 1999. Upon repayment of this indebtedness, the Company also exercised its option to purchase the distribution center for a nominal amount. Subsequent to the end of the third quarter, the Company also repurchased and retired $8,500 in face value of the 10.25% senior subordinated notes.
 
18.    Contingencies:
 
In the case of all known contingencies, the Company accrues for an obligation, including estimated legal costs, when it is probable and the amount is reasonably estimable. As facts concerning contingencies become known to the Company, the Company reassesses its position with respect to accrued liabilities and other potential exposures. Estimates that are particularly sensitive to future change include tax and legal matters, which are subject to change as events evolve and as additional information becomes available during the administrative and litigation process.
 
In March 2000, the Company was notified it has been named in a lawsuit filed on behalf of independent retailers and jobbers against the Company and others for various claims under the Robinson-Patman Act. On October 18, 2001, the court denied, on all but one count, a motion by the Company and other defendants to dismiss this lawsuit. The discovery phase of the litigation has commenced (including with respect to the Company). The Company continues to believe that the claims are without merit and intends to defend them vigorously; however, the ultimate outcome of this matter cannot be ascertained at this time.
 
In January 1999, the Company was notified by the United States Environmental Protection Agency, or EPA, that Western Auto and other parties may have potential liability under the Comprehensive Environmental Response Compensation and Liability Act relating to two battery salvage and recycling sites that were in operation in the 1970s and 1980s. The EPA has indicated the total cleanup for this site will be approximately
 
 
$1,600. This matter has since been settled for an amount not material to the Company's financial position or results of operations.
 
Sears, Roebuck and Co. , or Sears, has agreed to indemnify the Company for certain other litigation and environmental matters of Western that existed as of the Western merger date. The Company recorded a receivable from Sears of approximately $2,685 relating to certain environmental matters that had been accrued by Western as of the Western merger date. During the first quarter of 2001, the Company received notification from Sears that certain of these matters have been settled. Accordingly, the Company reversed $2,500 of the previously recorded $2,685 receivable due from Sears and reduced the corresponding environmental liability. Additionally, as of the Western merger date, Sears has agreed to indemnify partially the Company for up to 5 years for certain additional environmental matters that may arise relating to the period prior to the Western merger. The Company's maximum exposure during the indemnification period for certain matters covered in the Western merger agreement is $3,750.
 
In November 1997 a plaintiff, on behalf of himself and others similarly situated, filed a class action complaint and motion of class certification against the Company in the circuit court for Jefferson County, Tennessee, alleging misconduct in the sale of automobile batteries. The complaint seeks compensatory and punitive damages. In September 2001, the court granted the Company's motion for summary judgement and dismissed all claims against the Company in this matter. The period for appeal has not expired. The Company believes it has no liability for such claims and intends to defend them vigorously. In addition, three lawsuits were filed against the Company on July 28, 1998, for wrongful death relating to an automobile accident involving a team member of the Company. This matter has since been settled with no impact to the Company's financial position or results of operations.
 
In October 2000, a vendor repudiated a long-term purchase agreement entered into with the Company in January 2000. The Company filed suit against the vendor in November of fiscal 2000 to recover monetary damages. Based on consultation with the Company's legal counsel, management believed the purchase agreement was entered into in good faith and it was highly probable that the Company would prevail in its suit. Therefore, the Company recorded a gain of $3,300, which represented actual damages incurred through December 30, 2000, as a reduction of cost of sales in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 30, 2000. Related income taxes and legal fees of $1,300 were also recorded in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations for the year ended December 30, 2000. During the first quarter of fiscal 2001, the Company reached a settlement with this vendor and recorded a net gain of $8,300 as a reduction to cost of sales in the accompanying consolidated statement of operations for the forty weeks ended October 6, 2001.
 
The Company is also involved in various other claims and lawsuits arising in the normal course of business. The damages claimed against the Company in some of these proceedings are substantial. Although the final outcome of these legal matters cannot be determined, based on the facts presently known, it is management's opinion that the final outcome of such claims and lawsuits will not have a material adverse effect on the Company's financial position or results of operations.
 
The Company is self-insured with respect to workers' compensation and health care claims for eligible active team members. In addition, the Company is self-insured for general and automobile liability claims. The Company maintains certain levels of stop-loss insurance coverage for these claims through an independent
 
 
insurance provider. The cost of self-insurance claims is accrued based on actual claims reported plus an estimate for claims incurred but not reported. These estimates are based on historical information along with certain assumptions about future events, and are subject to change as additional information becomes available.
 
The Company has entered into employment agreements with certain team members that provide severance pay benefits under certain circumstances after a change in control of the Company or upon termination of the team member by the Company. The maximum contingent liability under these employment agreements is approximately $10,294 and $10,231 at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, respectively.
 
19.    Related Party Transactions:
 
Under the terms of a shared services agreement, Sears provided certain services to the Company, including payroll and payable processing for Western, among other services through the third quarter of fiscal year 1999. The Company and Sears have entered into agreements that provide for the Western stores to continue to purchase, at normal retail prices, and carry certain Sears branded products during periods defined in the agreements. The Company purchased directly from the manufacturers of Sears branded products of approximately $4,502 and $4,595 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001. The Company purchased directly from the manufacturers of Sears branded products of approximately $4,600, $9,200 and $13,500 for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000, respectively. The Company is also a first-call supplier of certain automotive products to certain Sears Automotive Group stores. Additionally, Sears arranged to buy from the Company certain products in bulk for its automotive centers through January 1999. These transactions are completed at the Company's normal retail prices. These amounts are included in net sales to Sears in the following table and have been negotiated based on the fair values of the underlying transactions.
 
The following table presents the related party transactions with Sears for the forty week periods ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001 and the fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, December 30, 2000 and January 1, 2000 and as of October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001:
 
 
 
In September 2001, the Company loaned a member of the Board of Directors $1,300. In June 2002, the board member repaid the loan in full. This loan was evidenced by a full recourse promissory note bearing interest at prime rate, payable annually, and was due in full in five years from its inception. Payment of the promissory
 
 
note was secured by a stock pledge agreement that granted the Company a security interest in all shares of common stock owned by the board member under the Company's stock subscription plan.
 
20.    Benefit Plans:
 
401(k) Plan
 
The Company maintains a defined contribution team member benefit plan, which covers substantially all team members after one year of service. The plan allows for team member salary deferrals, which are matched at the Company's discretion. The Company's contributions were $5,108 and $3,940 for the forty week periods ended October 5, 2002 and October 6, 2001, respectively and $5,238 in fiscal 2001, $5,245 in fiscal 2000, and $4,756 in fiscal 1999. All team members covered under the Discount plan were included in the Company's plan effective May 31, 2002.
 
The Company also maintains a profit sharing plan covering Western team members that was frozen prior to the Western Merger on November 2, 1998. This plan covered all full-time team members who had completed one year of service and had attained the age of 21 on the first day of each month. All team members covered under this plan were included in the Company's plan on October 5, 2002.
 
Deferred Compensation
 
The Company maintained an unfunded deferred compensation plan established for certain key team members of Discount prior to the acquisition on November 28, 2001, which the Company terminated on May 31, 2002. The Company assumed the plan liability of $1,382 through the Discount acquisition. The Company has reflected this liability in accrued expenses in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
 
The Company maintains an unfunded deferred compensation plan established for certain key team members of Western prior to the fiscal 1998 Western merger. The Company assumed the plan liability of $15,253 through the Western merger. The plan was frozen at the date of the Western merger. As of October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, $2,973 and $4,291, respectively, was accrued with the current portion included in accrued expenses and the long-term portion in other long-term liabilities in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets.
 
Postretirement Plan
 
The Company provides certain health care and life insurance benefits for eligible retired team members. Team members retiring from the Company with 20 consecutive years of service after age 40 are eligible for these benefits, subject to deductibles, co-payment provisions and other limitations.
 
The estimated cost of retiree health and life insurance benefits is recognized over the years that the team members render service as required by SFAS No. 106, "Employers Accounting for Postretirement Benefits Other Than Pensions." The initial accumulated liability, measured as of January 1, 1995, the date the Company adopted SFAS No. 106, is being recognized over a 20-year amortization period.
 
In connection with the Western merger, the Company assumed Western's benefit obligation under its postretirement health care plan. This plan was merged into the Company's plan effective July 1, 1999.
 
 
 
The Company maintains the existing plan and the assumed plan covering Western team members. Financial information related to the plans was determined by the Company's independent actuaries as of October 5, 2002, December 29, 2001 and December 30, 2000. The following provides a reconciliation of the accrued benefit obligation included in other long-term liabilities in the accompanying consolidated balance sheets and the funded status of the plan:
 
 
Net periodic postretirement benefit cost is as follows:
 
 
The postretirement benefit obligation was computed using an assumed discount rate of 6.75% for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 and 7.5% in 2001 and 2000. The health care cost trend rate was assumed to be 12.5% for 2002, 11.5% for 2003, 10.5% for 2004, 9.5% for 2005, 8.5% for 2006, 7.5% for 2007, and 5.0% to 7.0% for 2008 and thereafter.
 
 
 
If the health care cost were increased 1% for all future years the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation would have increased by $1,756 as of October 5, 2002. The effect of this change on the combined service and interest cost would have been an increase of $84 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002.
 
If the health care cost were decreased 1% for all future years the accumulated postretirement benefit obligation would have decreased by $1,471 as of October 5, 2002. The effect of this change on the combined service and interest cost would have been a decrease of $77 for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002.
 
The Company reserves the right to change or terminate the benefits or contributions at any time. The Company also continues to evaluate ways in which it can better manage these benefits and control costs. Any changes in the plan or revisions to assumptions that affect the amount of expected future benefits may have a significant impact on the amount of the reported obligation and annual expense.
 
21.    Stock Options:
 
The Company maintains a senior executive stock option plan and an executive stock option plan, or the Option Plans, for key team members of the Company. The Option Plans provide for the granting of non-qualified stock options. All options terminate on the seventh anniversary of the grant date. Shares authorized for grant under the senior executive and the executive stock option plans are 1,710 and 3,600, respectively, at October 5, 2002.
 
The Company has historically maintained three types of option plans; Fixed Price Service Options, or Fixed Options, Performance Options, or Performance Options, and Variable Option plans, or Variable Options. The Fixed Options vest over a three-year period in three equal installments beginning on the first anniversary of the grant date. During the fourth quarter of fiscal 2001, the board of directors approved an amendment to the Performance Options and the Variable Options. The amendment accelerated the vesting of the Performance Options by removing the variable provisions under the plan and established a fixed exercise price of $18.00 per share for the Variable Options. As a result of the increase in the Company's stock price and the above amendment, the Company recorded a one-time expense of $8,611 in fiscal 2001 to record the associated compensation expense.
 
Additionally, as a result of the Discount acquisition, the Company converted all outstanding stock options of Discount with an exercise price greater than $15.00 per share to options to purchase the Company's common stock. The Company converted 575 options from the executive stock option plan at a weighted-average exercise price of $38.89 per share. These options will terminate on the tenth anniversary of the original option agreement between Discount and the team member and as of October 5, 2002, had a weighted-average contractual life of four years. At October 5, 2002, all Discount shares were exercisable and had a range of exercise prices of $31.77 to $59.18. The fair value of the 575 converted options to purchase the Company's common stock was included in the purchase price of Discount.
 
 
 
As a result of the recapitalization in fiscal 1998, an existing stockholder received stock options to purchase up to 500 shares of common stock. The stock options are fully vested, nonforfeitable and provide for a $10.00 per share exercise price, increasing $2.00 per share annually, through the expiration date of April 2005.
 
Total option activity was as follows:
 
 
 
 
All of the Variable, Performance and Other options were exercisable as of October 5, 2002 and had remaining contractual lives of 2.5 years. Additional information related to the Fixed options by range of exercise prices is as follows:
 
 
Options and all of the other options were exercisable at a weighted average exercise price of $14.07.
 
During fiscal 2000, the Company granted options at an exercise price of $16.82, which equaled the fair market value determined by the board of directors, and $20.00 and $25.00, which exceeded the then determined fair market value. The weighted-average fair value of options granted at $16.82 was $1.44. The options granted at $20.00 and $25.00 had no fair value on the grant date. During fiscal 2001, the Company granted 343 options at an exercise price of $21.00, the fair value at the date of the grant as determined by the board of directors. The fair value of the options granted at $21.00 was $13.53. During the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002, the Company granted 537 options at an exercise price of $42.00, which was the market price of the Company's stock on the date of grant. The fair value of the options granted during the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 was $9.14.
 
As permitted under SFAS No. 123, "Accounting for Stock-Based Compensation," the Company accounts for its stock options using the intrinsic value method prescribed in Accounting Principles Board Opinion No. 25, "Accounting for Stock Issued to Employees", or APB No. 25. Under APB No. 25, compensation cost for stock options is measured as the excess, if any, of the market price of the Company's common stock at the measurement date over the exercise price. Accordingly, the Company has not recognized compensation expense on the issuance of its Fixed Options because the exercise price equaled the fair market value of the underlying stock on the grant date. The excess of the fair market value per share over the exercise price per share for the Performance Options and Variable Options was recorded as outstanding stock options included in additional paid-in capital. The Company recorded compensation expense related to the Performance Options and Variable Options of $11,735 (including the one-time charge discussed above), and $729 in non-cash stock option compensation expense in the accompanying consolidated statements of operations for the fiscal years ended December 29, 2001, and December 30, 2000, respectively. No compensation expense was required to be recognized in the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002.
 
 
 
The following information is presented as if the Company elected to account for compensation cost related to the stock options using the fair value method as prescribed by SFAS No. 123:
 
 
For the above information, the fair value of each option granted in the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002 was estimated on the grant date using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model with the following assumptions: (i) weighted average risk-free interest rate of 4.45%; (ii) weighted-average expected life of options of four years; (iii) expected dividend yield of zero and (iv) volatility of 17%.
 
For the above information, the fair value of each option granted in fiscal 2001 was estimated on the grant date using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model with the following assumptions: (i) weighted average risk-free interest rate of 2.89%; (ii) weighted-average expected life of options of three years; (iii) expected dividend yield of zero and (iv) volatility of 60%.
 
For the above information, the fair value of each option granted in fiscal 2000 was estimated on the grant date using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model with the following assumptions: (i) risk-free interest rate of life of options of two and three years and (ii) expected dividend yield of zero. As permitted by SFAS No. 123 for companies with non-public equity securities, the Company used the assumption of zero volatility in valuing these options.
 
For the above information, the fair value of each option granted in fiscal 1999 was estimated on the grant date using the Black-Scholes option-pricing model with the following assumptions: (i) risk-free interest rate of life of options of two and three years and (ii) expected dividend yield of zero. As permitted by SFAS No. 123 for companies with non-public equity securities, the Company used the assumption of zero volatility in valuing these options.
 
22.    Fair Value of Financial Instruments:
 
The carrying amount of cash and cash equivalents, receivables, bank overdrafts, accounts payable, borrowings secured by receivables and current portion of long-term debt approximates fair value because of the short maturity of those instruments. The carrying amount for variable rate long-term debt approximates fair value
 
 
for similar issues available to the Company. The fair value of all fixed rate long-term debt was determined based on current market prices, which approximated $459,380 (carrying value of $423,285) and $457,804 (carrying value of $450,737) at October 5, 2002 and December 29, 2001, respectively.
 
23.    Segment and Related Information:
 
The Company has the following operating segments: Advance, Retail and Wholesale. Advance has no operations but holds certain assets and liabilities. Retail consists of the retail operations of the Company, operating under the trade name "Advance Auto Parts" and "Discount Auto Parts" in the United States and "Western Auto" in Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. Wholesale consists of the wholesale operations, including distribution services to independent dealers and franchisees primarily operating under the "Western Auto" trade name.
 
The financial information for fiscal 2000 and 1999 has been restated to reflect the operating segments described above. Prior to January 1, 2000, management received and used financial information at the Advance Stores and consolidated Western levels. The Advance Stores segment consisted of the "Advance Auto Parts" retail locations and the Western segment consisted of the "Western Auto" retail locations and wholesale operations described above. The accounting policies of the reportable segments are the same as those of the Company.
 
The financial information for fiscal 2000 and 1999 has not been restated to reflect the change in accounting policy related to cooperative advertising funds. Had the new policy been applied in fiscal 2000 and 1999, gross profit and income before provision for income taxes and extraordinary item in the Retail segment would have been $829,475 and $39,393, respectively, in fiscal 2000 and $739,563 and a loss of $21,722, respectively, in fiscal 1999. The application of the new accounting policy to the Wholesale segment would not be material.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
24.    Quarterly Financial Data (unaudited):
 
The following table summarizes quarterly financial data for the forty weeks ended October 5, 2002:
 
 
The above forty weeks ended 2002 quarterly information includes non-recurring gains and losses by quarter as follows:
 
 
 
 
The following table summarizes quarterly financial data for fiscal years 2001 and 2000:
 
 
The above fiscal 2001 quarterly information includes non-recurring gains and losses by quarter as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
The above fiscal 2000 quarterly information includes non-recurring gains and losses by quarter as follows:
 
 
Results of operations for the fiscal year ended 2000 do not reflect the Company's change in accounting principle related to cooperative advertising funds. Fiscal 2000 results of operations on a pro forma basis for this change are as follows:
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030123170603.txt.gz
TIME:20030123170603
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are
not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(a)    Exhibits.
 
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
        On January 23, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance") issued a press release which contains, among other things, information regarding Advance's comparable store sales growth for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 28, 2002 and its anticipated earnings per diluted share for the fourth quarter ended December 28, 2002. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that it achieved 3.1% comparable store sales growth in its fourth quarter ended December 28, 2002 compared to 5.2% last year. The do-it-yourself business grew by 2.7% and the do-it-for-me or commercial business grew by 5.3%. For the year, the Company achieved strong same store sales gains of 5.5% compared to 6.2% last year.
Roanoke, Virginia, January 23, 2003
 
During the fourth quarter the Company continued to produce strong operating income results, despite less than anticipated sales, by generating robust gross margins and leveraging its expenses. The Company anticipates reporting earnings per diluted share at the top end of its previously announced guidance range of $0.38 to $0.42, compared to $0.16 last year. These results include approximately $0.03 per diluted share of expenses associated with the recently completed secondary offering and exclude approximately $0.15 per diluted share of expenses associated with the integration of Discount Auto Parts and an extraordinary loss of approximately $0.05 per diluted share related to the early extinguishment of debt.
 
Advance Auto Parts reiterated its 2003 fiscal year guidance for a 25% increase in earnings per diluted share, before integration expense and a potential bond refinancing, coming from solid comparable store sales growth, increased operating margins, and reduced interest expense. The Company expects to generate substantial free cash flow of approximately $150 million in 2003.
 
"Our team members produced solid results despite tough weather conditions and disruptions caused by the Discount Auto Parts' conversion process in the Florida markets." commented Larry Castellani, Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts.
 
The Company plans to announce its complete 2002 fourth quarter and fiscal year results on February 12, 2003. At 8:00 a.m. on February 13, 2003, the Company will host a conference call to discuss its fourth quarter and fiscal year results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to . The call will be archived on that website until March 10, 2003.
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Virginia, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At December 28, 2002, the Company had 2,435 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance. The forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, terrorist activities, war and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030131152654.txt.gz
TIME:20030131152654
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code            (540) 362-4911
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
Item 9.    Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On January 30, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance") issued a press release which, among other things, discloses that Advance successfully defended itself against an antitrust lawsuit filed by a group of warehouse distributors and jobbers. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
*Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that it successfully defended itself against an antitrust lawsuit filed by a group of warehouse distributors and jobbers, that appointed themselves as the "Coalition for a Level Playing Field." A seven-member jury in the United States District Court in New York unanimously found that the Company did not receive improper price discounts from manufacturers and in no way violated the Robinson-Pactman Act.
Roanoke, Virginia, January 30, 2003
 
"After a three year fight against these meritless allegations, we are pleased that we have prevailed," said Eric M. Margolin, Senior Vice President and General Counsel, at Advance Auto Parts.
 
"Our Company was built on providing an outstanding value to our customers and doing so with the highest degree of integrity," stated Larry P. Castellani, Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts. "This is a great victory for our customers, who will continue to find high quality products at value prices at our stores."
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At December 28, 2002, the Company had 2,435 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance. The forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, terrorist activities, war and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030213155219.txt.gz
TIME:20030213155219
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: 
 
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On February 12, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance") issued a press release which contains, among other things, information regarding Advance's financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 28, 2002. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
Roanoke, Virginia, February 12, 2003
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced its comparable earnings per diluted share increased 168.8% to $0.43 for the fourth quarter ended December 28, 2002, compared to $0.16 for the same quarter last year. The Company's comparable results do not include integration expenses, one-time items in 2001 and extraordinary items as reconciled on the accompanying financial statements. The Company believes that these comparable measures are important to the Company's stockholders due to the non-recurring nature and significance of the excluded expenses. The fourth quarter $0.43 earnings per diluted share include approximately $0.03 of expenses associated with the recently completed secondary offering. On a GAAP basis, which includes integration expenses, one-time items in 2001 and extraordinary items, earnings per diluted share increased to $0.23 from a loss of $0.73 last year.
 
For the 2002 fiscal year, comparable earnings per diluted share increased 104.6% to $2.68 compared to $1.31 last year. On a GAAP basis earnings per diluted share increased to $1.80 from $0.39 last year.
 
The Company incurred pre-tax integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition of $9.1 million during the fourth quarter and $35.5 million for the year, $4.5 million below the original 2002 estimate of $40 million. In 2003, the Company estimates that it will incur approximately $10 million in integration expenses as originally planned.
 
During the fourth quarter, the Company repurchased $24.0 million in face value of its 10.25% senior subordinated notes and 12.875% senior discount debentures resulting in an after-tax extraordinary loss of $1.7 million, which includes un-amortized discounts, deferred loan fees and premiums paid. During the fiscal year, the Company repurchased $64.6 million in face value of bonds and pre-paid approximately $162 million in bank
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS
 
debt, incurring an after-tax extraordinary loss of $10.4 million relating to un-amortized discounts, write-off of deferred loan fees and premiums paid to repurchase bonds.
 
Fourth quarter sales increased 20.7% to $702.4 million, compared to $582.0 million last year. Same store sales grew 3.1% for the fourth quarter compared to 5.2% in the comparable period last year. The Discount Auto Parts stores, which joined the reported comparable store base for the last four weeks of the quarter, produced a comparable store sales increase of 3.3% during the fourth quarter compared to 2.7% the same quarter last year.
 
For the 2002 fiscal year, sales rose 30.6% to approximately $3.3 billion from $2.5 billion last year. Same store sales rose 5.5% year-to-date, compared to 6.2% last year. The Discount Auto Parts stores produced comparable store sales gains of 4.7% for the year, compared to 2.4% in 2001.
 
Comparable operating income for the fourth quarter increased 76.2% to $42.9 million from $24.4 million in the fourth quarter last year, generating an operating margin increase of 190 basis points to 6.1%. On a GAAP basis, operating income increased to $33.8 million. For the 2002 fiscal year comparable operating income rose 91.9% to $237.5 million from $123.8 million last year, generating an operating margin increase of 230 basis points to 7.2%, compared to 4.9% last year. On a GAAP basis, operating income increased to $202.0 million.
 
Comparable net income rose 226.5% in the fourth quarter to $15.9 million from $4.9 million in the fourth quarter last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased to $8.6 million compared to a loss of $21.8 million last year. Year-to-date comparable net income increased 155.0% to $97.1 million from $38.1 million last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased to $65.0 million for the fiscal year from $11.4 million last year.
 
The Company generated $165.0 million in free cash flow for the fiscal year. Free cash flow is calculated as cash provided by operating activities less cash used in investing activities. As a result of generating strong free cash flow, the Company reduced its total debt in 2003 by $220 million to $735.5 million.
 
Commenting on the fourth quarter and fiscal year results, Larry Castellani, the Company's Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our team members produced solid results for the quarter and for the fiscal year. In 2003, we will continue to focus on expanding our operating margins, generating strong free cash flow, and successfully integrating Discount Auto Parts."
 
The Company also reiterated its 2003 fiscal year guidance for a 25% increase in comparable earnings per diluted share, which excludes integration expenses and the impact of a potential bond refinancing. For the first quarter of 2003, the Company believes that it can achieve comparable earnings per diluted share of $0.70 to $0.75 compared to $0.55 last year. For the second quarter, the Company anticipates producing earnings per diluted share of $0.92 to $0.97, compared to $0.77 last year.
 
The Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts also announced today that Nicholas F. Taubman, Chairman, and Garnett E. Smith, Vice Chairman, are stepping down from the Company's Board of Directors effective immediately. Concurrently, the Board of Directors appointed Larry Castellani the Company's Chief Executive Officer to the additional position of Chairman of the Board of Directors. John M. Roth, Partner of Freeman Spogli & Co., has been appointed as Lead Director.
 
"After over 45 years of building our Company, I am leaving it in very capable hands," said Nicholas F. Taubman. "I am confident that this executive team will continue to build Advance based on the Company's
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS
 
founding principle of always providing the highest level of integrity and customer service."
 
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, February 13, 2002, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its fourth quarter and fiscal year results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website: http://www.advanceautoparts.com until March 12, 2003.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At December 28, 2002, the Company had 2,435 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
NOTE:
These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
( a ) The fiscal 2001 adjustments represent charges associated with our supply chain initiatives, expenses associated with the integration of Discount Auto Parts, compensation charges associated with certain stock option plans, the related tax effect of the above at a 39.7% effective tax rate and the reversal of the extraordinary item and cumulative effect of change in accounting principle. (See the Consolidated Financial Statements and related notes at and for the year ended December 29, 2001 for additional information)
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030307214659.txt.gz
TIME:20030307214659
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
................................................................................. SEC 873 (10/2000) Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number. ................................................................................. ---------------------------- OMB APPROVAL ---------------------------- OMB Number: 3235-0060 Expires: March 31, 2003 Estimated average burden hours per response .... 1.25 ---------------------------- UNITED STATES SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION Washington, DC 20549 FORM 8-K CURRENT REPORT Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934 Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) March 7, 2003 ------------------------------- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter) Delaware 001-16797 54-2049910 - ------------------------------- ----------------------- --------------------- (State or other jurisdiction of (Commission File Number) (IRS Employer incorporation) Identification No.) 5673 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia 24012 - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Address of principal executive offices) (Zip Code) Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911 ---------------------------- - -------------------------------------------------------------------------------- (Former name or former address, if changed since last report.) INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits. (a) Exhibits. Exhibit Number ------ 99.1 Press Release of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., dated March 6, 2003 Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure. On March 6, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance") issued a press release which contains, among other things, information regarding the amendment and restatement of Advance's existing credit agreement which increased the aggregate commitments available under the facility by approximately $350 million. Advance also announced in the press release its intention to utilize these additional commitments to redeem certain of its outstanding notes and debentures and further indicated that it intends to issue notices of redemption to the holders of the notes and debentures on March 14, 2003. Also included in the press release, Advance provided updated per share guidance giving effect to these transactions. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference. A copy of the press release is attached to this Form 8-K as Exhibit 99.1.
SIGNATURES Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized. ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC. ------------------------------------- (Registrant) Date March 7, 2003 /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray ------------------- ------------------------------------- (Signature)* Jeffrey T. Gray Senior Vice President, Controller and Assistant Secretary *Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX Exhibit Number Exhibit Description 99.1 Press Release of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., dated March 6, 2003

Exhibit 99.1 Advance [LOGO](TM) Auto Parts 5673 Airport Road Roanoke, VA 24012 Phone (540) 362-4911 Fax (540) 561-1448 CONTACT: Sheila Stuewe Sstuewe@AdvanceAutoParts.com Advance Auto Parts (540) 561-3281 ADVANCE AUTO PARTS OBTAINS $350 MILLION IN ADDITIONAL TERM LOANS AND ANNOUNCES ITS PLAN TO CALL SENIOR SUBORDINATED NOTES AND DISCOUNT DEBENTURES Roanoke, Virginia, March 6, 2003 . Received Commitments for $350 Million in Additional Term Loans . Calling $284 Million in 10.25% Senior Subordinated Notes and $91 Million in 12.875% Discount Debentures Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today it has received commitments for an additional $350 million in bank debt through an amendment to its existing Credit Agreement as amended and restated on June 28, 2002. This amendment increased the Company's Term Loan A, which matures on November 30, 2006, by $75 million to $158 million. It also increased the Company's Term Loan C, which matures on November 30, 2007, by $275 million to $523 million. The anticipated funding date for these new term loans is April 15, 2003 commensurate with the retirement of the notes and debentures as described below. JPMorgan Securities Inc. was the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner on this transaction, with SunTrust Bank and Wachovia Securities, Inc. serving as Documentation Agents. The Company also announced that on March 14, 2003 it will issue a call notice for $284 million in 10.25% Senior Subordinated Notes and $91 million in 12.875% Discount Debentures to be redeemed on April 15, 2003 with the proceeds from the refinancing and existing cash. The remaining $30 million in Senior Subordinated Notes is expected to be called and retired from free cash flow within the next two quarters. The escrow agent for this transaction will be the Bank of New York. In conjunction with the refinancing and repayment of its notes and debentures, the Company anticipates that the incremental interest savings will increase earnings per diluted share by approximately $0.20 for the remainder of 2003. The non-recurring charges associated with the refinancing will be cash call premiums and refinancing expenses of approximately $25 million, un-amortized bond discount write-offs of approximately $10 million and deferred debt issuance cost write-offs of approximately $9 million, or approximately $0.72 per share in the first quarter of 2003. Commenting on the refinancing and redemption of its notes and debentures, Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer said, "By calling our high interest bearing debt, we will significantly
Page 2 reduce our interest expense and increase our financial flexibility, giving us the ability to grow with very attractive capital costs." Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At December 28, 2002, the Company had 2,435 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030514171005.txt.gz
TIME:20030514171005
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
 
 
OMB APPROVAL
OMB Number: 3235-0060
Expires: October 31, 2005
Estimated average burden
hours per response 2.58
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  Exhibits.
 
 
 
In accordance with SEC Release No. 33-8216, the information in this Form 8-K and Exhibit 99.1 attached hereto required to be furnished under "Item 12. Results of Operations and Financial Condition" is furnished under "Item 9. Regulation FD Disclosure."
 
On May 14, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its earnings for its first quarter ended April 19, 2003. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
This Form 8-K and the attached exhibit are provided under Item 12 of Form 8-K and are furnished to, but not filed with, the Securities and Exchange Commission.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
 

 
EXHIBIT 99.1
 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced it achieved earnings per diluted share of $0.14 for the first quarter ended April 19, 2003 after non-recurring expenses of $0.84 per diluted share. The early repayment of debt resulted in non-recurring expenses of $0.79 per diluted share. The remaining non-recurring expense of $0.05 per diluted share reflects the first quarter expense of integrating Discount Auto Parts. During the first quarter last year, the Company produced earnings per diluted share of $0.34 after integration expense.
Roanoke, Virginia, May 14, 2003 
 
Comparable earnings per diluted share rose by 78.2% to $0.98 in the first quarter from $0.55 last year. Comparable results do not include the non-recurring expenses associated with the early prepayment of debt and the integration of Discount Auto Parts, as reconciled on the accompanying statements. The Company uses this non-GAAP, comparable measure as an indication of its earnings from recurring operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the non-recurring nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
 
On April 15, 2003, the Company redeemed all $405 million of its then-outstanding 10.25% senior subordinated notes and 12.875% senior discount debentures. The debt was repaid, in part, with an additional $350 million in bank debt. The remaining funds came from free cash flow generated in the first quarter. The redemption of this high interest bearing debt will save approximately $14 million in before-tax interest expense in the remaining three-quarters of 2003 and approximately $20 million in 2004.
 
Sales increased 2.9% in the first quarter to $1,033.5 million compared to $1,004.1 million last year. Same store sales grew 1.1% in the first quarter on top of a strong 7.8% in the same period last year. The Discount Auto Parts stores, which are in the comparable store base this year, produced a comparable increase of 3.2% during the first quarter over 5.1% last year.
 
Gross margin increased 179 basis points to 45.3% in the first quarter compared to 43.5% last year as the Company reaped the benefits of its category management initiatives and leveraged its logistics expenses. Comparable selling, general, and administrative expense rose by only
12 basis points as the Company managed its expenses during a tough sales environment. On a GAAP basis, selling, general and administrative expense declined to 38.1% from 38.7% last year, as the integration expenses associated with Discount Auto Parts acquisition declined to $3.4 million compared to $10.6 million last year.
 
Comparable operating income increased 32.2% in the first quarter to $77.9 million from $58.9 million in the same quarter last year, generating an operating margin increase of over 160 basis points to 7.5%. On a GAAP basis, operating income increased 54.1% to $74.5 million.
 
Comparable net income rose 86% in the first quarter to $36.0 million from $19.3 million in the first quarter last year. On a GAAP basis, net income declined to $5.0 million, which includes $30.9 million of after-tax non-recurring expenses for the early repayment of debt and Discount Auto Parts' integration expenses, compared to $12.1 million last year.
 
Commenting on the first quarter results, Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Despite the impact of the winter storms that effected most of our trade area, our team members produced solid results for the quarter. Our strong gross margin improvement clearly demonstrates that our category management and supply chain initiatives are producing strong results."
 
During the first quarter, the Company generated $94.1 million in free cash flow. Free cash flow is calculated as cash provided by operating activities reduced by cash used in investing activities. The $94.1 million in free cash flow did not include the non-recurring cash expense of $36.9 million associated with the early redemption of the Company's high interest bearing debt. Including these non-recurring cash expenses, the Company generated $57.2 million in free cash flow. The Company used the free cash flow to reduce its total debt by $54.4 million and ended the quarter with $681.1 million in total debt. The Company anticipates generating $150 million in free cash flow in 2003, which includes the $36.9 million of non-recurring expense, and ending the year with approximately $590 million in total debt.
 
During the quarter 33 new stores were opened, 12 stores were relocated, and 12 stores were closed resulting in an ending store count of 2,456. During the first quarter of 2002, the Company opened 17 stores and closed 122, 119 of these stores were Discount Auto Parts stores that overlapped with Advance stores that were closed as part of the integration. The Company expects to open approximately 125 new stores in 2003 and close approximately 25 under-performing stores with a net increase of 4% in total square footage.
 
The Company increased its comparable earnings per diluted share guidance for the second quarter to a range of $1.01 to $1.05 compared to $.77 for the same quarter last year. The Company also raised its comparable earnings per diluted share guidance for the 2003-year to a range of $3.85 to $3.95 compared to its previous guidance of $3.55, which had been adjusted for the impact of the debt pre-payment, all compared to $2.68 per diluted share in 2002. This guidance excludes the non-recurring expenses of the bond refinancing, integration expenses, and the positive effect of the 53rd week. On a GAAP basis, the Company raised its earnings per diluted share guidance to $2.90 to $3.00, which includes the non-recurring expenses associated with the pre-payment of debt outlined above and integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition.
 
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, May 15, 2003, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its first quarter results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website: http://www.advanceautoparts.com until June 11, 2003.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At April 19, 2003, the Company had 2,456 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These Statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030605155449.txt.gz
TIME:20030605155449
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5. Other Events and Regulation FD Disclosure.
 
On June 4, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, sold 2.0 million shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. common stock in a transaction completed after the close of business on June 3, 2003. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
 
Item 7. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c) Exhibits.
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
*Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 

 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE:AAP) announced today that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, has filed a Form 144 Notice of Proposed Sale of Securities for up to 2.0 million shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. common stock which it has sold in a transaction completed after the close of business on June 3, 2003. Freeman Spogli continues to own over six million shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock.
Roanoke, Virginia, June 4, 2003
 
"Freeman Spogli is a strong partner of Advance Auto Parts and continues to be our largest shareholder, owning over 16% of the company," remarked Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, VA, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At April 19, 2003, the Company had 2,456 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward looking statements only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030806163815.txt.gz
TIME:20030806163815
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
                          On August 6, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its second quarter ended July 12, 2003 and forward looking statements relating to the third quarter of 2003 and fiscal 2003. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. The information in this Form 8-K shall be deemed incorporated by reference into any registration statement heretofore or hereafter filed under the Securities Act of 1933, except to the extent that such information is superceded by information as of a subsequent date that is included or incorporated by reference into such registration statement. The information in this Form 8-K shall not be treated as filed for purposes of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced it achieved earnings per diluted share of $1.16 for the second quarter ended July 12, 2003, after non-recurring expenses of $0.05 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration. Year-to-date earnings per diluted share rose to $1.31, after non-recurring expenses of $0.79 per diluted share resulting from the early redemption of outstanding notes and debentures and $0.10 per diluted share in integration expenses.
Roanoke, Virginia, August 6, 2003
Comparable earnings per diluted share rose by 57.1% to $1.21 in the second quarter from $0.77 last year. Year-to-date comparable earnings per diluted share rose 65.4% to $2.20 compared to $1.33 last year. Comparable results do not include the non-recurring expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying statements. The Company uses these non-GAAP-comparable measures as an indication of its earnings from recurring operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the non-recurring nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
Sales increased 5.9% in the second quarter to $839.2 million compared to $792.7 million last year. Same store sales grew 2.0% in the second quarter on top of 5.0% in the same quarter last year. The Discount Auto Parts stores, which are in the comparable store base this year, produced a comparable store sales increase of 6.6% during the second quarter compared to 3.7% last year. Year-to-date sales increased 4.2% to $1,872.7 million compared to $1,796.8 million last year as same store sales rose 1.5% compared to 6.5% during the same period last year.
During the second quarter, gross margin increased 140 basis points to 45.4% compared to 44.0% last year as the Company reaped the benefits of its category management initiatives and leveraged its logistics expenses. Year-to-date, gross margin improved 160 basis points to 45.3% from 43.7% last year.
As a result of the strong gross margin improvement, comparable operating income increased 24.6% in the second quarter to $80.9 million from $64.9 million in the same quarter last year, generating an operating margin increase of 140 basis points to 9.6%. On a GAAP basis, operating income increased 36.2% to $78.0 million.
Comparable net income rose 60.2% in the second quarter to $45.2 million from $28.2 million in the second quarter last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased 172.6% to $43.5 million in the second quarter, which included $1.8 million of after-tax non-recurring integration expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition. Year-to-date comparable net income increased 70.7% to $81.2 million compared to $47.6 million last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased 73.0% to $48.5 million, which included $3.9 million of after-tax non-recurring integration expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition and $28.8 million of after-tax non-recurring expenses related to the early redemption of outstanding notes and debentures in the first quarter.
Commenting on the second quarter results, Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our team proved this quarter that even in a challenging sales environment we can achieve our goal of expanding our operating margins. Our category management initiatives are running ahead of plan. We have developed a game plan to expand our sales growth and we see tremendous opportunities for the future."
Year-to-date, the Company generated $234.3 million in free cash flow, including $140.2 million in the second quarter. These results do not include the non-recurring cash expenses of $36.9 million associated with the early redemption of the Company's high interest bearing notes and debentures in the first quarter of 2003. Including these non-recurring expenses, year-to-date the Company generated $197.4 million in free cash flow. Free cash flow is calculated as cash provided by operating activities reduced by cash used in investing activities. The Company expects to be a slight user of cash in the second half of the year and raised its 2003 fiscal year guidance for free cash flow to $170 million.
During the quarter 27 new stores were opened, six stores were relocated, and one store was closed resulting in an ending store count of 2,482. Year-to-date, the Company has opened 60 new stores, relocated 18 stores, and closed 13 stores. The Company expects to open 125 stores this year, relocate approximately 40 stores, and close 25 stores.
The Company also issued comparable earnings per diluted share guidance for the third quarter in the range of $1.18 to $1.22 compared to $0.92 last year, a 28% to 33% increase. Due to its strong earnings growth during the first half of 2003, the Company's comparable earnings per diluted share guidance for the full year has increased to a range of $4.01 to $4.11 compared to its previous guidance of $3.85 to $3.95 per diluted share. This guidance excludes the non-recurring expenses of the redemption of notes and debentures, integration expenses, and the positive effect of the 53rd week in the fourth quarter. On a GAAP basis, the Company raised its earnings per diluted share guidance to $3.14 to $3.22, which includes the non-recurring expenses associated with the redemption of bonds and debentures in the first quarter and integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition.
The Company will host a conference call this evening, August 6, 2003, at 5:00 p.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its second quarter results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website: http://www.advanceautoparts.com until August 6, 2004.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At July 12, 2003, the Company had 2,482 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
NOTE: These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of cash flows and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030815174414.txt.gz
TIME:20030815174414
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On August 14, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing, among other things, the promotion of four of its senior executives. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                           The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
Note:
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 To lead the continued growth of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), the nation's second largest retailer of automotive parts, four senior executive promotions were announced today by Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.
Roanoke, Virginia, August 14, 2003
, President, has been assigned the responsibility for the strategic and operational management of the company. Since joining the Company in 1994, Mr. Wade has served in numerous key leadership positions. His leadership and strategic vision were instrumental in the successful growth of the Company from 300 stores to almost 2,500 stores today.
Jim Wade
, has been promoted to Senior Vice President and Chief Financial Officerfrom Senior Vice President and Controller. Prior to Mr. Gray's promotion, Mr. Wade held the title of President and Chief Financial Officer. Mr. Gray joined the Company in 1994 and has led the day-to-day operations of the financial team for the last three years. He will report to Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.
Jeff Gray
has been promoted to Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer from Senior Vice President  Merchandising and Marketing. Mr. Coppola joined the company in 2001 and has taken the lead on numerous initiatives including developing the Company's marketing, merchandising, and new store design strategies, as well as launching category management. In his new position, he will continue to lead the merchandising and marketing teams and also will have reporting to him store operations, store support, logistics and advertising. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Coppola spent 34 years in the retail grocery business, at Tops Markets, a $3 billion grocery chain headquartered in Buffalo, New York. He will report to Mr. Wade, the Company's President.
Mike Coppola,
, Executive Vice President  Merchandising and Marketing has been promoted to Executive Vice President  Stores. Mr. Klasing joined the Company in 1995 and has proven to be a strong leader in both merchandising and store operations. The Company's five Senior Vice Presidents of Store Operations will report to him. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Klasing held diverse positions in store operations and merchandising with other retailers in the automotive aftermarket. He will report to Mr. Coppola, Chief Operating Officer.
Paul Klasing
Along with Bob Hedrick, Senior Vice President of Human Resources, and Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, these individuals will make up the Company's Executive Committee.
"We are excited about the future of our Company. These proven and experienced leaders will continue to position our team to proactively respond to opportunities and challenges," commented Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer.
The Company also announced today, that David Reid has resigned from his position as Chief Operating Officer and has left the Company to pursue other interests.
"David has made a significant contribution to our Company during the past nineteen years," added Larry Castellani, "We wish him the best in his future endeavors."
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At July 12, 2003, the Company had 2,482 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030822170924.txt.gz
TIME:20030822170924
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On August 20, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, sold 1.5 million shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. common stock in a transaction completed after the close of business on August 19, 2003. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
                           The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
Note:
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, has sold 1,500,000 shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock in a transaction pursuant to SEC Rule 144 completed after the close of business on August 19, 2003. Freeman Spogli continues to own approximately 4.6 million shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock, representing approximately 12.5% of Advance Auto Parts' outstanding common stock.
Roanoke, Virginia, August 20, 2003
Advance Auto Parts, based in Roanoke, VA, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At July 12, 2003, the Company had 2,482 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. Advance Auto Parts serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, Advance Auto Parts' expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Advance Auto Parts' products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in Advance Auto Parts' filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. Advance Auto Parts intends these forward looking statements only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20030908171503.txt.gz
TIME:20030908171503
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On September 5, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, sold 1.25 million shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. common stock in a transaction completed after the close of business on September 4, 2003. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
                           The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
Note:
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, has sold 1,250,000 shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock in a transaction pursuant to SEC Rule 144 completed after the close of business on September 4, 2003. Freeman Spogli continues to own approximately 3.3 million shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock, representing approximately 9.1% of Advance Auto Parts' outstanding common stock.
Roanoke, Virginia, September 5, 2003
Advance Auto Parts, based in Roanoke, VA, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At July 12, 2003, the Company had 2,482 stores in 37 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. Advance Auto Parts serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, Advance Auto Parts' expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Advance Auto Parts' products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in Advance Auto Parts' filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. Advance Auto Parts intends these forward looking statements only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20031007164223.txt.gz
TIME:20031007164223
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On October 6, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or Advance, issued a press release announcing that after 2003 Western Auto Supply Company, a wholly owned subsidiary of Advance, will no longer supply merchandise and services to its wholesale distribution network of 304 Western Auto dealers and 44 other independent retailers. Advance will report results from its wholesale segment, which consists solely of the wholesale distribution network, as discontinued operations beginning in the fourth quarter of 2003 and will change its presentation of historical results to reflect this decision. Advance acquired Western Auto Supply Company in 1998, which included 535 Parts America stores that were converted to Advance Auto Parts stores and the wholesale distribution network. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by this reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Western Auto Supply Company, a wholly owned subsidiary of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that after 2003 it will no longer supply merchandise and services to its wholesale distribution network of 304 independent Western Auto dealers, as well as 44 other independent retailers. Due to the wide variety of products supplied to the dealers and the reduced concentration of stores spread over a wide geographic area, it has become difficult to serve these dealers effectively.
Roanoke, Virginia, October 6, 2003
During the transition, Western Auto Supply Company will assist the dealers in finding alternative suppliers for various goods and services, including establishing direct relationships with suppliers, as well as facilitate the dealers' access to ongoing credit card programs. The majority of dealers are currently purchasing some of their products directly from other suppliers. The dealers that choose to continue to use the Western Auto name and trademark will have the opportunity to license them through 2006.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. will report results from the Wholesale Segment, which consists solely of the wholesale distribution network, as discontinued operations beginning in the fourth quarter of 2003 and will change its presentation of historical results to reflect this decision. The Company is anticipating a net after tax loss from discontinued operations for 2003 of approximately $2.3 million, the majority of which will be incurred in the fourth quarter of 2003. This loss will include both the results of operations for the Wholesale Segment and certain expenses associated with discontinuing the wholesale supply program.
This decision will not impact Advance Auto Parts' previously released guidance for the 2003 year of $4.01 to $4.11 in comparable earnings per diluted share, which excludes non-recurring items associated with the redemption of notes and debentures of $0.78, integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition of $0.16, and the positive effect of the 53 week in the fourth quarter of approximately $0.10. The Company uses these non-GAAP-comparable measures as an indication of its earnings from recurring operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the non-recurring nature and significance of the excluded expenses. On a GAAP basis, the Company anticipates earnings per diluted share of $3.17 to $3.27, which includes the non-recurring expenses associated with the redemption of bonds and debentures in the first quarter, the integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition and the positive effect of the 53 week.
rd
rd
Advance Auto Parts acquired Western Auto Supply Company in 1998, including 535 Parts America stores that were converted to Advance Auto Parts stores and the wholesale distribution network.
Advance Auto Parts, based in Roanoke, VA, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 2, 2003, the Company had 2,500 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. Advance Auto Parts serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, Advance Auto Parts' expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Advance Auto Parts' products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in Advance Auto Parts' filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. Advance Auto Parts intends these forward looking statements only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20031030072709.txt.gz
TIME:20031030072709
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 7.    Financial Statements and Exhibits.
 
(c)  
Exhibits.
 
 
Item 12.    Results of Operations and Financial Condition
 
On October 29, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its third quarter ended October 4, 2003 and forward looking statements relating to the fourth quarter of 2003, fiscal 2003 and fiscal 2004. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
 
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise be subject to the liabilities of that section.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned thereunto duly authorized.
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced it achieved strong third quarter results. The highlights of the quarter include:
Roanoke, Virginia, October 29, 2003
 
 
 
 
The Company produced earnings per diluted share of $1.20 for the third quarter ended October 4, 2003, which includes expenses of $0.04 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration. Year-to-date earnings per diluted share rose to $2.52, which includes expenses of $0.78 per diluted share resulting from the early redemption of outstanding notes and debentures and $0.14 per diluted share in integration expenses.
 
Comparable earnings per diluted share rose by 34.8% to $1.24 in the third quarter from $0.92 last year. Year-to-date comparable earnings per diluted share rose 52.2% to $3.44 compared to $2.26 last year. Comparable results are non-GAAP measures because they exclude the expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company uses these non-GAAP measures as an indication of its earnings from its core operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
 
Sales increased 7.7% in the third quarter to $849.3 million compared to $788.7 million last year. Same store sales grew 3.1% in the third quarter on top of 5.5% in the same quarter last year. The stores acquired as part of the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition, which are in the comparable store base this year, produced a comparable store sales increase of 3.1% during the third quarter on top of 6.3% last year. Year-to-date sales increased 5.3% to $2,722.0 million compared to $2,585.5
million last year as same store sales rose 2.0% compared to 6.2% during the same period last year.
 
During the third quarter, gross margin increased 143 basis points to 45.8% compared to 44.3% last year, reflecting the benefits realized from the Company's category management initiatives and continued leveraging of its logistics costs. Year-to-date, gross margin improved 157 basis points to 45.5% from 43.9% last year.
 
During the third quarter, the Company invested a portion of its gross margin improvements in increased advertising to grow the Company's brand recognition and in expanded customer service levels through a slight increase in store labor hours. This investment resulted in an increase in comparable selling, general and administrative expenses to 36.1% as a percent of net sales from 35.4% last year. On a GAAP basis, selling, general and administrative expenses as a percent of net sales were consistent with last year at 36.4%. On a year-to-date basis, comparable selling, general and administrative expenses as a percent of sales increased 25 basis points to 36.6% compared to 36.4% last year. On a GAAP basis selling, general and administration costs year-to-date declined 45 basis points to 37.0% from 37.4% last year, reflecting the decrease in integration expenses.
 
Comparable operating margins improved in the third quarter to 9.6% compared to 9.0% in the same quarter last year. On a GAAP basis, third quarter operating margins rose to 9.3% compared to 7.9% last year. Year-to-date, comparable operating margins improved 131 basis points to 8.8% compared to 7.5% last year. On a GAAP basis, year-to-date operating margins improved to 8.5% from 6.5% last year.
 
Comparable net income rose 38.6% in the third quarter to $46.7 million from $33.7 million in the third quarter last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased 59.2% to $45.2 million in the third quarter, which includes $1.6 million of after-tax integration expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition. Year-to-date comparable net income increased 57.4% to $127.9 million compared to $81.3 million last year. On a GAAP basis, net income increased 66.1% to $93.7 million, which includes $5.4 million of after-tax integration expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition and $28.8 million of after-tax expenses related to the early redemption of outstanding notes and debentures in the first quarter.
 
Commenting on the third quarter results, Larry Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our investments in building Advance Auto Parts, including category management, are generating strong results. Our enhanced merchandising gives our team the opportunity to service our customers more effectively and we believe that these investments will continue to produce strong results."
 
Year-to-date, the Company generated $302.1 million in free cash flow, including $67.8 million in the third quarter. These results do not include the cash expenses of $36.9 million associated with the early redemption of the Company's high interest bearing notes and debentures in the first quarter of 2003. Including these expenses, year-to-date the Company generated $265.2 million in free cash flow. The generation of this free cash flow allowed the Company to repay $80 million in debt during the third quarter and $279 million of debt since December 28, 2002. Free cash flow is calculated as cash provided by operating activities reduced by cash used in investing activities. The Company expects to be a user of cash in the fourth quarter and raised its 2003 fiscal year guidance for free cash flow to $210 million.
 
During the quarter 19 new stores were opened, six stores were relocated, and five stores were closed resulting in an ending store count of 2,496. Year-to-date, the Company opened 79 new
stores, relocated 24 stores, and closed 18 stores. The Company expects to open approximately 125 stores this year, relocate approximately 40 stores, and close approximately 25 stores.
 
The Company also reconfirmed its comparable earnings per diluted share guidance for the fourth quarter in the range of $0.74 to $0.80 compared to $0.43 last year, a 72% to 86% increase. The Company's comparable earnings per diluted share are anticipated to be in the range of $4.18 to $4.24 for the full year. This guidance excludes the expenses of the redemption of notes and debentures of $0.78 and integration expenses of $0.16. Expenses associated with the discontinuance of the Western Auto wholesale supply program and the positive effect of the 53rd week in the fourth quarter are included. On a GAAP basis, the Company raised its earnings per diluted share guidance to $3.24 to $3.30, which includes the expenses associated with the redemption of bonds and debentures in the first quarter, integration expenses related to the Discount Auto Parts acquisition, expenses associated with the discontinuance of the Western Auto wholesale supply program and the positive effect of the 53
rd
week in fourth quarter. The Company anticipates earnings per diluted share in 2004 to be in the range of $5.00 to $5.10. The above earnings per share guidance does not include the impact of a stock split.
 
Also today, the Company's Board of Directors declared a two-for-one stock split of the Company's common stock, which will be effected as a 100% stock dividend. The dividend shares will be distributed on January 2, 2004 to stockholders of record on December 11, 2003. The Company's common stock will trade on a post-split basis, on January 5, 2004, the next trading day following the distribution date.
 
The Board of Directors also announced today that Peter Fontaine, former Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Discount Auto Parts, submitted his resignation to the Board effective immediately. Discount Auto Parts was acquired by Advance Auto Parts in November 2001.
 
"Peter has made a tremendous contribution to our Board during the last two years especially in regards to the integration of Discount Auto Parts," commented Larry Castellani. "We sincerely thank Peter for all his contributions."
 
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, October 30, 2003, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its third quarter results. To listen to the live webcast please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website http://www.advanceautoparts.com until October 30, 2004.
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the third largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 4, 2003, the Company had 2,496 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
NOTE: These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
 
 
NOTE: These preliminary statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of cash flows and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20031120150021.txt.gz
TIME:20031120150021
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On November 19, 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, sold 1.5 million shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. common stock in a transaction completed after the close of business on November 18, 2003. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
                           The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
Note:
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that FS Equity Partners IV, L.P., an investment fund controlled by Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC, has sold 1,500,000 shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock in a transaction pursuant to SEC Rule 144 completed after the close of business on November 18, 2003. Freeman Spogli continues to own approximately 1.8 million shares of Advance Auto Parts common stock, representing approximately 5% of Advance Auto Parts' outstanding common stock.
Roanoke, Virginia, November 19, 2003
Advance Auto Parts, based in Roanoke, VA, is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 4, 2003, the Company had 2,496 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. Advance Auto Parts serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, Advance Auto Parts' expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Advance Auto Parts' products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in Advance Auto Parts' filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. Advance Auto Parts intends these forward looking statements only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20031230171648.txt.gz
TIME:20031230171648
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On December 8, 2003, Advance Auto issued a press release announcing the amendment and restatement of its $600 million credit agreement. The amended and restated credit agreement provides for a reduction in the LIBOR interest rate spread to 2.0% from 2.25% effective December 5, 2003 on two new term loans. The new term loans will replace Advance Auto's existing term loans of $440 million. In addition to the interest rate reduction, Advance Auto received approval under the amended and restated credit agreement to establish a vendor financing program. We are filing the amended and restated agreements under the existing exhibit numbers previously used in our Form 10-K as included in the exhibit index. The press release is incorporated herein to this Form 8-K by reference and a copy of the press release is attached hereto as Exhibit 99.1.
                           The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (excluding the amended and restated agreements set forth in exhibits 10.1, 10.2, 10.5, 10.43 and 10.44) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
Note:
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

TABLE OF CONTENTS                                                                                                      Page                                                ARTICLE I                                               DefinitionsSECTION 1.01.  Defined Terms.............................................................................1SECTION 1.02.  Classification of Loans and Borrowings...................................................33SECTION 1.03.  Terms Generally..........................................................................33SECTION 1.04.  Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.....................................................33                                                ARTICLE II                                               The CreditsSECTION 2.01.  Commitments..............................................................................34SECTION 2.02.  Loans and Borrowings.....................................................................34SECTION 2.03.  Requests for Borrowings..................................................................35SECTION 2.04.  Swingline Loans..........................................................................36SECTION 2.05.  Letters of Credit........................................................................37SECTION 2.06.  Funding of Borrowings....................................................................42SECTION 2.07.  Interest Elections.......................................................................42SECTION 2.08.  Termination and Reduction of Commitments.................................................44SECTION 2.09.  Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.....................................................45SECTION 2.10.  Amortization of Term Loans...............................................................45SECTION 2.11.  Prepayment of Loans......................................................................47SECTION 2.12.  Fees  48SECTION 2.13.  Interest.................................................................................49SECTION 2.14.  Alternate Rate of Interest...............................................................50SECTION 2.15.  Increased Costs..........................................................................51SECTION 2.16.  Break Funding Payments...................................................................52SECTION 2.17.  Taxes 52SECTION 2.18.  Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs..............................54SECTION 2.19.  Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders...........................................56SECTION 2.20.  Incremental Facility.....................................................................56                                               ARTICLE III                                      Representations and WarrantiesSECTION 3.01.  Organization; Powers.....................................................................57SECTION 3.02.  Authorization; Enforceability............................................................57SECTION 3.03.  Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.....................................................57SECTION 3.04.  Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change..........................................57SECTION 3.05.  Properties...............................................................................58SECTION 3.06.  Litigation and Environmental Matters.....................................................59SECTION 3.07.  Compliance with Laws and Agreements......................................................59
SECTION 3.08.  Investment and Holding Company Status....................................................59SECTION 3.09.  Taxes 59SECTION 3.10.  ERISA 59SECTION 3.11.  Disclosure...............................................................................60SECTION 3.12.  Subsidiaries.............................................................................60SECTION 3.13.  Insurance................................................................................60SECTION 3.14.  Labor Matters............................................................................60SECTION 3.15.  Solvency.................................................................................61SECTION 3.16.  Senior Indebtedness......................................................................61SECTION 3.17.  Security Documents.......................................................................61                                                ARTICLE IV                                                ConditionsSECTION 4.01.  [Intentionally Omitted]..................................................................62SECTION 4.02.  Each Credit Event........................................................................62                                                ARTICLE V                                          Affirmative CovenantsSECTION 5.01.  Financial Statements and Other Information...............................................63SECTION 5.02.  Notices of Material Events...............................................................65SECTION 5.03.  Information Regarding Collateral.........................................................65SECTION 5.04.  Existence; Conduct of Business...........................................................66SECTION 5.05.  Payment of Obligations...................................................................66SECTION 5.06.  Maintenance of Properties................................................................66SECTION 5.07.  Insurance................................................................................66SECTION 5.08.  Casualty and Condemnation................................................................67SECTION 5.09.  Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights...........................................68SECTION 5.10.  Compliance with Laws.....................................................................68SECTION 5.11.  Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit....................................................68SECTION 5.12.  Additional Subsidiaries..................................................................69SECTION 5.13.  Further Assurances.......................................................................69SECTION 5.14.  Collection Deposit Accounts..............................................................70SECTION 5.15.  Designated Senior Indebtedness...........................................................70SECTION 5.16.  Interest Rate Protection.................................................................70                                                ARTICLE VI                                            Negative CovenantsSECTION 6.01.  Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities..................................................71SECTION 6.02.  Liens 73SECTION 6.03.  Fundamental Changes......................................................................74SECTION 6.04.  Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions................................75SECTION 6.05.  Asset Sales..............................................................................76
SECTION 6.06.  Hedging Agreements.......................................................................78SECTION 6.07.  Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness....................................78SECTION 6.08.  Transactions with Affiliates.............................................................82SECTION 6.09.  Restrictive Agreements...................................................................82SECTION 6.10.  Amendment of Material Documents..........................................................83SECTION 6.11.  Sale and Lease-Back Transactions.........................................................83SECTION 6.12.  Capital Expenditures.....................................................................84SECTION 6.13.  Leverage Ratio...........................................................................84SECTION 6.14.  Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio.............................................85SECTION 6.15.  Current Assets to Funded Senior Debt Ratio...............................................85SECTION 6.16.  Purchase and Sale of Vehicles; Vehicle Subsidiary........................................85SECTION 6.17.  Senior Leverage Ratio....................................................................85SECTION 6.18.  Permitted Vendor Financings..............................................................86                                               ARTICLE VII                                            Events of Default                                               ARTICLE VIII                                         The Administrative Agent                                                ARTICLE IX                                              MiscellaneousSECTION 9.01.  Notices..................................................................................91SECTION 9.02.  Waivers; Amendments......................................................................92SECTION 9.03.  Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.......................................................93SECTION 9.04.  Successors and Assigns...................................................................95SECTION 9.05.  Survival.................................................................................99SECTION 9.06.  Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.................................................99SECTION 9.07.  Severability.............................................................................99SECTION 9.08.  Right of Setoff..........................................................................99SECTION 9.09.  Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process..............................100SECTION 9.10.  WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL....................................................................100SECTION 9.11.  Headings................................................................................101SECTION 9.12.  Confidentiality.........................................................................101SECTION 9.13.  Interest Rate Limitation................................................................102SECTION 9.14.  Existing Credit Agreement; Effectiveness of Amendment and Restatement...................102
SCHEDULES:
Schedule 1.01(a)  --       Office Buildings and Distribution                                            Centers Held for SaleSchedule 1.01(b)  --       Mortgaged PropertySchedule 2.01              --       CommitmentsSchedule 3.06              --       Disclosed MattersSchedule 3.12              --       SubsidiariesSchedule 3.13              --       InsuranceSchedule 3.17              --       Mortgage Filing OfficesSchedule 6.01              --       Existing IndebtednessSchedule 6.02              --       Existing LiensSchedule 6.04              --       Existing InvestmentsSchedule 6.05(a)  --       Specified AssetsSchedule 6.05(b)  --       Specified StoresSchedule 6.08              --       Existing Affiliated LeasesSchedule 6.09              --       Existing Restrictions
EXHIBITS:
Exhibit A         --       Form of Assignment and AssumptionExhibit B         --       Form of Indemnity, Subrogation and                           Contribution AgreementExhibit C         --       Form of Guarantee AgreementExhibit D         --       Form of Pledge AgreementExhibit E         --       Form of Security AgreementExhibit F         --       Form of Intercreditor Agreement
        WHEREAS, Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent, are parties to an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003 (as further amended, supplemented and modified, the ""), as in effect immediately prior to the Restatement Effective Date (as defined herein), which Existing Credit Agreement amended and restated the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of June 28, 2002, which, in turn, amended and restated the Original Credit Agreement (as defined herein);
Existing Credit Agreement
        WHEREAS, Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Restatement Lenders (as defined therein) and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent, are parties to an Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003 (the "");
Amendment and Restatement Agreement
        WHEREAS, subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement shall be amended and restated as provided herein.
        NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto agree as follows:
        SECTION 1.01 As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
        "" means the senior subordinated notes to be issued by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date with gross proceeds not exceeding $186,000,000.
Additional Senior Subordinated Notes
        "" means the Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, any Guarantees thereof and the Indebtedness represented thereby.
Additional Subordinated Debt
2
        "" means the indenture under which the Additional Subordinated Debt is issued and all other instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing or governing the Additional Subordinated Debt or providing for any Guarantee or other right in respect thereof.
Additional Subordinated Debt Documents
        "" means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, that, without duplication, (a) there shall be excluded (i) the income of any Person in which any other Person (other than the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) has a joint interest, except such income shall be included to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries by such Person during such period, (ii) the income (or loss) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or the date that Person's assets are acquired by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries and (iii) gains and losses from, or incurred in connection with, the sale, liquidation or other disposition of assets outside the ordinary course of business; (b) there shall be excluded Reorganization Expenses incurred prior to December 31, 2005 in an aggregate amount not to exceed (i) $20,000,000 during the fiscal year ending on January 3, 2004, (ii) $10,000,000 during any such fiscal year ending after January 3, 2004 and (iii) $60,000,0000 for all five fiscal years ending on or prior to December 31, 2005, combined; (c) there shall be excluded Debt Retirement Costs; and (d) except for purposes of calculating the Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to any Permitted Acquisitions and any divestitures by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person occurring during such period as if such transactions had occurred on the first day of such period.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Income
provided
        "" means an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, (i) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (ii) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
        "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
        "" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
        "" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
        "" means, collectively, the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent and the Documentation Agents.
Agents
3
        "" means Advance Holding Corporation, a Virginia corporation.
AHC Holdings
        "" means the merger of AHC Holdings with and into Holdings, in accordance with the Merger Agreement, with Holdings being the surviving corporation.
AHC Merger
        "" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Base CD Rate in effect on such day plus 1% and (c) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
        "" has the meaning given such term in the recitals hereto.
Amendment and Restatement Agreement
        "" means, with respect to any Revolving Lender, the percentage of the total Revolving Commitments represented by such Lender's Revolving Commitment. If the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
        "" means, for any day:
Applicable Rate
    (a)        with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan that is a Tranche D Term Loan or Tranche E Term Loan, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread" or "Eurodollar Spread", as the case may be, based upon the Leverage Ratio as of the most recent determination date; that until the delivery of the financial statements pursuant to Section 5.01 for the fiscal year ending January 3, 2004, the "Applicable Rate" for purposes of this clause (a) shall be the applicable rate per annum set forth in Category 1:
provided
====================================================================================================                       Leverage Ratio:                                ABR              Eurodollar                                                                    Spread               Spread  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                          Category 1                                 1.00%               2.00%           Leverage Ratio is less than 1.25 to 1.00  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                          Category 2                                 1.25%               2.25%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to 1.25 to 1.00                  and less than 1.75 to 1.00  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------  ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                          Category 3                                 1.50%               2.50%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to 1.75 to 1.00  ====================================================================================================
4
    (b)        with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan that is a Revolving Loan or with respect to commitment fees in respect of Revolving Commitments payable under Section 2.12(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread" or "Commitment Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the Leverage Ratio as of the most recent determination date; that until the delivery of the financial statements pursuant to Section 5.01 for the fiscal quarter ending October 4, 2003, the "Applicable Rate" for purposes of this clause (b) shall be the applicable rate per annum set forth in Category 3:
provided
=====================================================================================================                 Leverage Ratio:                      ABR           Eurodollar      Commitment Fee                                                     Spread           Spread              Rate ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 1                        1.25%            2.25%              0.375%    Leverage Ratio is less than 1.50 to 1.00 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 2                        1.50%            2.50%              0.375%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to     1.50 to 1.00 and less than 2.00 to 1.00 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 3                        1.75%            2.75%              0.500%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to     2.00 to 1.00 and less than 2.50 to 1.00 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 4                        2.00%            3.00%              0.500%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to     2.50 to 1.00 and less than 3.00 to 1.00 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 5                        2.25%            3.25%              0.500%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to     3.00 to 1.00 and less than 3.50 to 1.00 ----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------- -----------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------------                   Category 6                        2.50%            3.50%              0.500%   Leverage Ratio is greater than or equal to                  3.50 to 1.00 =====================================================================================================
5
        For purposes of the foregoing clauses (a) and (b), (i) the Leverage Ratio shall be determined as of the end of each fiscal quarter of the Borrower's fiscal year based upon the Borrower's consolidated financial statements delivered pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b) and (ii) each change in the Applicable Rate resulting from a change in the Leverage Ratio shall be effective during the period commencing on and including the date of delivery to the Administrative Agent of such consolidated financial statements indicating such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change; that the Leverage Ratio shall be deemed to be in Category 6, for purposes of the foregoing clauses (a) and (b), (A) at any time that an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or (B) if the Borrower fails to deliver the consolidated financial statements required to be delivered by it pursuant to Section 5.01(a) or (b), during the period from the expiration of the time for delivery thereof until such consolidated financial statements are delivered.
provided
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(b).
Approved Fund
        "" means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as "well-capitalized" and within supervisory subgroup "B" (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States; provided that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid, then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
Assessment Rate
        "" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
        "" means, as of any date, an amount equal to (a) the sum of Excess Cash Flow for each preceding fiscal year for which a mandatory prepayment was required by Section 2.11(c) less (b) the sum of the prepayments made by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.11(c).
Available Excess Cash Flow
        "" means the sum of (a) the Three-Month Secondary CD Rate multiplied by the Statutory Reserve Rate plus (b) the Assessment Rate.
Base CD Rate
        "" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
        "" means Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Borrower
6
        "" means (a) Loans of the same Class and Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
        "" means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
        "" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "Business Day" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
        "" means, in respect of any fiscal year for which Excess Cash Flow is required to be calculated hereunder, an amount equal to any liabilities in respect of payment for Capital Expenditures for such fiscal year that are included in the Borrower's consolidated current liabilities as of the end of such fiscal year for purposes of determining the increase or decrease in Net Working Capital for such fiscal year, but only to the extent that such liabilities are paid in cash prior to the last day of the first fiscal quarter of the immediately succeeding fiscal year; that the Borrower may elect, in its discretion, to exclude any such amount in calculating the Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year, in which case the "Capex Adjustment" shall be such lesser amount (not less than zero) as the Borrower shall elect in calculating Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year.
Capex Adjustment
provided
        "" means, for any period, (a) the additions to property, plant and equipment and other capital expenditures of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries that are (or would be) set forth in a consolidated statement of cash flows of the Borrower for such period prepared in accordance with GAAP and (b) without duplication, Capital Lease Obligations incurred by the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries during such period. "Capital Expenditures" shall not include the purchase of the property subject to the DAP Synthetic Lease Agreement.
Capital Expenditures
        "" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
        "" means the "Cash Concentration Account", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Cash Concentration Account
        "" means at any time, (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person other than Holdings of any shares of capital stock of the Borrower; (b) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of
Change in Control
7
Rule 13d-5 under the United States Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 in effect on the date hereof), other than FS&C Investors and their Affiliates, of shares representing more than 25% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding capital stock of Holdings; (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of Holdings by Persons who were not Continuing Directors; or (d) while any of the Existing Subordinated Debt, Additional Subordinated Debt, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Subordinated Debt is outstanding, a "Change of Control" (as defined in the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents, Additional Subordinated Debt Documents, Holdings Senior Discount Debenture Documents or Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents, as applicable) shall have occurred.
        "" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Effective Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Effective Date or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Bank (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
Change in Law
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Tranche D Term Loans, Tranche E Term Loans or Swingline Loans and, when used in reference to any Commitment, refers to whether such Commitment is a Revolving Commitment, Tranche D Commitment or Tranche E Commitment.
Class
        "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
        "" means any and all "Collateral", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral
        "" means the "Collateral Agent", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral Agent
        "" means the "Collection Deposit Account", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Collection Deposit Account
        "" means the "Collection Deposit Letter Agreement", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Collection Deposit Letter Agreement
        "" means a Revolving Commitment, Tranche D Commitment, Tranche E Commitment or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Commitment
        "" means, for any period, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted from
Consolidated EBITDA
8
revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (a) consolidated interest expense for such period, (b) the aggregate amount of letter of credit fees accrued during such period, (c) the aggregate amount of income tax expense for such period, (d) all depreciation and amortization expense for such period and (e) other non-cash charges for such period (excluding any non-cash charges that constitute an accrual of or reserve for future cash payments), and minus, without duplication and to the extent added to revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, all non-cash gains during such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis with respect to Holdings and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP.
        "" means, for any period, the interest expense of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that, in the case of Holdings, interest expense in respect of the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures shall be included only to the extent paid in cash. For purposes of calculating Consolidated Interest Expense for each of the four-fiscal-quarter periods ending on December 29, 2001, April 20, 2002, July 13, 2002 and October 5, 2002, Consolidated Interest Expense shall be deemed to equal the product of (a) the quotient obtained by dividing (i) Consolidated Interest Expense for the period commencing on and including the Effective Date and ending on and including the last day of the period for which such calculation is required to be made, by (ii) the number of days during the period described in clause (i) above, multiplied by (b) 364.
Consolidated Interest Expense
provided
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Consolidated EBITDA to (b) Consolidated Interest Expense (net of interest income) for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Borrower ended as of such date, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio
        "" means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Net Income
        "" means the directors of Holdings on the Effective Date, after giving effect to the Reorganization, and each other director, if, in each case, such other director's nomination for election to the board of directors of Holdings is approved by a majority of the then Continuing Directors or such other director receives the vote of FS&C in his or her election by the stockholders of Holdings.
Continuing Directors
        "" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
        "" means, as of any date of determination, the amount of all inventory and accounts receivable (excluding all accounts receivable sold or transferred pursuant to any Receivables Program) owned by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Loan Parties as of such date, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Current Assets
9
        "" means Discount Auto Parts, Inc., a Florida corporation.
DAP
        "" means the contribution by Holdings of the Equity Interests of DAP to the Borrower as a capital contribution after consummation of the DAP Merger.
DAP Equity Transfer
        "" means, collectively, (a) the Master Lease dated as of February 27, 2001, between DAPPER Properties I, LLC and DAP, (b) the Master Lease dated as of February 27, 2001, between DAPPER Properties II, LLC and DAP, (c) the Master Lease dated as of February 27, 2001, between DAPPER Properties III, LLC and DAP and (d) the Sale, Leaseback Agreement dated as of February 27, 2001, among DAPPER Properties I, LLC, DAPPER Properties II, LLC, DAPPER Properties III, LLC and DAP, each as amended from time to time.
DAP Master Lease Agreement
        "" means the merger of Newco Sub with and into DAP, in accordance with the Merger Agreement, pursuant to which (a) DAP will be the surviving corporation and will become a wholly owned subsidiary of Holdings and (b) the Persons that, immediately prior to such merger, are stockholders of DAP (or holders of "in the money" options to acquire common stock or other equity equivalents of DAP) will become entitled to receive the DAP Merger Consideration as consideration for the conversion or cancelation of their interests in DAP.
DAP Merger
        "" means the consideration payable to the Persons that, immediately prior to the DAP Merger, were shareholders of DAP (or holders of "in the money" options to acquire common stock or other equity equivalents of DAP), in accordance with the Merger Agreement, consisting of (a) cash in an aggregate amount of $128,400,000 and (b) approximately 4,305,000 shares of Holdings common stock.
DAP Merger Consideration
        "" means, collectively, (a) the Master Agreement dated as of May 30, 2000, among DAP, Discount Auto Parts Distribution Center, Inc., certain other subsidiaries of DAP, Atlantic Financial Group, Ltd. and SunTrust Bank and (b) the Master Lease Agreement dated as of May 30, 2000, among Atlantic Financial Group, Ltd., Discount Auto Parts Distribution Center, Inc. and certain other subsidiaries of DAP.
DAP Synthetic Lease Agreement
        "" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
        "" means any call premiums, write-offs of unamortized discounts or deferred financing costs and fees and any expenses relating to or incurred in connection with the redemption, repurchase, prepayment or other early retirement of any Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes and Holdings Senior Discount Debentures as well as any write-offs relating to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Debt Retirement Costs
10
        "" means a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that allows executives of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to defer receipt of specified portions of base and bonus earnings each calendar year. Deferrals are maintained as a liability, along with assets owned by the Borrower, in a trust owned by the Borrower.
Deferred Compensation Obligations
        "" means any vendor or supplier from which the Borrower purchases inventory and that has been designated by the Borrower as a participant in a Permitted Vendor Financing.
Designated Vendor
        "" means (a) accounts receivable owed by the Borrower in respect of inventory purchased from a Designated Vendor or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower as payment in full of one or more of such accounts receivable; that such accounts receivable or drafts shall constitute Designated Vendor Accounts only after having been sold by such Designated Vendor to a DVA Creditor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and only so long as owed to a DVA Creditor.
Designated Vendor Accounts
provided
        "" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
        "" means Sun Trust Bank and Wachovia Bank, National Association.
Documentation Agents
        "" means (a) any financial institution that (i) has agreed to purchase one or more Designated Vendor Accounts from a Designated Vendor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and (ii) has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement (or is represented by an agent that has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement binding upon such financial institution) and (b) any successor or assignee of any such financial institution that holds any Designated Vendor Accounts originally purchased by such financial institution, provided that such successor or assignee (i) is not a Designated Vendor, a Loan Party or an Affiliate of a Designated Vendor or a Loan Party and (ii) has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement (or is represented by an agent that has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement binding upon such successor or assignee).
DVA Creditor
        "" means the obligations of the Borrower to pay Designated Vendor Accounts. For purposes of this Agreement, the amount of any DVA Obligation at any time shall be the entire amount payable in respect thereof as and when due.
DVA Obligations
        "" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
        "" means November 28, 2001, the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 of the Original Credit Agreement were satisfied.
Effective Date
        "" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way
Environmental Laws
11
to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
        "" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
        "" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person or any warrants, options or other rights to acquire such interests.
Equity Interests
        "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
        "" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
        "" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
12
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
        "" means, for any fiscal year, the sum (without duplication) of:
Excess Cash Flow
13
        "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.19(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.17(a).
Excluded Taxes
        "" has the meaning given to such term in the recitals hereto.
Existing Credit Agreement
        "" means the Revolving Credit Agreement dated as of July 29, 1999, as amended and in effect immediately prior to the Effective Date, among DAP, SunTrust Bank, Central Florida, National Association, individually and as Administrative Agent, SunTrust Equitable Securities Corporation, as Arranger and Book Manager, Bank of America, N.A., individually and as Syndication Agent, First National Bank of Chicago, individually and as Documentation Agent, SouthTrust Bank, National Association, Amsouth Bank, First Union National Bank, Banque Nationale de Paris, Regions Bank and Hibernia National Bank.
Existing DAP Credit Agreement
14
        "" means all principal, interest and other amounts in respect of the Indebtedness of DAP and its subsidiaries outstanding at the time of (and immediately prior to giving effect to) the DAP Merger.
Existing DAP Indebtedness
        "" means SunTrust Bank.
Existing DAP Issuing Bank
        "" means First Union National Bank.
Existing Issuing Bank
        "" means all letters of credit outstanding as of the Effective Date that were deemed to have been issued under the Original Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date as provided therein.
Existing Letters of Credit
        "" means the Senior Subordinated Notes issued by the Borrower prior to the Effective Date and due April 2008 in the aggregate principal amount of $169,500,000.
Existing Senior Subordinated Notes
        "" means the Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, any Guarantees thereof and the Indebtedness represented thereby.
Existing Subordinated Debt
        "" means the indenture under which the Existing Subordinated Debt is outstanding and all other instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing or governing the Existing Subordinated Debt or providing for any Guarantee or other right in respect thereof.
Existing Subordinated Debt Documents
        "" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
        "" means the chief financial officer, vice president of finance, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of Holdings or the Borrower, as applicable.
Financial Officer
        "" means (a) the execution, delivery and performance by each Loan Party of the Original Credit Agreement and the documents related thereto to which it was a party, the borrowing of Loans thereunder, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit under the Original Credit Agreement and (b) the execution, delivery and performance by each Loan Party of the Additional Subordinated Debt Documents to which it is a party, the issuance of the Additional Subordinated Debt and the use of the proceeds thereof.
Financing Transactions
        "" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this
Foreign Lender
15
definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
        "" means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
        "" means Freeman Spogli & Co. LLC.
FS&C
        "" means FS&C and certain other investors arranged by FS&C that are equity investors in AHC Holdings immediately prior to (and become equity investors in Holdings as a result of) the AHC Merger.
FS&C Investors
        "" means, as of any date, Total Debt as of such date, excluding (to the extent included therein) Indebtedness in respect of the Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, the Additional Senior Subordinated Notes and any Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes.
Funded Senior Debt
        "" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
        "" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
        "" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term "Guarantee" shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
        "" means the Guarantee Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit C, made by Holdings and the Subsidiary Loan Parties in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Guarantee Agreement
16
        "" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
        "" means any interest rate protection agreement, foreign currency exchange agreement, commodity price protection agreement or other interest or currency exchange rate or commodity price hedging arrangement.
Hedging Agreement
        "" means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Holdings
        "" means the indenture under which the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures are outstanding and all other instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing or governing the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or providing for any Guarantee or other right in respect thereof.
Holdings Senior Discount Debenture Documents
        "" means the Senior Discount Debentures due 2009 issued by AHC Holdings on April 15, 1998, that will become Indebtedness of Holdings as a result of the AHC Merger.
Holdings Senior Discount Debentures
        "" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 90 days and (ii) Deferred Compensation Obligations), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances and (j) all DVA Obligations. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. The amount of any Indebtedness described in clause (f) above shall be limited to the maximum amount payable under the applicable Guarantee of such Person if such Guarantee contains limitations on the amount payable thereunder.
Indebtedness
        "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
17
        "" means the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, among Holdings, the Borrower, the Subsidiary Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent.
Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
        "" means the Revolving Borrowing on the Restatement Effective Date not in excess of $50,000,000.
Initial Revolving Borrowing
        "" means an intercreditor agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit F, among the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent and the DVA Creditor (or an agent for one or more DVA Creditors) named therein.
Intercreditor Agreement
        "" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.07.
Interest Election Request
        "" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
Interest Payment Date
        "" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
        "" means, as of any date of determination, (a) "inventory", as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York and (b) all finished goods, wares and merchandise, finished or unfinished parts, components, assemblies held for sale to third party customers based on perpetual inventory reports, including reconciling items to the perpetual reports, defined and classified by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a basis consistent with current and historical accounting practice in accordance with GAAP.
Inventory
18
        "" means the issuance by Holdings of shares of its common stock to the public pursuant to a bona fide underwritten public offering after the Effective Date, resulting in the receipt by Holdings of at least $80,000,000 of gross cash proceeds.
IPO
        "" means (a) JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as the issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder, and its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.05(i), (b) solely with respect to the Existing Letters of Credit issued under the Existing DAP Credit Agreement, the Existing DAP Issuing Bank, (c) solely with respect to the Existing Letters of Credit issued by it under the Existing Credit Agreement, the Existing Issuing Bank or (d) any other Lender approved by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
        "" means a payment made by the Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
        "" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Revolving Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
        "" means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01, the Persons listed on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Acceptance, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Acceptance. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
        "" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement. Each Existing Letter of Credit will be deemed to constitute a Letter of Credit for all purposes under the Loan Documents as though each Existing Letter Credit had been issued hereunder on the Effective Date.
Letter of Credit
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Leverage Ratio
        "" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Markets Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for
LIBO Rate
19
purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
        "" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
        "" means this Agreement, the promissory notes, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.09(e), the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Reaffirmation Agreement, the Guarantee Agreement, the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, the Intercreditor Agreements, if any, and the Security Documents.
Loan Documents
        "" means Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Loan Parties.
Loan Parties
        "" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to, or that are outstanding under, this Agreement.
Loans
        "" means slow-moving inventory of the Borrower or its Subsidiaries identified on a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (which certificate shall be delivered to the Administrative Agent no later than 90 days after the Effective Date) that is expected to be returned to the respective suppliers of such inventory for cash at a discount to cost within 18 months after the Effective Date; that the aggregate cost of such inventory shall not exceed $70,000,000.
Low Turnover Inventory
provided
        "" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under any Loan Document or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Lenders under any Loan Document.
Material Adverse Effect
        "" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Hedging Agreements, of any one or more of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal
Material Indebtedness
20
amount exceeding $5,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Hedging Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Hedging Agreement were terminated at such time.
        "" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of August 7, 2001, by and among Holdings, AHC Holdings, the Borrower, Newco Sub and DAP.
Merger Agreement
        "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
        "" means a mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents, leasehold mortgage or other security document granting a Lien on any Mortgaged Property to secure the Obligations. Each Mortgage shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Collateral Agent.
Mortgage
        "" means, initially, each parcel of real property and the improvements thereto owned or leased by a Loan Party and identified on Schedule 1.01(b), and includes each other parcel of real property and improvements thereto with respect to which a Mortgage is granted pursuant to Section 5.12 or 5.13.
Mortgaged Property
        "" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
        "" means, with respect to any event (a) the cash proceeds received in respect of such event including (i) any cash received in respect of any non-cash proceeds, but only as and when received, (ii) in the case of a casualty, insurance proceeds, and (iii) in the case of a condemnation or similar event, condemnation awards and similar cash payments, net of (b) the sum of (i) all commissions, fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer or other disposition of an asset (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or a casualty or other damage or condemnation or similar proceeding), the amount of all payments required to be made by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans) secured by such asset or otherwise subject to mandatory prepayment as a result of such event, and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, and the amount of any reserves established by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to fund (A) retained liabilities relating to the assets sold or (B) contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next two succeeding years and that are directly attributable to such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Borrower).
Net Cash Proceeds
        "" means, at any date, (a) the consolidated current assets of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (excluding cash
Net Working Capital
21
and Permitted Investments) minus (b) the consolidated current liabilities of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (excluding current liabilities in respect of Indebtedness). Net Working Capital at any date may be a positive or negative number. Net Working Capital increases when it becomes more positive or less negative and decreases when it becomes less positive or more negative.
        "" means AAP Acquisition Corporation, a Florida corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Holdings.
Newco Sub
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Security Agreement.
Obligations
        "" means the Credit Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001, among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent.
Original Credit Agreement
        "" means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
Other Taxes
        "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
        "" means a certificate in the form of Annex 1 to the Security Agreement or any other form approved by the Collateral Agent.
Perfection Certificate
        "" means any acquisition (other than the acquisition of DAP as a result of the Reorganization) by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person if, immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would result therefrom, (b) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable laws, (c) all the Equity Interests of each Subsidiary formed for the purpose of or resulting from such acquisition shall be owned directly by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower and all actions required to be taken with respect to such acquired or newly formed Subsidiary under Sections 5.12 and 5.13 have been taken, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Sections 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition (and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, with any new Indebtedness being deemed to be amortized over the applicable testing period in accordance with its terms, and assuming that any Revolving Loans borrowed in connection with such acquisition are repaid with excess cash balances when available) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (e) the Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent an officers'
Permitted Acquisition
22
certificate to the effect set forth in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above, together with all relevant financial information for the Person or assets to be acquired.
        "" means any transfer of properties or assets by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in which at least 80% of the consideration received by the transferor consists of properties or assets (other than cash) that will be used in the business of such transferor, that (a) the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of the property or assets (including cash) being transferred by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, is not greater than the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of the property or assets (including cash) received by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, in such exchange and (b) the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of all property or assets (other than up to 35 Stores that are transferred by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries within 90 days after the Effective Date to any of DAPPER Properties I, LLC, DAPPER Properties II, LLC or DAPPER Properties III, LLC (and leased back under the DAP Master Lease Agreement) in exchange for Stores transferred by DAPPER Properties I, LLC, DAPPER Properties II, LLC or DAPPER Properties III, LLC to the Borrower or a Subsidiary Loan Property and released from the DAP Master Lease Agreement) transferred by the Borrower and any of its Subsidiaries in connection with exchanges in any period of twelve consecutive months shall not exceed $40,000,000.
Permitted Asset Swap
provided
        "" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
23
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
        "" means:
Permitted Investments
        "" means a financing arrangement pursuant to which a Designated Vendor sells to a financial institution that is a DVA Creditor (a) accounts receivable owed to such Designated Vendor by the Borrower or (b) drafts
Permitted Vendor Financing
24
issued by the Borrower to replace such accounts receivable; that such financing arrangement complies with the applicable provisions of this Agreement.
provided
        "" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
        "" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
        "" means the Pledge Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit D, among the Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiaries party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Pledge Agreement
        "" means:
Prepayment Event
25
that with respect to any event (other than a Specified Lease Financing) described in clause (a), if the Borrower shall deliver a certificate of a Financial Officer to the Administrative Agent at the time of such event setting forth the Borrower's or a Subsidiary's intent to use the Net Cash Proceeds of such event to acquire other assets to be used in the same line of business within 270 days of receipt of such Net Cash Proceeds and certifying that no Default has occurred and is continuing, such event shall not constitute a Prepayment Event except to the extent the Net Cash Proceeds therefrom are not so used at the end of such 270-day period, at which time such event shall be deemed a Prepayment Event with Net Cash Proceeds equal to the Net Cash Proceeds so remaining unused.
provided
        "" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
        "" means any issuance by Holdings of shares of its common stock pursuant to a bona fide underwritten public offering following the Restatement Effective Date, that (i) at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto, no Default has occurred and is continuing or would result therefrom and (ii) the Net Cash Proceeds in respect of all such offerings do not exceed $150,000,000 in the aggregate.
Public Offering
provided
        "" means the Reaffirmation Agreement, entered into in connection with the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, attached thereto as Exhibit C, among Holdings, the Borrower and the other Reaffirming Parties (as defined therein).
Reaffirmation Agreement
26
        "" means Indebtedness of the Borrower and/or its Subsidiaries arising from Receivables Programs in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding, at any time, (a) the sum of (i) 3.5% of the total aggregate amount of all accounts receivables sold or transferred during the preceding 12-month period by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to any Person other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to a Receivables Program or for which value has been received from any Person other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to a Receivables Program and (ii) $3,000,000 or (b) the amounts permitted pursuant to clause (ix) of Section 6.01(a).
Receivables Indebtedness
        "" means an arrangement or arrangements under which the Borrower and its Subsidiaries sell, transfer or otherwise receive value with respect to accounts receivable pursuant to documentation reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Receivables Program
        "" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
        "" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
        "" means, collectively, (a) the AHC Merger, (b) the DAP Merger and (c) the DAP Equity Transfer.
Reorganization
        "" means transition, conversion and integration expenses of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries relating to the Reorganization and bonuses paid for management and other employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (including the Subsidiaries acquired in the Reorganization) in connection with the Reorganization.
Reorganization Expenses
        "" means senior subordinated notes of the Borrower (a) that are issued on one or more occasions following the Restatement Effective Date, (b) the Net Cash Proceeds of which are applied solely to repay all or a portion of one or more of the Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, the Existing Senior Subordinated Notes and the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures, (c) that mature no earlier than the Indebtedness refinanced thereby and (d) that have terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Lenders than the terms and conditions of the Additional Senior Subordinated Notes and the Existing Senior Subordinated Notes (including with respect to interest rates, subordination, payment provisions, covenants, events of default and remedies). The term "Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes" shall also include any senior subordinated notes of the Borrower issued to refinance Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes previously issued, provided that (i) the Net Cash Proceeds thereof are applied solely to repay all or a portion of outstanding Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, (ii) such notes mature no earlier than the Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes refinanced thereby and (iii) such notes have terms and conditions which are no less favorable to the Lenders than the terms and conditions of the Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes refinanced thereby (including
Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes
27
with respect to interest rates, subordination, payment provisions, covenants, events of default and remedies).
        "" means the Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, any Guarantees thereof and the Indebtedness represented thereby.
Replacement Subordinated Debt
        "" means any indenture under which Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes are issued and all other instruments, agreements and other documents evidencing or governing the Replacement Subordinated Debt or providing for any Guarantee or other right in respect thereof.
Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents
        "" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures, Term Loans, and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures, outstanding Term Loans, and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
        "" has the meaning given such term in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Restatement Effective Date
        "" means the execution and delivery of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement by each Person party thereto, the satisfaction of the conditions to the effectiveness thereof, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, including (a) the borrowing of Tranche D Term Loans on the Restatement Effective Date and the use of the proceeds thereof to prepay all Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche A-1 Term Loans outstanding on the Restatement Effective Date and (b) the borrowing of Tranche E Term Loans on the Restatement Effective Date and the use of the proceeds thereof to prepay all Tranche C Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans outstanding on the Restatement Effective Date.
Restatement Transactions
        "" means Indebtedness of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, the payment, prepayment, redemption, repurchase or defeasance of which is restricted under Section 6.07(b).
Restricted Indebtedness
        "" means (a) any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, (b) any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancelation or termination of any such Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or (c) any loans or advances made by the Borrower or any Subsidiary to Holdings.
Restricted Payment
        "" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
Revolving Availability Period
28
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01 or in the Assignment and Acceptance pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Revolving Commitments is $160,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
        "" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
Revolving Exposure
        "" means a Lender with a Revolving Commitment or, if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, a Lender with Revolving Exposure.
Revolving Lender
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01(a).
Revolving Loan
        "" means November 30, 2006.
Revolving Maturity Date
        "" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc.
S&P
        "" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the Security Agreement.
Secured Parties
        "" means the Security Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit E, among Holdings, the Borrower, the Subsidiary Loan Parties and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Security Agreement
        "" means the Security Agreement, the Pledge Agreement, the Mortgages and each other security agreement or other instrument or document executed and delivered pursuant to Section 5.12 or 5.13 to secure any of the Obligations.
Security Documents
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Funded Senior Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Senior Leverage Ratio
        "" means the confidential Lender Presentation dated November 18, 2003, relating to Holdings, the Borrower and the Restatement Transactions and related projections.
Slide Presentation
29
        "" means any sale or transfer by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any Specified Property that is subsequently rented or leased by the Borrower or such Subsidiary; that (a) the consideration for such sale or transfer consists solely of cash and (b) the fair market value of all Specified Properties that are sold or disposed of on or after the Effective Date pursuant to such transactions shall not exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate.
Specified Lease Financing
provided
        "" means any property, real or personal, owned by the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Specified Property
        "" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject (a) with respect to the Base CD Rate, for new negotiable nonpersonal time deposits in dollars of over $100,000 with maturities approximately equal to three months and (b) with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
        "" means all owned and leasehold properties where Inventory owned by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries is sold to the public.
Stores
        "" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
        "" means any subsidiary of Holdings or the Borrower, as the context requires. For purposes of the representations and warranties made hereunder and compliance with the terms and conditions hereof, the "Subsidiaries" shall be determined after giving effect to the Reorganization unless the context expressly requires otherwise.
Subsidiary
30
        "" means any Subsidiary of the Borrower other than any Foreign Subsidiary that, if it were to Guarantee the Obligations, would result in adverse tax consequences to Holdings or the Borrower.
Subsidiary Loan Party
        "" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
        "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder or any successor in such capacity pursuant to Section 2.04(d).
Swingline Lender
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.04.
Swingline Loan
        "" means any swap, derivative or other agreement or combination of agreements pursuant to which Holdings, the Borrower or a Subsidiary is or may become obligated to make (a) any payment in connection with a purchase by a third party from a Person other than Holdings, the Borrower or a Subsidiary of any Equity Interest or Restricted Indebtedness or (b) any payment (other than on account of a permitted purchase by it of any Equity Interest or any Restricted Indebtedness) the amount of which is determined by reference to the price or value at any time of any Equity Interest or Restricted Indebtedness; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only to current or former directors, officers, consultants, advisors or employees of Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries (or to their heirs or estates) shall be deemed to be a Synthetic Purchase Agreement.
Synthetic Purchase Agreement
provided
        "" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
        "" means Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans.
Term Loans
        "" means, for any day, the secondary market rate for three-month certificates of deposit reported as being in effect on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day) by the Board through the public information telephone line of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (which rate will, under the current practices of the Board, be published in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15(519) during the week following such day) or, if such rate is not so reported on such day or such next preceding Business Day, the average of the secondary market quotations for three-month certificates of deposit of major money center banks in New York City received at approximately 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the next preceding Business Day) by the Administrative Agent from three negotiable certificate of deposit dealers of recognized standing selected by it.
Three-Month Secondary CD Rate
        "" means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to (a) all Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries outstanding on such date,
Total Debt
31
excluding Indebtedness described in clauses (e), (f) and (h) of the definition of "Indebtedness", minus (b) the aggregate amount that would appear as "Cash and cash equivalents" on a consolidated balance sheet of the Borrower prepared as of such date in accordance with GAAP; that any letters of credit and letters of guaranty referred to in clause (h) of the definition "Indebtedness" shall not be excluded from Total Debt to the extent issued to support any other obligations constituting Indebtedness.
provided
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche A Term Loan pursuant to clause (a) of Section 2.01 of the Original Credit Agreement.
Tranche A Commitment
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to clause (a) of Section 2.01 of the Original Credit Agreement.
Tranche A Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche A-1 Term Loan pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003.
Tranche A-1 Commitment
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003.
Tranche A-1 Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche B Term Loan pursuant to clause (b) of Section 2.01 of the Original Credit Agreement.
Tranche B Commitment
        "" means a loan made pursuant to clause (b) of Section 2.01 of the Original Credit Agreement.
Tranche B Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche C Term Loan pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of June 28, 2002.
Tranche C Commitment
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of June 28, 2002.
Tranche C Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make a Tranche C-1 Term Loan pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003.
Tranche C-1 Commitment
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003.
Tranche C-1 Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement to make a Tranche D Term Loan on the Restatement Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Tranche D Term Loan to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time
Tranche D Commitment
32
pursuant to Section 2.08 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Tranche D Commitment is set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Tranche D Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Tranche D Commitments is $100,000,000.
        "" means a Lender with a Tranche D Commitment or an outstanding Tranche D Term Loan.
Tranche D Lender
        "" means November 30, 2006.
Tranche D Maturity Date
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 3 of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Tranche D Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement to make a Tranche E Term Loan on the Restatement Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Tranche E Term Loan to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Tranche E Commitment is set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Tranche E Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Tranche E Commitments is $340,000,000.
Tranche E Commitment
        "" means a Lender with a Tranche E Commitment or an outstanding Tranche E Term Loan.
Tranche E Lender
        "" means November 30, 2007.
Tranche E Maturity Date
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 3 of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Tranche E Term Loan
        "" means the Reorganization, the Financing Transactions and the Restatement Transactions.
Transactions
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans comprising such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
        "" means any van, truck, tractor or trailer (other than a commercial delivery vehicle) that is covered by a certificate of title issued under the laws of any
Vehicle
33
jurisdiction in the United States of America and used in the distribution and delivery of inventory.
        "" means Advance Trucking Corporation, a Virginia corporation, and wholly owned Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Vehicle Subsidiary
        "" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
        SECTION 1.02. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
        SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally.
        SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.
provided
34
been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Except as otherwise provided herein, all references to a fiscal month shall mean any period of four or five calendar weeks used by the Borrower for recording or reporting its interim financial information.
        SECTION 2.01. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lender's Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lender's Revolving Commitment. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
        (b)     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, each Lender having a Tranche D Commitment made Tranche D Term Loans to the Borrower on the Restatement Effective Date in a principal amount equal to its Tranche D Commitment as set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
        (c)     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, each Lender having a Tranche E Commitment made Tranche E Term Loans to the Borrower on the Restatement Effective Date in a principal amount equal to its Tranche E Commitment as set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
        (d)     Amounts repaid in respect of Term Loans may not be reborrowed. All Revolving Loans and Letters of Credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement on the Restatement Effective Date shall remain outstanding hereunder on the terms set forth herein.
        SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Loan (other than a Swingline Loan) shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Class and Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments of the applicable Class. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
Loans and Borrowings.
provided
        (b)     Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing and Term Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, all Borrowings made on the Effective Date shall be ABR Borrowings. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to
35
make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
        (c)     At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $3,000,000. At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that (i) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Revolving Commitments and (ii) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $200,000. Borrowings of more than one Type and Class may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 8 Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
        (d)     Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Revolving Maturity Date, Tranche D Maturity Date or Tranche E Maturity Date, as applicable.
        SECTION 2.03. To request a Revolving Borrowing, Tranche D Term Borrowing or Tranche E Term Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e) may be given not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Borrowings.
provided
        (i)   the aggregate amount of such Borrowing;
        (ii) the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
        (iii) whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
        (iv) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period"; and
36
        (v) the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.06.
        If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
        SECTION 2.04. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $30,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Exposures exceeding the total Revolving Commitments; that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
Swingline Loans.
provided
        (b)     To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a credit to the general deposit account of the Borrower with the Swingline Lender (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e), by remittance to the Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
        (c)     The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Revolving Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Revolving Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Revolving Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and
37
agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Revolving Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Revolving Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Revolving Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Revolving Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis
mutandis
        (d)     A Swingline Lender may be replaced by any other Lender at any time that there are no outstanding Swingline Loans by a written agreement among the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and successor Swingline Lender. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Swingline Lender. From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Swingline Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Swingline Lender under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term "Swingline Lender" shall be deemed to refer to such successor Swingline Lender. After the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), the replaced Swingline Lender shall not be required to make any Swingline Loans. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Section 9.04, at no time following the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), may the Swingline Lender as of such time make an assignment or assignments the effect of which would be to reduce its Revolving Commitment to zero.
Replacement of Swingline Lender.
        SECTION 2.05. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with,
Letters of Credit.
General.
38
an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
        (b)     To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If there is more than one Issuing Bank, the Borrower may select among the Issuing Banks in connection with the issuance of any Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $70,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
        (c)     Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Revolving Maturity Date.
Expiration Date.
        (d)     By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Revolving Lender, and each Revolving Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance
Participations.
39
whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
        (e)     If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of the receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $100,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.04 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Revolving Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Revolving Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Revolving Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Revolving Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Revolving Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Revolving Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement.
provided
mutatis
mutandis
        (f)     The Borrower's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision herein or therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a
Obligations Absolute.
40
Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Bank, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by the Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
provided
        (g)     The Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. The Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the Revolving Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
        (h)     If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to
Interim Interest.
41
ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(c) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Revolving Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
provided
        (i)     An Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the successor to such Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(b). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued by it thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Bank.
        (j)     If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Revolving Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrower's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but
Cash Collateralization.
provided
42
subject to the consent of Revolving Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
        (k)     Each of the Existing Issuing Bank and the Existing DAP Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the Effective Date, a schedule identifying all Existing Letters of Credit issued by it. Each of the Existing Issuing Bank and the Existing DAP Issuing Bank also shall notify the Administrative Agent of any LC Disbursement or any expiration, termination or renewal of any Existing Letters of Credit issued by it.
        SECTION 2.06. (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.04. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
provided
        (b)     Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
        SECTION 2.07. (a) Each Revolving Borrowing and Term Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert
Interest Elections.
43
such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
        (b)     To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
        (c)     Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02 and paragraph (f) of this Section:
        (i)     the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
        (ii)     the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
        (iii)     whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
        (iv)     if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
        (d)     Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
        (e)     If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such
44
Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
        (f)     A Borrowing of any Class may not be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing if after giving effect thereto (i) the Interest Period therefor would commence before and end after a date on which any principal of the Loans of such Class is scheduled to be repaid and (ii) the sum of the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Eurodollar Borrowings of such Class with Interest Periods ending on or prior to such scheduled repayment date plus the aggregate principal amount of outstanding ABR Borrowings of such Class would be less than the aggregate principal amount of Loans of such Class required to be repaid on such scheduled repayment date.
        SECTION 2.08. (a) Unless previously terminated, (i) the Tranche D Commitments and Tranche E Commitments shall terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the Restatement Effective Date and (ii) the Revolving Commitments shall terminate on the Revolving Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments.
        (b)     The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
provided
        (c)     The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
provided
        (d)     The parties hereto acknowledge that the Tranche A Commitments, Tranche A-1 Commitments, Tranche B Commitments, Tranche C Commitments and Tranche C-1 Commitments have terminated.
45
        SECTION 2.09. (a) The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Revolving Maturity Date, (ii) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Term Loan of such Lender as provided in Section 2.10 and (iii) to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15th or last day of a calendar month and is at least two Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
provided
        (b)     Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
        (c)     The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
        (d)     The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
        (e)     Any Lender may request that Loans of any Class made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
        SECTION 2.10. (a) Subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section, the Borrower shall repay Tranche D Term Borrowings on each date set forth below in the aggregate principal amount set forth opposite such date:
Amortization of Term Loans.
46
Date                                                                                 AmountNovember 30, 2004                                                          $19,251,832.90May 31, 2005                                                               $21,636,234.22November 30, 2005                                                          $21,636,234.22May 31, 2006                                                               $21,636,234.22Tranche D Maturity Date                                                    $15,839,464.44
        (b)     Subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph (d) of this Section, the Borrower shall repay Tranche E Term Borrowings on each date set forth below in the aggregate principal amount set forth opposite such date:
Date                                                                                 AmountNovember 30, 2004                                                           $2,968,575.07May 31, 2005                                                                $2,968,575.07November 30, 2005                                                           $2,968,575.07May 31, 2006                                                                $2,968,575.07November 30, 2006                                                           $2,968,575.07May 31, 2007                                                                $2,968,575.07Tranche E Maturity Date                                                   $322,188,549.58
        (c)     To the extent not previously paid, (i) all Tranche D Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Tranche D Maturity Date and (ii) all Tranche E Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Tranche E Maturity Date.
        (d)     Any prepayment of a Term Borrowing of any Class shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section ratably; that any prepayment made pursuant to Section 2.11(a) shall be applied, first, to reduce the next scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section in chronological order, to the extent such repayments are scheduled to be due within 12 months after such prepayment is made, until such next scheduled repayments have been eliminated as a result of reductions hereunder and, second, to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section ratably.
provided
        (e)     Prior to any repayment of any Term Borrowings of any Class hereunder, the Borrower shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings of the applicable Class to be repaid and shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such selection not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the scheduled date of such repayment; that each repayment of Term Borrowings of any Class shall be applied to repay any outstanding ABR Term Borrowings of such Class before any other Borrowings of such Class. Each repayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the repaid Borrowing.
provided
47
Repayments of Term Borrowings shall be accompanied by accrued interest on the amount repaid.
        SECTION 2.11. (a) The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
        (b)     In the event and on each occasion that any Net Cash Proceeds are received by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Borrower shall, immediately after such Net Cash Proceeds are received, prepay Term Borrowings in an aggregate amount equal to such Net Cash Proceeds; that, in the case of a Prepayment Event described in clause (c) of the definition of the term "Prepayment Event", if such Prepayment Event is an IPO and if the Borrower delivers to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the date of such IPO, a certificate of a Financial Officer certifying that (i) no Default has occurred and is continuing and (ii) the Borrower or Holdings intends to apply a portion of the Net Cash Proceeds from such IPO (which portion shall be specified in such certificate and shall not exceed 25% of such Net Cash Proceeds), within 365 days after the date of such IPO, for the purposes specified in clause (viii) of Section 6.07(b), then the amount of the prepayment required by this paragraph in respect of such event shall be reduced by the portion of the Net Cash Proceeds therefrom specified in such certificate; that, upon the expiration of such 365-day period, if the Borrower and Holdings have not applied the entire amount of such portion of such Net Cash Proceeds for the purposes specified in clause (viii) of Section 6.07(b), the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent thereof and a prepayment shall be required under this paragraph to the extent such portion has not been so applied during such period.
provided
provided further
        (c)     Following the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, commencing with the fiscal year ending December 28, 2002, the Borrower shall prepay Term Borrowings in an aggregate amount equal to 50% of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year; that the amount of the prepayment required by this paragraph shall be equal to 25% (instead of 50%) of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year if, at the end of such fiscal year, the Senior Leverage Ratio is less than or equal to 1.00 to 1.00. Each prepayment pursuant to this paragraph shall be made on the last day of the first fiscal quarter of the fiscal year following the fiscal year for which Excess Cash Flow is being calculated.
provided
        (d)     Prior to any optional or mandatory prepayment of Borrowings hereunder, the Borrower shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings to be prepaid and shall specify such selection in the notice of such prepayment pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section; that each prepayment of Borrowings of any Class shall be applied to prepay ABR Borrowings of such Class before any other Borrowings of such Class. In the event of any optional or mandatory prepayment of Term Borrowings made at a time when Term Borrowings of more than one Class remain outstanding, the Borrower shall select Term Borrowings to be prepaid so that the aggregate amount of such prepayment is allocated among the Tranche D Term Borrowings and Tranche E Term Borrowings
provided
48
pro rata based on the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Borrowings of each such Class; that, so long as there are any Tranche D Term Borrowings outstanding, any Tranche E Lender may elect, by notice to the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) at least one Business Day prior to the prepayment date, to decline all or any portion of any prepayment of its Tranche E Term Loans pursuant to this Section (other than an optional prepayment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section, which may not be declined), in which case the aggregate amount of the prepayment that would have been applied to prepay Tranche E Term Loans but was so declined shall be applied to prepay Tranche D Term Borrowings. The rights of the Tranche E Lenders under this Section 2.11(d) shall not be changed without the written consent of the Tranche E Lenders holding a majority of the outstanding Tranche E Term Loans.
provided
        (e)     The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date, the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid and, in the case of a mandatory prepayment, a reasonably detailed calculation of the amount of such prepayment; that, if a notice of optional prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.08, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.08. Promptly following receipt of any such notice (other than a notice relating solely to Swingline Loans), the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02, except as necessary to apply fully the required amount of a mandatory prepayment. Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13.
provided
        SECTION 2.12. (a) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). For purposes of computing commitment fees, a Revolving
Fees.
49
Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
        (b)     The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate as interest on Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to the Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 1/4 of 1% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
        (c)     The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
        (d)     All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
        SECTION 2.13. (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
        (b)     The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
50
        (c)     Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
        (d)     Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Revolving Loans, upon termination of the Revolving Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Revolving Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
        (e)     All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
        SECTION 2.14. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
        (a)     the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
        (b)     the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
51
        SECTION 2.15. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
        SECTION 2.15. (i)     impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Bank; or
Increased Costs.
        SECTION 2.15. (ii)     impose on any Lender or the Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
Increased Costs.
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or the Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the Issuing Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
        (b)     If any Lender or the Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
        (c)     A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
        (d)     Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Bank pursuant to
provided
52
this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
further
        SECTION 2.16. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan or Term Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(e) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the Eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments.
        SECTION 2.17. (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes.
provided
53
        (b)     In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
        (c)     The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Bank, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability, and setting forth, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or the Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
        (d)     As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
        (e)     Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the Code, the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate. Any Foreign Lender which is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and intends to claim exemption from U.S. Federal withholding tax under Section 871(h) or 881(c) of the Code with respect to payments of "portfolio interest" shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy for the Administrative Agent) a Form W-8BEN, or any subsequent versions thereof or successors thereto (and, if such Foreign Lender delivers a Form W-8BEN, a certificate representing that such Foreign Lender is not a bank for purposes of Section 881(c) of the Code, is not a ten-percent shareholder (within the meaning of Section 871(h)(3)(B) of the Code) of the Borrower and is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Borrower (within the meaning of Section 864(d)(4) of the Code)), properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender claiming complete exemption from, or a reduced rate of, U.S. Federal withholding tax on payments of interest by the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
54
        (f)     If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.17, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.17 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Nothing contained in this Section 2.17(f) shall require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
provided
        SECTION 2.18. (a) The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Bank or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment under any Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
        (b)     If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in
55
accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
        (c)     If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans, Term Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
        (d)     Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
        (e)     If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.04(c), 2.05(d) or (e), 2.06(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision
56
hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
        SECTION 2.19. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
        (b)     If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and, if a Revolving Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Bank and Swingline Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a material reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
        SECTION 2.20. [Intentionally Omitted].
Incremental Facility.
57
        Each of Holdings and the Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders on the Restatement Effective Date and on each date thereafter as required under any Loan Document that:
        SECTION 3.01. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
        SECTION 3.02.   The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Party's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each of Holdings and the Borrower and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of Holdings, the Borrower or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability.
        SECTION 3.03.   The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and except filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents or (ii) where the failure to obtain such consent or approval or make such registration or filing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (other than repayment of the Existing DAP Indebtedness), and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries, except Liens created under the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
        SECTION 3.04. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
58
consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 28, 2002, reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants, (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended October 4, 2003, certified by one of its Financial Officers and (iii) as of the end of and for each fiscal month ended after the end of the fiscal quarter ended October 4, 2003 and prior to the date 30 days prior to the Restatement Effective Date, certified by one of its Financial Officers. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Holdings and its consolidated subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to customary year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clauses (ii) and (iii) above.
        (b)     Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Slide Presentation and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of Holdings, the Borrower or their Subsidiaries has, as of the Restatement Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities.
        (c)     Since December 28, 2002, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
        SECTION 3.05. (a) Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business (including its Mortgaged Properties), except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes.
Properties.
        (b)     Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
        (c)     The Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent a schedule setting forth the address of each real property that is owned or leased by Holdings or any of its Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date after giving effect to the Transactions.
        (d)     As of the Restatement Effective Date, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries has received notice of, or has knowledge of, any pending or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting any Mortgaged Property or any sale or disposition thereof in lieu of condemnation. Neither any Mortgaged Property nor any interest therein is subject to any right of first refusal, option or other contractual right to purchase such Mortgaged Property or interest therein (other than options to purchase any such Mortgaged Property leased by the Borrower as lessee).
59
        SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
        (b)     Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
        (c)     Since the Effective Date, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
        SECTION 3.07. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
        SECTION 3.08. Neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries is (a) an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940 or (b) a "holding company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935.
Investment and Holding Company Status.
        SECTION 3.09. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
        SECTION 3.10. No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a
ERISA.
60
Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
        SECTION 3.11. Holdings and the Borrower have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to any of them, that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Slide Presentation nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, Holdings and the Borrower represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure.
provided
        SECTION 3.12. After giving effect to the consummation of the Reorganization on the Effective Date, Holdings does not have any Subsidiaries other than the Borrower and the Borrower's Subsidiaries. Schedule 3.12 sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Borrower in, each Subsidiary of the Borrower and identifies each Subsidiary that is a Subsidiary Loan Party, in each case as of the Restatement Effective Date.
Subsidiaries.
        SECTION 3.13. Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries as of the Restatement Effective Date. As of the Restatement Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
Insurance.
        SECTION 3.14. As of the Restatement Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened. Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries have not been in material violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with the hours worked by or payments made to employees or any similar matters. All payments due from Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a
Labor Matters.
61
liability on the books of Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, except where the failure to pay such liability individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary is bound.
        SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Restatement Transactions to occur on the Restatement Effective Date and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Restatement Effective Date and after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of such Loans, (a) the fair value of the assets of each Loan Party, at a fair valuation, will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) each Loan Party will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) each Loan Party will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Restatement Effective Date.
Solvency.
        SECTION 3.16. The Obligations constitute "Senior Debt" and "Designated Senior Debt" under and as defined in the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents and the Additional Subordinated Debt Documents.
Senior Indebtedness.
        SECTION 3.17. (a) The Pledge Agreement is effective to create in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined in the Pledge Agreement) and, when such Collateral is delivered to the Collateral Agent, the Pledge Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected first priority Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of each pledgor thereunder in such Collateral, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person.
Security Documents.
        (b)     The Security Agreement is effective to create in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined in the Security Agreement) and, when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the offices specified on Schedule 6 to the Perfection Certificate, the Security Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the grantors thereunder in such Collateral other than the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Security Agreement), to the extent that a security interest can be perfected in such Collateral by filing, recording or registering a financing statement or analogous document in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law in such jurisdiction, in each case
62
prior and superior in right to any other Person, other than with respect to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
        (c)     When the Security Agreement is filed in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office, the Security Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Security Agreement) in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registering a security agreement, financing statement or analogous document in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person other than Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02 (it being understood that subsequent recordings in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office may be necessary to perfect a Lien on registered trademarks, trademark applications and copyrights acquired by the Loan Parties after the Effective Date).
        (d)     The Mortgages are effective to create, subject to the exceptions listed in each title insurance policy covering such Mortgage (or, in the case of the Mortgages with respect to each Mortgaged Property set forth on Schedule 1.01(b) and identified with an asterisk, subject to Permitted Encumbrances), in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable Lien on all of the Loan Parties' right, title and interest in and to the Mortgaged Properties thereunder and the proceeds thereof, and when the Mortgages are filed in the offices specified on Schedule 3.17, the Mortgages shall constitute a Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in such Mortgaged Properties and the proceeds thereof, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, other than with respect to the rights of Persons pursuant to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
        SECTION 4.01. [Intentionally Omitted].
        SECTION 4.02. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
        (a)     The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, except for representations and warranties expressly made as of an earlier date, which shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
63
        (b)     At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by Holdings and the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
        Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
        SECTION 5.01. Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information.
        (a)     within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings' audited consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit or other material qualification or exception) to the effect that such consolidated and consolidating financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated and consolidating basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
        (b)     within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings' consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated and consolidating basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
        (c)     within 30 days after the end of each month (other than the last month) of each fiscal quarter of Holdings, Holdings' consolidated balance sheets and related
64
statements of operations, stockholders' equity as of the end of and for such fiscal month and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
        (d)     concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth a reasonably detailed calculation of the Leverage Ratio as of the end of the period covered by such financial statements, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.12, 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 and (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of Holdings' audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
        (e)     concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
        (f)     as soon as the same are complete, but in no event more that 60 days after the commencement of each fiscal year of Holdings, a detailed consolidated budget presented on a quarterly basis for such fiscal year (including a projected consolidated balance sheet and related statements of projected operations and cash flow as of the end of and for such fiscal year) and, promptly when available, any significant revisions of such budget;
        (g)     promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by Holdings to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
        (h)     promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request; and
        (i)     promptly after the same are furnished to the Borrower, copies of any "Management Letter" delivered to Holdings and the Borrower by their independent certified public accountants in connection with the delivery of financial statements
65
contemplated by Section 5.01(a) if such Letter discloses any material weaknesses in internal financial controls or other material concerns relating to the financial statements identified by such accountants.
        SECTION 5.02. Upon Holdings or the Borrower obtaining knowledge thereof, Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
        (a)     the occurrence of any Default;
        (b)     the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
        (c)     the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $1,000,000; and
        (d)     any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of Holdings or the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
        SECTION 5.03. (a) Holdings or the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change (i) in any Loan Party's corporate name, (ii) in the jurisdiction of incorporation or organization of any Loan Party, (iii) in any office in which any Loan Party maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it or (iv) in any Loan Party's Organizational Identification Number. Holdings and the Borrower agree not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the Uniform Commercial Code or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral. Holdings and the Borrower also agree promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Information Regarding Collateral.
        (b)     Each year, at the time of delivery of annual financial statements with respect to the preceding fiscal year pursuant to clause (a) of Section 5.01, Holdings or the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of Holdings or the Borrower (i) setting forth the information required pursuant to Section 2 of the Perfection Certificate or confirming that there has been no change in such information since the date of the Perfection Certificate delivered on the Effective Date or
66
the date of the most recent certificate delivered pursuant to this Section and (ii) certifying that all Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings, as applicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations, including all refilings, rerecordings and reregistrations, containing a description of the Collateral have been filed of record in each governmental, municipal or other appropriate office in each jurisdiction identified pursuant to clause (i) above to the extent necessary to protect and perfect the security interests under the Security Agreement for a period of not less than 18 months after the date of such certificate (except as noted therein with respect to any continuation statements to be filed within such period).
        SECTION 5.04. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
        SECTION 5.05. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
        SECTION 5.06. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
        SECTION 5.07. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies (i) adequate insurance for its insurable properties, all to such extent and against such risks, including fire, casualty and other risks insured against by extended coverage, as is customary with companies in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations, (ii) such other insurance as is required pursuant to the terms of any Security Document and (iii) business interruption insurance, insuring against loss of gross earnings for a period of not less than 12 months arising from any risks or occurrences required to be covered by insurance pursuant to this Section 5.07.
Insurance.
        (b)     Fire and extended coverage policies maintained with respect to any Collateral shall be endorsed or otherwise amended to include (i) a non-contributing mortgage clause (regarding improvements to real property) and lenders' loss payable
67
clause (regarding personal property), in each case in favor of the Administrative Agent and providing for losses thereunder to be payable to the Administrative Agent or its designee, (ii) a provision to the effect that neither the Borrower, the Administrative Agent nor any other party shall be a coinsurer and (iii) such other provisions as the Administrative Agent may reasonably require from time to time to protect the interests of the Lenders. Commercial general liability policies shall be endorsed to name the Administrative Agent as an additional insured. Business interruption policies shall name the Administrative Agent as loss payee. Each such policy referred to in this paragraph also shall provide that it shall not be canceled, modified or not renewed (i) by reason of nonpayment of premium except upon not less than 10 days' prior written notice thereof by the insurer to the Administrative Agent (giving the Administrative Agent the right to cure defaults in the payment of premiums) or (ii) for any other reason except upon not less than 30 days' prior written notice thereof by the insurer to the Administrative Agent. Holdings or the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, prior to the cancelation, modification or nonrenewal of any such policy of insurance, a copy of a renewal or replacement policy (or other evidence of renewal of a policy previously delivered to the Administrative Agent) together with evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent of payment of the premium therefor.
        SECTION 5.08. (a) Holdings or the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders prompt written notice of any casualty or other insured damage to any material portion of any Collateral or the commencement of any action or proceeding for the taking of any Collateral or any part thereof or interest therein under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding.
Casualty and Condemnation.
        (b)     If any event described in paragraph (a) of this Section results in Net Cash Proceeds (whether in the form of insurance proceeds, condemnation award or otherwise), the Administrative Agent is authorized to collect such Net Cash Proceeds and, if received by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, such Net Cash Proceeds shall be paid over the Administrative Agent; provided that (i) if the aggregate Net Cash Proceeds in respect of such event (other than proceeds of business income insurance) are less than $5,000,000, such Net Cash Proceeds shall be paid over to Holdings or the Borrower unless a Default has occurred and is continuing, and (ii) all proceeds of business income insurance shall be paid over to the Borrower unless a Default has occurred and is continuing. All such Net Cash Proceeds retained by or paid over to the Administrative Agent shall be held by the Administrative Agent and released from time to time to pay the costs of repairing, restoring or replacing the affected property in accordance with the terms of the applicable Security Document, subject to the provisions of the applicable Security Document regarding application of such Net Cash Proceeds during a Default.
        (c)     If any Net Cash Proceeds retained by or paid over to the Administrative Agent as provided above continue to be held by the Administrative Agent on the date that is 360 days (or, in the case of a distribution center, two years, that repair, restoration or replacement commenced within 270 days after the occurrence
provided
68
of such event) after the occurrence of the event resulting in such Net Cash Proceeds, then such Net Cash Proceeds shall be applied to prepay Term Borrowings as provided in Section 2.11(b).
         SECTION 5.09.
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights.
        (a)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; that the Borrower shall be given the opportunity to be present at any discussion with its independent accountants.
provided
        (b)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent (including any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent) to conduct evaluations and appraisals of (i) the inventory of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and (ii) the systems providing for the monitoring and reporting of such inventory, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested. The Borrower shall pay the reasonable fees and expenses of any representatives retained by the Administrative Agent to conduct any such evaluation or appraisal (including the fees and expenses associated with the services performed by the Administrative Agent's collateral monitoring department); that the Borrower shall not be required to pay such fees and expenses for more than one such evaluation or appraisal during any calendar year unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
provided
        SECTION 5.10. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
        SECTION 5.11. The proceeds of the Tranche D Term Loans will be used to prepay Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche A-1 Term Loans outstanding on the Restatement Effective Date (other than any Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche A-1 Term Loans that have been exchanged for Tranche D Term Loans pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement). The proceeds of the Tranche E Term Loans will be used to prepay Tranche C Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans outstanding on the Restatement Effective Date (other than any Tranche C Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans that have been exchanged for Tranche E Term Loans pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement). The proceeds of the Revolving Loans (other than the proceeds from the Initial Revolving
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit.
69
Borrowing) and Swingline Loans will be used only for general corporate purposes. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations U and X. Letters of Credit will be issued only for general corporate purposes.
        SECTION 5.12. If any additional Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, Holdings and the Borrower will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof and (a) if such Subsidiary is a Subsidiary Loan Party, Holdings and the Borrower will cause such Subsidiary to become a party to the Guarantee Agreement, the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement and each applicable Security Document in the manner provided therein within three Business Days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired and promptly take such actions to create and perfect Liens on such Subsidiary's assets (other than commercial delivery vehicles and leasehold interests in Stores) to secure the Obligations as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall reasonably request and (b) if any Equity Interests or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary are owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party, Holdings and the Borrower will cause such Equity Interests and promissory notes evidencing such Indebtedness to be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement within three Business Days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired (except that, if such Subsidiary is a Foreign Subsidiary and is not a Subsidiary Loan Party, Equity Interests of such Subsidiary to be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement may be limited to 65% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests of such Subsidiary).
Additional Subsidiaries.
        SECTION 5.13. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each Subsidiary Loan Party to, execute any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments, and take all such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents), which may be required under any applicable law, or which the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders may reasonably request, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents or to grant, preserve, protect or perfect the Liens created or intended to be created by the Security Documents or the validity or priority of any such Lien, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. Holdings and the Borrower also agree to provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Security Documents.
Further Assurances.
        (b)     If any material assets (including any real property or improvements thereto or any interest therein) are acquired by the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party after the Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Security Agreement that become subject to the Lien of the Security Agreement upon acquisition thereof), the Borrower will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof, and, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, the Borrower will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Obligations and will take, and cause the Subsidiary Loan Parties to take, such actions as shall be necessary or
70
reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Liens, including actions described in paragraph (a) of this Section, all at the expense of the Loan Parties; that the foregoing shall not require the Borrower to grant a Lien on assets constituting commercial delivery vehicles, leasehold interests in Stores or Vehicles owned by the Vehicle Subsidiary.
provided
        (c)     If any Mortgaged Property set forth on Schedule 1.01(b) and identified with an asterisk is not sold prior to the date that is one year after the Effective Date, the Borrower shall, within 60 days of such date, deliver to the Administrative Agent a policy or policies of title insurance (or binding commitments to issue such title policies), or a title endorsement to an existing title policy, issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company, insuring the Lien of each Mortgage with respect to each such Mortgaged Property as a valid first Lien on such Mortgaged Property, free of any other Liens except as permitted by Section 6.02, in form and substance reasonably acceptable to the Collateral Agent, together with such endorsements, coinsurance and reinsurance as the Collateral Agent or the Required Lenders may reasonably request.
        SECTION 5.14. As promptly as practicable and in any event prior to September 30, 2002 and at all times thereafter, the Borrower shall maintain Collection Deposit Letter Agreements for Collection Deposit Accounts representing the collections of Stores which account for no less than 80% of Consolidated EBITDA for the fiscal year most recently ended. The Borrower will use its reasonable best efforts to enter into and maintain Collection Deposit Agreements for all other Collection Deposit Accounts.
Collection Deposit Accounts.
        SECTION 5.15. The Borrower hereby designates the Obligations as "Designated Senior Indebtedness" under and as defined in the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents.
Designated Senior Indebtedness.
        SECTION 5.16. As promptly as practicable, and in any event no later than 90 days after March 6, 2003, the Borrower will enter into, and thereafter for a period of not less than 18 months will maintain in effect, one or more interest rate protection agreements on such terms and with such parties as shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, the effect of which shall be to fix or limit the interest cost to the Borrower with respect to 35% of the outstanding Term Loans.
Interest Rate Protection.
        Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
71
        SECTION 6.01. (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities.
        (i)     Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
        (ii)     in the case of the Borrower, the Existing Subordinated Debt, the Additional Subordinated Debt and the Replacement Subordinated Debt;
        (iii)     Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness;
        (iv)     Indebtedness of the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower and of any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04;
provided
        (v)     Guarantees by the Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower and by any Subsidiary of the Borrower of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that (A) the Indebtedness so guaranteed is permitted by this Section, (B) Guarantees by the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04, (C) the Existing Subordinated Debt shall not be guaranteed by any Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Loan Party and any such Guarantee shall be subordinated to the obligations hereunder of the applicable Subsidiary on the same terms as the Existing Subordinated Debt of the Borrower is subordinated to its obligations hereunder, (D) the Additional Subordinated Debt shall not be guaranteed by any Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Loan Party and any such Guarantee shall be subordinated to the obligations under the Loan Documents of the applicable Subsidiary on the same terms as the Additional Subordinated Debt of the Borrower is subordinated to its obligations hereunder, (E) the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures shall not be Guaranteed and (F) the Replacement Subordinated Debt shall not be guaranteed by any Subsidiary that is not a Subsidiary Loan Party and any such Guarantee shall be subordinated to the obligations under the Loan Documents of the applicable Subsidiary on the same terms as the Replacement Subordinated Debt of the Borrower is subordinated to its obligations hereunder;
provided
        (vi)     Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets after the Effective Date, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (A) such
provided
72
         Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (B) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (vi) shall not exceed $75,000,000 at any time outstanding; that the amount permitted under clause (vi) above shall not include Indebtedness set forth in Schedule 6.01;
provided
further
         (vii)     Indebtedness of (A) any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition to the extent that such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary, (B) the Borrower or a Subsidiary to the extent that such Indebtedness is assumed in connection with a Permitted Acquisition made by the Borrower or such Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of such Permitted Acquisition and (C) the Borrower in respect of unsecured promissory notes issued as consideration for Permitted Acquisitions; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (vii) shall be subject to the limitations set forth in clause (h) of Section 6.04;
provided
         (viii)     other unsecured Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
         (ix)     Receivables Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $45,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
         (x)     DVA Obligations in an aggregate amount at any time outstanding not exceeding (A) $50,000,000 at any time on or prior to December 31, 2004, or (B) $100,000,000 at any time thereafter.
         (b)     Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness except (i) Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness, (ii) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents and (iii) the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures.
         (c)     Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to (i) create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents) in reliance upon such Indebtedness constituting a "Credit Facility" (as defined in the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents, the Additional Subordinated Debt Documents or the Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents) for purposes of determining whether such Indebtedness is permitted under the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents, the Additional Subordinated Debt Documents or the Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents, as applicable, regardless of whether such Indebtedness is permitted by this Section, or (ii) designate any Indebtedness (other than Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents) as "Designated Senior Debt" (as defined in the Existing Subordinated Debt Documents, the
73
Additional Subordinated Debt Documents or the Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents).
         (d)     Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, issue any preferred stock or other preferred Equity Interests or be or become liable in respect of any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem, retire, acquire or make any other payment in respect of any Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests.
        SECTION 6.02. (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
        (i)     Liens created under the Loan Documents;
        (ii)     Permitted Encumbrances;
        (iii)     any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
        (iv)     any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary (other than pursuant to the Reorganization) or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; that (A) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (B) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (C) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
        (v)     Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date; that (A) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (vi) of Section 6.01(a), (B) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (C) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost (including design, engineering, sales taxes, delivery, installation and other similar costs) of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and
provided
74
        (vi)     Liens arising under any Receivables Program on accounts receivables sold or transferred to Persons other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to such Receivables Program.
        (b)     Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect thereof, except Liens created under the Security Documents and Permitted Encumbrances.
        SECTION 6.03. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may merge into any Subsidiary Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders and (iv) any Subsidiary may merge with another entity to implement a Permitted Acquisition; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04; that this Section shall not be construed to prohibit consummation of the AHC Merger and the DAP Merger in accordance with the Merger Agreement.
Fundamental Changes.
provided
provided
further
        (b)     The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower, DAP and their respective subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
        (c)     Holdings will not engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of all the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Borrower and activities incidental thereto. Holdings will not own or acquire any assets (other than shares of capital stock of the Borrower, cash, promissory notes held pursuant to clause (g)(i) of Section 6.04 and Permitted Investments) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities under the Loan Documents, the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities). Holdings will not have any Subsidiaries, other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries.
        (d)     Prior to the consummation of the DAP Merger, Newco Sub will not engage in any business or activity. Newco Sub will not own or acquire any assets or incur any liabilities. Newco Sub will not have any subsidiaries.
75
        SECTION 6.04.  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
        (a)     Permitted Investments;
        (b)     investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04, to the extent such investments would not be permitted under any other clause of this Section;
        (c)     investments in the Equity Interests of their respective Subsidiaries; that (i) any such Equity Interests held by a Loan Party shall be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement (subject to the limitations applicable to Equity Interests of a Foreign Subsidiary referred to in Section 5.12) and (ii) the aggregate amount of investments in, and loans and advances to, and Guarantees of Indebtedness of, Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall not exceed $1,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding;
provided
        (d)     loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower (or to Holdings, but only as permitted by Section 6.07) and made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that (i) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement and (ii) the amount of all such loans and advances by Loan Parties to Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c)(ii) above;
provided
        (e)     Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01; that (i) neither the Borrower nor any Subsidiary shall Guarantee the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures, (ii) the Existing Subordinated Debt shall not be Guaranteed by Holdings or by any Subsidiary other than a Subsidiary Loan Party that is a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (iii) the Additional Subordinated Debt shall not be Guaranteed by any Subsidiary other than a Subsidiary Loan Party that is a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (iv) the Replacement Subordinated Debt shall not be Guaranteed by any Subsidiary other than a Subsidiary Loan Party that is a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (v) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties Guaranteed by any Loan Party shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c)(ii) above and (vi) a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall not Guarantee any Indebtedness of any Loan Party;
provided
76
        (f)     investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
        (g)     promissory notes received from employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries evidencing loans made for the purpose of permitting such employees to purchase capital stock of Holdings in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
        (h)     Permitted Acquisitions; that (i) the consideration for each Permitted Acquisition shall consist solely of cash, shares of common stock of Holdings, the assumption of Indebtedness of the acquired Person or encumbering the acquired assets, Indebtedness referred to in clauses (vii) and (viii) of Section 6.01(a) or a combination thereof and (ii) the sum of all Indebtedness so assumed or otherwise resulting from Permitted Acquisitions (including Indebtedness referred to in clauses (vii) and (viii) of Section 6.01(a)) plus the cash consideration paid in connection with Permitted Acquisitions (other than cash consideration received as Net Cash Proceeds from the issuance by Holdings of additional shares of its common stock to finance Permitted Acquisitions, as contemplated by clause (c)(ii) of the definition of "Prepayment Event"), minus the book value (determined, in respect of each Permitted Acquisition, as of the date of consummation thereof) of all cash, cash equivalents, prepaid expenses, inventory and accounts receivable acquired pursuant to Permitted Acquisitions, shall not exceed, during any fiscal year of the Borrower, when aggregated with the sum of all Capital Expenditures during such fiscal year, the amount permitted for such fiscal year pursuant to Section 6.12;
provided
        (i)     loans or advances to employees in the ordinary course of business; that the aggregate amount of all loans and advances permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed $750,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
        (j)     other investments in an aggregate amount not exceeding $2,000,000 at any time outstanding;
        (k)     obligations of management to the Borrower in connection with split dollar life insurance policies; that the aggregate amount of all obligations permitted by this clause (k) shall not exceed $1,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
provided
        (l)     promissory notes contemplated by clause (ii) of the proviso to Section 6.05.
        (m)     investments incurred in connection with Deferred Compensation Obligations.
        SECTION 6.05. The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interests, nor will the Borrower permit any of its Subsidiaries to issue any additional Equity Interests in such Subsidiary, except:
Asset Sales.
77
        (a)     sales of inventory, used or surplus equipment and Permitted Investments in the ordinary course of business;
        (b)     (i) sales, transfers, leases and dispositions to the Borrower or a Subsidiary, that any such sales, transfers, leases or dispositions involving a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be made in compliance with Section 6.08, and (ii) issuances of additional Equity Interests by any Subsidiary to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary (except that a Subsidiary Loan Party may not issue additional Equity Interests to a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party), that any such issuances shall be made in compliance with Section 6.04;
provided
provided
        (c)     sales, transfers and dispositions of assets (other than Equity Interests of a Subsidiary) that are not permitted by any other clause of this Section; that the aggregate fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this clause (c) shall not exceed $20,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Borrower and $75,000,000 in the aggregate after March 6, 2003;
provided
        (d)     the Borrower may sell or otherwise convey accounts receivable pursuant to and in accordance with any Receivables Program;
        (e)     sales of fixed or capital assets made pursuant to sale and lease-back transactions permitted under Section 6.11;
        (f)     sales, transfers and dispositions of assets constituting Permitted Asset Swaps;
        (g)     sales, transfers and other dispositions of property identified on Schedule 6.05(a); that the fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of pursuant to this clause (g) shall not exceed, on a cumulative basis from the Effective Date, $35,000,000;
provided
        (h)     [intentionally omitted]; and
        (i)     sales of assets which as of the Effective Date are owned by Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc., a Delaware corporation, Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation or WASCO Insurance Agency, Inc., a Missouri corporation or which constitute the Western Auto Wholesale Network, Western Auto Specialty Stores or rights with respect to Western Auto Dealer Stores or of the capital stock of any Subsidiary of the Borrower substantially all the assets of which at the time of such sale are assets permitted to be sold pursuant to this clause (i);
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (b) above) shall be made for fair value and solely for cash consideration, except that (i) consideration for Permitted Asset Swaps may consist of non-cash consideration as contemplated by the definition of such term, (ii) up to 30% of the aggregate consideration for transactions permitted by clause (i) above may consist of promissory notes, (iii) in the case of distribution centers, up to 30% of the aggregate consideration for transactions permitted by clause (g) above may consist of promissory notes, and (iv) up to 10% of the aggregate
provided
78
consideration for transactions (other than those involving distribution centers) permitted by clause (g) above may consist of promissory notes.
        SECTION 6.06. The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Hedging Agreement, other than Hedging Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to (a) hedge or mitigate risks to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and (b) effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, that in the case of clause (b), any such agreement must be in compliance with Section 5.16.
Hedging Agreements.
provided
        SECTION 6.07. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, except:
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
        (i)     Holdings may declare and pay dividends with respect to its capital stock payable solely in additional shares of its common stock;
        (ii)     Subsidiaries of the Borrower may make Restricted Payments to the Borrower and to wholly owned Subsidiaries of the Borrower and may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests;
        (iii)     if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower may pay dividends or make loans to Holdings at such times and in such amounts, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year, as shall be necessary to permit Holdings to discharge its permitted liabilities (other than to make any payments with respect to the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures);
        (iv)     following April 15, 2003, if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower may pay dividends or make loans to Holdings at such times and in such amounts, not exceeding $14,420,000 during any fiscal year, as shall be necessary to permit Holdings to pay, as and when due, interest on the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures accrued subsequent to April 15, 2003;
        (v)     Holdings may make Restricted Payments pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries, including the redemption or purchase of shares of common stock of Holdings held by former employees of Holdings or any Subsidiary following the termination of their employment, if (A) at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing
79
and (B) after giving effect to any such Restricted Payment, the aggregate cumulative amount of Restricted Payments made pursuant to this clause (v) shall not exceed the sum of (1) $2,000,000 during any fiscal year or (2) $10,000,000 in the aggregate from the Effective Date, plus the amount of Net Cash Proceeds received by Holdings and its Subsidiaries after the Effective Date and prior to making such Restricted Payment from the issuance of additional shares of its common stock to members of management or employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries; that the promissory notes permitted under Section 6.04(g) may be forgiven or returned without regard to the limitation in clause (B) above and the forgiveness or return thereof shall not be treated as Restricted Payments for purposes of determining compliance with such clause (B) above;
provided
        (vi)     the Borrower may pay cash dividends or make loans to Holdings in such amounts and at such times as Holdings makes Restricted Payments permitted by clause (v) above and clause (ix) below;
        (vii)     if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower may pay dividends or make loans to Holdings in such amounts and at such times as required to permit Holdings to pay, as and when due, income taxes payable by Holdings with respect to the consolidated, combined tax filing group that includes the Borrower and its Subsidiaries; that dividends or loans pursuant to this clause (vii) shall not at any time exceed the amount of income taxes that would then be payable by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries if the Borrower and its Subsidiaries were not a part of a consolidated, combined tax filing group with Holdings or any other Person;
provided
        (viii)     the Borrower may pay cash dividends or make loans to Holdings in such amounts and at such times as Holdings makes payments to purchase Holdings Senior Discount Debentures as permitted by clauses (vii) and (viii) of Section 6.07(b); and
        (ix)     if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, Holdings may make Restricted Payments in cash from time to time after the Restatement Effective Date in addition to those otherwise permitted under this Section 6.07(a); that after giving effect to each Restricted Payment made under this clause (ix), (a) the cumulative amount of all such Restricted Payments does not exceed the sum of (i) $25,000,000 (ii) (in the case of any Restricted Payments made after financial statements are available for the fiscal year ending January 3, 2004), during any fiscal year, 50% of Consolidated Net Income for the immediately preceding fiscal year; that Restricted Payments made in any fiscal year in reliance upon this clause (ii) may only be made after financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year have been made available pursuant to Section 5.01; and (b) the Borrower shall be in compliance on a pro forma basis with Sections 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 after
provided
plus
provided
80
giving effect to such Restricted Payment; and (c) the Leverage Ratio, calculated on a pro forma basis, shall be less than 2.00 to 1.00.
        (b)     Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash securities or other property) in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancelation or termination of any Indebtedness, except:
        (i)     payment of Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
        (ii)     payment of interest, stated premiums and principal payments in respect of any Indebtedness other than payments in respect of the Existing Subordinated Debt, the Additional Subordinated Debt or the Replacement Subordinated Debt prohibited by the subordination provisions thereof;
        (iii)     refinancings of Indebtedness to the extent permitted by Section 6.01;
        (iv)     payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
        (v)     payment of interest on the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures payable solely by the issuance by Holdings of additional Holdings Senior Discount Debentures, that after April 15, 2003, Holdings will be permitted to pay interest in cash on the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures as and when due;
provided
        (vi)     payment of intercompany Indebtedness between or among the Borrower and its Subsidiaries permitted under clause (iv) of Section 6.01(a) and payment of Indebtedness permitted under clauses (viii) and (ix) of Section 6.01(a);
        (vii)     payments to purchase or redeem Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes; that (A) at the time of and after giving effect to each such purchase or redemption of Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, as the case may be, (1) no Default shall have occurred and be continuing and (2) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to any such payments (and any Public Offering made or Replacement Subordinated Debt incurred), with the covenants contained in Sections 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such payment (and any Public Offering made or Replacement Subordinated Debt incurred to effect
provided
81
any such payments) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance; and (B) all Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, as the case may be, so purchased or redeemed shall be retired and canceled;
        (viii)     payments, in an aggregate amount not exceeding the portion of the Net Cash Proceeds of an IPO reserved for such purpose in accordance with the proviso to Section 2.11(b), to purchase Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes within 365 days after the date of such IPO; that (A) at the time of and after giving effect to each such purchase of Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, as the case may be, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing; (B) all Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes, as the case may be, so purchased shall be retired and canceled; and (C) for purposes of determining the amount of the Net Cash Proceeds of such IPO applied to purchase Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes as permitted by this clause (viii), the aggregate amount of such payments shall be calculated excluding the aggregate amount of accrued and unpaid interest on the Existing Senior Subordinated Notes, Additional Senior Subordinated Notes, Holdings Senior Discount Debentures or Replacement Senior Subordinated Notes so purchased that is discharged as a result of such purchase;
provided
        (ix)     the issuance of Equity Interests in Holdings to any holder of Holdings Senior Discount Debentures in exchange for Holdings Senior Discount Debentures; that (A) at the time of and after giving effect to such exchange, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing, (B) such exchange shall not be made in connection with any issuance of Equity Interests in Holdings to other investors for cash consideration, (C) such exchange is made on an arm's length basis with unrelated third parties and (D) all Holdings Senior Discount Debentures so exchanged shall be retired and canceled; and
provided
        (x)     the repayment of (A) all amounts outstanding in respect of the Existing DAP Indebtedness, including accrued interest and fees and any prepayment penalties and all amounts necessary to terminate the DAP Synthetic Lease Agreement and purchase the property subject thereto.
        (c)     Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into or be party to, or make any payment under, any Synthetic Purchase Agreement unless (i) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement related to any Equity Interest of Holdings, the payments required to be made by Holdings are
82
limited to amounts permitted to be paid under Section 6.07(a), (ii) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement related to any Restricted Indebtedness, the payments required to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries thereunder are limited to the amount permitted under Section 6.07(b) and (iii) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement, the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries thereunder are subordinated to the Obligations on terms satisfactory to the Required Lenders.
        SECTION 6.08. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions that do not involve Holdings and are at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, that the Borrower delivers to the Administrative Agent (i) with respect to any transaction or series of related transactions involving aggregate consideration in excess of $2,000,000, a resolution of the Borrower's board of directors set forth in an officers' certificate certifying that such transaction complies with this clause (a) and that such transaction has been approved by a majority of the disinterested members of the Borrower's board of directors and (ii) with respect to any transaction or series of related transactions involving aggregate consideration in excess of $10,000,000, an opinion as to the fairness to the Lenders of such transaction from a financial point of view issued by an accounting, appraisal or investment banking firm of national standing, (b) transactions between or among the Borrower and its Subsidiaries that are Subsidiary Loan Parties which do not involve any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.07, (d) loans to management of Holdings or the Borrower permitted by clause (g) of Section 6.04, (e) payments made under and in accordance with agreements in effect on the Effective Date and specified in Schedule 6.08 (without giving effect to any amendment or modification thereof that has not been approved by the Required Lenders), (f) any employment agreements, stock option or other compensation agreements or plans (and the payment of amounts or the issuance of securities thereunder) and other reasonable fees, compensation, benefits and indemnities paid or entered into by Holdings or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business of Holdings or such Subsidiary to or with the officers, directors or employees of Holdings or its Subsidiaries and (g) sales of common stock of Holdings, when such sales are exclusively for cash.
Transactions with Affiliates.
provided
        SECTION 6.09. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any shares of its capital stock or to make or repay loans or advances to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
83
law or by any Loan Document, Existing Subordinated Debt Document, Additional Subordinated Debt Document, Holdings Senior Discount Debenture Documents or Replacement Subordinated Debt Documents, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.09 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases or other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
        SECTION 6.10. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under (a) any Existing Subordinated Debt Document, Additional Subordinated Debt Document, Holdings Senior Discount Note Document, Replacement Subordinated Debt Document or any agreement specified in Schedule 6.08, (b) its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents or (c) the documents governing any Receivables Program or the documents governing the McDuffie County industrial revenue bonds, except amendments and modification to agreements and documents referred to in clauses (b) and (c) shall be permitted to the extent that the cumulative effect of all such amendments and modifications does not have a Material Adverse Effect or a material adverse effect on the interests of the Lenders; that amendments and modifications to documents governing Receivables Programs that have a monetary effect on the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries shall be deemed not to have a Material Adverse Effect or adversely affect the Lenders in any material respect so long as the cumulative net monetary effect of such amendments and modifications does not exceed $5,000,000 from the Effective Date (compared to the monetary effect of the existing Receivables Programs).
Amendment of Material Documents.
provided
        SECTION 6.11. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any Person whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property which it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred, except for (a) any such sale and leaseback of property involving the sale of fixed or capital assets (other than those acquired pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition), at a price not less than the cost thereof, that is consummated within 270 days after the date that such assets are acquired, (b) Specified Lease Financings and (c) any such sale and leaseback of up to 35 Stores that are transferred by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries within 90 days after the Effective Date to any of DAPPER Properties I, LLC, DAPPER Properties II, LLC or DAPPER Properties III, LLC (and leased back
Sale and Lease-Back Transactions.
84
under the DAP Master Lease Agreement) in exchange for Stores transferred by DAPPER Properties I, LLC, DAPPER Properties II, LLC or DAPPER Properties III, LLC to the Borrower or a Subsidiary Loan Party and released from the DAP Master Lease Agreement.
        SECTION 6.12. The Borrower will not permit the sum of (a) the aggregate amount of Capital Expenditures made by the Borrower and the Subsidiaries in any fiscal year (excluding those permitted by the last paragraph of this Section 6.12), plus (b) all amounts that are to be aggregated with Capital Expenditures for such fiscal year as provided in clause (h) of Section 6.04 (the sum of the amounts referred to in clauses (a) and (b) being referred to as ""), to exceed the amount set forth below opposite such year; , that the Restricted Expenditures in any fiscal year (the "") may be increased by an amount (not exceeding $50,000,000) equal to the excess, if any, of the sum of the amounts set forth below under "Amount" for each fiscal year referred to below ending prior to the Pending Fiscal Year, minus the sum of the Restricted Expenditures for such preceding fiscal years:
Capital Expenditures.
Restricted Expenditures
provided
Pending Fiscal Year
Fiscal Year                                                                 Amount             EndingDecember 29, 2001                                                                 $135,000,000December 28, 2002                                                                 $140,000,000January 3, 2004                                                                   $150,000,000January 1, 2005                                                                   $150,000,000December 31, 2005                                                                 $165,000,000December 30, 2006                                                                 $185,000,000
        The Borrower and the Subsidiaries may make additional Capital Expenditures not included in the foregoing provisions of this Section; that (i) such Capital Expenditures are made for the purpose of constructing Stores to be sold pursuant to sale leaseback transactions permitted by clause (a) of Section 6.11 and (ii) the aggregate amount of such Capital Expenditures allowed under this paragraph shall be limited to the sum of (A) $20,000,000 plus (B) the Net Cash Proceeds received by the Borrower or the Subsidiaries from such sale leaseback transactions.
provided
        SECTION 6.13. The Borrower will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date during any period set forth below to be in excess of the ratio set forth below opposite such period:
Leverage Ratio.
Period                                                                 RatioDecember 29, 2002 through April 14, 2003                                             4.00 to 1.00April 15, 2003 through January 3, 2004                                               3.50 to 1.00January 4, 2004 through July 17, 2004                                                3.25 to 1.00July 18, 2004 and thereafter                                                         3.00 to 1.00
85
        SECTION 6.14. The Borrower will not permit the Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio as of the last day of any fiscal quarter ending during any period set forth below to be less than the ratio set forth below opposite such period:
Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio.
Period                                                                 RatioDecember 29, 2002 through July 17, 2004                                              3.00 to 1.00July 18, 2004 and thereafter                                                         3.25 to 1.00
        SECTION 6.15. The Borrower will not permit the ratio of (a) Current Assets to (b) Funded Senior Debt, in each case as of the end of any fiscal quarter of the Borrower ending during any period set forth below, to be less than the ratio set forth below opposite such period:
Current Assets to Funded Senior Debt Ratio.
Period                                                                 RatioRestatement Effective Date through July 17, 2004                                     1.25 to 1.00July 18, 2004 through January 1, 2005                                                1.50 to 1.00January 2, 2005 and thereafter                                                       1.75 to 1.00
        SECTION 6.16. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary (other than the Vehicle Subsidiary) to, own, purchase, acquire or hold title to, any Vehicle.
Purchase and Sale of Vehicles; Vehicle Subsidiary.
        (b)     The Vehicle Subsidiary will not engage in any business or activity other than acquiring, owning and disposing of Vehicles used in the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, and activities incidental thereto. The Vehicle Subsidiary will not own or acquire any assets (other than Vehicles) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, the Guarantee of the Existing Subordinated Debt, the Additional Subordinated Debt or any Replacement Subordinated Debt by the Vehicle Subsidiary to the extent permitted by clause (v) of Section 6.01(a), Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities). The Vehicle Subsidiary will not have any Subsidiaries or other investments. The Borrower will not make or permit any investments in the Vehicle Subsidiary, other than contributions of equity capital by the Borrower to the extent necessary to permit the Vehicle Subsidiary to acquire Vehicles and to satisfy its permitted liabilities as and when done.
        SECTION 6.17. The Borrower will not permit the Senior Leverage Ratio as of any date during any period set forth below to be in excess of the ratio set forth below opposite such period:
Senior Leverage Ratio.
Period                                                                 RatioDecember 29, 2002 through April 14, 2003                                             2.75 to 1.00April 15, 2003 through July 12, 2003                                                 3.00 to 1.00July 13, 2003 through January 3, 2004                                                2.75 to 1.00January 4, 2004 through July 17, 2004                                                2.50 to 1.00July 18, 2004 and thereafter                                                         2.00 to 1.00
86
        SECTION 6.18. . Permitted Vendor Financings will not (a) impose any obligations on any Loan Party (including any covenants or cross defaults related to any Loan Party) other than the obligation of the Borrower to pay or make funds available to the DVA Creditors (or their agents) for payment of any amounts due in respect of the Designated Vendor Accounts on the scheduled payment date with respect thereto and for payment of interest, bank charges, return fees and reasonable attorneys' fees with respect to Designated Vendor Accounts which are not paid when due or (b) provide for any right to require accelerated payment of the Designated Vendor Accounts by reason of default or otherwise; that such Permitted Vendor Financings with respect to the Designated Vendor Accounts may (i) require accelerated payment following acceleration of the Obligations and (ii) provide for the automatic acceleration of all of the outstanding Designated Vendor Accounts and other obligations with respect thereto immediately and without notice upon the filing by the Borrower of any petition in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding. For the purposes of this Section 6.18, the term "" means (a) any voluntary or involuntary case or proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code or any similar Federal, state, or foreign law for the relief of debtors with respect to Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower that has granted a Lien on any Collateral pursuant to any Security Document (each such Subsidiary, a ""), (b) any other voluntary or involuntary insolvency, reorganization or bankruptcy case or proceeding, or any receivership, liquidation, reorganization or other similar case or proceeding with respect to Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor or with respect to any of their respective assets, (c) any liquidation, dissolution, reorganization or winding up of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether voluntary or involuntary and whether or not involving insolvency or bankruptcy or (d) any assignment for the benefit of creditors or any other marshalling of assets and liabilities of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Gurantor.
Permitted Vendor Financings
provided
Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding
Subsidiary Guarantor
        If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
        (a)     the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
        (b)     the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become
87
due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
        (c)     any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
        (d)     Holdings or the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.04 (with respect to the existence of Holdings or the Borrower) or 5.11 or in Article VI;
        (e)     any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
        (f)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable;
        (g)     any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
        (h)     an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
        (i)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar
88
law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
        (j)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
        (k)     one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be rendered against Holdings, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor (and such action is not effectively stayed) to attach or levy upon any assets of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
        (l)     an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $3,000,000 in any year or (ii) $5,000,000 for all periods;
        (m)     any Lien purported to be created under any Security Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, a valid and perfected Lien on any Collateral, with the priority required by the applicable Security Document, except (i) as a result of the sale or other disposition of the applicable Collateral in a transaction permitted under the Loan Documents or (ii) as a result of the Collateral Agent's failure to maintain possession of any stock certificates, promissory notes or other instruments delivered to it under the Pledge Agreement;
        (n)     a Change in Control shall occur;
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind,
89
all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
        Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
        The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
        The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by Holdings, the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or
90
other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
        The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
        The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of each Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
        Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor the Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower (except that no consultation is required during an Event of Default), to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
91
        Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
        The provisions of this Article applicable to the Administrative Agent also shall apply to the Collateral Agent, . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that neither of the Documentation Agents has any right, duty or liability under any Loan Document in its capacity as Documentatioin Agent.
mutatis
mutandis
        SECTION 9.01. Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone, all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices.
        (a)     if to Holdings or the Borrower, to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated at 5673 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia 24012, Attention of Chief Financial Officer  (Telecopy No. (540) 561-1699);
        (b)     if to the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Leah Hughes (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, 4th Floor, New York 10017, Attention of Neil Boylan (Telecopy No. (212) 270-6637);
        (c)     if to the Issuing Bank, to JPMorgan Chase Bank in care of JPMorgan Treasury Services, 10420 Highland Manor Drive, 4th Floor, Tampa, Florida 33610, Attention of Standby LC Department (Telecopy No. (813) 432-5161);
        (d)     if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Leah Hughes (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932); and
        (e)     if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
92
Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
        SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
        (b)     Neither this Agreement nor any other Loan Document nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent, as applicable, and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.18(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders (or Lenders of any Class) required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender (or each Lender of such Class, as the case may be), (vi) release Holdings or any Subsidiary Loan Party from its Guarantee under the Guarantee Agreement (except as
provided
93
expressly provided in the Guarantee Agreement), or limit its liability in respect of such Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender, (vii) except in strict accordance with the express provisions thereof, release all or any substantial part of the Collateral from the Liens of the Security Documents, without the written consent of each Lender, (viii) change any provisions of any Loan Document in a manner that by its terms adversely affects the rights in respect of payments due to Lenders holding Loans of any Class differently than those holding Loans of any other Class, without the written consent of Lenders holding a majority in interest of the outstanding Loans and unused Commitments of each affected Class (in addition to any other consent required under this paragraph), (ix) amend, modify or waive any condition precedent set forth in Section 4.02 with respect to the making of Revolving Loans, without the written consent of Revolving Lenders holding a majority in interest of the Revolving Commitments or (x) change the rights of the Tranche E Lenders to decline mandatory prepayments as provided in Section 2.11, without the written consent of Tranche E Lenders holding a majority of the outstanding Tranche E Loans; that (A) no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, and (B) any waiver, amendment or modification of this Agreement that by its terms affects the rights or duties under this Agreement of the Revolving Lenders (but not any other Lenders), the Tranche D Lenders or the Tranche E Lenders (but not any other Lenders) may be effected by an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and requisite percentage in interest of the affected Class of Lenders that would be required to consent thereto under this Section if such Class of Lenders were the only Class of Lenders hereunder at the time. In furtherance of clause (ix) of this Section 9.02(b), (i) any amendment or modification to or waiver of Section 6.12, 6.13, 6.14 or 6.15 of this Agreement or (ii) any amendment or modification to or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document at a time when any Default has occurred and is continuing, and that would have the effect of eliminating any such Default, shall not be deemed to be effective for purposes of determining whether the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 to the making of any Revolving Loan have been satisfied unless the Revolving Lenders holding a majority in interest of the Revolving Commitments shall have consented to such amendment, modification or waiver; that the foregoing shall not be construed to affect any amendment or modification to any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document (other than any amendment or modification to Section 6.12, 6.13, 6.14 or 6.15 of this Agreement) if no Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such amendment or modification.
provided
further
provided
        SECTION 9.03. (a) The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agents and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Agents, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
94
out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
        (b)     The Borrower shall indemnify the Agents, the Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any Mortgaged Property or any other property currently or formerly owned or operated by Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, except that this clause (iii) shall not apply to Environmental Liabilities related to a Mortgaged Property that are attributable solely to acts or events occurring after completion of foreclosure proceedings with respect to such Mortgaged Property and surrender of possession thereof by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to or as directed by the Collateral Agent or the purchasers at any such foreclosure sale, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnitee
provided
        (c)     To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim,
provided
95
damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such. For purposes hereof, a Lender's "pro rata share" shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures, outstanding Term Loans and unused Commitments at the time.
        (d)     To the extent permitted by applicable law, neither Holdings nor the Borrower shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
        (e)     All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
        SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
        (b)     (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
        (A)     the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of Article VII has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee; and
provided
        (B)     the Administrative Agent, that no consent of the Administrative Agent shall be required for an assignment of all or any portion of a Term Loan.
provided
96
        (ii)     Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
        (A)     except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $1,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default under clause (a), (b), (h) or (i) of Article VII has occurred and is continuing;
provided
        (B)     each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, that this clause shall not be construed to prohibit the assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations in respect of one Class of Commitments or Loans;
provided
        (C)     the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 (except in the case of an assignment to an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender, with only one such fee payable in connection with simultaneous assignments to or by two or more Approved Funds of a single Lender); and
        (D)     the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
        For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term "Approved Fund" has the following meaning:
        "" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
        (iii)     Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall
97
cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
        (iv)     The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, the Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
        (v)     Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
        (c)     (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "Participant") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce this Agreement and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of this Agreement; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees
provided
provided
98
that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(c) as though it were a Lender.
        (ii)     A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.17(e) as though it were a Lender.
        (d)     Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
        (e)     Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a "") may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle (an ""), identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, the option to provide to the Borrower all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPV to make any Loan and (ii) if an SPV elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to provide all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof. The making of a Loan by an SPV hereunder shall utilize the Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender. Each party hereto hereby agrees that no SPV shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement (all liability for which shall remain with the Granting Lender). In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior indebtedness of any SPV, it will not institute against, or join any other person in instituting against, such SPV any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof. In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 9.04, any SPV may (i) with notice to, but without the prior written consent of, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and without paying any processing fee therefor, assign all or a
Granting Lender
SPV
provided
99
portion of its interests in any Loans to the Granting Lender or to any financial institutions (consented to by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent) providing liquidity and/or credit support to or for the account of such SPV to support the funding or maintenance of Loans and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety, guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPV. As this Section 9.04(e) applies to any particular SPV, this Section may not be amended without the written consent of such SPV.
        SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
        SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Document and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall become effective as provided in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
        SECTION 9.07. Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
        SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at
Right of Setoff.
100
any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
        SECTION 9.09. (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
        (b)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Holdings, the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
        (c)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
        (d)     Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
        SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
101
PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
        SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
        SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below) in accordance with their customary procedures, except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' and Approved Funds' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement, (g) with the consent of the Borrower, (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than Holdings or the Borrower or (i) to any creditor or direct or indirect contractual counterparty with a Lender or its affiliates in a swap agreement or such counterparty's professional advisor (so long as such creditor contractual counterparty or professional advisor to such contractual counterparty agrees to be bound by the provisions of this Section 9.12). For the purposes of this Section, "" means all information received from Holdings or the Borrower relating to Holdings or the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by Holdings or the Borrower; that, in the case of information received from Holdings or the Borrower after the Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section
Confidentiality.
Information
provided
102
shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information. Nothing in this Section 9.12 is intended to prohibit any Lender (or any Affiliate or Approved Fund of any Lender) from acquiring or disposing of any of the Borrower's debt securities from or to an institutional "accredited investor" (as defined in Regulation D under the Securities Act of 1933); that in connection with any such acquisition or disposition, such Lender (or Affiliate or Approved Fund of such Lender) shall not disclose to its trade counterparty or any other Person any Information relating to the Borrower except in accordance with this Section 9.12.
provided
        SECTION 9.13. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively, the ""), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the "") which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
        SECTION 9.14. Until this Agreement becomes effective in accordance with the terms of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall not be affected hereby. After the Restatement Effective Date, all obligations of the Borrower under the Existing Credit Agreement shall become obligations of the Borrower hereunder, secured by the Security Documents, and the provisions of the Existing Credit Agreement shall be superseded by the provisions hereof.
Existing Credit Agreement; Effectiveness of Amendment and Restatement.
103
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                          by                                                               /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name:  Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, individually and as                                                     Administrative Agent,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                               Title: Managing Director
104
SUNTRUST BANK, individually and as Documentation                                                     Agent,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Deborah S. Armstrong                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Deborah S. Armstrong                                                               Title: Managing Director                                                     WACHOVIA BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, individually and                                                     as Documentation Agent,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Michael Grady                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Michael Grady                                                               Title: Senior Vice President
105
(THE OTHER LENDERS, ISSUING BANKS AND SWINGLINE                                                     LENDERS THAT ARE SIGNATORIES TO THE AMENDMENT AND                                                     RESTATEMENT AGREEMENT),                                                          by                                                     -------------------------------------------------------                                                               Name:                                                               Title:

Exhibit 10.2                                                                                                        EXECUTION COPY                                    AMENDED AND RESTATED PLEDGE AGREEMENT dated as of December 5, 2003                           (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the                           "Pledge Agreement"), among ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia                           corporation (the "Borrower"), ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation                           ("Holdings"), each subsidiary of the Borrower listed on Schedule I hereto                           (each such Subsidiary individually a "Subsidiary Pledgor" and, collectively,                           the "Subsidiary Pledgors"; the Borrower, Holdings and the Subsidiary Pledgors                           are referred to collectively herein as the "Pledgors") and JPMORGAN CHASE                           BANK, a New York banking corporation ("JPMCB"), as collateral agent (in such                           capacity, the "Collateral Agent") for the Secured Parties (as defined in the                           Credit Agreement referred to below).                  Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as ofDecember 5, 2003 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "CreditAgreement"), among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders")and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders,Collateral Agent and as issuing bank (in such capacity, the "Issuing Bank"), (b) the Guarantee Agreementdated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the"Guarantee Agreement"), among the Subsidiary Pledgors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent, and (c) thePledge Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001 (the "Existing Pledge Agreement"), among the partieshereto as in effect the date hereof.                  The parties desire to amend and restate the Existing Pledge Agreement to provide forthe DVA Obligations to be secured by the Collateral pari passu with the other Obligations.  Accordingly,the parties hereto agree by execution and delivery of this Agreement that the Existing Pledge Agreementwill be deemed to be amended and restated as provided herein.                  The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Bank has agreedto issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subjectto the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement.  Holdings and the Subsidiary Pledgors have agreedto guarantee, among other things, all the obligations of the Borrower under the Credit Agreement.  DVACreditors may from time to time agree to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts.  The obligations of theLenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit, and the agreement from time totime of DVA Creditors to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts, are conditioned upon, among other things,the execution and delivery by the Pledgors of a Pledge Agreement in the form hereof to secure (a) thedue and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interestaccruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding,regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether atmaturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each paymentrequired to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, whenand as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements made by the Issuing Bankwith respect thereto, interest thereon and obligations to provide, under certain circumstances, cashcollateral in connection therewith, and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs,expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (includingmonetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or othersimilar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Partiesto the Secured Parties under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctualperformance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Loan Parties under orpursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (c) the due and punctual payment andperformance of all obligations in respect of overdrafts and related liabilities owed to JPMCB, anyAffiliate thereof, the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent arising from or in connection withtreasury, depositary or cash management services or in connection with any automated clearinghousetransfer of funds, (d) unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the applicable Lender party thereto, thedue and punctual payment and performance of all monetary obligations of the Borrower under each HedgingAgreement entered into with any counterparty that was a Lender (or an Affiliate of a Lender) at the timesuch Hedging Agreement was entered into and (e) the due and punctual payment of all DVA Obligations(including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or othersimilar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), when and as due (allthe monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) through (e) being referred tocollectively as the "Obligations").  Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall havemeanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.                  Accordingly, the Pledgors and the Collateral Agent, on behalf of itself and eachSecured Party (and each of their respective successors or assigns), hereby agree as follows:                  SECTION 1.        Pledge.  As security for the payment and performance, as the case may be, in full ofthe Obligations, each Pledgor hereby transfers, grants, hypothecates and pledges, unto the CollateralAgent, its successors and assigns, and hereby grants to the Collateral Agent, its successors andassigns, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in, all of the Pledgor'sright, title and interest in, to and under (a) the shares of capital stock owned by it and listed onSchedule II hereto and any shares of capital stock of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of Holdingsobtained in the future by the Pledgor and the certificates representing all such shares (the "PledgedStock"); provided that the Pledged Stock shall not include (i) more than 65% of the issued andoutstanding shares of stock of any Foreign Subsidiary or (ii) to the extent that applicable law requiresthat a Subsidiary of the Pledgor issue directors' qualifying shares, such qualifying shares; (b)(i) thedebt securities listed opposite the name of the Pledgor on Schedule II hereto, (ii) any debt securities(other than promissory notes received in connection with loans permitted under Section 6.04(g) of theCredit Agreement) in the future held by or issued to the Pledgor and (iii) the promissory notes and anyother instruments evidencing such debt securities (the "Pledged Debt Securities"); (c) all otherproperty that may be delivered to and held by the Collateral Agent pursuant to the terms hereof;(d) subject to Section 5, all payments of principal or interest, dividends, cash, instruments and otherproperty from time to time received, receivable or otherwise distributed, in respect of, in exchange foror upon the conversion of the securities referred to in clauses (a) and (b) above; (e) subject toSection 5, all rights and privileges of the Pledgor with respect to the securities and other propertyreferred to in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above; and (f) all proceeds of any of the foregoing (theitems referred to in clauses (a) through (f) above being collectively referred to as the "Collateral").Upon delivery to the Collateral Agent, (a) any stock certificates, notes or other securities now orhereafter included in the Collateral (the "Pledged Securities") shall be accompanied by stock or notepowers, as applicable, duly executed in blank or other instruments of transfer satisfactory to theCollateral Agent and by such other instruments and documents as the Collateral Agent may reasonablyrequest and (b) all other property comprising part of the Collateral shall be accompanied by properinstruments of assignment duly executed by the applicable Pledgor and such other instruments ordocuments as the Collateral Agent may reasonably request.  Each delivery of Pledged Securities shall beaccompanied by a schedule describing the securities then being pledged hereunder, which schedule shallbe attached hereto as a supplement to Schedule II and made a part hereof. Each schedule so deliveredshall supplement any prior schedules so delivered.                  SECTION 2.        Delivery of the Collateral.  (a)  Each Pledgor agrees promptly to deliver or cause tobe delivered to the Collateral Agent any and all Pledged Securities, and any and all certificates orother instruments or documents representing the Collateral.                  (b)      Each Pledgor will cause any Indebtedness for borrowed money owed to the Pledgor by any LoanParty or any Subsidiary thereof to be evidenced by a duly executed promissory note that is pledged anddelivered to the Collateral Agent pursuant to the terms thereof.                  SECTION 3.        Representations, Warranties and Covenants.  Each Pledgor hereby represents, warrantsand covenants, as to itself and the Collateral pledged by it hereunder, to and with the Collateral Agentthat:                  (a)      the Pledged Stock represents that percentage as set forth on Schedule II of the issued and         outstanding shares of each class of the capital stock of the issuer with respect thereto;                  (b)      except for the security interest granted hereunder, the Pledgor (i) is and will at all times         continue to be the direct owner, beneficially and of record, of the Pledged Securities         indicated on Schedule II, (ii) holds the same free and clear of all Liens, (iii) will make no         assignment, pledge, hypothecation or transfer of, or create or permit to exist any security         interest in, or other Lien on, the Collateral, other than pursuant hereto, and (iv) subject to         Section 5, will cause any and all Pledged Securities, whether for value paid by the Pledgor or         otherwise, to be forthwith deposited with the Collateral Agent and pledged or assigned         hereunder;                  (c)      the Pledgor (i) has the power and authority to pledge the Collateral in the manner hereby done         or contemplated and (ii) will defend its title or interest thereto or therein against any and         all Liens (other than the Lien created by this Agreement), however arising, of all Persons         whomsoever;                  (d)      no consent of any other Person (including stockholders or creditors of any Pledgor) and no         consent or approval of any Governmental Authority or any securities exchange was or is         necessary to the validity of the pledge effected hereby;                  (e)      by virtue of the execution and delivery by the Pledgors of this Agreement, when the Pledged         Securities are delivered to the Collateral Agent in accordance with this Agreement, the         Collateral Agent will obtain a valid and perfected first lien upon and security interest in         such Pledged Securities as security for the payment and performance of the Obligations;                  (f)      upon delivery of the Pledged Securities to the Collateral Agent, the pledge effected hereby is         effective to vest in the Collateral Agent, on behalf of the Secured Parties, the rights of the         Collateral Agent in the Collateral as set forth herein;                  (g)      all of the Pledged Stock has been duly authorized and validly issued and is fully paid and         nonassessable;                  (h)      all information set forth herein relating to the Pledged Stock is accurate and complete in all         material respects as of the date hereof; and                  (i)      the pledge of the Pledged Stock pursuant to this Agreement does not violate Regulation T, U or         X of the Federal Reserve Board or any successor thereto as of the date hereof.                  SECTION 4.        Registration in Nominee Name; Denominations.  The Collateral Agent, on behalf of theSecured Parties, shall have the right (in its sole and absolute discretion) to hold the PledgedSecurities in its own name as pledgee, the name of its nominee (as pledgee or as sub-agent) or the nameof the Pledgors, endorsed or assigned in blank or in favor of the Collateral Agent.  Each Pledgor willpromptly give to the Collateral Agent copies of any notices or other communications received by it withrespect to Pledged Securities registered in the name of such Pledgor.  The Collateral Agent shall at alltimes have the right to exchange the certificates representing Pledged Securities for certificates ofsmaller or larger denominations for any purpose consistent with this Agreement.                  SECTION 5.        Voting Rights; Dividends and Interest, etc.  (a)  Unless and until an Event of Defaultshall have occurred and be continuing:                  (i)      Each Pledgor shall be entitled to exercise any and all voting and/or other consensual rights         and powers inuring to an owner of Pledged Securities or any part thereof for any purpose         consistent with the terms of this Agreement, the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents;         provided, however, that such Pledgor will not be entitled to exercise any such right if the         result thereof would reasonably be expected to materially and adversely affect the rights         inuring to a holder of the Pledged Securities or the rights and remedies of any of the Secured         Parties under this Agreement or the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document or the ability         of the Secured Parties to exercise the same.                  (ii)     The Collateral Agent shall execute and deliver to each Pledgor, or cause to be executed and         delivered to each Pledgor, all such proxies, powers of attorney and other instruments as such         Pledgor may reasonably request for the purpose of enabling such Pledgor to exercise the voting         and/or consensual rights and powers it is entitled to exercise pursuant to subparagraph (i)         above and to receive the cash dividends it is entitled to receive pursuant to subparagraph         (iii) below.                  (iii)    Each Pledgor shall be entitled to receive and retain any and all dividends, interest, principal         and other distributions paid in cash on the Pledged Securities to the extent and only to the         extent that such cash dividends, interest, principal and other distributions are permitted by,         and otherwise paid in accordance with, the terms and conditions of the Credit Agreement, the         other Loan Documents and applicable laws.  All dividends, interest, principal and other         distributions made on or in respect of the Pledged Securities other than in cash (or that are         paid in cash but are not permitted by the Credit Agreement, the other Loan Documents or         applicable law), whether resulting from a subdivision, combination or reclassification of the         outstanding capital stock of the issuer of any Pledged Securities or received in exchange for         Pledged Securities or any part thereof, or in redemption thereof, or as a result of any merger,         consolidation, acquisition or other exchange of assets to which such issuer may be a party or         otherwise, shall be and become part of the Collateral, and, if received by any Pledgor, shall         not be commingled by such Pledgor with any of its other funds or property but shall be held         separate and apart therefrom, shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Collateral Agent         and shall be forthwith delivered to the Collateral Agent in the same form as so received (with         any necessary endorsement).                  (b)      Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, all rights of anyPledgor to dividends, interest, principal or other distributions that such Pledgor is authorized toreceive pursuant to paragraph (a)(iii) above shall cease, and all such rights shall thereupon becomevested in the Collateral Agent, which shall have the sole and exclusive right and authority to receiveand retain such dividends, interest, principal or other distributions.  All dividends, interest,principal or other distributions received by the  Pledgor contrary to the provisions of this Section 5shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, shall be segregated from other propertyor funds of such Pledgor and shall be forthwith delivered to the Collateral Agent upon demand in thesame form as so received (with any necessary endorsement). Any and all money and other property paidover to or received by the Collateral Agent pursuant to the provisions of this paragraph (b) shall beretained by the Collateral Agent in an account to be established by the Collateral Agent upon receipt ofsuch money or other property and shall be applied in accordance with the provisions of Section 7.  Afterall Events of Default have been cured or waived, the Collateral Agent shall, within five Business Daysafter all such Events of Default have been cured or waived, repay to each Pledgor all cash dividends,interest, principal or other distributions (without interest), that such Pledgor would otherwise bepermitted to retain pursuant to the terms of paragraph (a)(iii) above and which remain in such account.                  (c)      Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, all rights of anyPledgor to exercise the voting and consensual rights and powers it is entitled to exercise pursuant toparagraph (a)(i) of this Section 5, and the obligations of the Collateral Agent under paragraph (a)(ii)of this Section 5, shall cease, and all such rights shall thereupon become vested in the CollateralAgent, which shall have the sole and exclusive right and authority to exercise such voting andconsensual rights and powers, provided that, unless otherwise directed by the Required Lenders, theCollateral Agent shall have the right from time to time following and during the continuance of an Eventof Default to permit the Pledgors to exercise such rights.  After all Events of Default have been curedor waived, such Pledgor will have the right to exercise the voting and consensual rights and powers thatit would otherwise be entitled to exercise pursuant to the terms of paragraph (a)(i) above.                  SECTION 6.        Remedies upon Default.  Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event ofDefault, subject to applicable regulatory and legal requirements, the Collateral Agent may sell theCollateral, or any part thereof, at public or private sale or at any broker's board or on any securitiesexchange, for cash, upon credit or for future delivery as the Collateral Agent shall deem appropriate.The Collateral Agent shall be authorized at any such sale (if it deems it advisable to do so) torestrict the prospective bidders or purchasers to Persons who will represent and agree that they arepurchasing the Collateral for their own account for investment and not with a view to the distributionor sale thereof, and upon consummation of any such sale the Collateral Agent shall have the right toassign, transfer and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers thereof the Collateral so sold.  Each suchpurchaser at any such sale shall hold the property sold absolutely free from any claim or right on thepart of any Pledgor, and, to the extent permitted by applicable law, the Pledgors hereby waive allrights of redemption, stay, valuation and appraisal any Pledgor now has or may at any time in the futurehave under any rule of law or statute now existing or hereafter enacted.                  The Collateral Agent shall give a Pledgor 10 days' prior written notice (which eachPledgor agrees is reasonable notice within the meaning of Section 9-504(3) of the Uniform CommercialCode as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions) of the CollateralAgent's intention to make any sale of such Pledgor's Collateral.  Such notice, in the case of a publicsale, shall state the time and place for such sale and, in the case of a sale at a broker's board or ona securities exchange, shall state the board or exchange at which such sale is to be made and the day onwhich the Collateral, or portion thereof, will first be offered for sale at such board or exchange.  Anysuch public sale shall be held at such time or times within ordinary business hours and at such place orplaces as the Collateral Agent may fix and state in the notice of such sale.  At any such sale, theCollateral, or portion thereof, to be sold may be sold in one lot as an entirety or in separate parcels,as the Collateral Agent may (in its sole and absolute discretion) determine.  The Collateral Agent shallnot be obligated to make any sale of any Collateral if it shall determine not to do so, regardless ofthe fact that notice of sale of such Collateral shall have been given. The Collateral Agent may, withoutnotice or publication, adjourn any public or private sale or cause the same to be adjourned from time totime by announcement at the time and place fixed for sale, and such sale may, without further notice, bemade at the time and place to which the same was so adjourned. In case any sale of all or any part ofthe Collateral is made on credit or for future delivery, the Collateral so sold may be retained by theCollateral Agent until the sale price is paid in full by the purchaser or purchasers thereof, but theCollateral Agent shall not incur any liability in case any such purchaser or purchasers shall fail totake up and pay for the Collateral so sold and, in case of any such failure, such Collateral may be soldagain upon like notice.  At any public (or, to the extent permitted by applicable law, private) salemade pursuant to this Section 6, any Secured Party may bid for or purchase, free from any right ofredemption, stay or appraisal on the part of any Pledgor (all said rights being also hereby waived andreleased), the Collateral or any part thereof offered for sale and may make payment on account thereofby using any claim then due and payable to it from such Pledgor as a credit against the purchase price,and it may, upon compliance with the terms of sale, hold, retain and dispose of such property withoutfurther accountability to such Pledgor therefor.  For purposes hereof, (a) a written agreement topurchase the Collateral or any portion thereof shall be treated as a sale thereof, (b) the CollateralAgent shall be free to carry out such sale pursuant to such agreement and (c) such Pledgor shall not beentitled to the return of the Collateral or any portion thereof subject thereto, notwithstanding thefact that after the Collateral Agent shall have entered into such an agreement all Events of Defaultshall have been remedied and the Obligations paid in full.  As an alternative to exercising the power ofsale herein conferred upon it, the Collateral Agent may proceed by a suit or suits at law or in equityto foreclose upon the Collateral and to sell the Collateral or any portion thereof pursuant to ajudgment or decree of a court or courts having competent jurisdiction or pursuant to a proceeding by acourt-appointed receiver.  Any sale pursuant to the provisions of this Section 6 shall be deemed toconform to the commercially reasonable standards as provided in Section 9-504(3) of the UniformCommercial Code as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions.                  SECTION 7.        Application of Proceeds of Sale.  The Collateral Agent shall apply the proceeds of anycollection or sale of Collateral as well as any Collateral consisting of cash:                  FIRST, to the payment of all costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative         Agent or the Collateral Agent (in its capacity as such hereunder or under any other         Loan Document) in connection with such collection or sale or otherwise in connection         with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any of the Obligations including all         court costs and the reasonable fees and expenses of its agents and legal counsel, the         repayment of all advances made by the Collateral Agent hereunder or under any other         Loan Document on behalf of any Pledgor and any other costs or expenses incurred by the         Collateral Agent or the Administrative Agent in connection with the exercise of any         right or remedy hereunder or under any other Loan Document;                  SECOND, to the payment in full of the Obligations (the amounts so applied to         be distributed among the Secured Parties pro rata in accordance with the amounts of         the Obligations owed to them on the date of any such distribution); and                  THIRD, to the Pledgors, their successors or assigns, or as a court of         competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct.                  The Collateral Agent shall have absolute discretion as to the time of application ofany such proceeds, moneys or balances in accordance with this Agreement.  Upon any sale of theCollateral by the Collateral Agent (including pursuant to a power of sale granted by statute or under ajudicial proceeding), the receipt of the purchase money by the Collateral Agent or of the officer makingthe sale shall be a sufficient discharge to the purchaser or purchasers of the Collateral so sold andsuch purchaser or purchasers shall not be obligated to see to the application of any part of thepurchase money paid over to the Collateral Agent or such officer or be answerable in any way for themisapplication thereof.  For purposes of making any payment hereunder in respect of any DVA Obligations,the Collateral Agent may rely upon any statement or certificate presented to it by any Grantor or DVACreditor (or any agent for such DVA Creditor) with respect to the amount of such DVA Obligation, and anydistribution by the Collateral Agent of funds to any agent for any of the DVA Creditors shall besufficient to discharge the obligations of the Collateral Agent in respect of such DVA Obligations, andthe Collateral Agent shall not be required to see to the application of such funds by such agent.                  SECTION 8.        Reimbursement of Collateral Agent.  (a)  Each Pledgor agrees to pay upon demand to theCollateral Agent the amount of any and all reasonable expenses, including the reasonable fees, othercharges and disbursements of its counsel and of any experts or agents, that the Collateral Agent mayincur in connection with (i) the administration of this Agreement, (ii) the custody or preservation of,or the sale of, collection from, or other realization upon, any of the Collateral, (iii) the exercise orenforcement of any of the rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder or (iv) the failure by such Pledgorto perform or observe any of the provisions hereof.                  (b)      Without limitation of its indemnification obligations under the other Loan Documents, eachPledgor agrees to indemnify the Collateral Agent and the Indemnitees (as defined in Section 9.03 of theCredit Agreement) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages,liabilities and related expenses, including reasonable counsel fees, other charges and disbursements,incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in any way connected with, or as a resultof (i) the execution or delivery of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any agreement orinstrument contemplated hereby or thereby, the performance by the parties hereto of their respectiveobligations thereunder or the consummation of the Restatement Transactions and the other transactionscontemplated thereby or (ii) any claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of theforegoing, whether or not any Indemnitee is a party thereto, provided that such indemnity shall not, asto any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or relatedexpenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to haveresulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.                  (c)      Any amounts payable as provided hereunder shall be additional Obligations secured hereby and bythe other Security Documents.  The provisions of this Section 8 shall remain operative and in full forceand effect regardless of the termination of this Agreement, the consummation of the transactionscontemplated hereby, the repayment of any of the Obligations, the invalidity or unenforceability of anyterm or provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or any investigation made by or on behalfof the Collateral Agent or any other Secured Party.  All amounts due under this Section 8 shall bepayable on written demand therefor and shall bear interest at the rate specified in Section 2.13 of theCredit Agreement.                  SECTION 9.        Collateral Agent Appointed Attorney-in-Fact.  Each Pledgor hereby appoints theCollateral Agent the attorney-in-fact of such Pledgor for the purpose of carrying out the provisions ofthis Agreement and taking any action and executing any instrument that the Collateral Agent may deemnecessary or advisable to accomplish the purposes hereof, which appointment is irrevocable and coupledwith an interest, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, with full powerof substitution either in the Collateral Agent's name or in the name of such Pledgor, to ask for,demand, sue for, collect, receive and give acquittance for any and all moneys due or to become due underand by virtue of any Collateral, to endorse checks, drafts, orders and other instruments for the paymentof money payable to the Pledgor representing any interest or dividend or other distribution payable inrespect of the Collateral or any part thereof or on account thereof and to give full discharge for thesame, to settle, compromise, prosecute or defend any action, claim or proceeding with respect thereto,and to sell, assign, endorse, pledge, transfer and to make any agreement respecting, or otherwise dealwith, the same; provided, however, that nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring orobligating the Collateral Agent to make any commitment or to make any inquiry as to the nature orsufficiency of any payment received by the Collateral Agent, or to present or file any claim or notice,or to take any action with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or the moneys due or to becomedue in respect thereof or any property covered thereby.  The Collateral Agent and the other SecuredParties shall be accountable only for amounts actually received as a result of the exercise of thepowers granted to them herein, and neither they nor their officers, directors, employees or agents shallbe responsible to any Pledgor for any act or failure to act hereunder, except for their own grossnegligence or wilful misconduct.                  SECTION 10.       Waivers; Amendment. (a)  No failure or delay of the Collateral Agent in exercisingany power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exerciseof any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right orpower, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  Therights and remedies of the Collateral Agent hereunder and of the other Secured Parties under the otherLoan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwisehave.  No waiver of any provisions of this Agreement or consent to any departure by any Pledgortherefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, andthen such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose forwhich given.  No notice or demand on any Pledgor in any case shall entitle such Pledgor to any other orfurther notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.                  (b)      Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified exceptpursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Collateral Agent and the Pledgor or Pledgorswith respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification is to apply, subject to any consentrequired in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement or any Intercreditor Agreement.                  SECTION 11.       Securities Act, etc.  In view of the position of the Pledgors in relation to thePledged Securities, or because of other current or future circumstances, a question may arise under theSecurities Act of 1933, as now or hereafter in effect, or any similar statute hereafter enactedanalogous in purpose or effect (such Act and any such similar statute as from time to time in effectbeing called the "Federal Securities Laws") with respect to any disposition of the Pledged Securitiespermitted hereunder.  Each Pledgor understands that compliance with the Federal Securities Laws mightvery strictly limit the course of conduct of the Collateral Agent if the Collateral Agent were toattempt to dispose of all or any part of the Pledged Securities, and might also limit the extent towhich or the manner in which any subsequent transferee of any Pledged Securities could dispose of thesame.  Similarly, there may be other legal restrictions or limitations affecting the Collateral Agent inany attempt to dispose of all or part of the Pledged Securities under applicable Blue Sky or other statesecurities laws or similar laws analogous in purpose or effect.  Each Pledgor recognizes that in lightof such restrictions and limitations the Collateral Agent may, with respect to any sale of the PledgedSecurities, limit the purchasers to those who will agree, among other things, to acquire such PledgedSecurities for their own account, for investment, and not with a view to the distribution or resalethereof.  Each Pledgor acknowledges and agrees that in light of such restrictions and limitations, theCollateral Agent, in its sole and absolute discretion, (a) may proceed to make such a sale whether ornot a registration statement for the purpose of registering such Pledged Securities or part thereofshall have been filed under the Federal Securities Laws and (b) may approach and negotiate with a singlepotential purchaser to effect such sale.  Each Pledgor acknowledges and agrees that any such sale mightresult in prices and other terms less favorable to the seller than if such sale were a public salewithout such restrictions.  In the event of any such sale, the Collateral Agent shall incur noresponsibility or liability for selling all or any part of the Pledged Securities at a price that theCollateral Agent, in its sole and absolute discretion, may in good faith deem reasonable under thecircumstances, notwithstanding the possibility that a substantially higher price might have beenrealized if the sale were deferred until after registration as aforesaid or if more than a singlepurchaser were approached.  The provisions of this Section 11 will apply notwithstanding the existenceof a public or private market upon which the quotations or sales prices may exceed substantially theprice at which the Collateral Agent sells.                  SECTION 12.       Registration, etc.  Each Pledgor agrees that, upon the occurrence and during thecontinuance of an Event of Default hereunder, if for any reason the Collateral Agent desires to sell anyof the Pledged Securities at a public sale, it will, at any time and from time to time, upon the writtenrequest of the Collateral Agent, use its best efforts to take or to cause the issuer of such PledgedSecurities to take such action and prepare, distribute and/or file such documents, as are required oradvisable in the reasonable opinion of counsel for the Collateral Agent to permit the public sale ofsuch Pledged Securities.  Each Pledgor further agrees to indemnify, defend and hold harmless theCollateral Agent, each other Secured Party, any underwriter and their respective officers, directors,affiliates and controlling Persons from and against all loss, liability, expenses, costs of counsel(including, without limitation, reasonable fees and expenses to the Collateral Agent of legal counsel),and claims (including the costs of investigation) that they may incur insofar as such loss, liability,expense or claim arises out of or is based upon any alleged untrue statement of a material factcontained in any prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto) or in any notification or offeringcircular, or arises out of or is based upon any alleged omission to state a material fact required to bestated therein or necessary to make the statements in any thereof not misleading, except insofar as thesame may have been caused by any untrue statement or omission based upon information furnished inwriting to such Pledgor or the issuer of such Pledged Securities by the Collateral Agent or any otherSecured Party expressly for use therein.  Each Pledgor further agrees, upon such written requestreferred to above, to use its best efforts to qualify, file or register, or cause the issuer of suchPledged Securities to qualify, file or register, any of the Pledged Securities under the Blue Sky orother securities laws of such states as may be requested by the Collateral Agent and keep effective, orcause to be kept effective, all such qualifications, filings or registrations.  Each Pledgor will bearall costs and expenses of carrying out its obligations under this Section 12.  Each Pledgor acknowledgesthat there is no adequate remedy at law for failure by it to comply with the provisions of thisSection 12 and that such failure would not be adequately compensable in damages, and therefore agreesthat its agreements contained in this Section 12 may be specifically enforced.                  SECTION 13.       Security Interest Absolute.  All rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder, the grantof a security interest in the Collateral and all obligations of each Pledgor hereunder, shall beabsolute and unconditional irrespective of (a) any lack of validity or enforceability of the CreditAgreement, any other Loan Document, any agreement with respect to any of the Obligations or any otheragreement or instrument relating to any of the foregoing, (b) any change in the time, manner or place ofpayment of, or in any other term of, all or any of the Obligations, or any other amendment or waiver ofor any consent to any departure from the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any otheragreement or instrument relating to any of the foregoing, (c) any exchange, release or nonperfection ofany other collateral, or any release or amendment or waiver of or consent to or departure from anyguaranty, for all or any of the Obligations or (d) any other circumstance that might otherwiseconstitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Pledgor in respect of the Obligations or inrespect of this Agreement (other than the indefeasible payment in full of all the Obligations).                  SECTION 14.       Termination or Release.  (a)  This Agreement and the security interests grantedhereunder shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than  the DVA Obligations and other thaninchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations) have been indefeasibly paid in full, Lendershave no further commitment to lend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Bank has nofurther commitment to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement, at which time the CollateralAgent shall execute and deliver to the Pledgors, at the Pledgors' expense, all Uniform Commercial Codetermination statements and similar documents which the Pledgors shall reasonably request to evidencesuch termination.  Any execution and delivery of termination statements or documents pursuant to thisSection 14 shall be without recourse to or warranty by the Collateral Agent.                  (b)      A Pledgor which is a Subsidiary shall automatically be released from its obligations hereunderand the Security Interest in the Collateral of such Pledgor shall be automatically released in the eventthat all the capital stock of such Pledgor shall be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of to aPerson that is not an Affiliate of the Borrower in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement;provided that if the Credit Agreement so requires, the Lenders shall have consented pursuant toSection 9.02 of the Credit Agreement to such sale, transfer or other disposition and the terms of suchconsent did not provide otherwise.                  (c)      Upon any sale or other transfer by any Pledgor of any Collateral that is permitted under theCredit Agreement to any Person that is not a Pledgor, or, upon the effectiveness of any written consentto the release of the security interest granted hereby in any Collateral pursuant to Section 9.02(b) ofthe Credit Agreement, the security interest in such Collateral shall be automatically released.                  SECTION 15.       Notices.  All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given asprovided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement.  All communications and notices hereunder to anySubsidiary Pledgor shall be given to it at the address for notices set forth on Schedule I.                  SECTION 16.       Further Assurances.  Each Pledgor agrees to do such further acts and things, and toexecute and deliver such additional conveyances, assignments, agreements and instruments, as theCollateral Agent may at any time reasonably request in connection with the administration andenforcement of this Agreement or with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or in order betterto assure and confirm unto the Collateral Agent its rights and remedies hereunder.                  SECTION 17.       Binding Effect; Several Agreement; Assignments. Whenever in this Agreement any of theparties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns ofsuch party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of any Pledgor that are containedin this Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of its successors and assigns.  This Agreementshall become effective as to any Pledgor when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of such Pledgorshall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed onbehalf of the Collateral Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon such Pledgor and the CollateralAgent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Pledgor, theCollateral Agent and the other Secured Parties, and their respective successors and assigns, except thatno Pledgor shall have the right to assign its rights hereunder or any interest herein or in theCollateral (and any such attempted assignment shall be void), except as expressly contemplated by thisAgreement or the other Loan Documents.  If all of the capital stock of a Pledgor is sold, transferred orotherwise disposed of to a Person that is not an Affiliate of the Borrower or Holdings pursuant to atransaction permitted by Section 6.05 of the Credit Agreement, such Pledgor shall be released from itsobligations under this Agreement without further action.  This Agreement shall be construed as aseparate agreement with respect to each Pledgor and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived orreleased with respect to any Pledgor without the approval of any other Pledgor and without affecting theobligations of any other Pledgor hereunder.                  SECTION 18.       Survival of Agreement; Severability.  (a)  All covenants, agreements, representationsand warranties made by each Pledgor herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared ordelivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall beconsidered to have been relied upon by the Collateral Agent and the other Secured Parties and shallsurvive the making by the Lenders of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the IssuingBank, regardless of any investigation made by the Secured Parties or on their behalf, and shall continuein full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any otherfee or amount payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document is outstanding and unpaid or theLC Exposure does not equal zero and as long as the Commitments have not been terminated.                  (b)      In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be heldinvalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of theremaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it beingunderstood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in andof itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavorin good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with validprovisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal orunenforceable provisions.                  SECTION 19.       Governing Law.  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH,THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.                  SECTION 20.       Counterparts.  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each ofwhich shall constitute an original, but all of which, when taken together, shall constitute a singlecontract, and shall become effective as provided in Section 17.  Delivery of an executed counterpart ofa signature page to this Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of amanually executed counterpart of this Agreement.                  SECTION 21.       Rules of Interpretation.  The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of theCredit Agreement shall be applicable to this Agreement.  Section headings used herein are forconvenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of,or to be taken into consideration in, interpreting this Agreement.                  SECTION 22.       Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process. (a)  Each Pledgor hereby irrevocably andunconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any New YorkState court or Federal court of the United States of America sitting in New York City, and any appellatecourt from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or theother Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties heretohereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that, to the extent permitted by applicable law, allclaims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York Stateor, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that afinal judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in otherjurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreementshall affect any right that the Collateral Agent or any other Secured Party may otherwise have to bringany action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against any Pledgor orits properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.                  (b)      Each Pledgor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it maylegally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue ofany suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documentsin any New York State or Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to thefullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such actionor proceeding in any such court.                  (c)      Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner providedfor notices in Section 15.  Nothing in this Agreement will affect the right of any party to thisAgreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.                  SECTION 23.       Waiver Of Jury Trial; Appointment of Receiver.  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TOTHE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OFANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT. EACHPARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED,EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THEFOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTERINTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.                  SECTION 24.       Additional Pledgors.  Pursuant to Section 5.12 of the Credit Agreement, eachSubsidiary of Holdings that was not in existence or not a Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreementis required to enter in this Agreement as a Subsidiary Pledgor upon becoming a Subsidiary if suchSubsidiary owns or possesses property of a type that would be considered Collateral hereunder.  Uponexecution and delivery by the Collateral Agent and a Subsidiary of an instrument in the form of Annex 1,such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Pledgor hereunder with the same force and effect as iforiginally named as a Subsidiary Pledgor herein.  The execution and delivery of such instrument shallnot require the consent of any Pledgor hereunder. The rights and obligations of each Pledgor hereundershall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the addition of any new Subsidiary Pledgor as aparty to this Agreement.                  SECTION 25.       Execution of Financing Statements.  Pursuant to Section 9-402 of the UniformCommercial Code as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions, eachPledgor authorizes the Collateral Agent to file financing statements with respect to the Collateralowned by it without the signature of such Pledgor in such form and in such filing offices as theCollateral Agent reasonably determines appropriate to perfect the security interests of the CollateralAgent under this Agreement.  A carbon, photographic or other reproduction of this Agreement shall besufficient as a financing statement for filing in any jurisdiction.                  SECTION 26.       Intercreditor Agreement.  The rights hereunder with respect to the DVA Creditors andthe DVA Obligations are subject to the applicable Intercreditor Agreements.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the dayand year first above written.                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assitant Secretary                                                     EACH SUBSIDIARY PLEDGOR LISTED ON SCHEDULE I HERETO,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assitant Secretary                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                        --------------------------                                                            Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                            Title: Managing Director                                                                                       Schedule I to the                                                                                        Pledge Agreement                                           Subsidiary PledgorsName                                                            Address
Schedule II to the                                                                                          Pledge Agreement                                              Capital Stock                                              -------------                                                                           Number and                              Number of              Registered             Class of          Percentage         Issuer              Certificate               Owner                 Shares           of Shares         ------              -----------             ----------           -----------         ----------                                             Debt Securities                                             ---------------          Issuer                 Principal Amount            Date of Note               Maturity Date          ------                 ----------------            ------------               -------------
4                                                                                            Annex 1 to the                                                                                          Pledge Agreement                                    SUPPLEMENT NO. [   ] dated as of [         ], to the AMENDED AND                           RESTATED PLEDGE AGREEMENT dated as of December 5, 2003 (as further amended,                           supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Pledge Agreement"),                           among ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the                           "Borrower"), ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"),                           and each subsidiary of the Borrower listed on Schedule I thereto (each such                           subsidiary individually a "Subsidiary Pledgor" and, collectively, the                           "Subsidiary Pledgors"; the Borrower, Holdings and Subsidiary Pledgors are                           referred to collectively herein as the "Pledgors") and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, a                           New York banking corporation ("JPMCB"), as collateral agent, (in such                           capacity, the "Collateral Agent"), for the Secured Parties (as defined in the                           Credit Agreement referred to below).                  A.       Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003(as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"),among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders") and JPMCB, asadministrative agent (in such capacity, the "Administrative Agent") for the Lenders, Collateral Agentand as issuing bank (in such capacity, the "Issuing Bank") and (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as ofNovember 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "GuaranteeAgreement"), among the Subsidiary Pledgors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent.                  B.       Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assignedto such terms in the Credit Agreement.                  C.       The Pledgors have entered into the Pledge Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to makeLoans, the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit and DVA Creditors to purchase Designated VendorAccounts.  Pursuant to Section 5.12 of the Credit Agreement, each Subsidiary of Holdings that was not inexistence or not a Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into the PledgeAgreement as a Subsidiary Pledgor upon becoming a Subsidiary if such Subsidiary owns or possessesproperty of a type that would be considered Collateral under the Pledge Agreement.  Section 24 of thePledge Agreement provides that such Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Pledgors under the PledgeAgreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement.  The undersignedSubsidiary (the "New Pledgor") is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of theCredit Agreement to become a Subsidiary Pledgor under the Pledge Agreement in order to induce theLenders to make additional Loans, the Issuing Bank to issue additional Letters of Credit and DVACreditors to purchase additional Designated Vendor Accounts, and as consideration for Loans previouslymade, Letters of Credit previously issued and Designated Vendor Accounts previously purchased.                  Accordingly, the Collateral Agent and the New Pledgor agree as follows:                  SECTION 1.        In accordance with Section 24 of the Pledge Agreement, the New Pledgor by itssignature below becomes a Pledgor under the Pledge Agreement with the same force and effect as iforiginally named therein as a Pledgor, and the New Pledgor hereby agrees (a) to all the terms andprovisions of the Pledge Agreement applicable to it as a Pledgor thereunder and (b) represents andwarrants that the representations and warranties made by it as a Pledgor thereunder are true and correcton and as of the date hereof.  In furtherance of the foregoing, the New Pledgor, as security for thepayment and performance in full of the Obligations (as defined in the Pledge Agreement), does herebycreate and grant to the Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the SecuredParties, their successors and assigns, a security interest in and lien on all of the New Pledgor'sright, title and interest in and to the Collateral (as defined in the Pledge Agreement) of the NewPledgor.  Each reference to a "Subsidiary Pledgor" or a "Pledgor" in the Pledge Agreement shall bedeemed to include the New Pledgor.  The Pledge Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.                  SECTION 2.        The New Pledgor represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the SecuredParties that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by it and constitutes itslegal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.                  SECTION 3.        This Supplement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute anoriginal, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Supplementshall become effective when the Collateral Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplementthat, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Pledgor and the Collateral Agent.  Delivery ofan executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile transmission shall be as effective asdelivery of a manually signed counterpart of this Supplement.                  SECTION 4.        The New Pledgor hereby represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the SecuredParties that set forth on Schedule I attached hereto is a true and correct schedule of all its PledgedSecurities.                  SECTION 5.        Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Pledge Agreement shall remain in fullforce and effect.                  SECTION 6.        THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OFTHE STATE OF NEW YORK.                  SECTION 7.        In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be heldinvalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, neither party hereto shall be required to comply withsuch provision for so long as such provision is held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, but thevalidity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the PledgeAgreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired.  The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faithnegotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions theeconomic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceableprovisions.                  SECTION 8.        All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided inSection 15 of the Pledge Agreement.  All communications and notices hereunder to the New Pledgor shallbe given to it at the address set forth under its signature hereto.                  SECTION 9.        The New Pledgor agrees to reimburse the Collateral Agent for its reasonableout-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, other chargesand disbursements of counsel for the Collateral Agent.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Pledgor and the Collateral Agent have duly executed thisSupplement to the Pledge Agreement as of the day and year first above written.                                                     [Name of New Pledgor],                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                            Address:                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                        --------------------------                                                            Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                            Title: Managing Director
Schedule I to                                                                                      Supplement No. [   ]                                                                                   to the Pledge Agreement                                  Pledged Securities of the New Pledgor                                              Capital Stock                                              -------------                                                         Number and                      Number of          Registered       Class of       PercentageIssuer               Certificate            Owner          Shares         of Shares- ------               -----------        -----------      ----------     -----------                                             Debt Securities                                             ---------------                      PrincipalIssuer                  Amount                  Date of Note       Maturity Date- ------                ---------                 ------------       -------------

Exhibit 10.5                                                                                                EXECUTION COPY                                    AMENDED AND RESTATED SECURITY AGREEMENT dated as of December 5, 2003,                           among ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the                           "Borrower"), ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"),                           each subsidiary of the Borrower listed on Schedule I hereto (each such                           subsidiary individually a "Subsidiary Guarantor" and collectively, the                           "Subsidiary Guarantors"; the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the Borrower                           are referred to collectively herein as the "Grantors") and JPMORGAN CHASE                           BANK, a New York banking corporation ("JPMCB"), as collateral agent (in such                           capacity, the "Collateral Agent") for the Secured Parties (as defined herein).                  Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as ofDecember 5, 2003 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "CreditAgreement"), among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders")and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the "Administrative Agent"),Collateral Agent and as issuing bank (in such capacity, the "Issuing Bank"), (b) the Guarantee Agreementdated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the"Guarantee Agreement"), among the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent, and (c) theSecurity Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001 (the "Existing Security Agreement"), among the partieshereto as in effect the date hereof.                  The parties desire to amend and restate the Existing Security Agreement to provide forthe DVA Obligations to be secured by the Collateral pari passu with the other Obligations.  Accordingly,the parties hereto agree by execution and delivery of this Agreement that the Existing SecurityAgreement will be deemed to be amended and restated as provided herein.                  The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Bank has agreedto issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subjectto the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement.  Each of Holdings and the Subsidiary Guarantorshas agreed to guarantee, among other things, all the obligations of the Borrower under the CreditAgreement.  DVA Creditors may from time to time agree to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts.  Theobligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit, and theagreement from time to time of DVA Creditors to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts, are conditionedupon, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Grantors of an agreement in the form hereofto secure (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest(including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or othersimilar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, whenand as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment orotherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respectof any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement ofdisbursements, interest thereon and obligations to provide cash collateral, and (iii) all other monetaryobligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct,contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of anybankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed orallowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Secured Parties under the Credit Agreement andthe other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligationsand liabilities of the Loan Parties under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other LoanDocuments, (c) the due and punctual payment and performance of all obligations in respect of overdraftsand related liabilities owed to JPMCB, any Affiliate thereof, the Administrative Agent or the CollateralAgent arising from or in connection with treasury, depositary or cash management services or inconnection with any automated clearinghouse transfer of funds, (d) unless otherwise agreed to in writingby the applicable Lender party thereto, the due and punctual payment and performance of all monetaryobligations of the Borrower under each Hedging Agreement entered into with any counterparty that was aLender (or an Affiliate of a Lender) at the time such Hedging Agreement was entered into and (e) the dueand punctual payment of all DVA Obligations (including interest accruing during the pendency of anybankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed orallowable in such proceeding), when and as due (all the monetary obligations described in the precedingclauses (a) through (e) being collectively called the "Obligations").                  Accordingly, the Grantors and the Collateral Agent, on behalf of itself and eachSecured Party (and each of their respective successors or assigns), hereby agree as follows:                                                ARTICLE I                                               Definitions                  SECTION 1.01.     Definition of Terms Used Herein.  Capitalized terms used in this Agreement and nototherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement.  All terms definedin the New York UCC (as defined herein) and not defined in this Agreement shall have the meaningsspecified therein; the term "instrument" shall have the meaning specified in Article 9 of the New YorkUCC.                  SECTION 1.02.     Definition of Certain Terms Used Herein. As used herein, the following terms shallhave the following meanings:                  "Account Debtor" shall mean any Person who is or who may become obligated to anyGrantor under, with respect to or on account of an Account.                  "Cash Concentration Account" shall mean the cash concentration account maintained bythe Borrower with the Cash Concentration Bank in Roanoke, Virginia (account number 2001000059003), towhich the Borrower will cause to be transferred, on each Business Day, amounts deposited in theCollection Deposit Accounts on such Business Day.                  "Cash Concentration Bank" shall mean the "Cash Concentration Bank" as defined in theCash Concentration Letter Agreement.                  "Cash Concentration Letter Agreement" shall mean the agreement among the CashConcentration Bank, the Borrower and the Collateral Agent, in substantially the form of Annex 1-Ahereto, pursuant to which the Borrower shall maintain the Cash Concentration Account, as such CashConcentration Letter Agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.                  "Collateral" shall mean all right, title or interest now owned or at anytime hereafteracquired by any Grantor or in which such Grantor now has or at any time in the future may acquire anyright, title or interest  in all (a) Accounts, (b) Chattel Paper, (c) Deposit Accounts (including theCash Concentration Account and the Collection Deposit Accounts), (d) Documents, (e) Equipment,(f) General Intangibles, (g) Instruments, (h) Inventory, (i) Investment Property, (j) all books andrecords pertaining to the foregoing and (k) to the extent not otherwise included, all Proceeds andproducts of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees given by any Person withrespect to any of the foregoing; provided that the term "Collateral" shall not include any property ofthe type specified in clauses (c) and (f) above if the assignment, granting, creation, mortgage, pledge,hypothecation or transfer thereof by such Grantor hereunder, would violate the terms of, or otherwiseconstitute a default or termination or similar event under any document or instrument to which any LoanParty is a party (other than those documents or instruments between or among the Loan Parties and/ortheir Affiliates only) relating to the ownership of, or pertaining to any rights or interests held insuch property, provided that (i) the terms to be violated or default or termination or similar eventthat would result in the event of the granting of the Lien hereunder, are consistent with such LoanParty's current business practice in connection with the type of document or instrument to which theyrelate and (ii) each Loan Party shall use its best efforts to ensure that the assignment, granting,creation, mortgage, pledge, hypothecation or transfer of any such property by any Grantor will notviolate the terms of, or otherwise constitute a default or termination or similar event under anydocument or instrument to which such Loan Party is a party.                  "Collection Deposit Account" shall mean each collection deposit account maintained bythe Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors pursuant to a Collection Deposit Letter Agreement (and priorto the execution of a Collection Deposit Letter Agreement with respect to such account, any othercollection deposit accounts maintained by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors) into which theBorrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors will deposit all Daily Receipts.                  "Collection Deposit Letter Agreement" shall mean an agreement among the Borrower, anyLender or other bank and the Collateral Agent, in substantially the form of Annex 1-B hereto, pursuantto which, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall maintain a Collection Deposit Account, assuch Collection Deposit Agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.                  "Copyright License" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect,granting any right to any third party under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any Grantor or whichsuch Grantor otherwise has the right to license, or granting any right to such Grantor under anyCopyright now or hereafter owned by any third party, and all rights of such Grantor under any suchagreement.                  "Copyrights" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by anyGrantor:  (a) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States or anyother country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (b) all registrations andapplications for registration of any such copyright in the United States or any other country, includingregistrations, recordings, supplemental registrations and pending applications for registration in theUnited States Copyright Office, including those listed on Schedule II.                  "Credit Agreement" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the preliminarystatement of this Agreement.                  "Daily Receipts" shall mean all amounts received by the Borrower and the SubsidiaryGuarantors, whether in the form of cash, checks, any moneys received or receivable in respect of chargesmade by means of credit cards, and other negotiable instruments, in each case as a result of the sale ofInventory.                  "Documents" shall mean all instruments, files, records, ledger sheets and documentscovering or relating to any of the Collateral.                  "General Intangibles" shall mean all choses in action and causes of action and allother assignable intangible personal property of any Grantor of every kind and nature (other thanAccounts) now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including limited partnership or limitedliability company interests, corporate or other business records, indemnification claims, contractrights (including rights under leases, whether entered into as lessor or lessee, Hedging Agreements andother agreements), Intellectual Property, goodwill, registrations, franchises, tax refund claims and anyletter of credit, guarantee, claim, security interest or other security held by or granted to anyGrantor to secure payment by an Account Debtor of any of the Accounts.  Notwithstanding the foregoing,the term "General Intangibles" shall not include any accounts receivable sold or created pursuant to anyReceivables Program, except to the extent the same are transferred back or charged back to a Grantorpursuant to the applicable documents governing such Receivables Program.                  "Intellectual Property" shall mean all intellectual and similar property of anyGrantor of every kind and nature now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including inventions,designs, Patents, Copyrights, Licenses, Trademarks, trade secrets, confidential or proprietary technicaland business information, know-how, show-how or other data or information, software and databases andall embodiments or fixations thereof and related documentation, registrations and franchises, and alladditions, improvements and accessions to, and books and records describing or used in connection with,any of the foregoing.                  "License" shall mean any Patent License, Trademark License, Copyright License or otherlicense or sublicense to which any Grantor is a party, including those listed on Schedule III (otherthan those license agreements in existence on the date hereof and listed on Schedule III and thoselicense agreements entered into after the date hereof, which by their terms prohibit assignment or agrant of a security interest by such Grantor as licensee thereunder).                  "New York UCC" shall mean the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effectin the State of New York.                  "Obligations" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the preliminarystatement of this Agreement.                  "Patent License" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect,granting to any third party any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent, now orhereafter owned by any Grantor or which any Grantor otherwise has the right to license, is in existence,or granting to any Grantor any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent, now orhereafter owned by any third party, is in existence, and all rights of any Grantor under any suchagreement.                  "Patents" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by anyGrantor:  (a) all letters patent of the United States or any other country, all registrations andrecordings thereof, and all applications for letters patent of the United States or any other country,including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and TrademarkOffice or any similar offices in any other country, including those listed on Schedule IV, and (b) allreissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and theinventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventionsdisclosed or claimed therein.                  "Perfection Certificate" shall mean a certificate substantially in the form of Annex 2hereto, completed and supplemented with the schedules and attachments contemplated thereby, and dulyexecuted by a Financial Officer of the Borrower.                  "Proceeds" shall have the meaning specified in Section 9-102 of the New York UCC.                  "Secured Parties" shall mean (a) the Lenders, (b) the Administrative Agent, (c) theCollateral Agent, (d) the Issuing Bank, (e) each counterparty to a Hedging Agreement entered into withthe Borrower if such counterparty was a Lender (or an affiliate of a Lender) at the time the HedgingAgreement was entered into, (f) the beneficiaries of each indemnification obligation undertaken by anyGrantor under any Loan Document, (g) the DVA Creditors and (h) the successors and assigns of each of theforegoing.                  "Security Interest" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.01.                  "Trademark License" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect,granting to any third party any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any Grantor orwhich any Grantor otherwise has the right to license, or granting to any Grantor any right to use anyTrademark now or hereafter owned by any third party, and all rights of any Grantor under any suchagreement.                  "Trademarks" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by anyGrantor:  (a) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, businessnames, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or businessidentifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, now existing or hereafter adopted oracquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applicationsfiled in connection therewith, including registrations and registration applications in the UnitedStates Patent and Trademark Office, any State of the United States or any similar offices in any othercountry or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, including thoselisted on Schedule V, (b) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (c) all otherassets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.                  SECTION 1.03.     Rules of Interpretation.  The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of theCredit Agreement shall be applicable to this Agreement.                                                ARTICLE II                                            Security Interest                  SECTION 2.01.     Security Interest.  As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, infull of the Obligations, each Grantor hereby grants, mortgages, pledges, hypothecates and transfers tothe Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, andhereby grants to the Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the ratable benefit of theSecured Parties, a security interest in, all of such Grantor's right, title and interest now owned or atany time hereafter acquired by such Grantor or in which such Grantor now has or any time in the futuremay acquire any right, title or interest, in, to and under the Collateral (the "Security Interest").Each Grantor hereby irrevocably authorizes the Collateral Agent  at any time and from time to time tofile in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financing statements (including fixture filings), andamendments thereto that contain the information required by Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code ofeach applicable jurisdiction for the filing of any financing statement or amendment, including(a) whether the Grantor is an organization, the type of organization and any organizationalidentification number issued to the Grantor and (b) in the case of a financing statement filed as afixture filing or covering Collateral constituting minerals or the like to be extracted or timber to becut, a sufficient description of the real property to which such Collateral relates.  The Grantor agreesto provide such information to the Collateral Agent promptly upon request.  Each Grantor also ratifiesits authorization for the Collateral Agent to file in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financingstatements or amendments thereto if filed prior to the date hereof.                  The Collateral Agent is further authorized to file filings with the United StatesPatent and Trademark Office or United States Copyright Office (or any successor office or any similaroffice in any other country) or other documents for the purpose of perfecting, confirming, continuing,enforcing or protecting the Security Interest granted by each Grantor, without the signature of anyGrantor, and naming any Grantor or the Grantors as debtors and the Collateral Agent as secured party.                  SECTION 2.02.     No Assumption of Liability.  The Security Interest is granted as security only andshall not subject the Collateral Agent or any other Secured Party to, or in any way alter or modify, anyobligation or liability of any Grantor with respect to or arising out of the Collateral.                                                ARTICLE III                                      Representations and Warranties                  The Grantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Collateral Agent andthe Secured Parties that:                  SECTION 3.01.     Title and Authority.  Each Grantor has good and valid rights in and title to theCollateral with respect to which it has purported to grant a Security Interest hereunder and has fullpower and authority to grant to the Collateral Agent the Security Interest in such Collateral pursuanthereto and to execute, deliver and perform its obligations in accordance with the terms of thisAgreement, without the consent or approval of any other Person other than any consent or approval whichhas been obtained.                  SECTION 3.02.     Filings.  (a)  The Perfection Certificate has been duly prepared, completed andexecuted and the information set forth therein, including the exact legal name of each Grantor, iscorrect and complete in all material respects.  Fully executed Uniform Commercial Code financingstatements (including fixture filings, as applicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings orregistrations containing a description of the Collateral have been delivered to the Collateral Agent forfiling in each governmental, municipal or other office specified in Schedule 6 to the PerfectionCertificate, which are all the filings, recordings and registrations (other than filings required to bemade in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office in order toperfect the Security Interest in Collateral consisting of United States Patents, Trademarks andCopyrights) that are necessary to publish notice of and protect the validity of and to establish alegal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Collateral Agent (for the ratable benefitof the Secured Parties) in respect of all Collateral in which the Security Interest may be perfected byfiling, recording or registration in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and itsterritories and possessions, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording,registration or reregistration is necessary in any such jurisdiction, except as provided underapplicable law with respect to the filing of continuation statements or amendments.                  (b)      Each Grantor represents and warrants that fully executed security agreements in the form hereofand containing a description of all Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property with respect toUnited States Patents and United States registered Trademarks (and Trademarks for which United Statesregistration applications are pending) and United States registered Copyrights have been delivered tothe Collateral Agent for recording by the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the UnitedStates Copyright Office pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and theregulations thereunder, as applicable, and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of anyother necessary jurisdiction, to protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfectedsecurity interest in favor of the Collateral Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) in respectof all Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and United States registered Copyrights in which asecurity interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States (or anypolitical subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, or in any other necessaryjurisdiction, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration orreregistration is necessary (other than the financing statements referred to above in Section 3.02(a)and such actions as are necessary to perfect the Security Interest with respect to any Collateralconsisting of Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights (or registration or application for registrationthereof) acquired or developed after the date hereof).                  SECTION 3.03.     Validity of Security Interest.  The Security Interest constitutes (a) a legal andvalid security interest in all the Collateral securing the payment and performance of the Obligations,(b) subject to the filings described in Section 3.02 above, a perfected security interest in allCollateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registering a financingstatement or analogous document in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and itsterritories and possessions pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law in suchjurisdictions and (c) a security interest that shall be perfected in all Collateral in which a securityinterest may be perfected upon the receipt and recording of this Agreement with the United States Patentand Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, within the three monthperiod (commencing as of the date hereof) pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C. 205 and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of any other necessary jurisdiction.  TheSecurity Interest is and shall be prior to any other Lien on any of the Collateral, other than Liensexpressly permitted to be prior to the Security Interest pursuant to Section 6.02 of the CreditAgreement.                  SECTION 3.04.     Absence of Other Liens.  The Collateral is owned by the Grantors free and clear of anyLien, except for Liens expressly permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.  TheGrantor has not filed or consented to the filing of (a) any financing statement or analogous documentunder the Uniform Commercial Code or any other applicable laws covering any Collateral, (b) anyassignment in which any Grantor assigns any Collateral or any security agreement or similar instrumentcovering any Collateral with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United StatesCopyright Office or (c) any assignment in which any Grantor assigns any Collateral or any securityagreement or similar instrument covering any Collateral with any foreign governmental, municipal orother office, which financing statement or analogous document, assignment, security agreement or similarinstrument is still in effect, except, in each case, for Liens expressly permitted pursuant toSection 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.  None of the Grantors holds any commercial tort claim except asindicated on the Perfection Certificate.                                                ARTICLE IV                                                Covenants                  SECTION 4.01.     Change of Name; Location of Collateral; Records; Place of Business. (a)  Each Grantoragrees promptly to notify the Collateral Agent in writing of any change (i) in its corporate name,(ii) in the location of its chief executive office, its principal place of business, any office in whichit maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it or any office or facility at whichCollateral owned by it is located (including the establishment of any such new office or facility) otherthan with respect to Collateral (A) consisting of goods in transit between facilities, whether invehicles owned by the applicable Grantor or on common carriers and (B) located in temporary warehousingwhich will remain in such warehousing for no longer than one month, (iii) in its identity or type oforganization or corporate structure, (iv) in its Federal Taxpayer Identification Number ororganizational identification number, as applicable, or (v) in its jurisdiction of organization.  EachGrantor agrees promptly to provide the Collateral Agent with certified organizational documentsreflecting any of the changes described in the preceding sentence.  Each Grantor agrees not to effect orpermit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under theUniform Commercial Code or otherwise that are required in order for the Collateral Agent to continue atall times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected first priority security interest inall the Collateral.  Each Grantor agrees promptly to notify the Collateral Agent if any material portionof the Collateral owned or held by such Grantor is damaged or destroyed.                  (b)      Each Grantor agrees to maintain, at its own cost and expense, such complete and accuraterecords with respect to the Collateral owned by it as is consistent with its current practices and inaccordance with such prudent and standard practices used in industries that are the same as or similarto those in which such Grantor is engaged, but in any event to include complete accounting recordsindicating all payments and proceeds received with respect to any part of the Collateral, and, at suchtime or times as the Collateral Agent may reasonably request, promptly to prepare and deliver to theCollateral Agent a duly certified schedule or schedules in form and detail satisfactory to theCollateral Agent showing the identity, amount and location of any and all Collateral.                  SECTION 4.02.     Periodic Certification.  Each year, at the time of delivery of annual financialstatements with respect to the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 5.01 of the Credit Agreement,the Borrower shall deliver to the Collateral Agent a certificate executed by a Financial Officer of theBorrower (a) setting forth the information required pursuant to this Section 2 of the PerfectionCertificate or confirming that there has been no change in such information since the date of suchcertificate or the date of the most recent certificate delivered pursuant to this Section 4.02 and(b) certifying that all Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings, asapplicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations, including all refilings,rerecordings and reregistrations, containing a description of the Collateral have been filed of recordin each governmental, municipal or other appropriate office in each jurisdiction identified pursuant toclause (a) above to the extent necessary to protect and perfect the Security Interest for a period ofnot less than 18 months after the date of such certificate (except as noted therein with respect to anycontinuation statements to be filed within such period).  Each certificate delivered pursuant to thisSection 4.02 shall identify in the format of Schedule II, III, IV or V, as applicable, all Patents,Trademarks, Copyrights and Licenses of any Grantor in existence on the date thereof and not then listedon such Schedules or previously so identified to the Collateral Agent.                  SECTION 4.03.     Protection of Security.  Each Grantor shall, at its own cost and expense, take any andall actions necessary to defend title to the Collateral against all Persons and to defend the SecurityInterest of the Collateral Agent in the Collateral and the priority thereof against any Lien notexpressly permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.                  SECTION 4.04.     Further Assurances.  Each Grantor agrees, at its own expense, to execute, acknowledge,deliver and cause to be duly filed all such further instruments and documents and take all such actionsas the Collateral Agent may from time to time reasonably request to better assure, preserve, protect andperfect the Security Interest and the rights and remedies created hereby, including the payment of anyfees and taxes required in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the granting ofthe Security Interest and the filing of any financing statements (including fixture filings) or otherdocuments in connection herewith or therewith.  If any amount payable under or in connection with any ofthe Collateral shall be or become evidenced by any promissory note or other instrument, such note orinstrument shall be promptly pledged and delivered to the Collateral Agent, duly endorsed in a mannersatisfactory to the Collateral Agent.                  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor hereby authorizes theCollateral Agent, with prompt notice thereof to the Grantors, to supplement this Agreement bysupplementing Schedule II, III, IV or V hereto or adding additional schedules hereto to specificallyidentify any asset or item that may constitute Copyrights, Licenses, Patents or Trademarks; provided,however, that any Grantor shall have the right, exercisable within 10 days after it has been notified bythe Collateral Agent of the specific identification of such Collateral, to advise the Collateral Agentin writing of any inaccuracy of the representations and warranties made by such Grantor hereunder withrespect to such Collateral.  Each Grantor agrees that it will use its best efforts to take such actionas shall be necessary in order that all representations and warranties hereunder shall be true andcorrect with respect to such Collateral within 30 days after the date it has been notified by theCollateral Agent of the specific identification of such Collateral.                  SECTION 4.05.     Inspection and Verification.  The Collateral Agent and such Persons as the CollateralAgent may reasonably designate shall have the right, subject to compliance with Section 5.09 of theCredit Agreement, to inspect the Collateral, all records related thereto (and to make extracts andcopies from such records) and the premises upon which any of the Collateral is located, to discuss theGrantors' affairs with the officers of the Grantors and their independent accountants and to verifyunder reasonable procedures the validity, amount, quality, quantity, value, condition and status of, orany other matter relating to, the Collateral, including, in the case of Accounts or Collateral in thepossession of any third person, by contacting Account Debtors or the third person possessing suchCollateral for the purpose of making such a verification; provided, however, that representatives of theGrantors shall be entitled to participate in such discussions.  The Collateral Agent shall have theabsolute right to share any information it gains from such inspection or verification with any SecuredParty.                  SECTION 4.06.     Taxes; Encumbrances.  At its option and after notice to the applicable Grantor, theCollateral Agent may discharge past due taxes, assessments, charges, fees, Liens, security interests orother encumbrances at any time levied or placed on the Collateral and not permitted pursuant toSection 6.02 of the Credit Agreement, and may pay for the maintenance and preservation of the Collateralto the extent any Grantor fails to do so as required by the Credit Agreement or this Agreement, and eachGrantor jointly and severally agrees to reimburse the Collateral Agent on demand for any payment made orany expense incurred by the Collateral Agent pursuant to the foregoing authorization; provided, however,that nothing in this Section 4.06 shall be interpreted as excusing any Grantor from the performance of,or imposing any obligation on the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to cure or perform, anycovenants or other promises of any Grantor with respect to taxes, assessments, charges, fees, liens,security interests or other encumbrances and maintenance as set forth herein or in the other LoanDocuments.                  SECTION 4.07.     Assignment of Security Interest.  If at any time any Grantor shall take a securityinterest in any property of an Account Debtor or any other Person to secure payment and performance ofan Account, such Grantor shall promptly assign such security interest to the Collateral Agent.  Suchassignment need not be filed of public record unless necessary to continue the perfected status of thesecurity interest against creditors of and transferees from the Account Debtor or other Person grantingthe security interest.                  SECTION 4.08.     Continuing Obligations of the Grantors.  Each Grantor shall remain liable to observeand perform all the conditions and obligations to be observed and performed by it under each contract,agreement or instrument relating to the Collateral, all in accordance with the terms and conditionsthereof, and each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the CollateralAgent and the Secured Parties from and against any and all liability for such performance.                  SECTION 4.09.     Use and Disposition of Collateral.  None of the Grantors shall make or permit to bemade an assignment, pledge or hypothecation of the Collateral or shall grant any other Lien in respectof the Collateral, except as expressly permitted by Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.  None of theGrantors shall make or permit to be made any transfer of the Collateral and each Grantor shall remain atall times in possession of the Collateral owned by it, except that (a) Inventory, obsolete or worn outassets, Permitted Investments and other assets having a fair market value (alone or together with otherrelated assets sold or to be sold) of less than $25,000 may be sold, in each case in the ordinary courseof business and (b) unless and until the Collateral Agent shall notify the Grantors that an Event ofDefault shall have occurred and be continuing and that during the continuance thereof the Grantors shallnot sell, convey, lease, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Collateral (which notice may begiven by telephone if promptly confirmed in writing), the Grantors may use and dispose of the Collateralin any lawful manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, the Credit Agreement or anyother Loan Document.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor agrees that itshall not permit any Inventory to be in the possession or control of any warehouseman, bailee, agent orprocessor at any time unless such warehouseman, bailee, agent or processor shall have been notified ofthe Security Interest and shall have agreed in writing to hold the Inventory subject to the SecurityInterest and the instructions of the Collateral Agent and to waive and release any Lien held by it withrespect to such Inventory, whether arising by operation of law or otherwise.                  SECTION 4.10.     Limitation on Modification of Accounts.  None of the Grantors will, without theCollateral Agent's prior written consent, grant any extension of the time of payment of any of theAccounts included in the Collateral, compromise, compound or settle the same for less than the fullamount thereof, release, wholly or partly, any Person liable for the payment thereof or allow any creditor discount whatsoever thereon, other than extensions, credits, discounts, compromises or settlementsgranted or made in the ordinary course of business and consistent with its current practices and inaccordance with such prudent and standard practices used in industries that are the same as or similarto those in which such Grantor is engaged.                  SECTION 4.11.     Insurance.  The Grantors, at their own expense, shall maintain or cause to bemaintained insurance covering physical loss or damage to the Inventory and Equipment in accordance withSection 5.07 of the Credit Agreement.  Each Grantor irrevocably makes, constitutes and appoints theCollateral Agent (and all officers, employees or agents designated by the Collateral Agent) as suchGrantor's true and lawful agent (and attorney-in-fact) for the purpose, during the continuance of anEvent of Default, of making, settling and adjusting claims in respect of Collateral under policies ofinsurance, endorsing the name of such Grantor on any check, draft, instrument or other item of paymentfor the proceeds of such policies of insurance and for making all determinations and decisions withrespect thereto.  In the event that any Grantor at any time or times shall fail to obtain or maintainany of the policies of insurance required hereby or to pay any premium in whole or part relatingthereto, the Collateral Agent may, without waiving or releasing any obligation or liability of theGrantors hereunder or any Event of Default, in its sole discretion, obtain and maintain such policies ofinsurance and pay such premium and take any other actions with respect thereto as the Collateral Agentdeems advisable.  All sums disbursed by the Collateral Agent in connection with this Section 4.11,including reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, expenses and other charges relating thereto, shall bepayable, upon demand, by the Grantors to the Collateral Agent and shall be additional Obligationssecured hereby.                  SECTION 4.12.     Legend.  Each Grantor shall legend, in form and manner satisfactory to the CollateralAgent, its Chattel Paper and its books, records and documents evidencing or pertaining thereto with anappropriate reference to the fact that such Chattel Paper have been assigned to the Collateral Agent forthe benefit of the Secured Parties and that the Collateral Agent has a security interest therein.                  SECTION 4.13.     Covenants Regarding Patent, Trademark and Copyright Collateral.  (a)  Each Grantoragrees that it will not, nor will it permit any of its licensees to, do any act, or omit to do any act,whereby any Patent which is material to the conduct of such Grantor's business may become invalidated ordedicated to the public, and agrees that it shall continue to mark any products covered by a Patent withthe relevant patent number as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rightsunder applicable patent laws.                  (b)      Each Grantor (either itself or through its licensees or its sublicensees) will, for eachTrademark material to the conduct of such Grantor's business, (i) maintain such Trademark in full forcefree from any claim of abandonment or invalidity for non-use, (ii) maintain the quality of products andservices offered under such Trademark, (iii) display such Trademark with notice of Federal or foreignregistration to the extent necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights underapplicable law and (iv) not knowingly use or knowingly permit the use of such Trademark in violation ofany third party rights.                  (c)      Each Grantor (either itself or through licensees) will, for each work covered by a materialCopyright, continue to publish, reproduce, display, adopt and distribute the work with appropriatecopyright notice as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights underapplicable copyright laws.                  (d)      Each Grantor shall notify the Collateral Agent immediately if it knows or has reason to knowthat any Patent, Trademark or Copyright material to the conduct of its business may become abandoned,lost or dedicated to the public, or of any adverse determination or development (including theinstitution of, or any such determination or development in, any proceeding in the United States Patentand Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any court or similar office of any country)regarding such Grantor's ownership of any Patent, Trademark or Copyright, its right to register thesame, or to keep and maintain the same.                  (e)      In no event shall any Grantor, either itself or through any agent, employee, licensee ordesignee, file an application for any Patent, Trademark or Copyright (or for the registration of anyTrademark or Copyright) with the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States CopyrightOffice or any office or agency in any political subdivision of the United States or in any other countryor any political subdivision thereof, unless it promptly informs the Collateral Agent, and, upon requestof the Collateral Agent, executes and delivers any and all agreements, instruments, documents and papersas the Collateral Agent may request to evidence the Collateral Agent's security interest in such Patent,Trademark or Copyright, and each Grantor hereby appoints the Collateral Agent as its attorney-in-fact toexecute and file such writings for the foregoing purposes, all acts of such attorney being herebyratified and confirmed; such power, being coupled with an interest, is irrevocable.                  (f)      Each Grantor will take all necessary steps that are consistent with the practice in anyproceeding before the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or anyoffice or agency in any political subdivision of the United States or in any other country or anypolitical subdivision thereof, to maintain and pursue each material application relating to the Patents,Trademarks and/or Copyrights (and to obtain the relevant grant or registration) and to maintain eachissued Patent and each registration of the Trademarks and Copyrights that is material to the conduct ofany Grantor's business, including timely filings of applications for renewal, affidavits of use,affidavits of incontestability and payment of maintenance fees, and, if consistent with good businessjudgment, to initiate opposition, interference and cancelation proceedings against third parties.                  (g)      In the event that any Grantor has reason to believe that any Collateral consisting of a Patent,Trademark or Copyright material to the conduct of any Grantor's business has been or is about to beinfringed, misappropriated or diluted by a third party, such Grantor promptly shall notify theCollateral Agent and shall, if consistent with good business judgment, promptly sue for infringement,misappropriation or dilution and to recover any and all damages for such infringement, misappropriationor dilution, and take such other actions as are appropriate under the circumstances to protect suchCollateral.                  (h)      Upon and during the continuance of an Event of Default, each Grantor shall use its best effortsto obtain all requisite consents or approvals by the licensor of each Copyright License, Patent Licenseor Trademark License to effect the assignment of all of such Grantor's right, title and interestthereunder to the Collateral Agent or its designee.                  (i)      Each Grantor shall ensure that fully executed security agreements in the form hereof andcontaining a description of all Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property shall have been receivedand recorded within three months after the execution of this Agreement with respect to United StatesPatents, United States registered Trademarks (and Trademarks for which United States registrationapplications are pending) and United States registered Copyrights have been delivered to the CollateralAgent for recording by the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States CopyrightOffice pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and the regulations thereunder,as applicable, and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of any other necessaryjurisdiction, to protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interestin favor of the Collateral Agent (for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties) in respect of allCollateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and registered Copyrights in which a security interest maybe perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States (or any political subdivisionthereof) and its territories and possessions, or in any other necessary jurisdiction, and no further orsubsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary (otherthan such actions as are necessary to perfect the Security Interest with respect to any Collateralconsisting of Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights (or registration or application for registrationthereof) acquired or developed after the date of this amendment and restatement).                  SECTION 4.14.     Other Actions.  In order to further insure the attachment, perfection and priority of,and the ability of the Collateral Agent to enforce, the Collateral Agent's security interest in theCollateral, each Grantor agrees, in each case at such Grantor's own expense, to take the followingactions with respect to the following Collateral:                  (a)      Instruments and Tangible Chattel Paper.  If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire anyInstruments or Tangible Chattel Paper (other than such Instruments or Tangible Chattel Paper held in theordinary course of such Grantor's business and in an aggregate amount not exceeding $100,000), suchGrantor shall forthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Collateral Agent, accompanied bysuch instruments of transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Collateral Agent may from timeto time specify.                  (b)      Investment Property.  If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire any certificatedsecurities (other than any such certificated securities having an aggregate fair market value not inexcess of $50,000 and held in the ordinary course of such Grantor's business), such Grantor shallforthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Collateral Agent, accompanied by such instrumentsof transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Collateral Agent may from time to time specify.If any securities now or hereafter acquired by any Grantor are uncertificated and are issued to suchGrantor or its nominee directly by the issuer thereof, such Grantor shall promptly notify the CollateralAgent thereof and, at the Collateral Agent's request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form andsubstance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, either (a) cause the issuer to agree to comply withinstructions from the Collateral Agent as to such securities, without further consent of any Grantor orsuch nominee, or (b) arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the registered owner of the securities.If any securities, whether certificated or uncertificated, or other investment property now or hereafteracquired by any Grantor are held by such Grantor or its nominee through a securities intermediary orcommodity intermediary, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at theCollateral Agent's request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonablysatisfactory to the Collateral Agent, either (i) cause such securities intermediary or (as the case maybe) commodity intermediary to agree to comply with entitlement orders or other instructions from theCollateral Agent to such securities intermediary as to such securities or other investment property, or(as the case may be) to apply any value distributed on account of any commodity contract as directed bythe Collateral Agent to such commodity intermediary, in each case without further consent of any Grantoror such nominee, or (ii) in the case of Financial Assets or other Investment Property held through asecurities intermediary, arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the entitlement holder with respectto such investment property, with the Grantor being permitted, only with the consent of the CollateralAgent, to exercise rights to withdraw or otherwise deal with such investment property.  The CollateralAgent agrees with each of the Grantors that the Collateral Agent shall not give any such entitlementorders or instructions or directions to any such issuer, securities intermediary or commodityintermediary, and shall not withhold its consent to the exercise of any withdrawal or dealing rights byany Grantor, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, or, after giving effect to anysuch investment and withdrawal rights would occur.  The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply toany financial assets credited to a securities account for which the Collateral Agent is the securitiesintermediary.                  (c)      Electronic Chattel Paper and Transferable Records.  If any Grantor at any time holds oracquires an interest in any electronic chattel paper or any "transferable record," as that term isdefined in Section 201 of the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, or in 16 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act as in effect in any relevant jurisdiction, such Grantorshall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the request of the Collateral Agent, shalltake such action as the Collateral Agent may reasonably request to vest in the Collateral Agent controlunder UCC 9-105 of such electronic chattel paper or control under Section 201 of the Federal ElectronicSignatures in Global and National Commerce Act or, as the case may be, 16 of the Uniform ElectronicTransactions Act, as so in effect in such jurisdiction, of such transferable record.  The CollateralAgent agrees with such Grantor that the Collateral Agent will arrange, pursuant to proceduressatisfactory to the Collateral Agent and so long as such procedures will not result in the CollateralAgent's loss of control, for the Grantor to make alterations to the electronic chattel paper ortransferable record permitted under UCC 9-105 or, as the case may be, Section 201 of the FederalElectronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act or 16 of the Uniform Electronic TransactionsAct for a party in control to allow without loss of control, unless an Event of Default has occurred andis continuing or would occur after taking into account any action by such Grantor with respect to suchelectronic chattel paper or transferable record.                  (d)      Letter-of-credit Rights.  If any Grantor is at any time a beneficiary (other than in theordinary course of its business and in respect of letters of credit in an aggregate amount not exceeding$150,000) under a letter of credit now or hereafter issued in favor of such Grantor, such Grantor shallpromptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the request and option of the Collateral Agent,such Grantor shall, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to theCollateral Agent, either (i) arrange for the issuer and any confirmed of such letter of credit toconsent to an assignment to the Collateral Agent of the proceeds of any drawing under the letter ofcredit or (ii) arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the transferee beneficiary of the letter ofcredit, with the Collateral Agent agreeing, in each case, that the proceeds of any drawing under theletter of credit are to be applied as provided in the Credit Agreement.                  (e)      Commercial Tort Claims.  If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire a commercial tortclaim for an amount exceeding $100,000, the Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent in awriting signed by such Grantor of the brief details thereof and grant to the Collateral Agent in suchwriting a security interest therein and in the proceeds thereof, all upon the terms of this Agreement,with such writing to be in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent.                                                ARTICLE V                                               Collections                  SECTION 5.01.     Collection Deposit Accounts.  (a)  From and after the Effective Date, each Grantoragrees to deposit all Daily Receipts into the Collection Deposit Accounts on a daily basis.                  (b)      From and after the Effective Date, the Grantors agree to transfer, or cause to be transferred,on each Business Day, all amounts on deposit in any Collection Deposit Account to the Cash ConcentrationAccount other than amounts necessary (i) for the payment of routine bank service fees, (ii) for changeorders and (iii) to reconcile deposit balances.                  (c)      Unless and until the happening of an Event of Default, the Borrower may at any time withdrawany of the funds contained in the Cash Concentration Account for use, subject to the provisions of theCredit Agreement, for general corporate purposes.                  (d)      Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, each Collection Deposit Account and the CashConcentration Account will, without any further action taken on the part of any Grantor or theCollateral Agent, automatically convert into a closed account under the exclusive dominion and controlof the Collateral Agent in which funds are held subject to the rights of the Collateral Agenthereunder.  No Grantor shall thereafter have any right or power to withdraw any funds from anyCollection Deposit Account or the Cash Concentration Account without the prior written consent of theCollateral Agent.                  (e)      In the event that a Grantor directly receives any remittances on Accounts included in theCollateral, notwithstanding the arrangements for payment directly into the Collection Deposit Accountspursuant to Section 5.02, such remittances shall be held for the benefit of the Collateral Agent and theLenders and shall be segregated from other funds of such Grantor, subject to the Security Interestgranted hereby, and such Grantor shall cause such remittances and payments to be deposited into aCollection Deposit Account or the Cash Concentration Account as soon as practicable after such Grantor'sreceipt thereof.                  (f)      All payments by any Grantor into any Cash Deposit Account or the Cash Collateral Accountpursuant to this Section 5.01, whether in the form of cash, checks, notes, drafts, bills of exchange,money orders or otherwise, in the relevant Cash Deposit Account or Cash Collateral Account in preciselythe form in which received (but with any endorsements of such Grantor necessary for deposit orcollection), and until they are so deposited such payments shall be held in trust by such Grantor forand as the property of the Collateral Agent.                  SECTION 5.02.     Collections.  (a)  From and after the Effective Date, each Grantor agrees to notifyand direct promptly each Account Debtor and every other Person obligated to make payments with respectto the Accounts included in the Collateral to make all such payments to a Collection Deposit Accountestablished by it.  Each Grantor shall use all reasonable efforts to cause each Account Debtor and everyother Person identified in the preceding sentence to make all payments with respect to the Accountsincluded in the Collateral directly to such Collection Deposit Account.                  (b)      Without the prior written consent of the Collateral Agent, no Grantor shall, in a manneradverse to the Lenders, change the general instructions given to Account Debtors in respect of paymenton Accounts to be deposited in any Collection Deposit Account.  Until the Collateral Agent shall haveadvised the Grantors to the contrary, each Grantor shall, and the Collateral Agent hereby authorizeseach Grantor to, enforce and collect all amounts owing on the Inventory and Accounts included in theCollateral, for the benefit and on behalf of the Collateral Agent and the other Secured Parties;provided, however, that such privilege may at the option of the Collateral Agent be terminated upon theoccurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default.                  SECTION 5.03.     Power of Attorney.  Each Grantor irrevocably makes, constitutes and appoints theCollateral Agent (and all officers, employees or agents designated by the Collateral Agent) as suchGrantor's true and lawful agent and attorney-in-fact, and in such capacity the Collateral Agent shallhave the right, with power of substitution for each Grantor and in each Grantor's name or otherwise, forthe use and benefit of the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties, upon the occurrence and during thecontinuance of an Event of Default (a) to receive, endorse, assign and/or deliver any and all notes,acceptances, checks, drafts, money orders or other evidences of payment relating to the Collateral orany part thereof; (b) to demand, collect, receive payment of, give receipt for and give discharges andreleases of all or any of the Collateral; (c) to sign the name of any Grantor on any invoice or bill oflading relating to any of the Collateral; (d) to send verifications of Accounts included in theCollateral to any Account Debtor; (e) to commence and prosecute any and all suits, actions orproceedings at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction to collect or otherwise realizeon all or any of the Collateral or to enforce any rights in respect of any Collateral; (f) to settle,compromise, compound, adjust or defend any actions, suits or proceedings relating to all or any of theCollateral; (g) to notify, or to require any Grantor to notify, Account Debtors to make payment directlyto the Collateral Agent; and (h) to use, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, make any agreement with respectto or otherwise deal with all or any of the Collateral, and to do all other acts and things necessary tocarry out the purposes of this Agreement, as fully and completely as though the Collateral Agent werethe absolute owner of the Collateral for all purposes; provided, however, that nothing herein containedshall be construed as requiring or obligating the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to make anycommitment or to make any inquiry as to the nature or sufficiency of any payment received by theCollateral Agent or any Secured Party, or to present or file any claim or notice, or to take any actionwith respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or the moneys due or to become due in respect thereofor any property covered thereby, and no action taken or omitted to be taken by the Collateral Agent orany Secured Party with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof shall give rise to any defense,counterclaim or offset in favor of any Grantor or to any claim or action against the Collateral Agent orany Secured Party.  It is understood and agreed that the appointment of the Collateral Agent as theagent and attorney-in-fact of the Grantors for the purposes set forth above is coupled with an interestand is irrevocable.  The provisions of this Section shall in no event relieve any Grantor of any of itsobligations hereunder or under any other Loan Document with respect to the Collateral or any partthereof or impose any obligation on the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to proceed in anyparticular manner with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof, or in any way limit the exerciseby the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party of any other or further right which it may have on the dateof this Agreement or hereafter, whether hereunder, under any other Loan Document, by law or otherwise.                                                ARTICLE VI                                                 Remedies                  SECTION 6.01.     Remedies upon Default.  Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event ofDefault, each Grantor agrees to deliver each item of Collateral to the Collateral Agent on demand, andit is agreed that the Collateral Agent shall have the right to take any of or all the following actionsat the same or different times:  (a) with respect to any Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property,on demand, to cause the Security Interest to become an assignment, transfer and conveyance of any of orall such Collateral by the applicable Grantors to the Collateral Agent, or to license or sublicense,whether general, special or otherwise, and whether on an exclusive or non-exclusive basis, any suchCollateral throughout the world on such terms and conditions and in such manner as the Collateral Agentshall determine (other than in violation of any then-existing licensing arrangements to the extent thatwaivers cannot be obtained), and (b) with or without legal process and with or without prior notice ordemand for performance, to take possession of the Collateral and without liability for trespass to enterany premises where the Collateral may be located for the purpose of taking possession of or removing theCollateral and, generally, to exercise any and all rights afforded to a secured party under the UniformCommercial Code or other applicable law.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantoragrees that the Collateral Agent shall have the right, subject to the mandatory requirements ofapplicable law, to sell or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the Collateral, at public or privatesale or at any broker's board or on any securities exchange, for cash, upon credit or for futuredelivery as the Collateral Agent shall deem appropriate.  The Collateral Agent shall be authorized atany such sale (if it deems it advisable to do so) to restrict the prospective bidders or purchasers toPersons who will represent and agree that they are purchasing the Collateral for their own account forinvestment and not with a view to the distribution or sale thereof, and upon consummation of any suchsale the Collateral Agent shall have the right to assign, transfer and deliver to the purchaser orpurchasers thereof the Collateral so sold.  Each such purchaser at any such sale shall hold the propertysold absolutely, free from any claim or right on the part of any Grantor, and each Grantor hereby waives(to the extent permitted by law) all rights of redemption, stay and appraisal which such Grantor now hasor may at any time in the future have under any rule of law or statute now existing or hereafter enacted.                  The Collateral Agent shall give the Grantors 10 days' written notice (which eachGrantor agrees is reasonable notice within the meaning of Section 9-504(3) of the Uniform CommercialCode as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions) of the CollateralAgent's intention to make any sale of Collateral.  Such notice, in the case of a public sale, shallstate the time and place for such sale and, in the case of a sale at a broker's board or on a securitiesexchange, shall state the board or exchange at which such sale is to be made and the day on which theCollateral, or portion thereof, will first be offered for sale at such board or exchange.  Any suchpublic sale shall be held at such time or times within ordinary business hours and at such place orplaces as the Collateral Agent may fix and state in the notice (if any) of such sale.  At any such sale,the Collateral, or portion thereof, to be sold may be sold in one lot as an entirety or in separateparcels, as the Collateral Agent may (in its sole and absolute discretion) determine.  The CollateralAgent shall not be obligated to make any sale of any Collateral if it shall determine not to do so,regardless of the fact that notice of sale of such Collateral shall have been given.  The CollateralAgent may, without notice or publication, adjourn any public or private sale or cause the same to beadjourned from time to time by announcement at the time and place fixed for sale, and such sale may,without further notice, be made at the time and place to which the same was so adjourned.  In case anysale of all or any part of the Collateral is made on credit or for future delivery, the Collateral sosold may be retained by the Collateral Agent until the sale price is paid by the purchaser or purchasersthereof, but the Collateral Agent shall not incur any liability in case any such purchaser or purchasersshall fail to take up and pay for the Collateral so sold and, in case of any such failure, suchCollateral may be sold again upon like notice.  At any public (or, to the extent permitted by law,private) sale made pursuant to this Section, any Secured Party may bid for or purchase, free (to theextent permitted by law) from any right of redemption, stay, valuation or appraisal on the part of anyGrantor (all said rights being also hereby waived and released to the extent permitted by law), theCollateral or any part thereof offered for sale and may make payment on account thereof by using anyclaim then due and payable to such Secured Party from any Grantor as a credit against the purchaseprice, and such Secured Party may, upon compliance with the terms of sale, hold, retain and dispose ofsuch property without further accountability to any Grantor therefor.  For purposes hereof, a writtenagreement to purchase the Collateral or any portion thereof shall be treated as a sale thereof; theCollateral Agent shall be free to carry out such sale pursuant to such agreement and no Grantor shall beentitled to the return of the Collateral or any portion thereof subject thereto, notwithstanding thefact that after the Collateral Agent shall have entered into such an agreement all Events of Defaultshall have been remedied and the Obligations paid in full.  As an alternative to exercising the power ofsale herein conferred upon it, the Collateral Agent may proceed by a suit or suits at law or in equityto foreclose this Agreement and to sell the Collateral or any portion thereof pursuant to a judgment ordecree of a court or courts having competent jurisdiction or pursuant to a proceeding by acourt-appointed receiver.  Any sale pursuant to the provisions of this Section 6.01 shall be deemed toconform to the commercially reasonable standards as provided in Section 9-504(3) of the UniformCommercial Code as in effect in the State of New York or its  equivalent in other jurisdictions.                  SECTION 6.02.     Application of Proceeds.  The Collateral Agent shall apply the proceeds of anycollection or sale of the Collateral, as well as any Collateral consisting of cash, as follows:                  FIRST, to the payment of all costs and expenses incurred by the Administrative         Agent or the Collateral Agent (in its capacity as such hereunder or under any other         Loan Document) in connection with such collection or sale or otherwise in connection         with this Agreement, any other Loan Document or any of the Obligations including all         court costs and the fees and expenses of its agents and legal counsel, the repayment         of all advances made by the Collateral Agent hereunder or under any other Loan         Document on behalf of any Grantor and any other costs or expenses incurred by the         Collateral Agent or the Administrative Agent in connection with the exercise of any         right or remedy hereunder or under any other Loan Document;                  SECOND, to the payment in full of the Obligations (the amounts so applied to         be distributed among the Secured Parties pro rata in accordance with the amounts of         the Obligations owed to them on the date of any such distribution); and                  THIRD, to the Grantors, their successors or assigns, or as a court of         competent jurisdiction may otherwise direct.The Collateral Agent shall have absolute discretion as to the time of application of any such proceeds,moneys or balances in accordance with this Agreement.  Upon any sale of the Collateral by the CollateralAgent (including pursuant to a power of sale granted by statute or under a judicial proceeding), thereceipt of the purchase money by the Collateral Agent or of the officer making the sale shall be asufficient discharge to the purchaser or purchasers of the Collateral so sold and such purchaser orpurchasers shall not be obligated to see to the application of any part of the purchase money paid overto the Collateral Agent or such officer or be answerable in any way for the misapplication thereof.  Forpurposes of making any payment hereunder in respect of any DVA Obligations, the Collateral Agent mayrely upon any statement or certificate presented to it by any Grantor or DVA Creditor (or any agent forsuch DVA Creditor) with respect to the amount of such DVA Obligation, and any distribution by theCollateral Agent of funds to any agent for any of the DVA Creditors shall be sufficient to discharge theobligations of the Collateral Agent in respect of such DVA Obligations, and the Collateral Agent shallnot be required to see to the application of such funds by such agent.                  SECTION 6.03.     Grant of License to Use Intellectual Property.  For the purpose of enabling theCollateral Agent to exercise rights and remedies under this Article at such time as the Collateral Agentshall be lawfully entitled to exercise such rights and remedies, each Grantor hereby grants to theCollateral Agent an irrevocable, non-exclusive license (exercisable without payment of royalty or othercompensation to the Grantors) to use, license or sub-license any of the Collateral consisting ofIntellectual Property now owned or hereafter acquired by such Grantor, and wherever the same may belocated, and including in such license reasonable access to all media in which any of the licensed itemsmay be recorded or stored and to all computer software and programs used for the compilation or printoutthereof.  The use of such license by the Collateral Agent shall be exercised, at the option of theCollateral Agent, upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default; provided thatany license, sub-license or other transaction entered into by the Collateral Agent in accordanceherewith shall be binding upon the Grantors notwithstanding any subsequent cure of an Event of Default.                                                ARTICLE VII                                              Miscellaneous                  SECTION 7.01.     Notices.  All communications and notices hereunder shall (except as otherwiseexpressly permitted herein) be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the CreditAgreement.  All communications and notices hereunder to any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be given to it atits address or telecopy number set forth on Schedule I, with a copy to the Borrower.                  SECTION 7.02.     Security Interest Absolute.  All rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder, theSecurity Interest and all obligations of the Grantors hereunder shall be absolute and unconditionalirrespective of (a) any lack of validity or enforceability of the Credit Agreement, any other LoanDocument, any agreement with respect to any of the Obligations or any other agreement or instrumentrelating to any of the foregoing, (b) any change in the time, manner or place of payment of, or in anyother term of, all or any of the Obligations or any other amendment or waiver of or any consent to anydeparture from the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument,(c) any exchange, release or non-perfection of any Lien on other collateral, or any release or amendmentor waiver of or consent under or departure from any guarantee, securing or guaranteeing all or any ofthe Obligations, or (d) any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to,or a discharge of, any Grantor in respect of the Obligations or this Agreement.                  SECTION 7.03.     Survival of Agreement.  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties madeby any Grantor herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connectionwith or pursuant to this Agreement shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Secured Partiesand shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans, and the execution and delivery to the Lendersof any notes evidencing such Loans, regardless of any investigation made by the Lenders or on theirbehalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until this Agreement shall terminate.                  SECTION 7.04.     Binding Effect; Several Agreement.  This Agreement shall become effective as to anyGrantor when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of such Grantor shall have been delivered to theCollateral Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Collateral Agent,and thereafter shall be binding upon such Grantor and the Collateral Agent and their respectivesuccessors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Grantor, the Collateral Agent and theother Secured Parties and their respective successors and assigns, except that no Grantor shall have theright to assign or transfer its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein or in theCollateral (and any such assignment or transfer shall be void) except as expressly contemplated by thisAgreement or the Credit Agreement.  This Agreement shall be construed as a separate agreement withrespect to each Grantor and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived or released with respect toany Grantor without the approval of any other Grantor and without affecting the obligations of any otherGrantor hereunder.                  SECTION 7.05.     Successors and Assigns.  Whenever in this Agreement any of the parties hereto isreferred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and allcovenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of any Grantor or the Collateral Agent that arecontained in this Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors andassigns.                  SECTION 7.06.     Collateral Agent's Fees and Expenses; Indemnification.  (a)  Each Grantor jointly andseverally agrees to pay upon demand to the Collateral Agent the amount of any and all reasonableexpenses, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of its counsel and of anyexperts or agents, which the Collateral Agent may incur in connection with (i) the administration ofthis Agreement, (ii) the custody or preservation of, or the sale of, collection from or otherrealization upon any of the Collateral, (iii) the exercise, enforcement or protection of any of therights of the Collateral Agent hereunder or (iv) the failure of any Grantor to perform or observe any ofthe provisions hereof.                  (b)      Without limitation of its indemnification obligations under the other Loan Documents, eachGrantor jointly and severally agrees to indemnify the Collateral Agent and the other Indemniteesagainst, and hold each of them harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities andrelated expenses, including reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel, incurred by orasserted against any of them arising out of, in any way connected with, or as a result of, theexecution, delivery or performance of this Agreement or any claim, litigation, investigation orproceeding relating hereto or to the Collateral, whether or not any Indemnitee is a party thereto;provided that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that suchlosses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competentjurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willfulmisconduct of such Indemnitee.                  (c)      Any such amounts payable as provided hereunder shall be additional Obligations secured herebyand by the other Security Documents.  The provisions of this Section 7.06 shall remain operative and infull force and effect regardless of the termination of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, theconsummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of any of the Loans, the invalidityor unenforceability of any term or provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or anyinvestigation made by or on behalf of the Collateral Agent or any Lender.  All amounts due under thisSection 7.06 shall be payable on written demand therefor.                  SECTION 7.07.     GOVERNING LAW.  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BYTHE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.                  SECTION 7.08.     Waivers; Amendment.  (a)  No failure or delay of the Collateral Agent in exercisingany power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exerciseof any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right orpower, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  Therights and remedies of the Collateral Agent hereunder and of the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank, theAdministrative Agent and the Lenders under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusiveof any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provisions of this Agreementor any other Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Grantor therefrom shall in any event beeffective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consentshall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  No notice to ordemand on any Grantor in any case shall entitle such Grantor or any other Grantor to any other orfurther notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.                  (b)      Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified exceptpursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Collateral Agent and the Grantoror Grantors with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification is to apply, subject to anyconsent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement or any Intercreditor Agreement.                  SECTION 7.09.     WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; APPOINTMENT OF RECEIVER.  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TOTHE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OFANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANYOF THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS.  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEYOF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THEEVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHERPARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, ASAPPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 7.09.                  SECTION 7.10.     Severability.  In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in thisAgreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality andenforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impairedthereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdictionshall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  Theparties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceableprovisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of theinvalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.                  SECTION 7.11.     SECTION 7.11  Counterparts.  This Agreement may be executed in two or morecounterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which when taken together shallconstitute but one contract (subject to Section 7.04), and shall become effective as provided inSection 7.04.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Agreement by facsimile transmission shallbe effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.                  SECTION 7.12.     Headings.  Article and Section headings used herein are for the purpose of referenceonly, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken intoconsideration in interpreting, this Agreement.                  SECTION 7.13.     Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.  (a)  Each Grantor hereby irrevocably andunconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any New YorkState court or Federal court of the United States of America sitting in New York City, and any appellatecourt from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or theother Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties heretohereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action orproceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, insuch Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action orproceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or inany other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the CollateralAgent, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any actionor proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against any Grantor or itsproperties in the courts of any jurisdiction.                  (b)      Each Grantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it maylegally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venueof any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other LoanDocuments in any New York State or Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives,to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of suchaction or proceeding in any such court.                  (c)      Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner providedfor notices in Section 7.01.  Nothing in this Agreement will affected the right of any party to thisAgreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.                  SECTION 7.14.     Termination.  (a)  This Agreement and the Security Interest shall terminate when allthe Obligations (other than the DVA Obligations and other than inchoate indemnification andreimbursement rights) have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Lenders have no further commitment tolend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Bank has no further commitment to issueLetters of Credit under the Credit Agreement, at which time the Collateral Agent shall execute anddeliver to the Grantors, at the Grantors' expense, all Uniform Commercial Code termination statementsand similar documents which the Grantors shall reasonably request to evidence such termination.  Anyexecution and delivery of termination statements or documents pursuant to this Section 7.14 shall bewithout recourse to or warranty by the Collateral Agent.                  (b)      A Subsidiary Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations hereunder and theSecurity Interest in the Collateral of such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically released in theevent that all the capital stock of such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be sold, transferred or otherwisedisposed of to a Person that is not an Affiliate of the Borrower in accordance with the terms of theCredit Agreement; provided that the Lenders shall have consented to such sale, transfer or otherdisposition (to the extent required by the Credit Agreement) and the terms of such consent did notprovide otherwise.                  (c)      Upon any sale or other transfer by any Grantor of any Collateral that is permitted under theCredit Agreement to any Person that is not a Grantor, or, upon the effectiveness of any written consentto the release of the security interest granted hereby in any Collateral pursuant to Section 9.02(b) ofthe Credit Agreement, the security interest in such Collateral shall be automatically released.                  (d)      The Collateral Agent shall, in connection with a financing contemplated by Section 6.01(a)(vi)and 6.02(a)(v) of the Credit Agreement, at the request of the lender providing the financing,(i) subordinate the security interest under this Agreement on the specific assets or improvement beingfinanced to the security interest of such lender pursuant to an intercreditor and/or subordinationagreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such lender, the Administrative Agent and theGrantor or (ii) release the Lien and security interest under this Agreement on the specific assets orimprovement being financed; provided that such Lien and security interest shall be reinstated upon therepayment in full of the loans of such lender and the obligations of the Grantor to such lender arisingfrom or related to such financing secured by such assets or improvement and, in connection with suchreinstatement, the Grantors shall execute and deliver, at the Grantors' expense, any Uniform CommercialCode financing statements or other documents necessary to effect and evidence such reinstatement as maybe reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent.  In connection with any subordination or release ofLien and security interest pursuant to this Section 7.14(d), the Collateral Agent shall execute anddeliver, at the Grantors' expense, any documents necessary to effect and evidence such subordination asmay be reasonably requested by the Grantors.                  SECTION 7.15.     Additional Grantors.  Upon execution and delivery by the Collateral Agent and aSubsidiary of Holdings of an instrument in the form of Annex 3 hereto, such Subsidiary shall become aGrantor hereunder with the same force and effect as if originally named as a Grantor herein. Theexecution and delivery of any such instrument shall not require the consent of any Grantor hereunder.The rights and obligations of each Grantor hereunder shall remain in full force and effectnotwithstanding the addition of any new Grantor as a party to this Agreement.                  SECTION 7.16.     Intercreditor Agreement.  The rights hereunder with respect to the DVA Creditors andthe DVA Obligations are subject to the applicable Intercreditor Agreements.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the dayand year first above written.                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assitant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assitant Secretary                                                     EACH SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR LISTED ON SCHEDULE I                                                     HERETO,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assitant Secretary                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                        --------------------------                                                            Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                            Title: Managing Director
SCHEDULE I                                          Subsidiary Guarantors
SCHEDULE II                                                Copyrights
SCHEDULE III                                                 Licenses
SCHEDULE IV                                                 Patents
SCHEDULE V                                                Trademarks
5                                    CASH CONCENTRATION LETTER AGREEMENT dated as of                           [                        ], among ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED a                           Virginia corporation (the "Borrower"), FIRST UNION NATIONAL BANK, a national                           banking corporation (the "Cash Concentration Bank"), JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, a                           New York banking corporation ("JPMCB") as collateral agent (in such capacity,                           the "Collateral Agent") for the Secured Parties (as defined in the Security                           Agreement referred to below).                  Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of December 5,2003 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"),among the Borrower, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"), the lenders from timeto time party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Secured Parties.                  A.       The Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein) (the SubsidiaryGuarantors, the Borrower and Holdings being collectively referred to as the "Grantors") and theCollateral Agent are parties to an Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003(as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Security Agreement").Pursuant to the terms of the Security Agreement, the Grantors have granted to the Collateral Agent, forthe benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in the Grantors' Accounts and other Collateral,to secure the payment and performance of the Obligations.  Capitalized terms used herein and nototherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Security Agreement.                  B.       The Cash Concentration Bank has agreed to act as collection sub-agent of the Collateral Agentto receive (a) amounts transferred to the Cash Concentration Account (as defined below) (such amounts,the "Transferred Receipts") and (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.                  C.       The parties hereto desire to define hereunder certain rights and obligations among them withrespect to the appointment of the Cash Concentration Bank.                  NOW,  THEREFORE,  in  consideration  of  the  premises  and  the  mutual  covenants  andagreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:                  1.       The Collateral Agent hereby appoints the Cash Concentration Bank as its collection sub-agentunder the Security Agreement and authorizes the Cash Concentration Bank, on the terms and subject to theconditions set forth herein, to receive and hold on deposit (a) Transferred Receipts and (b) payments onthe Accounts included in the Collateral.                  2.       Prior to or contemporaneously with the execution and delivery by the Cash Concentration Bank ofthis Agreement, and for the purposes of this Agreement, the Cash Concentration Bank has established andwill (except as otherwise provided in paragraph 12 below) maintain a cash concentration account in FirstUnion National Bank (account number 2001000059003) in the name of the Borrower (the "Cash ConcentrationAccount").  The Cash Concentration Bank shall deposit in the Cash Concentration Account all TransferredReceipts received by the Cash Concentration Bank and all payments received by the Cash ConcentrationBank in respect of the Accounts included in the Collateral.  The Cash Concentration Bank agrees to givethe Collateral Agent prompt notice if the Cash Concentration Bank receives notice that the CashConcentration Account is subject to any writ, judgment, warrant of attachment, execution or similarprocess.  As security for the payment and performance of the Obligations, the Borrower hereby pledges,assigns and transfers to the Cash Concentration Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, andhereby creates and grants to the Cash Concentration Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, asecurity interest in the Cash Concentration Account and all property and assets held therein.  The CashConcentration Bank acknowledges the security interest of the Collateral Agent for the benefit of theLenders in the Cash Concentration Account.                  3.       [The Cash Concentration Bank shall transmit all funds, if any, then on deposit in the CashConcentration Account at the end of each Business Day to the cash concentration account maintained bythe Borrower with First Union National Bank (account number 2001000059003); provided that funds ondeposit which are subject to collection shall be transmitted promptly upon collection.]  The CollateralAgent hereby authorizes the Cash Concentration Bank to permit the Borrower to make withdrawals from theCash Concentration Account, so long as the Cash Concentration Bank has not received prior written noticefrom the Collateral Agent pursuant to the next succeeding sentence.  Promptly upon receipt of written,telex or telecopy notice from the Collateral Agent so directing the Cash Concentration Bank at any time(which direction shall be given by the Collateral Agent only upon the occurrence and during thecontinuation of an Event of Default and which notice shall be sent simultaneously to the Borrower),except to the extent and subject to such terms as may be specified in such notice, the CashConcentration Bank shall no longer permit withdrawals from the Cash Concentration Account to be made bythe Borrower without the written consent of the Collateral Agent, and, if so directed in such notice,shall promptly transmit to the Collateral Agent, at the office specified in such notice, all funds, ifany, then on deposit in the Cash Concentration Account (provided that funds on deposit that are subjectto collection shall be transmitted promptly upon collection).  If so directed in such notice, the CashConcentration Bank shall deliver directly to the Collateral Agent at the office specified in such noticeall checks, drafts and other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Transferred Receiptsor Accounts included in the Collateral in the possession of the Cash Concentration Bank withoutdepositing such checks, drafts or other instruments in the Cash Concentration Account.                  4.       Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, the Cash ConcentrationBank shall, if requested by the Collateral Agent, furnish the Collateral Agent with monthly statements,in the form and manner typical for the Cash Concentration Bank, of amounts on deposit in, and amountswithdrawn from, the Cash Concentration Account and such other information relating to the CashConcentration Account at such times as shall be reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent.                  5.       For purposes of this Agreement, any officer of the Collateral Agent shall be authorized to act,and to give instructions and notice, for the purposes set forth in this Agreement on behalf of theCollateral Agent hereunder.                  6.       The fees for the services of the Cash Concentration Bank shall be mutually agreed upon betweenthe Borrower and the Cash Concentration Bank.  The Collateral Agent shall not have any responsibility orliability for the payment of any such fee.                  7.       The Cash Concentration Bank may perform any of its duties hereunder by or through its agents,officers or employees and shall be entitled to rely upon the advice of counsel as to its duties.  TheCash Concentration Bank shall not be liable to the Collateral Agent for any action required of the CashConcentration Bank under the terms of this Agreement, if such action was taken or omitted to be taken byit in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, nor shall the Cash Concentration Bank beresponsible to the Collateral Agent or the Borrower for the consequences of any oversight or error ofjudgment or be answerable to the Collateral Agent for the same unless the same shall happen through itsgross negligence or wilful misconduct.                  8.       The Borrower consents to the appointment of the Cash Concentration Bank and agrees that it willnot withdraw, or request to withdraw, funds from the Cash Concentration Account upon the occurrence andduring the continuation of an Event of Default unless such withdrawal is consented to in writing by theCollateral Agent.                  9.       The Cash Concentration Bank undertakes to perform only such duties as are expressly set forthin this Agreement.                  10.      The Cash Concentration Bank accepts its obligations as set forth in this Agreement upon theterms and conditions hereof, including the following, to all of which the Borrower and the CollateralAgent agree:                  (a)      The Borrower shall promptly pay the Cash Concentration Bank the compensation, if any, to be         mutually agreed upon with the Borrower for all services rendered by the Cash Concentration Bank         in connection with this Agreement and to reimburse the Cash Concentration Bank for reasonable         out-of-pocket expenses (including counsel fees) incurred by the Cash Concentration Bank in         connection with the services rendered hereunder by the Cash Concentration Bank.                  (b)      The Borrower agrees to and does hereby indemnify and hold harmless the Cash Concentration Bank         from and against any loss, liability, claim, action, cost or expense incurred hereunder or         arising directly from its action as Cash Concentration Bank hereunder, except for any action or         omission caused by its gross negligence or wilful misconduct (collectively, a "Loss"), as well         as the costs and expenses of defending against any such claim.  The Cash Concentration Bank         shall promptly notify the Borrower of the commencement of any claim giving rise to a potential         Loss and of the proceedings relating thereto.  The Borrower may, at its option, undertake to         defend any such claim against the Cash Concentration Bank.                  (c)      The Cash Concentration Bank may consult with one or more legal counsel satisfactory to it, and         in no event shall it be liable for action taken, suffered or omitted by it hereunder in good         faith and in accordance with the opinion of such counsel.                  (d)      The Cash Concentration Bank shall be protected from and shall incur no liability for or in         respect of any action taken or damage suffered by it in reliance upon any certification,         notice, direction, consent, affidavit, statement, or other paper or document reasonably         believed by it to be genuine and to have been presented or signed by the proper parties, and         the Cash Concentration Bank shall be under no duty whatsoever to inquire into or investigate         the authenticity, validity, accuracy or content of any such item.                  (e)      The Cash Concentration Bank shall have no responsibility, and shall incur no liability, with         respect to the validity of this Agreement or any document related hereto.                  (f)      The Cash Concentration Bank shall not be under any duty to give the items held by it hereunder         any greater degree of care than it gives its own similar property, shall not, unless separately         agreed to with the Borrower, be required to invest any funds held hereunder, and shall be under         no duty to take any action with respect to the funds held in the Cash Concentration Account,         except to keep the same safe and to release and deliver same in accordance with this         Agreement.  Funds held hereunder shall not earn or accrue interest, unless separately agreed to         with the Borrower.  The Cash Concentration Bank's duties and responsibilities shall be limited         to the specific duties stated in this Agreement.                  (g)      The Cash Concentration Bank shall act hereunder as a depository only and shall not be liable or         responsible in any manner for the sufficiency, correctness, genuineness or validity of any         certificate or information delivered to it, or for the identity or authority of any Person         making any deposit hereunder.                  11.      The Cash Concentration Bank shall be entitled to rely on the information furnished to it forall purposes in connection with carrying out its duties and obligations as Cash Concentration Bankhereunder, notwithstanding any knowledge that the Cash Concentration Bank may have (in any capacity)that conflicts with the information so provided.                  12.      (a)  The Cash Concentration Bank may at any time resign as such by giving written notice to theBorrower and the Collateral Agent of such intention on its part, specifying the date on which itsdesired resignation shall become effective; provided, however, that such date shall not be less than45 days after the date on which such notice is given unless the Borrower and the Collateral Agent agreeto accept less notice.                  (b)      In the event that the Cash Concentration Bank shall resign or the Borrower shall replace theCash Concentration Bank (of which the Borrower shall notify the Collateral Agent in advance), the CashConcentration Bank or the Borrower, as applicable, will (i) immediately upon the effectiveness of suchresignation or replacement transmit to a successor collection subagent (which may be the CollateralAgent and which, if other than the Collateral Agent, shall be a Lender and be reasonably acceptable tothe Collateral Agent) specified in writing by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent and the CashConcentration Bank (such successor collection sub-agent, the "Successor Cash Concentration Bank"), atthe office specified in writing by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent and the Cash Concentration Bank,all funds, if any, then on deposit in, or otherwise to the credit of, the Cash Concentration Account,provided that funds on deposit which are subject to collection shall be transmitted promptly uponcollection, (ii) deliver directly to the Successor Cash Concentration Bank at the office specified inwriting by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent and the Cash Concentration Bank all Transferred Receiptsand all checks, drafts and other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Accounts includedin the Collateral in the possession of the Cash Concentration Bank, without depositing such TransferredReceipts or checks, drafts or other instruments in the Cash Concentration Account or any other accountand (iii) deliver any Transferred Receipts or payments relating to the Accounts included in theCollateral received by the Cash Concentration Bank after such replacement, in whatever form received,directly to the Successor Cash Concentration Bank at the office specified in writing to the CollateralAgent and the Cash Concentration Bank.                  13.      The Collateral Agent agrees with the Borrower that it will provide the Cash Concentration Bankwith notice as specified in paragraph 3 of this Agreement only if an Event of Default has occurred andis continuing under this Agreement or any other Loan Document.                  14.      The term of this Agreement shall extend from the date hereof until the earlier of (a) the dateon which all Obligations (other than the DVA Obligations) have been paid in full and (b) any date onwhich the Cash Concentration Bank shall not be serving in its capacity hereunder as provided inparagraph 12 above.  The obligations of the Cash Concentration Bank contained in clause (b)(iii) ofparagraph 12 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.                  15.      All notices and communications hereunder shall be in writing (except where telephonicinstructions or notices are authorized herein) and shall be deemed to have been received and shall beeffective on the day on which delivered (including delivery by telex or facsimile) (a) in the case ofthe Collateral Agent, addressed to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, One ChaseManhattan Plaza, 8th Floor, New York, New York  10081, to the attention of Janet Belden (TelecopyNo. (212) 552-5658) with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, to theattention of Neil Boylan, (Telecopy No. (212) 552-5658); (b) in the case of the Cash Concentration Bank,addressed to First Union National Bank, 301 S. College Street, DC-5, Charlotte, N.C. 28288-0757 to theattention of [                 ] (Telecopy No. (704) 374-3300); and (c) in the case of the Borrower,addressed to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, 5673 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia 24012 to theattention of Chief Financial Officer (Telecopy No. (540) 561-1699).                  16.      The Cash Concentration Bank will not (except as expressly permitted hereby) assign or transferany of its rights or obligations hereunder (other than to the Collateral Agent) without the priorwritten consent of the other parties hereto.                  17.      This Agreement may be amended only by a written instrument executed by the Collateral Agent,the Cash Concentration Bank and the Borrower, acting by their representative officers thereunto dulyauthorized.                  18.      Except as otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement with respect to rights of set-offavailable to the Cash Concentration Bank in the event that it is also a Lender under the CreditAgreement, the Cash Concentration Bank hereby irrevocably waives, effective upon the occurrence andduring the continuation of an Event of Default, any right to set-off against, or otherwise deduct from,any funds then or at any time thereafter held in the Cash Concentration Account for any indebtedness orother claim then or at any time thereafter owed by the Borrower to the Cash Concentration Bank.                  19.      Except to the extent the laws of the state of Virginia govern the Cash Concentration Account,this Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York.                  20.      This Agreement (a) shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Collateral Agent, theCash Concentration Bank, the Borrower and their respective successors and assigns and (b) may beexecuted simultaneously in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but allof which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.                  IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed bytheir duly authorized officers as of the date first above written.                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                         by                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Title:                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                        --------------------------                                                            Title:                                                     FIRST UNION NATIONAL BANK, as Cash Concentration                                                     Bank,                                                         by                                                        -------------------------                                                            Title:
6                                                                                              Annex 1-B to                                                                                    the Security Agreement                                    COLLECTION DEPOSIT LETTER AGREEMENT dated as of [      ], among                           ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia Corporation (the "Borrower"),                           JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, a New York banking corporation ("JPMCB"), as collateral                           agent (the "Collateral Agent") for the Secured Parties (as defined in the                           Security Agreement referred to below) and [           ], a [               ]                           (the "Collection Deposit Bank").                  Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of December 5,2003 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"),among the Borrower, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"), the Lenders from timeto time party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the"Administrative Agent").                  A.       The Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein) (the SubsidiaryGuarantors, the Borrower and Holdings being collectively referred to herein as the "Grantors") and theCollateral Agent are parties to an Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003(the "Security Agreement").  Pursuant to the terms of the Security Agreement, the Grantors have grantedto the Collateral Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in the Grantors'Accounts and other Collateral, to secure the payment and performance of the Obligations.  Capitalizedterms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in theSecurity Agreement.                  B.       The Collection Deposit Bank has agreed to receive on behalf of the Grantors (a) Daily Receiptsand (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.                  C.       The parties hereto desire to define hereunder certain rights and obligations among them withrespect to the appointment of the Collection Deposit Bank.                  NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants andagreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:                  1.       The Collateral Agent hereby authorizes the Collection Deposit Bank, on the terms and subject tothe conditions set forth herein, to receive (a) Daily Receipts and (b) payments on the Accounts includedin the Collateral.                  2.       Contemporaneously with the execution and delivery by the Collection Deposit Bank of thisAgreement, and for the purposes of this Agreement, the Collection Deposit Bank has established and shallmaintain (except as otherwise provided in paragraph 8 below) for the benefit of  the Collateral Agentupon the occurrence of an Event of Default one or more collection accounts in the name of the Borrower(all such accounts, collectively, the "Collection Deposit Account").  All Daily Receipts received by theCollection Deposit Bank and all payments received by the Collection Deposit Bank in respect of theAccounts included in the Collateral shall be deposited by the Borrower in the Collection DepositAccount, and such Daily Receipts and payments shall not be commingled with other funds of the Borrower.All funds at any time on deposit in the Collection Deposit Account shall be held by the CollectionDeposit Bank subject to the terms of this Agreement.  The Collection Deposit Bank agrees to give theCollateral Agent prompt notice if the Collection Deposit Bank receives notice that the CollectionDeposit Account is subject to any writ, judgment, warrant of attachment, execution or similar process.As security for the payment and performance of the Obligations, the Borrower hereby pledges, assigns andtransfers to the Collection Deposit Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, and hereby createsand grants to the Collection Deposit Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, a security interestin the Collection Deposit Account and all property and assets held therein.  The Collection Deposit Bankacknowledges the security interest of the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Lenders in theCollection Deposit Account.                  3.       The Collateral Agent hereby authorizes the Collection Deposit Bank to permit the Borrower tomake withdrawals from the Collection Deposit Account, so long as the Collection Deposit Bank has notreceived notice from the Collateral Agent pursuant to the next succeeding sentence.  Upon receipt ofwritten, telex, facsimile or telephonic notice (which, in the case of telephonic notice, shall bepromptly confirmed in writing) from the Collateral Agent so directing the Collection Deposit Bank at anytime (which direction shall be given by the Collateral Agent only upon the occurrence and during thecontinuation of an Event of Default and which notice shall be sent simultaneously to the Borrower),except to the extent and subject to such terms as may be specified in such notice, the CollectionDeposit Bank shall no longer permit withdrawals from the Collection Deposit Account to be made by theBorrower, and, if so directed in such notice, shall promptly transmit to the cash concentration accountmaintained by the Borrower with First Union National Bank (account number 2001000059003) (the "BorrowerCash Concentration Account") all funds, if any, then on deposit in, or otherwise to the credit of, theCollection Deposit Account (provided that funds on deposit that are subject to collection shall betransmitted promptly upon collection).  If so directed in such notice, the Collection Deposit Bank shalltransmit directly to the Borrower Cash Concentration Account all Daily Receipts and all checks, draftsand other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Accounts included in the Collateral inthe possession of the Collection Deposit Bank without depositing such Daily Receipts or such checks,drafts or other instruments in the Collection Deposit Account or any other account.                  4.       Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, the Collection DepositBank shall, if requested by the Collateral Agent, furnish the Collateral Agent with monthly statements,in the form and manner typical for the Collection Deposit Bank, of amounts of deposits in, and amountswithdrawn from, the Collection Deposit Account and such other information relating to the CollectionDeposit Account at such times as shall be reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent.                  5.       For purposes of this Agreement, any officer of the Collateral Agent shall be authorized to act,and to give instructions and notice, for the purposes set forth in this Agreement on behalf of theCollateral Agent hereunder.                  6.       The fees for the services of the Collection Deposit Bank shall be mutually agreed upon betweenthe Borrower and the Collection Deposit Bank.  The Collateral Agent shall not have any responsibility orliability for the payment of any such fee.                  7.       The Collection Deposit Bank may perform any of its duties hereunder by or through its agents,officers or employees and shall be entitled to rely upon the advice of counsel as to its duties.  TheCollection Deposit Bank shall not be liable to the Collateral Agent for any action required of theCollection Deposit Bank under the terms of this Agreement, if such action was taken or omitted to betaken by it in good faith, nor shall the Collection Deposit Bank be responsible to the Collateral Agentor the Borrower for the consequences of any oversight or error of judgment or be answerable to theCollateral Agent for the same unless the same shall happen through its gross negligence or willfulmisconduct.                  8.       In the event that the Borrower shall replace the Collection Deposit Bank (of which the Borrowershall notify the Collateral Agent in advance), the Collection Deposit Bank or the Borrower, asapplicable, will (a) immediately transmit to the Borrower Cash Concentration Account all funds, if any,then on deposit in, or otherwise to the credit of, the Collection Deposit Account, (b) deliver directlyto the successor collection deposit bank at the office specified in writing by the Borrower to theCollateral Agent all subsequently received Daily Receipts and all checks, drafts and other instrumentsfor the payment of money relating to the Accounts included in the Collateral that would have beendeposited with the Collection Deposit Bank and (c) deliver any Daily Receipts or payments relating tothe Accounts included in the Collateral by the Collection Deposit Bank after such replacement, inwhatever form received, directly to the successor collection deposit bank at the office specified inwriting by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent.                  9.       The Borrower consents to the appointment of the Collection Deposit Bank and agrees that it willnot withdraw, or request to withdraw, funds from the Collection Deposit Account upon the occurrence andduring the continuation of an Event of Default unless such withdrawal is consented to in writing by theCollateral Agent.  The Borrower acknowledges that the Collection Deposit Bank shall incur no liabilityto the Borrower as a result of any action taken pursuant to an instruction given by the Collateral Agentin accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.                  10.      The Collateral Agent agrees that it will provide the Collection Deposit Bank with notice asspecified in paragraph 3 of this Agreement only if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuingunder this Agreement or any other Loan Document.                  11.      The term of this Agreement shall extend from the date hereof until the earlier of (a) the dateon which all Obligations (other than the DVA Obligations) have been paid in full and (b) any date onwhich the Collection Deposit Bank shall not be serving in its capacity as collection deposit bankhereunder as provided in paragraph 8 above.  The obligations of the Collection Deposit Bank contained inthe third sentence of paragraph 8 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.                  12.      All notices and communications hereunder shall be in writing (except where telephonicinstructions or notices are authorized herein) and shall be deemed to have been received and shall beeffective on the day on which delivered (including delivery by telex or facsimile) (a) in the case ofthe Collateral Agent, addressed to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, One ChaseManhattan Plaza, 8th Floor, New York, New York 10081, to the attention of Janet Belden (TelecopyNo. (212) 552-5658) with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, to theattention of Neil Boylan, (Telecopy No. (212) 552-5658), and (b) in the case of the Collection DepositBank, addressed to [         ], to the attention of [           ].                  13.      The Collection Deposit Bank will not (except as contemplated in paragraph 8 above) assign ortransfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder (other than to the Collateral Agent) without theprior written consent of the other parties hereto.                  14.      This Agreement may be amended only by a written instrument executed by the Collateral Agent,the Collection Deposit Bank and the Borrower, acting by their representative officers thereunto dulyauthorized.                  15.      Except as otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement with respect to rights of set-offavailable to the Collection Deposit Bank in the event that it is also a Lender under the CreditAgreement, the Collection Deposit Bank hereby irrevocably waives, effective upon the occurrence andduring the continuation of an Event of Default, any right to set-off against, or otherwise deduct from,any funds (with the exception of service fees and deposited items which have been returned) then or atany time thereafter held in the Collection Deposit Account for any indebtedness or other claim then orat any time thereafter owed by the Borrower to the Collection Deposit Bank.                  16.      Except to the extent the laws of the state of [           ] govern the Collection DepositAccount, this Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State ofNew York.                  17.      This Agreement (a) shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Collateral Agent, theCollection Deposit Bank, the Borrower and their respective successors and assigns and (b) may beexecuted simultaneously in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but allof which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
IN WITNESS  WHEREOF,  the parties  hereto have caused this  Agreement to be executed by their dulyauthorized officers as of the date first above written.                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY INCORPORATED,                                                         by                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Title:                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                        --------------------------                                                            Title:                                                     [                                           ],                                                     as Collection Deposit Bank,                                                         by                                                            Title:                                                                                            Annex 2 to the                                                                                        Security Agreement                                                [Form Of]                                          PERFECTION CERTIFICATE                  Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as ofDecember 5, 2003 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "CreditAgreement"), among Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Holdings"), Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (the"Borrower"), the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders") and JPMorgan Chase Bank, asadministrative agent for the Lenders, Collateral Agent and issuing bank, (b) the Guarantee Agreementdated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the"Guarantee Agreement"), among the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein), Holdings and the CollateralAgent and (c) the Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003 (as furtheramended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Security Agreement"), among theBorrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Collateral Agent.  All capitalized terms used butnot defined herein shall have the meanings given such terms in the Credit Agreement or the SecurityAgreement, as applicable.                  The undersigned, a Financial Officer of the Borrower, hereby certifies to theCollateral Agent and each other Secured Party as follows:                  1.       Names  (a)  The exact corporate name of each Grantor, as such name appears in its respectivecertificate of incorporation, is as follows:                  (b)      Set forth below is each other corporate name each Grantor has had in the past five years,together with the date of the relevant change:                  (c)      Except as set forth in Schedule 1 hereto, no Grantor has changed its identity or corporatestructure in any way within the past five years.  Changes in identity or corporate structure wouldinclude mergers, consolidations and acquisitions, as well as any change in the form, nature orjurisdiction of corporate organization.  If any such change has occurred, include in Schedule 1 theinformation required by Sections 1 and 2 of this certificate as to each acquiree or constituent party toa merger or consolidation.                  (d)      The following is a list of all other names (including trade names or similar appellations) usedby each Grantor or any of its divisions or other business units in connection with the conduct of itsbusiness or the ownership of its properties at any time during the past five years:                  (e)      Set forth below is the Federal Taxpayer Identification Number of each Grantor:                  (f)      Set forth below is the organizational number of each Grantor that is a registered organization:                  2.       Current Locations.  (a)  The chief executive office of each Grantor is located at the addressset forth opposite its name below:Grantor                      Mailing Address                    County                    State                  (b)      Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all locations where such Grantormaintains any books or records relating to any Accounts (with each location at which chattel paper, ifany, is kept being indicated by an "*"):Grantor                      Mailing Address                    County                    State                  (c)      The jurisdiction of formation of each Grantor that is a registered organization is set forthopposite its name below:Grantor                                                                           Jurisdiction                  (d)      Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the places of business of suchGrantor not identified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) above:Grantor                      Mailing Address                    County                    State                  (e)      Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the locations where such Grantormaintains any Collateral not identified above:Grantor                      Mailing Address                    County                    State                  (f)      Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are the names and addresses of all Personsother than such Grantor that have possession of any of the Collateral of such Grantor:Grantor                      Mailing Address                    County                    State                  3.       Unusual Transactions.  All Accounts have been originated by the Grantors and all Inventory hasbeen acquired by the Grantors in the ordinary course of business.                  4.       File Search Reports.  File search reports have been obtained from each Uniform Commercial Codefiling office identified with respect to such Grantor in Section 2 hereof, and such search reportsreflect no liens against any of the Collateral other than those permitted under the Credit Agreement.                  5.       UCC Filings.  Duly [authenticated] [signed] financing statements on Form UCC-1 in substantiallythe form of Schedule 5 hereto have been prepared for filing in the Uniform Commercial Code filing officein each jurisdiction identified with respect to such Grantor in [Section 2] [Section 2(a) or 2(b)]hereof.                  6.       Schedule of Filings.  Attached hereto as Schedule 5 is a schedule setting forth, with respectto the filings described in Section 5 above, each filing and the filing office in which such filing isto be made.                  7.       Filing Fees.  All filing fees and taxes payable in connection with the filings described inSection 5 above have been or will be paid.                  8.       Stock Ownership.  Attached hereto as Schedule 8 is a true and correct list of all the dulyauthorized, issued and outstanding stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membershipinterests or other equity interests in the Borrower and of each Subsidiary and the record and beneficialowners of such stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or otherequity interests.  Also set forth on Schedule 8 is each equity investment of Holdings and eachSubsidiary that represents 50% or less of the equity of the entity in which such investment was made.                  9.       Debt Indebtedness.  Attached hereto as Schedule 9 is a true and correct list of allinstruments, including promissory notes and other evidence of indebtedness, held by Holdings and eachSubsidiary, including all intercompany notes between Holdings and each Subsidiary of Holdings andbetween each Subsidiary of Holdings and each other such Subsidiary.                  10.      Advances.  Attached hereto as Schedule 10 is (a) a true and correct list of all advances madeby Holdings to any Subsidiary of Holdings or made by any Subsidiary of Holdings to Holdings or any otherSubsidiary of Holdings, which advances will be on and after the date hereof evidenced by one or moreintercompany notes pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreement, and (b) a true andcorrect list of all unpaid intercompany transfers of goods sold and delivered by or to Holdings or anySubsidiary of Holdings.                  11.      Mortgage Filings.  Attached hereto as Schedule 11 is a schedule setting forth, with respect toeach Mortgaged Property, (a) the exact corporate name of the corporation that owns such property as suchname appears in its certificate of incorporation, (b) if different from the name identified pursuant toclause (a), the exact name of the current record owner of such property reflected in the records of thefiling office for such property identified pursuant to the following clause and (c) the filing office inwhich a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filed or recorded in order for the CollateralAgent to obtain a perfected security interest therein.                  12.      Intellectual Property.  Attached hereto as Schedule 12(A) in proper form for filing with theUnited States Patent and Trademark Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Patents,Patent Licenses, Trademarks and Trademark Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, theregistration number and the expiration date of each Patent, Patent License, Trademark and TrademarkLicense owned by any Grantor. Attached hereto as Schedule 12(B) in proper form for filing with theUnited States Copyright Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Copyrights andCopyright Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and theexpiration date of each Copyright or Copyright License owned by any Grantor.                  13.      Commercial Tort Claims.  Attached hereto as Schedule 13 is a true and correct list ofcommercial tort claims held by any Grantor, including a brief description thereof.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed this certificate on this _____day of December 2003.                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary
Annex 3 to the                                                                                        Security Agreement                                    SUPPLEMENT NO. [  ] dated as of [            ], to the Amended and                           Restated Security Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003 (as further amended,                           supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Security                           Agreement"), among ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia                           corporation (the "Borrower"), ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation                           ("Holdings"), each subsidiary of the Borrower listed on Schedule I thereto                           (each such subsidiary individually a "Subsidiary Guarantor" and collectively,                           the "Subsidiary Guarantors"; the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the                           Borrower are referred to collectively herein as the "Grantors") and JPMORGAN                           CHASE BANK, a New York banking corporation ("JPMCB"), as collateral agent (in                           such capacity, the "Collateral Agent") for the Secured Parties (as defined                           therein).                  A.       Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003(as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"),among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders") and JPMCB, asadministrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the "Administrative Agent"), Collateral Agentand as issuing bank (in such capacity, the "Issuing Bank"), and (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as ofNovember 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "GuaranteeAgreement"), among the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent.                  B.       Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assignedto such terms in the Security Agreement or the Credit Agreement, as applicable.                  C.       The Grantors have entered into the Security Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to makeLoans, the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit and DVA Creditors to purchase Designated VendorAccounts.  Section 7.15 of the Security Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries of Holdings maybecome Grantors under the Security Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form ofthis Supplement.  The undersigned Subsidiary (the "New Grantor") is executing this Supplement inaccordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement to become a Grantor under the SecurityAgreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans, the Issuing Bank to issue additionalLetters of Credit and DVA Creditors to purchase additional Designated Vendor Accounts, and asconsideration for Loans previously made, Letters of Credit previously issued and Designated VendorAccounts previously purchased.                  Accordingly, the Collateral Agent and the New Grantor agree as follows:                  SECTION 1.        In accordance with Section 7.15 of the Security Agreement, the New Grantor by itssignature below becomes a Grantor under the Security Agreement with the same force and effect as iforiginally named therein as a Grantor, and the New Grantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms andprovisions of the Security Agreement applicable to it as a Grantor thereunder and (b) represents andwarrants to the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties that the representations and warranties made byit as a Grantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof.  In furtherance of theforegoing, the New Grantor, as security for the payment and performance in full of the Obligations (asdefined in the Security Agreement), does hereby create and grant to the Collateral Agent, its successorsand assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, their successors and assigns, a security interestin and lien on all of the New Grantor's right, title and interest in and to the Collateral (as definedin the Security Agreement) of the New Grantor.  Each reference to a "Grantor" in the Security Agreementshall be deemed to include the New Grantor. The Security Agreement is hereby incorporated herein byreference.                  SECTION 2.        The New Grantor represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the SecuredParties that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by it and constitutes itslegal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.                  SECTION 3.        This Supplement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto ondifferent counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when takentogether shall constitute a single contract. This Supplement shall become effective when the CollateralAgent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signaturesof the New Grantor and the Collateral Agent.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplementby facsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually signed counterpart of thisSupplement.                  SECTION 4.        The New Grantor hereby represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the SecuredParties that (a) set forth on Schedule I attached hereto is a true and correct schedule of the locationof any and all Collateral of the New Grantor other than Collateral (i) consisting of goods in transitbetween facilities, whether in vehicles owned by the applicable Grantor or on common carriers and(ii) located in temporary warehousing which will remain in such warehousing for no longer than one monthand (b) set forth under its signature hereto, is the true and correct location of the chief executiveoffice of the New Grantor and its jurisdiction of formation.                  SECTION 5.        Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Security Agreement shall remain in fullforce and effect.                  SECTION 6.        THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OFTHE STATE OF NEW YORK.                  SECTION 7.        In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be heldinvalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of theremaining provisions contained herein and in the Security Agreement shall not in any way be affected orimpaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particularjurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any otherjurisdiction). The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid,illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close aspossible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.                  SECTION 8.        All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided inSection 7.01 of the Security Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to the New Grantorshall be given to it at the address set forth under its signature below.                  SECTION 9.        The New Grantor agrees to reimburse the Collateral Agent for its reasonableout-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, other chargesand disbursements of counsel for the Collateral Agent.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Grantor and the Collateral Agent have duly executed thisSupplement to the Security Agreement as of the day and year first above written.                                                     [Name Of New Grantor],                                                         by                                                                /s/ Jeffery T. Gray                                                        ---------------------------                                                            Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                            Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                            Address:                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Collateral Agent,                                                         by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                        --------------------------                                                            Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                            Title: Managing Director
SCHEDULE I                                                                             to Supplement No. [  ] to the                                                                                        Security Agreement                                          LOCATION OF COLLATERALDescription                                                            Location                                          PERFECTION CERTIFICATE         Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as ofDecember [ ],2003, (as further amended, supplmented or otherwise modified from time to time, the "Credit Agreement"),among Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Holdings"), Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (the "Borrower"), thelenders from time to time party thereto (the "Lenders"), and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrativeagent for the Lenders, Collateral Agent and issuing bank, (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as ofNovember 28, 2001 (as amended,  supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time) among theSubsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein), Holdings and the Collateral Agent and (c) the Amended andRestated Security Agreement dated as of December [ ], 2003 (as further amended, supplemented orotherwise modified from time to time, the "Security Agreement"), among the Borrower, Holdings, theSubsidiary Guarantors and the Collateral Agent.  All capitalized terms used but not defined herein shallhave the meanings given such terms in the Credit Agreement or the Security Agreement, as applicable.         The undersigned, a Financial Officer of the Borrower, hereby certifies to the Collateral Agentand each other Secured Party as follows:         1.       Names                  (a)      The exact corporate name of each Grantor, as such name appears in itsrespective certificate of incorporation, is as follows:                           Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation                           Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation                           Advance Trucking Corporation, a Virginia corporation                           Western Auto Supply Company, a Delaware corporation                           Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation                           Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc., a Delaware corporation                           Advance Merchandising Company, Inc., a Virginia corporation                           Advance Aircraft Company, Inc., a Virginia corporation                           Discount Auto Parts, Inc., a Florida corporation                           DAP Acceptance Corporation, a Delaware corporation                  (b)      Set forth below is each other corporate name each Grantor has had in the pastfive years, together with the date of the relevant change:                           There have been no name changes for Grantors.                  (c)      Except as set forth in Schedule 1 hereto, no Grantor has changed its identifyor corporate structure in any way within the past five years.  Changes in identity or corporatestructure would include mergers, consolidations and acquisitions, as well as any change in the form,nature or jurisdiction of corporate organization.  If any such change has occurred, include in Schedule1 the information required by Sections 1 and 2 of this certificate as to each acquiree or constituentparty to a merger or consolidation.                    (d)    The following is a list of all other names (including trade names or similarappellations) used by each Grantor or any of its divisions or other business units in connection withthe conduct of its business or the ownership of its properties at any time during the past five years:                           Advance Auto Parts                           Parts America                           Western Auto                           Discount Auto Parts                           Advance Discount Auto Parts                  (e)      Set forth below is the Federal Taxpayer Identification Number of each Grantor:                           Advance Auto Parts Inc.                              54-2049910                           Advance Stores Company, Incorporated                 54-0118110                           Advance Trucking Corporation                         54-1895223                           Western Auto Supply Company                          54-1911686                           Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.                    43-1544437                           Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.                     66-0469029                           Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.                  54-2061915                           Advance Aircraft Company, Inc.                       54-2061983                           Discount Auto Parts, Inc.                            59-1447420                           DAP Acceptance Corporation                           51-0394621                    (f)    Set forth below is the organizational number of each Grantor that is aregistered organization:                           Advance Auto Parts, Inc.                             0386705-8                           Advance Stores Company, Incorporated                 0034317-8                           Advance Trucking Corporation                         0501578-9                           Western Auto Supply Company                          2930353                           Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.                    2222941                           Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.                     2239675                           Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.                  0567871-9                           Advance Aircraft Company, Inc.                       0567983-2                           Discount Auto Parts, Inc.                            402764                           DAP Acceptance Corporation                           3124365         2.       Current Locations:                  (a)  The chief executive office of each Grantor is located at the address set forthopposite its name below:Grantor                             Mailing Address           County            StateAdvance Auto Parts, Inc.            5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Advance Stores Company,             5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VAIncorporated                                Roanoke, VA 24012Advance Trucking Corporation        5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Western Auto Supply Company         5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.   5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.    5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Advance Merchandising Company,      5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VAInc.                                        Roanoke, VA 24012Advance Aircraft Company, Inc.      5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Discount Auto Parts, Inc.           5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012DAP Acceptance                      5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VACorporation                                 Roanoke, VA  24012                  (b)  Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all locations where suchGrantor maintains any books or records relating to any Accounts Receivable (with each location at whichchattel paper, if any is kept being indicated by an "*"):Grantor                             Mailing Address           County            StateAdvance Auto Parts, Inc.            5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Advance Stores Company,             5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VAIncorporated                                Roanoke, VA 24012Western Auto Supply Company         5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012                                            9680 Marion Ridge Dr.      Jackson  MO                                            Kansas City, MO 64137                                            235 E 2nd Street           Imperial CA                                            Calexico, CAWestern Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.   5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012                                            65th Infantry                                            PO Box 3978                                            Carolina                                    PRWestern Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.    5673 Airport Road         Roanoke  VA                                            Roanoke, VA 24012Discount Auto Parts, Inc.           4900 Frontage Road South  Polk              FL                                            Lakeland, FL 33815                  (c)  The jurisdiction of formation of each Grantor that is a registered organizationis set forth opposite its name below:         Grantor                                                                JurisdictionAdvance Auto Parts Inc.                                                         DelawareAdvance Stores Company, Incorporated                                            VirginiaAdvance Trucking Corporation                                                    VirginiaWestern Auto Supply Company                                                     DelawareWestern Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.                                               DelawareWestern Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.                                                DelawareAdvance Merchandising Company, Inc.                                    VirginiaAdvance Aircraft Company, Inc.                                                  VirginiaDiscount Auto Parts, Inc.                                                       FloridaDAP Acceptance Corporation                                                      Delaware                  (d)  Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the places of businessof such Grantor not identified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) above:                         See Schedule 2(d) attached.                  (e)  Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the locations wheresuch Grantor maintains any Collateral not identified above:Grantor                             Mailing Address           County            State                                                      None                  (f)  Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are the names and addresses ofall Persons other than such Grantor that have possession of any of the Collateral of such Grantor:         Grantor                    Mailing Address           County            State         Note:  JPMorgan Chase Bank has possession of collateral pledged pursuant to that certain PledgeAgreement dated as of November 28, 2001.         3.       Unusual Transactions.  All Accounts have been originated by the Grantors and allInventory has been acquired by the Grantors in the ordinary course of business.         4.       [Intentionally omitted.]         5.       [Intentionally omitted.]         6.       [Intentionally omitted.]         7.       [Intentionally omitted.]         8.       Stock Ownership.  Attached hereto as Schedule 8 is a true and correct list of all theduly authorized, issued and outstanding stock, partnership interests, limited liability companymembership interests or other equity interests of the Borrower and each Subsidiary and the record andbeneficial owners of such stock, partnership interests, membership interests or other equity interests.Also set forth on Schedule 8 is each equity investment of Holdings and each Subsidiary that represents50% or less of the equity of the entity in which such investment was made.                  See Schedule 8 attached hereto.         9.       Debt Instruments.  Attached hereto as Schedule 9 is a true and correct list of allinstruments, including any promissory notes and other evidence of indebtedness, held by Holdings andeach Subsidiary, including all intercompany notes between Holdings and between each Subsidiary ofHoldings and each other such Subsidiary.                  See Schedule 9 attached hereto.         10.      Advances.  Attached hereto as Schedule 10 is (a) a true and correct list of alladvances made by Holdings to any Subsidiary of Holdings or made by any Subsidiary of Holdings toHoldings or any other Subsidiary of Holdings, which advances will be on and after the date hereofevidenced by one or more intercompany notes pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreementand (b) a true and correct list of all unpaid intercompany transfers of goods sold and delivered by orto Holdings or any Subsidiary of Holdings.                  See Schedule 10 attached hereto.         11.      Mortgage Filings.  Attached hereto as Schedule 11 is a Schedule setting forth, withrespect to each Mortgaged Property, (a) the exact corporate name of the corporation that owns suchproperty as such name appears in its certificate of incorporation,  (b) if different from the nameidentified pursuant to clause (a), the exact name of the current record owner of such property reflectedin the records of the filing office for such property identified pursuant to the following clause and(c)  the filing office in which a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filing or recorded inorder for the Collateral Agent to obtain a perfected security interest therein.                  See Schedule 11 attached hereto.         12.      Intellectual Property.  Attached hereto as Schedule 12(A) in proper form for filingwith the United States Patent and Trademark Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor'sPatents, Patent Licenses, Trademarks and Trademark Licenses, including the name of the registered owner,the registration number and the expiration date of each Patent, Patent License, Trademark and TrademarkLicense owned by any Grantor.  Attached hereto as Schedule 12(B) in proper form for filing with theUnited States Copyright Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Copyrights andCopyright Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and theexpiration date of each Copyright or Copyright License owned by any Grantor.                  See Schedules 12 (A) and 12(B) attached hereto.         13.      Commercial Tort Claims.  Attached hereto as Schedule 13 is a true and correct list ofcommercial tort claims held by any Grantor, including a brief description hereof.                  None.         14.      Deposit Accounts.  Attached hereto as Schedule 14 is a true and correct list ofdeposit accounts maintained by each Grantor, including the name and address of the depositaryinstitution, the type of account and the account number.                  See Schedule 14 attached hereto.         IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed this certificate this  _5th  day ofDecember 2003.                                                              ADVANCE STORES COMPANY,                                                              INCORPORATED,                                                                BY /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                                ______________________                                                                    Jeffrey T. Gray                                                                    SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                Schedule 1- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Name of Corporation                   Nature of Change                                  Date of Change- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Advance Auto, Inc.                    Advance Holding Corporation merged with and       11/29/01                                      into Advance Auto Parts, Inc., the latter being                                      the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Advance Stores Company, Incorporated- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      Parts America, Inc., a Delaware corporation,      1/26/99                                      was merged into Advance Stores Company,                                      Incorporated, the latter being the survivor.- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Western Auto Supply Company- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      W.A. Charities, a nonprofit corporation, was      12/21/00                                      dissolved.- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.   DAP Asset Management, Inc. was merged with and    11/01                                      into Advance Merchandising Company, Inc., the                                      latter being the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      DAP Licensing Company was merged with and into    11/01                                      Advance Merchandising Company, Inc., the latter                                      being the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      LARALEV, Inc. was merged with and into Advance    12/28/01                                      Merchandising Company, Inc., the latter being                                      the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------Discount Auto Parts, Inc.             AAP Acquisition Corporation acquired Discount     11/28/01                                      Auto Parts, Inc., simultaneously merging                                      Discount Auto Parts, Inc. with and into AAP                                      Acquisition Corporation, upon which the name                                      was changed to Discount Auto Parts, Inc.- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      DAP Management Services Corporation was merged    11/01                                      with and into Discount Auto Parts, Inc., with                                      the latter being the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      Discount Auto Parts Distribution Center, Inc.     11/01                                      was merged with and into Discount Auto Parts,                                      Inc., with the latter being the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      HLA Acquisition, Inc. was merged with and into    11/01                                      Discount Auto Parts, Inc., with the latter                                      being the survivor- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------                                      100 percent of LARALEV, Inc.'s outstanding        12/28/01                                      stock, all owned by Advance Stores Company,                                      Incorporate, was contributed to Discount Auto                                      Parts, Inc.- ------------------------------------- ------------------------------------------------- ---------------------
Schedule 8 to Perfection Certificate                                             Stock Ownership(a)      Owner             Advance Auto Parts, Inc.         o    Issuer: Advance Stores Company, Incorporated         o    5,000 Class A Shares Authorized         o    538 Class A Common Shares held by Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (100%)(b)      Owner             Advance Stores Company, Incorporated         o    Issuer: Advance Trucking Corporation         o    5,000 Common Shares Authorized         o    1 Common Share held by Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (100%)(c)      Owner             Advance Stores Company, Incorporated         o    Issuer: Western Auto Supply Company         o    1,000 Common Shares Authorized         o    100 Common Shares held by Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (100%)(d)      Owner             Advance Stores Company, Incorporated         o    Issuer: Discount Auto Parts, Inc.         o    50,000,000 Common Shares Authorized         o    5,000,000 Preferred Shares Authorized         o    16,707,923 Common Shares held by Advance Stores Company, Incorporated              (100%)o        No Preferred Shares issued(e)      Owner             Discount Auto Parts, Inc.         o    Issuer: Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.         o     5,000 Common Shares Authorized         o     100 Common Shares held by Discount Auto Parts, Inc. (100%)
(f)      Owner             Advance Stores Company, Incorporated         o    Issuer: Advance Aircraft Company         o    5,000 Common Shares Authorized         o    100 Common Shares held by Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (100%)(g)      Owner             Discount Auto Parts, Inc.         o    Issuer:  DAP Acceptance Corporation         o    3,000 Common Shares Authorized         o    1,000 Common Shares held by Discount Auto Parts, Inc. (100%)h)       Owner             Western Auto Supply Company         o        Issuer: Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.         o        100,000 Common Shares Authorized         o        100,000 Common Shares held by Western Auto Supply Company (100%)(i)      Owner             Western Auto Supply Company         o        Issuer:  Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc.         o        100,000 Common Shares Authorized         o        100,000 Common Shares held by Western Auto Supply Company (100%)                                   Schedule 9 to Perfection Certificate                                                  NotesIntercompany Note executed by each of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., Advance Stores Company, Incorporated,Western Auto Supply Company, Western Auto Supply of Puerto Rico, Inc., Western Auto Supply of St.Thomas, Inc., WASCO Insurance Agency, Inc., Advance Trucking Corporation, Advance Merchandising Company,Inc., Advance Aircraft Company, Inc., Discount Auto Supply, Inc. and DAP Acceptance Corporation in favorof each of the other parties.                                  Schedule 10 to Perfection CertificateIntercompany Note executed by each of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., Advance Stores Company, Incorporated,Western Auto Supply Company, Western Auto Supply of Puerto Rico, Inc., Western Auto Supply of St.Thomas, Inc., WASCO Insurance Agency, Inc., Advance Trucking Corporation, Advance Merchandising Company,Inc., Advance Aircraft Company, Inc., Discount Auto Supply, Inc. and DAP Acceptance Corporation in favorof each of the other parties.
Schedule 11 to Perfection Cerfiticate                                            Mortgaged Property1.       4330 Brooke Avenue         Gadsden, Alabama  35901(a)      Advance Stores Company, Incorporated(b)      Same(c)      Etowah County Recorder                  800 Forrest Avenue, Room 105                  Gadsden, AL  359012.       150 State Street         Jeffersonville, Ohio  43128(a)      Advance Stores Company, Incorporated(b)      Same(c)      Fayette Conty Recorder              119 East Court Street              Washington Courthouse, OH  432603.       1520 I-20 Industrial Park Drive         Thomson, Georgia  30824(a)      Advance Stores Company, Incorporated(b)      Same(c)      Clerk of the Court              McDuffie County                  P.O. Box 158              Thomson, GA  308244.       1675 South U.S. Route 42         Delaware, OH  43015(a)      Western Auto Supply Company(b)      Same(c)      Delaware County Recorder              91 North Sandusky Street              Delaware, OH  430155.       1900 Jenkins Dairy Road         Gastonia, NC  28053         (a)      Western Auto Supply Company(b)      Same(c)      Gaston County Recorder                  315 North Marietta                  P.O. Box 1578                  Gastonia, NC  280526.       Route 4 Water Well Road         Salina, KS  67401         (a) Western Auto Supply Company(b)      Same(c)      Salina County Registar of Deeds              300 West Ash Street, Room 212              P.O. Box 5040              Salina, KS  674017.       4900 Frontage Road South         Lakeland, FL  33815         (a)      Discount Auto Parts, Inc.(b)      Same(c)      Office of the Polk County Clerk of the Circuit Court                  255 North Broadway                  Bartow, FL  338308.       19001 US Highway 51         Hazlehurst, Mississippi  39083(a)      Discount Auto Parts, Inc.(b)      Same(c)      Copiah County Courthouse                  100 Caldwell Dr., Courthouse                  Hazlehurt, MS  39803                                  Schedule 12A to Perfection Certificate                                                 LICENSES         None.
PATENTS         None.
TRADEMARKSFEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONSOWNER:   Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.                                                                                      Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application Date.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADV                                                         2,049,823                    04/01/1997.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS                                          1,815,267                    01/04/1994.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             1,847,137                    07/26/1994.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             1,484,796                    04/12/1988.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             78/258905                    06/05/2003.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             78/258959                    06/05/2003.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS.  WE'RE READY IN ADVANCE. &          78/258939                    06/05/2003design.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ADVANCE AUTO PARTS.  WE'RE READY IN ADVANCE. &          78/258981                    06/05/2003design.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................AMERICAN SPIRIT                                             1,242,721                    06/21/1983.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................AUTOCRAFT                                                   1,622,118                    11/13/1990.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................AUTOCRAFT CASTAWAY                                          2,640,809                    10/22/2002.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................CARCARE101                                                  2,391,747                    10/03/2000.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................CARCARE101 & design                                     2,391,746                    10/03/2000.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                            2,415,619                    12/26/2000.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                            2,539,168                    02/19/2002.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................HYDRO FORCE                                                 2,731,342                    07/01/2003.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................MORE PARTS, LOWER PRICES                                    2,482,142                    08/28/2001.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................PARTS AMERICA                                               2,280,955                    09/28/1999.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................PARTS EXPRESS                                               2,381,242                    08/29/2000.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................PDQ                                                         1,395,226                    05/27/1986.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................PRO2CALL                                                    2,228,513                    03/02/1999.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................PROFESSIONAL'S FAVORITE                                76/469754                    11/26/2002.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................SENTRY                                                      0,255,631                    04/30/1929.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................SPARK FORCE                                                 2,361,786                    06/27/2000.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................THE BEST PART IS OUR PEOPLE                                 2,167,375                    06/23/1998.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................THE FRONT RUNNER                                            1,850,319                    08/16/1994.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TIRE SOURCE                                                 1,956,753                    02/13/1996.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TOTALGRIP                                                   78/325379                    11/10/2003.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TOUGH ONE                                                   1,715,139                    09/15/1992.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TRUCKELA                                                    78/291802                    08/25/2003.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WEAREVER                                                    2,044,917                    03/11/1997.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WEAREVER                                                    1,650,703                    07/16/1991.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WESTERN FLYER                                               0,440,857                    10/05/1948.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WIZARD                                                      0,837,072                    10/17/1967.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WIZARD                                                      78/247111                    05/08/2003.................................................. .............................. ............................
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONSOWNER:   Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.(continued)                                                                                      Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application Date.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................INFO-TRAK*                                                  1,792,873                    09/14/1993.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................LASTACELL*                                                  1,494,948                    07/05/1988.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TRAK AUTO*                                                  1,168,761                    09/08/1981.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TRAK*                                                       1,574,103                    01/02/1990.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TRAK AUTO & design*                                     1,418,151                    11/25/1986.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TROUBLE FREE*                                               1,490,825                    06/07/1988.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................TROUBLE FREE*                                               2,133,425                    01/27/1998.................................................. .............................. ............................*  These marks were assigned by Trak Auto Corporation to Advance Stores Company by assignment dated July26, 2002, and assigned by Advance Stores Company to Advance Merchandising Company by undatedassignment.  Recordations with the PTO to bring the owner of record current are in process.
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONSOWNER:   Western Auto Supply Company                                                                                      Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application Date.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................ENDURANCE                                                   1,197,174                    06/08/1982.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WESTERN AUTO                                                0,883,548                    12/30/1969.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WESTERN AUTO                                                0,883,524                    12/30/1969.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................checkered flag design                                       1,209,010                    09/14/1982.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................flag design                                                 1,652,836                    08/06/1991.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................WESTERN FLYER                                               0,289,563                    12/01/1931.................................................. .............................. ............................
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONSOWNER:   Discount Auto Parts, Inc.                                                                                      Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application Date.................................................. .............................. .............................................................................. .............................. ............................RIGHT PART.  RIGHT AWAY.                                    76/060218                    05/30/2000.................................................. .............................. ............................
STATE MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONSOWNER:   Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.                                               State                                    Registration or                                                                   Serial or                 Mark                                           Registration No.        Application Date........................................ .................... ....................... ................................................................ .................... ....................... ........................DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS                           Florida                922243                04/11/1980........................................ .................... ....................... ................................................................ .................... ....................... ........................DRIVING HOME THE SAVINGS*                     Florida             T95000000733             06/13/1995........................................ .................... ....................... ........................*  These marks were included in the sale from Discount Auto to Advance.  The owner of record reflectedin the state's records is Rose Auto Stores.                                  Schedule 12B to Perfection CertificateCOPYRIGHTSNone.

Exhibit 10.43                                                                                                                                EXECUTION COPY                                    AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT AGREEMENT dated as of December 5, 2003, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                           a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the                           "Borrower"), the Lenders party hereto, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, as Administrative Agent, under the Amended                           and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003, among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders referred                           to therein and the Administrative Agent, as in effect on the date hereof (the "Existing Credit Agreement").                  WHEREAS, Holdings and the Borrower have requested, and the Required Restatement Lenders and the Administrative Agenthave agreed, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, that (a) the Renewing Tranche D Lenders referred to belowand the Additional Tranche D Lenders referred to below extend credit in the form of Tranche D Term Loans on the Restatement EffectiveDate, in an aggregate principal amount equal to $100,000,000, (b) the Renewing Tranche E Lenders referred to below and the AdditionalTranche E Lenders referred to below extend credit in the form of Tranche E Term Loans on the Restatement Effective Date, in anaggregate principal amount equal to $340,000,000, and (c) the Existing Credit Agreement be amended and restated as provided herein.                  NOW, THEREFORE, Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Restatement Lenders and the Administrative Agent hereby agreeas follows:                  SECTION 1.        Defined Terms. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned tosuch terms in the Restated Credit Agreement referred to below.  As used in this Agreement, "Required Restatement Lenders" means, at anytime, (i) the Required Lenders under (and as defined in) the Existing Credit Agreement and (ii) each of the Renewing Tranche D Lenders,Additional Tranche D Lenders, Renewing Tranche E Lenders and Additional Tranche E Lenders set forth on Schedule 1 hereto.                  SECTION 2.        Restatement Effective Date. (a)  The transactions provided for in Sections 3 through 5 hereof shallbe consummated at a closing to be held on the Restatement Effective Date at the offices of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, or at such othertime and place as the parties hereto shall agree upon.                  (b)      The "Restatement Effective Date" shall be specified by the Borrower, and shall be a date not later thanDecember 5, 2003, as of which all the conditions set forth or referred to in Section 6 hereof shall have been satisfied.  The Borrowershall give not less than one Business Day's written notice proposing a date as the Restatement Effective Date to the Administrative Agent,which shall send copies of such notice to the Lenders.  This Agreement shall terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on December 5, 2003,if the Restatement Effective Date shall not have occurred at or prior to such time.                  SECTION 3.        Tranche D Term Loans; Tranche E Term Loans; Prepayment of Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche A-1 Term Loans,Tranche C Term Loans, Tranche C-1 Term Loans.   (a)  Each existing Tranche A Lender, Tranche A-1 Lender, Tranche C Lender and Tranche C-1Lender (in each case, an "Existing Term Lender") that executes and delivers this Agreement specifically in the capacity of a renewingTranche D Lender (a "Renewing Tranche D Lender") or renewing Tranche E Lender (a "Renewing Tranche E Lender") will be deemed upon theRestatement Effective Date to have agreed to the terms of this Agreement and to have made a commitment to make Tranche D Term Loansor Tranche E Term Loans in an aggregate principal amount up to, but not in excess of, the aggregate principal amount of such ExistingTerm Lender's Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche A-1 Term Loans, Tranche C Term Loans or Tranche  C-1 Term Loans immediately prior to theRestatement Effective Date (collectively, the "Existing Term Loans").  Each Existing Term Lender that executes and delivers thisAgreement solely in the capacity of an Existing Term Lender and not specifically as a Renewing Tranche D Lender or Renewing Tranche ELender shall be deemed to have agreed to this Agreement but will not be deemed by virtue of such execution and delivery to haveundertaken any commitment to make Tranche D Terms Loans or Tranche E Term Loans.  Each Person (other than a Renewing Tranche D Lenderor Renewing Tranche E Lender in its capacity as such) that agrees to make Tranche D Term Loans (an "Additional Tranche D Lender") orTranche E Term Loans (an "Additional Tranche E Lender") will, on the Restatement Effective Date, make such Tranche D Term Loans orTranche E Term Loans to the Borrower in the manner contemplated by paragraph (c) of this Section.                  (b)      Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Renewing Tranche D Lender and Additional Tranche DLender agrees to make a Tranche D Term Loan and each Renewing Tranche E Lender and Additional Tranche E Lender agrees to make a Tranche ETerm Loan to the Borrower on the Restatement Effective Date in a principal amount equal to the Tranche D Commitment or Tranche E Commitmentset forth for each such Renewing Tranche D Lender, Additional Tranche D Lender, Renewing Tranche E Lender and Additional Tranche E Lenderon Schedule 1 hereto.  The Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans shall be made on the Restatement Effective Date asEurodollar Borrowings.  The Required Restatement Lenders hereby waive the requirements of Section 6.01 of the Existing CreditAgreement to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to permit the Borrower to incur the Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche ETerm Loans and make Borrowings thereunder on the Restatement Effective Date.  Such Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loansshall be made in the manner contemplated by paragraph (c) of this Section.  For purposes hereof, a Person shall become an AdditionalTranche D Lender or Additional Tranche E Lender and a party to the Restated Credit Agreement by executing and delivering to theAdministrative Agent, on or prior to the Restatement Effective Date, either (A) a signature page to this Agreement setting forth theamounts of Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche E Term Loans that such Person commits to make on the Restatement Effective Date or (B) awritten instrument in a form satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower (a "Joinder Agreement"), pursuant to whichsuch Person (1) commits to make Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche E Term Loans on the Restatement Effective Date in the amounts setforth in such Joinder Agreement and (2) agrees to become party to the Restated Credit Agreement as a Tranche D Lender or Tranche ELender and to be bound by the provisions of the Restated Credit Agreement from and after the Restatement Effective Date.  The"Tranche D Commitment" or "Tranche E Commitment" (x) of any Renewing Tranche D Lender or Renewing Tranche E Lender will be such amount(not in excess of the amount of its Existing Term Loans) as is determined by J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. ("JPMorgan") and notified tosuch Lender prior to the Restatement Effective Date and (y) of any Additional Tranche D Lender or Additional Tranche E Lender will bethe amount of such commitment set forth in its signature page hereto or in its Joinder Agreement, as applicable, or such lesseramount as is allocated to it by the Borrower and JPMorgan and notified to it prior to the Restatement Effective Date.  Thecommitments of the Renewing Tranche D Lenders, Additional Tranche D Lenders, Renewing Tranche E Lenders and Additional Tranche ELenders are several and no such Lender will be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche ETerm Loans.                  (c)      (i) Each Renewing Tranche D Lender and each Additional Tranche D Lender will make Tranche D Term Loans on theRestatement Effective Date and (ii) each Renewing Tranche E Lender and each Additional Tranche E Lender will make Tranche E Term Loans on theRestatement Effective Date in each case by (A) exchanging its Existing Term Loans, if any, for Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche E TermLoans in an equal principal amount (to the extent the amounts of such Existing Term Loans, if any, do not exceed the Tranche DCommitment or Tranche E Commitment of such Lender) and (B) transferring to the Administrative Agent, in the manner contemplated bySection 2.06 of the Restated Credit Agreement, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of its Tranche D Commitment or Tranche ECommitment over the principal amount of its Existing Term Loans exchanged pursuant to clause (A) above.                  (d)      The Borrower hereby irrevocably directs the Administrative Agent pursuant to Section 2.11(a) of the Existing CreditAgreement (i) to apply all the proceeds of the Tranche D Term Loans, together with the Borrower's payment of $5,796,769.99 to theAdministrative Agent by intrabank transfer of immediately available funds on the Restatement Effective Date, in each case,immediately upon the receipt thereof to prepay all the outstanding principal of the Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche A-1 Term Loansthat have not been exchanged by Renewing Tranche D Lenders and (ii) to apply all the proceeds of the Tranche E Term Loans, togetherwith the Borrower's payment of $10,291,859.49 to the Administrative Agent by intrabank transfer of immediately available funds on theRestatement Effective Date, in each case, immediately upon the receipt thereof to prepay all the outstanding principal of the TrancheC Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans that have not been exchanged by Renewing Tranche E Lenders.  The Borrower also agrees to payto the Administrative Agent on the Restatement Effective Date by intrabank transfer of immediately available funds, an amountnecessary to pay all accrued interest and any other amounts owing in respect of the Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche A-1 Term Loans,Tranche C Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans as of such date.                  (e)      Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender priorto the Restatement Effective Date that such Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent suchTranche D Lender's share of such Tranche D Borrowing or such Tranche E Lender's share of such Tranche E Borrowing, the AdministrativeAgent may assume that such Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with thisSection.  If any Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender shall default in the payment of any amount due from it under this Section, thenthe applicable Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith ondemand such defaulted amount (to the extent so advanced by the Administrative Agent on behalf of such defaulting Tranche D Lender orTranche E Lender) to the Administrative Agent, together with interest on such amount at the interest rate applicable to ABR Loansfrom the Restatement Effective Date to the date of payment.  Upon any such payment by the Borrower, the Borrower shall have theright, at the defaulting Tranche D Lender's or Tranche E Lender's expense, upon notice to the defaulting Tranche D Lender or TrancheE Lender and to the Administrative Agent, to require such defaulting Tranche D Lender or Tranche E Lender to transfer and assignwithout recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04 of the Restated Credit Agreement) allits interests, rights and obligations under the Restated Credit Agreement to another financial institution which shall assume suchinterests, rights and obligations; provided that (i) no such assignment shall conflict with any law, rule or regulation or order ofany Governmental Authority and (ii) the assignee shall pay to the defaulting Tranche D Lender, Tranche E Lender or the AdministrativeAgent (as applicable), in immediately available funds on the date of such assignment, the outstanding principal of and interestaccrued to the date of payment on the Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche E Term Loans made by such defaulting Tranche D Lender orTranche E Lender (or advanced by the Administrative Agent on its behalf, as applicable) under the Restated Credit Agreement, if any,and all other amounts accrued for such defaulting Tranche D Lender's or Tranche E Lender's (or, if applicable, the AdministrativeAgent's) account or owed to it under the Restated Credit Agreement in respect of such Tranche D Term Term Loans or Tranche E TermLoans.                  SECTION 4.        Amendment of Security Documents; Intercreditor Agreement.  The Required Restatement Lenders hereby(a) authorize the Collateral Agent to execute and deliver any amendments or modifications to the Security Documents that the Collateral Agentdetermines to be necessary or appropriate to permit the Liens granted thereunder to secure the DVA Obligations equally and ratablywith the Obligations, (b) consent to all such amendments or modifications and (c) authorize the Collateral Agent to enter intoIntercreditor Agreements that will be binding on the Lenders; provided that such amendments or modifications to the SecurityDocuments and any such Intercreditor Agreement shall not become effective prior to the Restatement Effective Date.                  SECTION 5.        Amendment and Restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement; Loans and Letters of Credit.  (a)  Effectiveimmediately after the prepayment of the Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche A-1 Term Loans, Tranche C Term Loans and Tranche C-1 Term Loans underSection 3 above, the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as set forth in Exhibit Ahereto (the "Restated Credit Agreement"), and the Administrative Agent is hereby directed by the Required Restatement Lenders toenter into such Loan Documents and to take such other actions as may be required to give effect to the transactions contemplatedhereby.  From and after the effectiveness of such amendment and restatement, the terms "Agreement", "this Agreement", "herein","hereinafter", "hereto", "hereof" and words of similar import, as used in the Restated Credit Agreement, shall, unless the contextotherwise requires, refer to the Existing Credit Agreement as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement, andthe term "Credit Agreement", as used in the other Loan Documents, shall mean the Restated Credit Agreement.                  (b)      All Revolving Loans, Swingline Loans and Letters of Credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement on theRestatement Effective Date shall continue to be outstanding under the Restated Credit Agreement and the terms of the Restated CreditAgreement will govern the rights of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank with respect thereto.                  SECTION 6.        Conditions.  The consummation of the transactions set forth in Sections 3 through 5 of this Agreement shallbe subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent:                  (a)      The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received from each of Holdings, the Borrower and the Required         Restatement Lenders either (i) a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or (ii) written evidence         satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this         Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement; provided that any of the Renewing Tranche D Lenders,         Additional Tranche D Lenders, Renewing Tranche E Lenders or Additional Tranche E Lenders may become a party hereto by         signing counterparts of Joinder Agreements instead of counterparts of this Agreement.                  (b)      The Administrative Agent shall have received a favorable written opinion (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the         Lenders and dated the Restatement Effective Date) of each of (i) Bingham McCutchen LLP, counsel for the Loan Parties,         substantially in the form of Exhibit B-1, (ii) Flippin Densmore Morse Rutherford & Jessee, Virginia counsel for the Loan         Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibit B-2 and (iii) Bingham McCutchen LLP, special New York counsel for the Loan         Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibit B-3, and, in the case of each such opinion required by this paragraph,         covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Restatement Transactions as the Required         Restatement Lenders shall reasonably request.  Holdings and the Borrower hereby request such counsel to deliver such         opinions.                  (c)      The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel         may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of each Loan Party, the authorization of the         Restatement Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Restatement         Transactions, all in form and substance satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.                  (d)      The Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate, dated the Restatement Effective Date and signed by the         President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of each of Holdings and the Borrower, confirming compliance with the         conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 of the Restated Credit Agreement.                  (e)      The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable on or prior to the Restatement         Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses (including fees,         charges and disbursements of counsel) required to be reimbursed or paid by any Loan Party hereunder or under any other Loan         Document.                  (f)      The Collateral Agent shall have received (i) all documents and instruments, including Uniform Commercial Code financing         statements, required by law or reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent to be filed, registered or recorded to create or         perfect the Liens intended to be created under the Security Agreement after giving effect to the Restatement Transactions,         (ii) a completed Perfection Certificate dated the Restatement Effective Date and signed by an executive officer or Financial         Officer of the Borrower and (iii) all documents and instruments necessary to create or perfect the Liens intended to be         created under the Pledge Agreement after giving effect to the Restatement Transactions.                  (g)      The Collateral Agent shall have received (i) to the extent requested by the Collateral Agent, amendments to each Mortgage         executed in connection with the Existing Credit Agreement providing that the Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans         (in addition to the other Obligations) shall be secured by a Lien on each Mortgaged Property, signed on behalf of the record         owner of such Mortgaged Property and (ii) a policy or policies of title insurance or a title endorsement to an existing         title insurance policy, issued by a nationally recognized title insurance company, insuring the Lien of each such Mortgage         as a valid first Lien on the Mortgaged Property described therein, free of any other Liens except as permitted by the         Restated Credit Agreement, together with such endorsements, coinsurance and reinsurance as the Collateral Agent or the         Required Restatement Lenders may reasonably request.                  (h)      A Reaffirmation Agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit C hereto shall have been delivered by each party thereto.The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Restatement Effective Date, and such notice shall beconclusive and binding.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the consummation of the transactions set forth in Sections 3 through 5 ofthis Agreement and the obligations of the Tranche D Lenders to make Tranche D Term Loans and the Tranche E Lenders to make Tranche ETerm Loans hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 7below) at or prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on December 5, 2003 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied orwaived, the Tranche D Commitments and Tranche E Commitments shall terminate at such time).                  SECTION 7.        Effectiveness; Counterparts; Amendments; Fees.  (a)  This Agreement shall become effective when copies hereofwhich, when taken together, bear the signatures of Holdings, the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Required Restatement Lendersshall have been received by the Administrative Agent.  This Agreement may not be amended nor may any provision hereof be waivedexcept pursuant to a writing signed by Holdings, the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Required Restatement Lenders.  ThisAgreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which when takentogether shall constitute a single contract.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopyshall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.                  (b)      In consideration of the agreements of the Revolving Lenders, the Tranche D Lenders and the Tranche E Lenders herein, theBorrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of each such Lender that delivers an executed counterpart of thisAgreement at or prior to 5:00 p.m. on December 5, 2003, a fee equal to 0.05% of the sum of such Lender's Revolving Commitment,Tranche D Commitment and Tranche E Commitment in each case as of the Restatement Effective Date; provided that such fee shall not bepayable unless and until this Agreement becomes effective as provided in Sections 6 and 7(a) hereof.                  SECTION 8.        No Novation.  This Agreement shall not extinguish the Loans outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement.Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the Loans outstanding under the Existing CreditAgreement, which (except to the extent repaid as provided herein) shall remain outstanding after the Restatement Effective Date asmodified hereby.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement, the provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 of theExisting Credit Agreement as in effect immediately prior to the Restatement Effective Date will continue to be effective as to allmatters arising out of or in any way related to facts or events existing or occurring prior to the Restatement Effective Date.                  SECTION 9.        Notices.  All notices hereunder shall be given in accordance with the provisions of Section 9.01 of the RestatedCredit Agreement or, in the case of a notice to any Tranche A Lender, Tranche A-1 Lender, Tranche C Lender or Tranche C-1 Lender, inaccordance with Section 9.01 of the Existing Credit Agreement.                  SECTION 10.       Applicable Law; Waiver of Jury Trial.  (A)    THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BYTHE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.                  (B)      EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY AGREES AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 9.10 OF THE RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT AS IF SUCH SECTION WERE SETFORTH IN FULL HEREIN.                  SECTION 11.       Headings.  The Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreementand are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.                  IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorizedofficers as of the day and year first written above.                                                     ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, individually and as                                                     Administrative Agent,                                                          by                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                               Title: Managing Director                                            SIGNATURE PAGE TO THE AMENDMENT AND RESTATEMENT AGREEMENT, DATED AS OF DECEMBER ___,                                            2003, IN RESPECT OF THE AMENDED AND RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT, DATED DECEMBER ___, 2003,                                            AMONG ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, THE LENDERS PARTY                                            THERETO AND JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, AS ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT.                  Name of Institution*                                        Executing as a Required Lender:                                             by                                                  ---------------------------------------------                                                  Name:                                                  Title:                                        Executing as a Renewing Tranche D Lender:                                             by                                                  ---------------------------------------------                                                  Name:                                                  Title:                                        Executing as an Additional Tranche D Lender:                                             by                                                  ---------------------------------------------                                                  Name:                                                  Title:                                                  Tranche D Commitment:                                                    $___________________________                                        Executing as a Renewing Tranche E Lender:                                             by                                                  ---------------------------------------------                                                  Name:                                                  Title:                                        Executing as an Additional Tranche E Lender:                                             by                                        -------------------------------------------------------                                                  Name:                                                  Title:                                                  Tranche E Commitment:                                                    $____________________________________________________*Each Lender must sign  separately in each capacity in which it is agreeing to the terms of this Agreement.  Only Additional  Tranche DLenders and Additional Tranche E Lenders must specify their Tranche D Commitment or Tranche E Commitment, as the case may be.                                                        SCHEDULES AND EXHIBITSSchedulesSchedule 1 --     Tranche D Commitments and Tranche E CommitmentsExhibitsExhibit A --      Amended and Restated Credit AgreementExhibit B-1 --    Form of Opinion of Bingham McCutchen LLP, Counsel for the                  Loan PartiesExhibit B-2 --    Form of Opinion of Flippin Densmore Morse Rutherford & JesseeExhibit B-3 --    Form of Opinion of Bingham McCutchen LLPExhibit C --      Form of Reaffirmation Agreement

Exhibit 10.44                                    REAFFIRMATION AGREEMENT, dated as of December5, 2003, among ADVANCE                           STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the "Borrower"), ADVANCE                           AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation ("Holdings"), each subsidiary of                           Holdings listed on the signature pages hereof (collectively, the "Subsidiary                           Loan Parties" and, together with the Borrower and Holdings, the "Reaffirming                           Parties") and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK ("JPMCB"), as Administrative Agent and                           Collateral Agent under the Restated Credit Agreement referred to below.                  WHEREAS Holdings, the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto, and JPMCB have entered intoan Amendment and Restatement Agreement (the "Amendment and Restatement Agreement"), dated as ofDecember 5, 2003, which amends and restates the Credit Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001, asamended and restated as of March 6, 2003 (the "Existing Credit Agreement", and, as amended and restatedafter giving effect to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the "Restated Credit Agreement"), amongHoldings, the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent;                  WHEREAS each of the Reaffirming Parties is party to one or more of the SecurityDocuments (such term and each other capitalized term used but not defined herein having the meaningassigned in the Restated Credit Agreement), the Guarantee Agreement and the Indemnity, Subrogation andContribution Agreement (the Security Documents, the Guarantee Agreement and the Indemnity, Subrogationand Contribution Agreement are collectively referred to herein as the "Reaffirmed Documents");                  WHEREAS each Reaffirming Party expects to realize, or has realized, substantial directand indirect benefits as a result of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement becoming effective and theconsummation of the transactions contemplated thereby; and                  WHEREAS the execution and delivery of this Agreement is a condition precedent to theconsummation of the transactions contemplated by the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.                  NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and for other good and valuableconsideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree asfollows:                                                ARTICLE I                                 Reaffirmation/Amendment and Restatement                  SECTION 1.01.     Reaffirmation.  (a) Each of the Reaffirming Parties hereby consents to the Amendmentand Restatement Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby and hereby confirms its respectiveguarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other agreements, as applicable, under each of theReaffirmed Documents to which it is party, and agrees that notwithstanding the effectiveness of theAmendment and Restatement Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, suchguarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other agreements shall continue to be in fullforce and effect and shall accrue to the benefit of the Lenders under the Restated Credit Agreement.Each of the Reaffirming Parties further agrees to take any action that may be required or that isreasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to ensure compliance by Holdings and the Borrower withSections 5.12 and 5.13 of the Restated Credit Agreement to the extent such covenant pertains to suchReaffirming Party and hereby reaffirms its obligations under each similar provision of each ReaffirmedDocument to which it is party.                  (b)      Each of the Reaffirming Parties hereby confirms and agrees that the obligations of the Borrowerin respect of the Tranche D Term Loans, the Tranche E Term Loans and the DVA Obligations constituteObligations under each of the Reaffirmed Documents.                  SECTION 1.02.     Amendment and Restatement.  On and after the effectiveness of the Amendment andRestatement Agreement, (i) each reference in each Reaffirmed Document to the "Credit Agreement","thereunder", "thereof" or words of like import shall mean and be a reference to the Restated CreditAgreement as such agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented and in effect from time to time and(ii) the definition of any term defined in any Reaffirmed Document by reference to the terms defined inthe "Credit Agreement" shall be amended to be defined by reference to the defined term in the RestatedCredit Agreement, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented and in effect from time to time.                                                ARTICLE II                                      Representations and Warranties                  Each Reaffirming Party hereby represents and warrants, which representations andwarranties shall survive execution and delivery of this Agreement, as follows:                  SECTION 2.01.     Organization.  Such Reaffirming Party is duly organized, validly existing and in goodstanding under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization.                  SECTION 2.02.     Authority; Enforceability.  Such Reaffirming Party has the power and authority toexecute, deliver and carry out the terms and provisions of this Agreement and has taken all necessaryaction to authorize the execution, delivery and performance by it of this Agreement.  Such ReaffirmingParty has duly executed and delivered this Agreement, and this Agreement constitutes its legal, validand binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.                  SECTION 2.03.     Reaffirmed Documents.  The representations and warranties of such Reaffirming Partycontained in each Reaffirmed Document are true and correct on and as of the date hereof with the sameeffect as though made on and as of such date, except to the extent such representations and warrantiesexpressly relate to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have beentrue and correct as of such earlier date).                                               ARTICLE III                                              Miscellaneous                  SECTION 3.01.     Notices.  All notices and other communications hereunder shall be made at theaddresses, in the manner and with the effect provided in Article IX of the Restated Credit Agreement;provided that, for this purpose, the address of each Reaffirming Party shall be the one specified forthe Borrower under the Restated Credit Agreement.                  SECTION 3.02.     Expenses.  Each Reaffirming Party agrees to pay all reasonable costs, fees andexpenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and time charges of attorneys for JPMCB or any Lender,which attorneys may be employees of JPMCB or any Lender) incurred by JPMCB or any Lender in collectingor enforcing any Reaffirming Party's obligations under this Agreement.                  SECTION 3.03.     Loan Document.  This Agreement is a Loan Document executed pursuant to the RestatedCredit Agreement and shall (unless otherwise expressly indicated herein) be construed, administered andapplied in accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.                  SECTION 3.04.     Section Captions.  Section captions used in this Agreement are for convenience ofreference only and shall not affect the construction of this Agreement.                  SECTION 3.05.     Severability.  Wherever possible each provision of this Agreement shall be interpretedin such manner as to be effective and valid under applicable law, but if any provision of this Agreementshall be prohibited by or invalid under such law, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent ofsuch prohibition or invalidity, without invalidating the remainder of such provision or the remainingprovisions of this Agreement.                  SECTION 3.06.     Successors and Assigns.  This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be bindingupon the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.                  SECTION 3.07.     Amendment.  This Agreement may be waived, modified or amended only by a writtenagreement executed by each of the parties hereto.                  SECTION 3.08.     Counterparts.  This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by thedifferent parties hereto on separate counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall bean original but all of which shall together constitute one and the same agreement.  Delivery of anexecuted counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic transmissionshall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.                  SECTION 3.09.     No Novation.  Neither this Agreement nor the execution, delivery or effectiveness ofthe Amendment and Restatement Agreement shall extinguish the obligations for the payment of moneyoutstanding under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or the Restated Credit Agreement or dischargeor release the Lien or priority of any Security Document or any other security therefor.  Nothing hereincontained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the obligations outstanding under theExisting Credit Agreement or instruments securing the same, which shall remain in full force and effect,except to any extent modified hereby or by instruments executed concurrently herewith.  Nothing impliedin this Agreement, the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or in any other document contemplated herebyor thereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of Holdings, the Borrower or anySubsidiary Loan Party under any Loan Document from any of its obligations and liabilities as "Holdings",the "Borrower", a "Subsidiary Loan Party", a "Pledgor" or a "Grantor" under the Restated CreditAgreement or the Loan Documents.  Each of the Existing Credit Agreement and the Loan Documents shallremain in full force and effect, until (as applicable) and except to any extent modified hereby or bythe Amendment and Restatement Agreement or in connection herewith and therewith.                          [The remainder of this page intentionally left blank]                  IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Reaffirming Party and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent for thebenefit of the Lenders, have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the datefirst above written.                                                     ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE TRUCKING CORPORATION,                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     WESTERN AUTO SUPPLY COMPANY,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     WESTERN AUTO OF PUERTO RICO, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     WESTERN AUTO OF ST. THOMAS, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE MERCHANDISING COMPANY, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     ADVANCE AIRCRAFT COMPANY, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS, INC.,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     DAP ACCEPTANCE CORPORATION,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Jeffrey T. Gray                                                               Title: SVP-CFO, Assistant Secretary                                                     JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, AS ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT,                                                          By                                                                /s/ Neil R. Boylan                                                               ---------------------------------------------                                                               Name: Neil R. Boylan                                                               Title: Managing Director

EXHIBIT 99.1
Roanoke, Virginia, December 8, 2003        -       Reduced LIBOR interest rate spread by 25 basis points.        -       Established Vendor Financing Program.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today an amendment to its $600 million Credit Agreement. The amendment provides for a reduction in the LIBOR interest rate spread to 2.0% from 2.25% effective December 5, 2003 on two new term loans. The new term loans will replace the Company's existing term loans of $440 million. The terms of the Company's existing $160 million revolving credit facility remain unchanged under this agreement.
In addition to the interest rate reduction, the Company received approval under the amended Credit Agreement to establish a Vendor Financing Program, which will enhance the Company's future cash flow.
JPMorgan Securities Inc. acted as the Sole Lead Arranger and Sole Bookrunner with SunTrust Bank and Wachovia Securities, Inc. as Documentation Agents on the amendments to the Credit Agreement.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., based in Roanoke, Va., is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 4, 2003, the Company had 2,496 stores in 38 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040218163803.txt.gz
TIME:20040218163803
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On February 18, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 3, 2004. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2004 first quarter, second quarter and fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 99.1
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive parts, today announced record revenue and earnings for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 3, 2004. Fiscal 2003 included 53 weeks of operations compared to 52 weeks in 2002, with the additional week falling in the fourth quarter of 2003.
Roanoke, Virginia, February 18, 2004
Fourth Quarter 2003
Sales increased 19.2% in the fourth quarter to $821.3 million from $689.2 million. Excluding $63.0 million in sales from the extra week, sales increased 10.0%. Same store sales grew 7.0% in the fourth quarter versus 3.1% in the same quarter last year. The stores acquired as part of the Discount Auto Parts acquisition, which are included in the comparable store base, produced a comparable store sales increase of 7.5% during the fourth quarter compared to 3.3% last year. Fourth quarter same store sales are based on the equivalent 13-week period in both 2002 and 2003.
During the fourth quarter, gross margin increased 49 basis points to 45.6% versus 45.1% in the same quarter of last year, reflecting the positive impact of category management initiatives and improved efficiencies in the logistics network. On a GAAP basis, fourth quarter operating margins improved 243 basis points to 7.2% compared to 4.8% last year. Comparable operating margins rose 131 basis points to 7.4% compared to 6.1% in the same quarter last year. Comparable results exclude the expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration.
On a GAAP basis, net earnings increased by 262.8% to $31.3 million for the fourth quarter of 2003. GAAP earnings per diluted share were $0.41, compared to $0.12 last year. The 2003 fourth quarter GAAP earnings included expenses of $0.01 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and a $0.03 loss per diluted share from discontinued operations related to the Western Auto wholesale business.
Comparable earnings from continuing operations rose 121.7% to $34.3 million, representing a comparable earnings per diluted share gain of 114.3%, to $0.45 in the 2003 fourth quarter versus $0.21 in the same quarter of the previous year. Including the impact of discontinued operations, comparable earnings per diluted share rose 90.9% to $0.42, $0.02 over the top end of the Company's guidance range. The 2003 fourth quarter earnings included an estimated $0.07 per diluted share for the 53 week.
rd
Comparable results are non-GAAP measures because they exclude the expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company uses these non-GAAP measures as an indication of its earnings from its core operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, noted, "In the fourth quarter, our team generated the strongest same store sales growth of the year, as we built momentum from our operating initiatives; including refining our category management process, launching a nationwide brand-building advertising program, and enhancing our in-store systems. The same store sales increase came from a rise in both customer count and higher average transactions. We also produced strong gains in both our gross and operating margins."
Other highlights for the 2003 fourth quarter included:
Fiscal 2003
Sales increased 9.0% to $3.5 billion, including the effect of the 53 week. Excluding the impact of the extra week, sales rose 7.1% in 2003. Same store sales rose 3.1% for the year compared to 5.5% last year. The same store sales calculation for the year is based on a 53-week year in 2003 compared to the equivalent 53-weeks last year.
rd
For 2003, gross profit margin improved 116 basis points to 45.9% from 44.8% last year. On a GAAP basis, operating profit margins increased 212 basis points to 8.3% compared to 6.1% last year. For the year, comparable operating profit margins improved 131 basis points to 8.5% from 7.2% in 2002. As noted earlier, comparable results exclude the expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures.
On a GAAP basis, net earnings for 2003 increased to $124.9 million, up 92.2%. GAAP earnings per diluted share increased 85.6% to $1.67 compared to $0.90 in 2002. Earnings per diluted share for 2003 included expenses of $0.39 per diluted share resulting from the early redemption of outstanding notes and debentures, $0.08 per diluted share in integration expenses, and a $0.01 loss per diluted share on discontinued operations.
The Company discontinued the operations of its Western Auto wholesale business in December 2003. The wholesale business's results of operations for fiscal 2003, 2002 and 2001, which were historically reported as part of the Wholesale Segment, will be reflected as discontinued operations in the 2003 annual reports. The wholesale business incurred a loss of $0.4 million, income of $2.9 million and income of $2.4 million, all net of tax, for the fiscal years ended 2003, 2002 and 2001, respectively. The 2001 financial statements were audited by the Company's former auditors who have subsequently ceased operations. As a result, the current independent auditors are in the process of completing the audit procedures required to incorporate 2001 in their report for the Form 10-K to be filed on March 18, 2004.
Comparable earnings from continuing operations for the year were $160.5 million, an increase of 70.3%. Comparable earnings per diluted share from continuing operations rose 65.4% to $2.15 versus $1.30 in 2002. The 2003 earnings included an estimated $0.07 per diluted share for the 53 week.
rd
Other highlights for 2003 included:
Guidance
The Company has issued guidance for its 2004 first and second quarter earnings per diluted share from continuing operations in the range of $0.62 to $0.65 compared to last year's $0.48 for the first quarter and $0.68 to $0.72 compared to last year's $0.60 for the second quarter. The Company is reiterating its guidance for earnings per diluted share of $2.50 to $2.55 for the 2004 year. The Company also announced that it expects to generate free cash flow of $180 million in 2004.
Castellani added, "Increasing our sales productivity is the centerpiece of our 2004 initiatives. We will continue to grow our sales per store by refining our category management initiatives, adding functionality to our proprietary point of sale and electronic catalog system, and continuing to remodel our stores on a market-by-market basis to our 2010 store format, which is generating a strong, positive customer response."
He added, "We plan to open between 125 to 135 new stores this year, and we'll have more than 1,000 stores operating under our new 2010 format by the end of 2004."
Board of Directors Announcements
The board of directors today announced the following additions and changes:
Castellani stated, "I am delighted that Nick Taubman has returned to our board of directors. Nick had the vision and the determination to lead Advance Auto Parts from a small regional chain of automotive and home stores to the industry powerhouse it is today. Nick's vast industry knowledge will be a tremendous help to our leadership team, as we continue to move aggressively on our growth plans."
"We would like to thank John Roth for his leadership and guidance as lead director during the past year," he added. "His insight and business acumen have truly helped the Advance Auto Parts team build a strong foundation for the future. John will continue to have a positive impact on our Company as an active participant on our board.
"We look forward to the contributions that Stephen Peck will make as lead director," continued Castellani. "Stephen's achievements and reputation in the investment community are well known. We are privileged to have someone with his impeccable credentials serving in this leadership position on our board."
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call today, February 18, 2004, at 5:00 p.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its fourth quarter and fiscal year results. To listen to the live webcast, please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website http://www.advanceautoparts.com until February 19, 2005.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At January 3, 2004, the Company had 2,539 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
NOTE: These balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of operations have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of operations and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously presented statements of cash flows and do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040227171527.txt.gz
TIME:20040227171527
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          During December 2003, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. discontinued the supply of merchandise and services to its wholesale distribution network of independently owned Western Auto dealers. This component of our business operated in our previously reported wholesale segment. The accompanying financial statements (attached as Exhibit 99.1, which are incorporated herein by reference) reflect the historical consolidated statements of operations for the quarterly periods ended April 19, 2003, July 12, 2003 and October 4, 2003 as reported in our earnings releases filed on form 8-K on May 14, 2003, August 6, 2003 and October 30, 2003, respectively, as adjusted to present the wholesale distribution network results as discontinued operations. The attached consolidated statements of operations include our comparable results, which are non-GAAP financial measures. We use these non-GAAP measures as an indication of our earnings from core operations and believe they are important to our stockholders due to the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.



</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040519164752.txt.gz
TIME:20040519164752
EVENTS:		Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: 
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On May 19, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its first quarter ended April 24, 2004. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2004 second quarter, third quarter and fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

                        
News Release
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive parts and accessories, today announced record revenue and earnings for its first quarter ended April 24, 2004.
Roanoke, Virginia, May 19, 2004
Sales increased 11.6% in the first quarter to $1.1 billion from $1.0 billion in the same quarter last year. Comparable store sales grew 6.9% in the first quarter versus 1.1% in the same quarter last year. Sales to both the do-it-yourself (DIY) and commercial customers were strong as DIY comparable store sales grew 4.5% and comparable commercial sales were up 19.3%.
Due to the positive impact of category management initiatives and supply chain leverage, gross margin increased 26 basis points to 46.4% of net sales in the first quarter versus 46.1% for the same quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses declined by 20 basis points to 38.4% of net sales. SG&A expenses for the prior year were 38.6% of net sales, excluding merger and integration costs associated with the Discount Auto Parts acquisition, and 38.9% of net sales on a GAAP basis. First quarter operating margins rose to 8.0% of net sales compared to operating margins of 7.6% for the same quarter of the prior year, which excluded the merger and integration costs, and GAAP operating margins of 7.2%.
Net earnings for the first quarter of 2004 increased to $51.3 million. Earnings per diluted share rose 38.8% to $0.68 in the 2004 first quarter over comparable earnings per diluted share of $0.49 in the first quarter last year. The 2003 first quarter GAAP earnings per diluted share were $0.07 and included expenses of $0.39 per diluted share resulting from the early redemption of previously outstanding notes and debentures and $0.03 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration.
Advance Auto Parts First Quarter 2004 Results - Page 2
In 2003, the Company used comparable results, which are non-GAAP measures because they excluded the expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company used these non-GAAP measures as an indication of its earnings from its core operations and believes they are important to the Company's stockholders because of the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
Commenting on the first quarter results, Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our team is focused on executing our numerous initiatives to serve our customers better than ever. We are seeing returns on the investments we have made in category management, our national advertising program, and our new 2010 store format."
"During the quarter, we completed the roll-out of our proprietary POS and electronic parts catalog system, which we refer to as APAL, ahead of schedule and it's already contributing to our results," he added. "By putting the right tools at our team members' fingertips, we expect to generate an even higher level of customer service and build customer loyalty."
In the first quarter, the Company generated free cash flow of $64 million as defined on the accompanying financial tables. As a result of this strong free cash flow, the Company repaid $65 million in debt, bringing its debt level to $380 million at the end of the first quarter. The Company uses free cash flow as a measure of its liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of its ability to implement its growth strategies and service its debt.
During the quarter, the Company opened 20 new stores, closed six under-performing stores, and relocated five stores, resulting in a store count of 2,553 stores at April 24, 2004. The Company anticipates opening 125 to 135 stores for the 2004 year.
Guidance
The Company increased its earnings per diluted share guidance for 2004 to a range of $2.53 to $2.58 compared to prior guidance of $2.50 to $2.55, reflecting the Company's first quarter $0.03 above-guidance results. Guidance for the remainder of the year is based on achieving mid-single-digit comparable store sales growth, a slight increase in gross margin and a proportionate decline in its S,G&A expenses, resulting in earnings per diluted share guidance in the range of $0.69 to $0.72 for the second quarter, $0.70 to $0.73 for the third quarter.
The Company also announced it has identified a location for a new distribution center to better serve its growing store count in the northeast. Pending the successful completion of due diligence, the purchase of this facility is anticipated to occur in the second quarter and open in the spring of 2005. As a result, the Company is modifying its guidance for free cash flow in 2004 to $130 million from the previous guidance of $180 million, to reflect the anticipated cost of approximately $50 million.
Annual Meeting Announcements
The Company's Annual Meeting of Stockholders was held today. At the meeting, stockholders:
Board of Directors Announcements
The board of directors today announced the following:
Advance Auto Parts First Quarter 2004 Results - Page 3
Castellani stated, "I am delighted to welcome John Brouillard to our board of directors and audit committee. His retail experience and strong financial background will prove invaluable as Advance Auto continues to build market share and strives to be the best in the automotive aftermarket industry. We also look forward to the contributions that Bill Salter will make as lead director. His knowledge and experience in specialty retail will continue to guide Advance Auto Parts to higher levels of customer service and satisfaction."
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, May 20, 2004, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its first quarter results. To listen to the live web cast, please log on to or dial 1-800-599-9795. The call will be archived on the Company's website until May 20, 2005. There will not be a telephonic replay available.
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At April 24, 2004, the Company had 2,553 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these
Advance Auto Parts First Quarter 2004 Results - Page 4
forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
NOTE:
These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040520141459.txt.gz
TIME:20040520141459
EVENTS:	Other events	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other events
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On May 19, 2004, Advance Auto Parts amended its Restated Certificate of Incorporation to increase the number of shares of common stock authorized from 100,000,000 to 200,000,000 shares. A copy of Advance Auto Parts' Certificate of Amendment of Restated Certificate of Incorporation is attached as Exhibit 3.3 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
                          In addition, Advance Auto Parts' board of directors has approved a form of indemnification agreement to be entered into, from time to time, with Advance Auto Parts' directors. A form of the indemnification agreement is attached as Exhibit 10.19 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
                          Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

        Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Corporation"), a corporation organized and existing under and by virtue of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the "Delaware General Corporation Law"), does hereby certify:
        : That at a meeting of the Board of Directors of the Corporation (the "Board"), held on February 18, 2004, resolutions were duly adopted approving and declaring advisable the proposed amendment to the Corporation's Restated Certificate of Incorporation set forth below:
FIRST
        Section A of Article IV of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
        : That the stockholders of the Corporation approved, by vote of the necessary number of shares required by statute, at the annual meeting of the stockholders duly called and held on May 19, 2004, upon notice in accordance with provisions of Section 222 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
SECOND
        : That said amendment was duly adopted in accordance with the provisions of Section 242 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
THIRD
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Corporation has caused this Certificate of Amendment of Restated Certificate of Incorporation to be executed by Eric M. Margolin, its Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Secretary, on this 19th day of May, 2004.

         THIS INDEMNITY AGREEMENT (this "Agreement") dated as of ________________ is made by Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), and ______________ (the "Indemnitee").
         A.      The Company recognizes that competent and experienced persons are increasingly reluctant to serve as directors of corporations unless thery are protected by comprehensive liability insurance or indemnification, or both, due to increased exposure to litigation costs and risks resulting from their service to such corporations, and due to the fact that the exposure frequently bears no reasonable relationship to the compensation of such directors.
         B.      The statutes and judicial decisions regarding the duties of directors are often difficult to apply, ambiguous, or conflicting, and therefore fail to provide such directors with adequate, reliable knowledge of legal risks to which they are exposed or information regarding the proper course of action to take.
         C.       The Company and the Indemnitee recognize that plaintiffs often seek damages in such large amounts and the costs of litigation may be so substantial (whether or not the case is meritorious), that the defense and/or settlement of such litigation is often beyond the personal resources of directors.
         D.       The Company believes that it is unfair for its directors to assume the risk of substantial judgments and other expenses which may occur in cases in which the director received no personal profit and in cases where such person acted in good faith.
         E.       Section 145 of the General Corporation Law of Delaware ("Section 145"), under which the Company is organized, empowers the Company to indemnify, among others, its directors by agreement and to indemnify persons who serve, at the request of the Company, as the directors of other corporations or enterprises, and expressly provides that the indemnification provided by Section 145 is not exclusive.
         F.       The Board of Directors of the Company has determined that contractual indemnification as set forth herein is not only reasonable and prudent but necessary to promote the best interests of the Company and its stockholders.
         G.       The Company desires and has requested the Indemnitee to serve or continue to serve as a director of the Company.
         H.       The Indemnitee only is willing to serve, or to continue to serve, as a director of the Company if the Indemnitee is furnished the indemnity provided for herein by the Company.
         NOW THEREFORE, in consideration of the mutual convenants and agreements set forth below, the parties hereto, intending to be legally bound, hereby agree as follows:
         1.       .    For purposes of this Agreement, the following terms shall have the meanings set forth below:
Definitions
                   (a)    "Agent" of the Company shall mean any person who: (i) is or was a director of the Company; or (ii) is or was serving at the request of, for the convenience of, or to represent the interest of the Company as a director of a Subsidiary of the Company or of another foreign or domestic corporation, partnership, joint venture, trust or other enterprise.
                   (b)    "Expenses" shall mean all direct and indirect costs of any type or nature whatsoever including, without limitation, all attorney's fees, fees of experts, witness fees, travel fees, and all related disbursements, or other out-of-pocket costs of the types customarily incurred in connection with prosecuting, defending or appealing, preparing to prosecute, defend or appeal investigations, being or preparing to be a witness in or otherwise participating in, a Preceeding or establishing or enforcing a right to indemnification under this Agreement, Section 145 or otherwise.
                   (c)    "Proceeding" shall mean any threatened, pending, or completed action, suit, arbitration, mediation hearing or other proceeding, whether civil, criminal, administrative, legislative, investigative or any other type whatsoever.
                   (d)    "Subsidiary" shall mean any corporation of which more than 50% of the outstanding voting securities are owned directly or indirectly by the Company.
         2.       .    The Indemnitee agrees to serve and/or continue to serve as an Agent for so long as the Indemnitee is duly appointed or elected and qualified in accordance with the applicable provisions of the bylaws of the Company or of any Subsidiary thereof, or until such time as the Indemnitee tenders his resignation in writing or is removed from his or her position in accordance with the bylaws of the Company or otherwise; , , that nothing contained in this Agreement is intended to create any right to continued service with the Company or any other entity in any capacity.
Agreement to Serve
provided
however
         3.       .
Indemnification
                   (a)    .
Indemnification in Third Party Proceedings
                            (i)    Subject to hereof, the Company shall indemnify the Indemnitee if the Indemnitee is a party to or threatened to be made a party to or otherwise involved in any Proceeding (other than a Proceeding by or in the name of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor) by reason of the fact that the Indemnitee is or was an Agent, or by reason of any act or inaction by Indemnitee in any such capacity (including, but not limited to, any written statement of the Indemnitee that (A) is required to be, and is, filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") regarding the adequacy of the Company's internal controls or the accuracy of reports or statements filed by the Company with the SEC pursuant to federal laws and/or administrative regulations (each, a "Required Statement") or (B) is made to another officer or employee of the Company to support a Required Statement), against any and all Expenses and liabilities of any type whatsoever (including, but not limited to, judgments, fines (including any excise taxes assessed with respect to any employee benefit plan), penalties and, subject to hereof, amounts paid in settlement), actually and
Section 10
Section 10(d)
reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in connection with the investigation, defense, settlement or appeal of such Proceeding, but only if the Indemnitee, subject to the presumption set forth in hereof, acted in good faith and in a manner the Indemnitee reasonably believed to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the Company, and, with respect to any criminal Proceeding, had no reasonable cause to believe Indemnitee's conduct was unlawful.
Section 3(c)
                            (ii)    The termination of any Proceeding by judgment, order, settlement, conviction or upon a plea of nolo contendere or its equivalent, shall not, of itself, create a presumption that the Indemnitee did not act in good faith in a manner which the Indemnitee reasonably believed to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the Company, and, with respect to any criminal Proceeding, that the Indemnitee had reasonable cause to believe that the Indemnitee's conduct was unlawful.
                   (b)    .    Subject to hereof, the Company shall indemnify the Indemnitee if the Indemnitee is a party to or threatened to be made a party to or otherwise involved in any Proceeding by or in the name of the Company to procure a judgment in its favor by reason of the fact that the Indemnitee is or was an Agent, or by reason of any act or inaction by the Indemnitee in any such capacity (including, but not limited to, any written statement of the Indemnitee that (i) is a Required Statement or (ii) is made to another officer or employee of the Company to support a Required Statement), against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the Indemnitee in connection with the investigation, defense, settlement, or appeal of such Proceedings, but only if the Indemnitee, subject to the presumption set forth in hereof, acted in good faith and in a manner the Indemnitee reasonably believed to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the Company; , , that no indemnification under this subsection (b) shall be made in respect of any claim, issue or matter as to which the Indemnitee shall have been finally adjudged to be liable to the Company by a court of competent jurisdiction, except and only to the extent that any court in which such Proceeding was brought shall determine upon application that, despite the adjudication of liability but in view of all the circumstances of the case, the Indemnitee is fairly and reasonably entitled to indemnity for such expenses as such court shall deem proper.
Indemnification in Derivative Actions
Section 10
Section 3(c)
provided
however
                   (c)    .    With respect to and hereof, the Indemnitee shall be conclusively presumed to have acted in good faith and in a manner Indemnitee reasonably believed to be in, or not opposed to, the best interests of the Company, and, with respect to any criminal Proceeding, to have had no reasonable cause to believe Indemnitee's conduct was unlawful, unless a determination is made that the Indemnitee has not acted in accordance with the standards set forth above (i) by the Board of Directors of the Company by a majority vote of a quorum thereof consisting of directors who were not parties to the Proceeding due to which a claim is made under this Agreement, (ii) by the stockholders of the Company by a majority vote of stockholders who were not parties to such a Proceeding, or (iii) in a written opinion of independent legal counsel, selection of whom has been approved by the Indemnitee in writing or by a panel of arbitrators, one of whom is selected by the Company, another of whom is selected by the Indemnitee and the last of whom is selected by the first two arbitrators so selected.
Conclusive Presumption Regarding Indemnitee Conduct
Sections 3(a)
3(b)
         4.       .    Notwithstanding any other provisions of this Agreement, to the extent that the Indemnitee has been successful on the merits
Indemnification of Expenses of Successful Party
or otherwise in defense of (a) any Proceeding referred to in or hereof or (b) any claim, issue or matter therein, including the dismissal of any action without prejudice, the Company shall indemnify the Indemnitee (to the maximum extent permitted by law) against all Expenses actually and reasonably incurred by the Indemnitee in connection with the investigation, defense or appeal of such Proceeding, or any claim, issue or matter therein.
Section 3(a)
3(b)
         5.       .    If the Indemnitee is entitled under any provision of this Agreement to indemnification by the Company for some or a portion of any Expenses or liabilities of any type whatsoever (including, but not limited to, judgments, fines, penalties or, subject to hereof, amounts paid in settlement) actually and reasonably incurred by Indemnitee in the investigation, defense, settlement or appeal of a Proceeding but is not entitled, however, to indemnification for the total amount thereof, the Company shall nevertheless indemnify the Indemnitee for the portion thereof to which the Indemnitee is entitled.
Partial Indemnification
Section 10(d)
         6.       .    Subject to hereof, the Company shall advance all reasonable Expenses of the Indemnitee in connection with the investigation, defense, settlement or appeal of any Proceeding to which the Indemnitee is a party or is threatened to be made a party by reason of the fact that the Indemnitee is or was an Agent. The Indemnitee hereby undertakes to repay such advanced Expenses only if, and to the extent that, it shall ultimately be determined by a final judgment or other final adjudication that the Indemnitee is not entitled to be indemnified by the Company as authorized by this Agreement. Each advance to be made hereunder shall be paid by the Company to or on behalf of the Indemnitee within 10 days following delivery of a written request therefor by the Indemnitee to the Company.
Advancement of Expenses
Section 10(b)
         7.       .
Notice and Other Indemnification Procedures
                   (a)    .     Promptly after receipt by the Indemnitee of notice of the commencement of or the threat of any Proceeding, the Indemnitee shall, if the Indemnitee believes that indemnification with respect thereto may be sought from the Company under this Agreement, notify the Company of the commencement or threat thereof.
Notification of Proceeding
                   (b)    .     Any indemnification payment pursuant to hereof requested by the Indemnitee shall be made no later than 10 days after receipt of the written request of the Indemnitee, unless a good faith determination is made within said 10-day period in accordance with one of the methods set forth in hereof that the Indemnitee is not or (subject to final judgment or other final adjudication as provided in hereof) ultimately will not be entitled to indemnification hereunder.
Indemnification Payments
Section 3
Section 3(c)
Section 10(a)
                   (c)    .     Notwithstanding a determination under hereof that the Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification with respect to any specific Proceeding, the Indemnitee shall have the right to apply to any court of competent jurisdiction for the purpose of enforcing the Indemnitee's right to indemnification pursuant to this Agreement. In such an enforcement Proceeding, the burden of proving by clear and convincing evidence that indemnification or advances are not appropriate shall be on the Company. Neither the failure of the Company (including its Board of Directors, stockholders, independent legal counsel or the panel of arbitrators) to have made a determination prior to the commencement of such enforcement Proceeding that the Indemnitee is entitled to indemnification hereunder, nor an
Application for Enforcement
Section 3(c)
actual determination by the Company (including its Board of Directors or independent legal counsel or the panel of arbitrators) that the Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification hereunder, shall be a defense in the enforcement Proceeding or create any presumption that the Indemnitee is not entitled to indemnification hereunder.
                   (d)    .     The Company shall indemnify the Indemnitee against all expenses incurred in connection with any enforcement Proceeding under this unless the Company prevails by clear and convincing evidence in such enforcement Proceeding.
Indemnification of Certain Expenses
Section 7
         8.       . In the event the Company shall be obligated to pay the Expenses of the Indemnitee in any Proceeding, the Company, if appropriate, shall be entitled to assume the defense of such Proceeding, with counsel reasonably acceptable to the Indemnitee, upon the delivery to the Indemnitee of written notice of its election to do so. After delivery of such notice, approval such counsel by the Indemnitee and the retention of such counsel by the Company, the Company shall not be liable to the Indemnitee under this Agreement for any fees of counsel subsequently incurred by the Indemnitee with respect to the same Proceeding, that (a) the Indemnitee shall have the right to employ separate counsel in such Proceeding at the Indemnitee's own expense, and (b) if (i) the employment of separate counsel by the Indemnitee has been previously authorized in writing by the Company, (ii) the Indemnitee's separate counsel delivers a written statement to the Company stating that such counsel has reasonably concluded that there may be an actual or potential conflict of interest or actual or potential separate or different defenses between the Company and the Indemnitee in the conduct of any such defense or (iii) the Company shall not, in fact, have employed counsel to assume the defense of such Proceeding within a reasonable time, then in any such event the reasonable fees and expenses of the Indemnitee's counsel shall be paid by the Company.
Assumption of Defense
provided
         9.       . The Company may, but is not obligated to, obtain directors' and officers' liability insurance ("D&O Insurance") on behalf of the Indemnitee against any liability which may be asserted against or incurred by the Indemnitee as an Agent, whether or not the Company would have the power to indemnify the Indemnitee hereunder. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Company shall not be obligated to indemnify the Indemnitee for Expenses, judgments, fines or penalties which have been paid directly to the Indemnitee by D&O Insurance. If the Company has D&O Insurance in effect at the time the Company receives from the Indemnitee any notice of the commencement or threat of a Proceeding, the Company shall give prompt notice of the commencement or threat of such Proceeding to the insurers in accordance with the procedures set forth in the D&O Insurance policy. The Company shall thereafter take all necessary or desirable action to cause such insurers to pay, on behalf of the Indemnitee, all amounts payable as a result of such Proceeding in accordance with the terms of such policy.
Insurance
         10.       .
Exceptions
                   (a)    .     Any provision herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall not be obligated to indemnify the Indemnitee pursuant to the terms of this Agreement, and Indemnitee hereby undertakes to repay any advanced Expenses, on account of any Proceeding with respect to (i) remuneration paid to the Indemnitee if it is determined by final
Certain Matters
judgment or other final adjudication that such remuneration was in violation of law; (ii) which final judgment is rendered against the Indemnitee for an accounting of profits made from the purchase or sale by the Indemnitee of securities of the Company pursuant to the provisions of Section 16(b) of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or similar provisions of any federal, state or local statute; or (iii) which (but only to the extent that) it is determined by final judgment or other final adjudication that the Indemnitee's conduct was in bad faith, knowingly fraudulent or deliberately dishonest. For purposes of the forgoing sentence, a final judgment or other final adjudication may be reached in either the underlying Proceeding or action in connection with which indemnification is sought or in a separate Proceeding or action to establish rights and liabilities under this Agreement.
                   (b)    .     Any provision herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall not be obligated to indemnify the Indemnitee or otherwise act pursuant to the terms hereof in violation of any undertaking appearing in, and required by the rules and regulations promulgated in the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "Act"), any registration statement filed with the SEC under the Act. The Indemnitee acknowledges that paragraph (h) of Item 512 of Regulation S-K promulgated under the Act requires the Company to undertake in connection with any registration statement filed under the Act to submit the issue of the enforceability of the Indemnitee's rights under this Agreement in connection with any liability under the Act on public policy grounds to a court of appropriate jurisdiction and to be governed by any final adjudication of such issue. The Indemnitee specifically agrees that any such undertaking shall supersede the provisions of this Agreement and to be bound by any such undertaking.
Securities Act Liabilities
                   (c)    .     Any provision herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall not be obligated pursuant to the terms of this Agreement to indemnify the Indemnitee or advance Expenses to the Indemnitee with respect to Proceedings or claims initiated or brought voluntarily by the Indemnitee and not by way of defense, except with respect to Proceedings brought to establish or enforce a right to indemnification under this Agreement as contemplated by or any other statute or law or otherwise as required under Section 145, but such indemnification or advancement of Expenses may be provided by the Company in specific cases if the Board of Directors of the Company find it to be appropriate.
Claims Initiated by the Indemnitee
Section 7(c)
                   (d)    .     Any provision herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company shall not be obligated pursuant to the terms of this Agreement to indemnify the Indemnitee under this Agreement for any amounts paid in settlement of a Proceeding effected without the Company's prior written consent. Neither the Company nor the Indemnitee shall unreasonably withhold consent to any proposed settlement; , , that the Company may in any event decline to consent to (or to otherwise admit or agree to any liability for indemnification hereunder in respect of) any proposed settlement if the Company determines in good faith (pursuant to ) hereof) that the Indemnitee is not or ultimately will not be entitled to indemnification hereunder.
Unauthorized Settlements
provided
however
Section 3(c
         11.       . The provisions for indemnification and advancement of Expenses set forth in this Agreement shall not be deemed exclusive of any other rights which the Indemnitee may have as a result of any provision of law, the Company's certificate of
Nonexclusivity
incorporation or bylaws, the vote of the Company's stockholders or disinterested directors, and the Indemnitee's rights hereunder shall continue after the Indemnitee has ceased acting as an Agent and shall inure to the benefit of the heirs, executors and administrators of the Indemnitee. Any provision herein to the contrary notwithstanding, the Company may provide, in specific cases, the Indemnitee with indemnification of any Expenses if the Board of Directors of the Company determines that such indemnification is appropriate.
         12.       . In the event of payment under this Agreement, the Company shall be subrogated to the extent of such payment to all of the rights of recovery of the Indemnitee, who, at the request and expense of the Company, shall execute all papers required and shall do everything that may be reasonably necessary to secure such rights, including the execution of such documents necessary to enable the Company effectively to bring suit to enforce such rights.
Subrogation
         13.       . It is understood that the parties hereto intend this Agreement to be interpreted and enforced so as to provide indemnification to the Indemnitee to the fullest extent now or hereafter permitted by law.
Interpretation of Agreement
         14.       . If any provision or provisions of this Agreement shall be held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable for any reason whatsoever, (a) the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions of the Agreement (including without limitation, all portions of any paragraphs of this Agreement containing any such provision held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that are not themselves invalid, illegal or unenforceable) shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby; and (b) to the fullest extent possible, the provisions of this Agreement (including, without limitation, all portions of any paragraph of this Agreement containing any such provision held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable, that are not themselves invalid, illegal or unenforceable) shall be construed so as to give effect to the intent manifested by the provision held invalid, illegal or unenforceable and to give effect to hereof.
Severability
Section 13
         15.       . No supplement, modification, amendment or waiver of this Agreement shall be binding unless executed in writing by the parties hereto. No waiver of any of the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed or shall constitute a waiver of any other provision hereof (whether or not similar) nor shall such waiver constitute a continuing waiver. The indemnification rights afforded to the Indemnitee hereby are contract rights and may not be diminished, eliminated or otherwise affected by amendments to the certificate of incorporation or bylaws of the Company or by other agreements.
Modification and Waiver
         16.       . The terms of this Agreement (including without limitation the Indemnitee's rights that continue after ceasing to act as an Agent pursuant to hereof) shall bind, and shall inure to the benefit of, the successors of the parties hereto, and the assigns of the Company.
Successors and Assigns
Section 11
         17.       . Except as otherwise provided herein, any notice or demand which, by the provisions hereof, is required or which may be given to or served upon the parties hereto shall be in writing and, if by telegram, telecopy or telex, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered when sent, if by personal delivery, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered upon actual delivery and, if mailed, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered three business days after deposit in the United States mails, as
Notice
registered or certified mail, with proper postage prepaid and addressed to the party or parties to be notified at the addresses set forth on the signature page of this Agreement (or such other address(es) as a party may designate for itself by like notice).
         18.       . This Agreement shall be governed exclusively by and construed according to the laws of the State of Delaware, as applied to contracts between Delaware residents entered into and to be performed entirely within Delaware.
Governing Law
         19.       . This Agreement constitutes the entire agreement between the parties with respect to the subject matter hereof and supersedes all prior agreements, understandings and negotiations, written and oral, between the parties with respect to the subject matter of this Agreement.
Entire Agreement
                 IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have entered into this Agreement effective as of the date first above written.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040527143518.txt.gz
TIME:20040527143518
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On May 27, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing its Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, Lawrence P. Castellani, has adopted a prearranged, systematic trading plan to sell shares of Advance Auto Parts' common stock in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

                        
News Release
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that Lawrence P. Castellani, the Company's Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, has adopted a prearranged, systematic trading plan to sell shares of Advance Auto Parts' common stock in accordance with Rule 10b5-1 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934.
Roanoke, Virginia, May 27, 2004
Pursuant to Rule 10b5-1, officers and directors of public companies may adopt predetermined plans for selling specified amounts of stock at specified prices. The plans may be entered into only when the officer or director is not in possession of material, nonpublic information and may be used to diversify investment portfolios over a period of time.
Under the plan, Mr. Castellani has directed a broker unaffiliated with the company to sell, subject to certain conditions, up to 800,000 shares of common stock over the period commencing on July 1, 2004 and ending on December 31, 2004. Mr. Castellani beneficially owns 1,889,533 shares, after the stock transaction filed on Form 4 with the Securities and Exchange Commission on May 26, 2004 and including shares issuable upon the exercise of stock options.
"I remain very optimistic about the long term growth prospects for Advance Auto Parts, including our initiatives to drive even higher levels of customer service," stated Mr. Castellani. "I am adopting this 10b5-1 plan on the recommendation of my financial advisors as a way of achieving prudent diversification of my investments."
The stock sold under this plan has designated target prices. If Advance Auto Parts stock is not trading at or above those price targets, the shares will not be sold. The transactions under this plan will be disclosed publicly on Form 4 filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Form 4 filings will also be posted on the investor relations section of the Company's web site, www.advanceautoparts.com.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At April 24, 2004, the Company had 2,553 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040715115304.txt.gz
TIME:20040715115304
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On July 15, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing certain preliminary results for its second quarter ending July 17, 2004. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced today that its comparable store sales for the second quarter which ends July 17, 2004 will approximate 5%. The Company anticipates its comparable store sales will be in the low single digit range for the last four weeks of the second quarter.
Roanoke, Virginia, July 15, 2004
The Company anticipates its earnings per diluted share for the second quarter will be at the lower end of its guidance range of $0.69 to $0.72. These preliminary results are subject to the completion of customary quarterly financial closing and review procedures.
Advance Auto Parts will release earnings after 4:30 p.m. on August 11, 2004 and will host a conference call on August 12, 2004 at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its second quarter results. To listen to the live web cast, please log on to http:///www.advanceautoparts.com or dial 1-866-800-8649. The call will be archived on the Company's web site http:///www.advanceautoparts.com until August 12, 2005. There will not be a telephonic replay available.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts in the United States. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040721172212.txt.gz
TIME:20040721172212
EVENTS:	Financial statements and exhibits	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On July 21, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing the election of a new Director to its Board of Directors. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) is pleased to announce that Darren R. Jackson, Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President of Finance for Best Buy Co., Inc. (NYSE: BBY), was elected to its Board of Directors and will serve as a member of the board's audit committee.
Roanoke, Virginia, July 21, 2004
Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts said, "We are excited to have Darren Jackson join our Board. His numerous accomplishments and talents, including a strong background in finance, strategic planning and retailing, will further strengthen our Board. We look forward to his contributions to our Company."
Jackson joined Minneapolis-based Best Buy in 2000 and was appointed its chief financial officer in February of 2001. Prior to that, he served as vice president and chief financial officer of Seattle-based Nordstrom Inc. and held various senior positions including chief financial officer of Carson Pirie Scott & Company in Milwaukee. He began his career at KPMG Peat Marwick.
In 2001, Jackson was recognized as one of Minneapolis' top 40 executives under 40 and was named as one of the top 20 young chief financial officers likely to shape the profession by CFO magazine. Jackson graduated from Marquette University in Milwaukee and holds a bachelor's degree in accounting. He is a member of the Marquette University Board of Trustees and President's Council.
Headquartered in Roanoke, VA, Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts and products in the United States. At April 24, 2004, the Company had 2,553 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at .
www.advanceautoparts.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040811170233.txt.gz
TIME:20040811170233
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial statements and exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial statements and exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
                          On August 11, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its second quarter ended July 17, 2004. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2004 third quarter, fourth quarter and fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive parts and accessories, today announced record revenue and earnings for its second quarter ended July 17, 2004.
Roanoke, Virginia, August 11, 2004
Sales increased 9.8% in the second quarter to $908.4 million from $827.3 million in the same quarter last year. Comparable store sales grew 5.0% in the second quarter. Do-it-yourself (DIY) comparable store sales grew 1.8% and comparable commercial sales were up 22.3%.
Second Quarter 2004
Gross margin increased 62 basis points to 46.5% of net sales in the second quarter due to the continued positive impact of category management initiatives and enhanced supply chain efficiencies. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses increased by 30 basis points to 36.4% of net sales. SG&A expenses for the prior year were 36.1% of net sales, excluding merger and integration costs associated with the Discount Auto Parts acquisition, and 36.5% of net sales on a GAAP basis. Second quarter operating margins rose to 10.0% of net sales, the Company's first quarter of double-digit operating margins. During last year's second quarter, the Company achieved operating margins of 9.7% of net sales excluding the merger and integration costs, and on a GAAP basis achieved operating margins of 9.4% of net sales.
Net earnings for the second quarter of 2004 increased 17.7% to $53.2 million from comparable net earnings of $45.2 million in the same quarter of last year. Earnings per diluted share rose 16.7% to $0.70 in the second quarter of 2004 versus comparable earnings per diluted share of $0.60 in the prior year's second quarter. The 2003 second quarter GAAP net earnings were $43.5 million, or $0.58 per diluted share, and included expenses of $0.02 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration.
Advance Auto Parts Second Quarter 2004 Results - Page 2
In 2003, the Company used comparable results, which are non-GAAP measures because they excluded expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company used these non-GAAP measures as an indication of its earnings from its core operations and believed they were important to the Company's stockholders because of the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
Commenting on the second quarter results, Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our team produced industry-leading comparable store sales growth by delivering legendary customer service. During the quarter, we continued to invest in initiatives that provide us the foundation to produce continued strong long-term results. Once again we would like to thank our Team Members for their dedication to serving our customers."
In the second quarter, the Company generated free cash flow of $58.3 million as defined in the accompanying financial tables. The Company uses free cash flow, which is a non-GAAP measure, as a measure of its liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of its ability to implement its growth strategies and service its debt.
During the quarter, the Company opened 31 new stores, closed one under-performing store, and relocated six stores, resulting in a total count of 2,583 stores at July 17, 2004. The Company is on track to open 125 to 135 stores in 2004.
Sales for the first two quarters of 2004 increased to $2.0 billion, or 10.8%. Comparable store sales grew 6.1% during the first two quarters of this year.
Year-to-Date 2004
Year-to-date gross margin increased 43 basis points to 46.4% of net sales. SG&A expenses were 37.5% of net sales for the first two quarters of this year, flat with the prior year's comparable results, which excluded merger and integration costs associated with the Discount Auto Parts acquisition. On a GAAP basis, SG&A expenses were 37.8% of net sales for the first two quarters of last year. Year-to-date operating margins rose to 8.9% of net sales. During the first two quarters of last year, the Company achieved operating margins of 8.5% of net sales, which excluded the merger and integration costs, and GAAP operating margins of 8.2% of net sales.
Year-to-date, net earnings rose to $104.5 million, an increase of 28.7%, versus comparable net earnings of $81.2 million for the same period of last year. Earnings per diluted share rose 24.5% to $1.37 over prior year's comparable earnings per diluted share of $1.10. The 2003 year-to-date GAAP net earnings were $48.5 million, or $0.66 per diluted share, and included expenses of $0.05 per diluted share associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and $0.39 per diluted share resulting from the early redemption of the Company's outstanding notes and debentures.
Advance Auto Parts also announced that its board of directors has authorized a stock repurchase program of up to $200 million. The program will allow the Company to repurchase its shares on the open market or in privately negotiated transactions from time to time in accordance with the requirements of the Securities and Exchange Commission. The Company currently has $87 million available in fiscal 2004 for stock
Stock Repurchase Program
Advance Auto Parts Second Quarter 2004 Results - Page 3
repurchases under its existing credit agreement and is evaluating the opportunity to modify its credit agreement to allow flexibility to accelerate the stock repurchase program.
Mr.  Castellani commented, "This stock repurchase program reflects our board of directors' and management's confidence in our financial outlook and growth opportunities. It is our strong financial position that provides us the opportunity to drive shareholder value through investing in our business, as well as buying back our shares at attractive valuations."
The Company updated its earnings guidance for the third quarter to $0.68 to $0.71 earnings per diluted share from its previous guidance of $0.70 to $0.73. The Company also initiated guidance of $0.42 to $0.46 for the fourth quarter. Guidance for both quarters is based on 3% to 4% comparable store sales increases, which is in line with current sales. The fourth quarter of 2004 includes twelve weeks compared to thirteen weeks in the fourth quarter of 2003. The extra week last year contributed earnings per diluted share of approximately $0.07. For the 2004 fiscal year, the Company's guidance for earnings per diluted share is $2.48 to $2.55 updated from $2.53 to $2.58 previously.
Guidance
These anticipated results do not include the potential positive impact of the stock repurchase program, or any costs associated with modifying its existing credit agreement, if the Company chooses to do so.
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, August 12, 2004, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its second quarter results. To listen to the live web cast, please log on to or dial 1-866-800-8649. The call will be archived on the Company's website until August 11, 2005. There will not be a telephonic replay available.
Investor Conference Call
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At July 17, 2004, the Company had 2,583 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
Advance Auto Parts Second Quarter 2004 Results - Page 4
NOTE:
These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20040914092902.txt.gz
TIME:20040914092902
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On September 8, 2004, the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. appointed Michael N. Coppola as a new director. Mr. Coppola has been with Advance Auto Parts, Inc. since February 2001 and currently serves as its Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer.
                          Additionally, on September 10, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release announcing that Lawrence P. Castellani, its Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, will retire as Chief Executive Officer effective May 19, 2005 after its annual stockholders' meeting but will remain Chairman of the Board. Michael N. Coppola has been designated to become its Chief Executive Officer at that time. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in Item 7.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) announced that, Lawrence P. Castellani, its Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, will retire effective May 19, 2005 after its annual stockholders' meeting. Mr. Castellani will remain as Chairman of the Board. Michael N. Coppola, Advance's Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer, has been designated to become its Chief Executive Officer at that time. He has also been appointed to the Company's Board of Directors, effective immediately.
Roanoke, Virginia, September 10, 2004
William L. Salter, the Company's lead director, stated, "Under Larry's leadership the Company has greatly expanded its presence and profitability and we are fortunate he has agreed to remain as Chairman of the Board following this transition."
Mr.  Coppola has been with Advance since February 2001 and, in addition to his current position, has previously served as Senior Vice President, Merchandising. Mr. Coppola has had a very successful career in the retail industry prior to joining Advance, which includes serving as Executive Vice President of Marketing at Tops Friendly Markets.
Mr.  Coppola stated, "I am excited about assuming this significant leadership role and even more excited about the opportunities ahead for Advance." Mr. Castellani added, "Mike has accomplished a tremendous amount in the merchandising, marketing, operations and supply chain areas since arriving at Advance. He is the architect of our strategic plan and his abilities, enthusiasm and focus will help move Advance to the next level of performance and beyond."
Mr.  Castellani concluded "I feel very privileged to have been Chief Executive Officer of Advance for the last five years and have found it to be a most rewarding experience because of all the terrific team members, and I would like to thank them for their support."
Advance Auto Parts Announces Leadership Transition Page 2
Headquartered in Roanoke, VA, Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts and products in the United States. At July 17, 2004, the Company had 2,583 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at .
www.advanceautoparts.com
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20041020103241.txt.gz
TIME:20041020103241
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On October 19, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its sales and earnings results for the third quarter ended October 9, 2004. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2004 fourth quarter. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) today announced record results for its third quarter ended October 9, 2004, with comparable store sales increasing by 3.0% and earnings per diluted share increasing to $0.68. These preliminary results are subject to completion of the Company's normal quarter end closing procedures.
Roanoke, Virginia, October 19, 2004 
Chairman and CEO Larry Castellani commented, "During the third quarter our team continued to execute on our initiatives as planned and we are pleased with our results. The four hurricanes within this quarter disrupted our operations throughout Florida, the Southeast and the Mid-Atlantic, where almost two-thirds of our stores are located. Despite the impact of these storms, our team produced solid results in both comparable store sales increases and earnings per share growth. We believe we would have achieved the high end of our guidance range of 3% to 4% for comparable store sales and $0.68 to $0.71 for earnings per diluted share without the effects of the hurricanes."
While the Company incurred disruptions and property damage throughout the areas impacted by these storms, all but seven stores are now fully operational. All seven stores are expected to reopen by the end of November 2004 and all costs related to the hurricanes are reflected in the third quarter results.
The Company reiterated its fourth quarter earnings per diluted share guidance of $0.42 to $0.46. The fourth quarter of 2004 consists of twelve weeks compared to thirteen weeks last year. The additional week last year produced an increase of approximately $0.07 in earnings per diluted share. Mr. Castellani added, "We are pleased that our comparable sales increases have accelerated to mid-single digits for the last five weeks through October 16. Our business trends are strengthening and we are optimistic about the fourth quarter and 2005."
The Company also anticipates it will close on its new $670 million Senior Credit Facility by the end of October 2004. It intends to use the proceeds from this new facility to refinance its outstanding term loans under its existing $495 million facility and to fund potential share repurchases under its previously
Advance Auto Parts Announces Record Third Quarter Sales and Earnings Page 2
authorized stock repurchase program through a new delayed draw term loan of $175 million. The new facility will also provide for lower effective borrowing rates and increase the capacity of its financed vendor accounts payable program. As stated in our second quarter press release, fourth quarter guidance does not include the costs of refinancing our existing credit facility or the positive effects of potential stock buybacks during the quarter. Stock buybacks during the third quarter did not change third quarter earnings per diluted share of $0.68.
Advance Auto Parts will release its complete earnings after 4:30 p.m. on November 3, 2004, and host a conference call on November 4, 2004, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its third quarter results. To listen to the live web cast, please log on to www.advanceautoparts.com or dial 1-800-295-4740. The call will be archived on the Company's web site at www.advanceautoparts.com until November 4, 2005. There will not be a telephonic replay available.
Headquartered in Roanoke, VA, Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts and products in the United States. At October 9, 2004, the Company had 2,612 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at www.advanceautoparts.com.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements.These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20041103171208.txt.gz
TIME:20041103171208
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On November 3, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its third quarter ended October 9, 2004. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2004 fourth quarter. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive parts and accessories, today announced record sales and earnings for its third quarter ended October 9, 2004.
Roanoke, Virginia, November 3, 2004
Net sales increased 6.1% in the third quarter to $890.2 million from $839.1 million in the same quarter last year. Comparable store sales grew 3.0% in the third quarter. Do-it-yourself (DIY) comparable store sales decreased 0.6% and do-it-for-me (DIFM) comparable sales increased 21.4%.
Third Quarter
Commenting on the third quarter results, Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, said, "Our results were especially strong in light of the impact of the four major hurricanes that disrupted our operations in Florida, the Southeast and the Mid-Atlantic. We believe we would have achieved the high end of our guidance range of 3% to 4% for comparable store sales and $0.68 to $0.71 for earnings per share without the effects of these hurricanes. Our growth is attributable to the strength of our business model and the execution of our strategic initiatives."
Mr. Castellani added, "We are pleased our comparable store sales increases in the last four weeks of the third quarter were in the mid-single digit range, and that trend has continued in the first three weeks of the fourth quarter. We remain optimistic and are prepared to maximize our results if these trends continue. We are very encouraged by the strength and consistency of our DIFM sales and the rebound of our DIY sales to solid, positive comps during these past seven weeks."
Gross margin increased 68 basis points to 46.8% of net sales in the third quarter from 46.1% for the same quarter last year. Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses increased by 48 basis points during the quarter to 36.9% of net sales as a result of higher medical costs and the de-leveraging caused by lower sales from the hurricane disruptions. SG&A expenses for the prior year were 36.4% of net sales,
Advance Auto Parts Third Quarter 2004 Results - Page 2
excluding merger and integration costs associated with the Discount Auto Parts acquisition, and 36.7% of net sales on a GAAP basis. Third quarter operating margins rose to 9.9% of net sales versus last year's 9.7% of net sales excluding merger and integration costs, and 9.4% of net sales on a GAAP basis.
Earnings from continuing operations for the third quarter of 2004 increased to $51.4 million versus comparable earnings from continuing operations of $46.3 million from the same quarter of last year. GAAP earnings from continuing operations were $44.7 million for the same quarter of last year. Earnings per diluted share from continuing operations rose 11.5% to $0.68 in the third quarter of 2004 versus comparable earnings per diluted share from continuing operations of $0.61 in the third quarter last year. GAAP earnings per diluted share from continuing operations were $0.59 in the third quarter last year.
The 2003 comparable results are non-GAAP measures because they excluded expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company used these non-GAAP measures as an indication of earnings from its core operations and believed they were important to the Company's stockholders because of the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
During the quarter, the Company opened 31 new stores, closed two stores, and relocated 11 stores, resulting in a total store count of 2,612 stores at October 9, 2004. The Company anticipates the opening of approximately 125 stores in fiscal year 2004.
Net sales for the first three quarters of 2004 increased to $2.9 billion, or 9.3% over the same period in the prior year. Comparable store sales grew 5.1% during the first three quarters of this year.
Year-to-Date 2004
Year-to-date gross margin increased 50 basis points to 46.5% of net sales. SG&A expenses were 37.3% of net sales for the first three quarters of this year. Comparable SG&A expenses were 37.1% of net sales for the prior year, while GAAP SG&A expenses were 37.5% of net sales. Year-to-date operating margins rose to 9.2% of net sales. Comparable operating margins were 8.9% of net sales for the prior year, while GAAP operating margins were 8.6% of net sales.
Year-to-date earnings from continuing operations rose to $156.0 million, an increase of 23.5%, versus comparable earnings from continuing operations of $126.2 million for the same period last year. GAAP earnings from continuing operations were $92.0 million for the same period last year. Earnings per diluted share from continuing operations rose to $2.05, a 20.6% increase over last year's comparable earnings per diluted share from continuing operations of $1.70. GAAP earnings per diluted share from continuing operations were $1.24 for the same period last year.
The Company reiterated its fourth quarter earnings guidance of $0.42 to $0.46 per diluted share. As stated in previous releases, this guidance does not include the costs of replacing its existing credit facility that will approximate $0.02 per diluted share or the positive effects of potential stock buybacks during the fourth quarter. The fourth quarter of 2004 includes 12 weeks compared to 13 weeks in the fourth quarter of 2003. The extra week last year contributed earnings per diluted share of approximately $0.07. On a GAAP basis, the Company anticipates fourth quarter earnings per diluted share to be $0.40 to $0.44, including the refinancing costs.
Guidance
Advance Auto Parts Third Quarter 2004 Results - Page 3
The Company announced it has closed on a new $670 million Senior Credit Facility. The Company intends to use the proceeds from this new facility to refinance outstanding term loans and the revolver under its existing $495 million facility and to fund potential stock repurchases under its previously authorized stock repurchase program through a new delayed draw term loan. The new facility will also provide for lower effective borrowing rates and increase the capacity of its financed vendor accounts payable program.
New Senior Credit Facility
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, November 4, 2004, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its third quarter results. To listen to the live web cast, please log on to or dial 1-800-295-4740. The call will be archived on the Company's website until November 4, 2005. There will not be a telephonic replay available.
Investor Conference Call
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At October 9, 2004, the Company had 2,612 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
NOTE:
These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
Note: The Company uses free cash flow, which is a non-GAAP measure, as a measure of its liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of its ability to implement its growth strategies and service its debt.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20041109151352.txt.gz
TIME:20041109151352
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                         The disclosure contained in Item 2.03 is incorporated herein by reference.
                         On November 3, 2004, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, entered into a new amended and restated $670 million senior credit facility with Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, or Advance Stores, the lenders party thereto, JPMorgan Chase, as administrative agent, Suntrust Bank and Wachovia Bank, National Association, as syndication agents, and U.S. Bank N.A. and Bank of America N.A., as documentation agents. This new facility will provide for a $200 million tranche A term loan and a $170 million tranche B term loan. Proceeds from these term loans will be used to refinance the Company's current tranche D and E term loans and revolver under its existing credit facility. Additionally, the new facility will provide for a $100 million delayed draw term loan, which is available exclusively for stock buybacks under its previously announced stock repurchase program, and a $200 million revolving facility, or the revolver (which provides for the issuance of letters of credit with a sub limit of $70 million). As of November 3, 2004, the Company had no borrowings under the revolver and had $37.6 million in letters of credit outstanding, which reduced availability to $162.4 million.
                         The interest rates on the tranche A and B term loans, the delayed draw term loan and the revolver will be based, at the Company's option, on an adjusted LIBOR rate, plus a margin, or an alternate base rate, plus a margin. The initial margin for the tranche A term loan and revolver is 1.50% and 0.50% per annum for the adjusted LIBOR and alternate base rate borrowings, respectively. The initial margin for the tranche B term loan and the delayed draw term loan is 1.75% and 0.75% per annum for the adjusted LIBOR and alternate base rate borrowings, respectively. Additionally, a commitment fee of 0.375% per annum will be charged on the unused portion of the tranche A loan and revolver, payable in arrears. A commitment fee of 1.75% per annum will be charged on the unused portion of the delayed draw term loan, payable in arrears.
                         The tranche A term loan requires scheduled repayments of $7.5 million on March 31, 2005 and quarterly thereafter through December 31, 2006, $10.0 million on March 31, 2007 and quarterly thereafter through December 31, 2007, $12.5 million on March 31, 2008 and quarterly thereafter through June 30, 2009 and $25.0 million due at maturity on September 30, 2009. The tranche B term loan currently requires scheduled repayments of $0.4 million on March 31, 2005 and quarterly thereafter, with a final payment of $160.7 million due at maturity on September 30, 2010. The delayed draw term loan requires scheduled repayments of 0.25% of the aggregate principal amount outstanding on March 31, 2006 and quarterly thereafter, with a final payment due at maturity on September 30, 2010 and the revolver expires on September 30, 2009.
                         Borrowings under the new senior credit facility are required to be prepaid, subject to certain exceptions, with (1) 50% of the Excess Cash Flow (as defined in the senior credit facility) unless the Company's Senior Leverage Ratio (as defined in the senior credit facility) at the end of any fiscal year is less than or equal to 1.00 to 1.00, in which case 25% of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year will be required to be repaid, (2) 100% of the net cash proceeds of all asset sales or other dispositions of property by the Company and its subsidiaries, subject to certain exceptions (including exceptions for reinvestment of certain asset sale proceeds within 270 days of such sale and certain sale-leaseback transactions), and (3) 100% of the net proceeds of certain issuances of debt or equity by the Company and its subsidiaries.
                         Voluntary prepayments and voluntary reductions of the unutilized portion of the revolver are permitted in whole or in part, at the Company's option, in minimum principal amounts specified in the new senior credit facility, without premium or penalty, subject to reimbursement of the lenders' redeployment costs in the case of a prepayment of adjusted LIBOR borrowings other than on the last day of the relevant interest period. The new senior credit facility also provides for customary events of default, including non-payment defaults, covenant defaults and cross-defaults to the Company's other material indebtedness.
                         The new senior credit facility is guaranteed by the Company and by each of its existing domestic subsidiaries and will be guaranteed by all future domestic subsidiaries. The facility is secured by a first priority lien on substantially all, subject to certain exceptions, of the Advance Stores' properties and assets and the properties and assets of its existing domestic subsidiaries (including Discount Auto Parts, Inc. and its subsidiaries) and will be secured by the properties and assets of its future domestic subsidiaries. The facility contains covenants restricting the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to, among other things, (1) declare dividends or redeem or repurchase capital stock, (2) prepay, redeem or purchase debt, (3) incur liens or engage in sale-leaseback transactions, (4) make loans and investments, (5) incur additional debt (including hedging arrangements), (6) engage in certain mergers, acquisitions and asset sales, (7) engage in transactions with affiliates, (8) change the nature of the Company's business and the business conducted by its subsidiaries and (9) change the holding company status of the Company. The Company is required to comply with financial covenants with respect to a maximum leverage ratio, a minimum interest coverage ratio, a minimum current assets to funded senior debt ratio, a maximum senior leverage ratio and maximum limits on capital expenditures.
                         The above description of the new senior credit facility is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the amended and restated credit agreement for the facility, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

EXHIBIT 10.1
Page
SCHEDULES:
EXHIBITS:
100
        WHEREAS, Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent, are parties to an Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003 (as further amended, supplemented and modified, the "), as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Date (as defined herein), which Existing Credit Agreement amended and restated the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of March 6, 2003, which, in turn, amended and restated the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of June 28, 2002, which, in turn, amended and restated the Original Credit Agreement (as defined herein);
"Existing Credit Agreement
        WHEREAS, Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Restatement Lenders (as defined therein) and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent, are parties to an Amendment and Restatement Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (the "");
Amendment and Restatement Agreement
        WHEREAS, subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement shall be amended and restated as provided herein.
        NOW, THEREFORE, the parties hereto agree as follows:
        SECTION 1.01. Defined Terms. As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
        "" means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, that, without duplication, (a) there shall be excluded (i) the income of any Person in which any other Person (other than the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) has a joint interest, except such income shall be included to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries by such Person during such period, (ii) the income (or loss) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or the date that Person's assets are acquired by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries and (iii) gains and losses from, or incurred in connection with, the sale, liquidation or other disposition of assets outside the ordinary course of business; (b) there shall be excluded Reorganization Expenses in an aggregate amount not to exceed (i) $20,000,000 during the fiscal year ended January 3, 2004 and (ii) $10,000,000 during each of the fiscal years ending January 1, 2005 and December 31, 2005; (c) there shall be excluded Debt Retirement Costs; and (d) except for purposes of calculating the Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to any Permitted Acquisitions and any divestitures by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person occurring during such period as if such transactions had occurred on the first day of such period.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Income
provided
        "" means an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, (i) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (ii) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
        "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
        "" means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
        "" means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
        "" means, collectively, the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Syndication Agents and the Documentation Agents.
Agents
        "" means Advance Holding Corporation, a Virginia corporation.
AHC Holdings
        "" means the merger of AHC Holdings with and into Holdings, in accordance with the Merger Agreement, with Holdings being the surviving corporation.
AHC Merger
        "" means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Base CD Rate in effect on such day plus 1% and (c) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Base CD Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
        "" has the meaning given such term in the recitals hereto.
Amendment and Restatement Agreement
        "" means, with respect to any Revolving Lender, the percentage of the total Revolving Commitments represented by such Lender's Revolving Commitment. If the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
Applicable Percentage
        "" means, for any day:
Applicable Rate
        (a)        with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan that is a Tranche A Term Loan or Revolving Loan or with respect to commitment fees in respect of Revolving Commitments payable under Section 2.12(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption "ABR Spread", "Eurodollar Spread" or "Commitment Fee Rate", as the case may be, based upon the ratings by S&P and Moody's, respectively, applicable on such date to the Index Debt:
        (b)        with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan that is a Tranche B Term Loan or Delayed Draw Term Loan, as the case may be, (i) 0.75% per annum in respect of any such ABR Loan or (ii) 1.75% per annum in respect of any such Eurodollar Loan, as the case may be; that if the ratings by S&P and Moody's applicable on such date to the Index Debt are equal to or greater than BB+ and Ba1, respectively, "Applicable Rate" for the purposes of this clause (b) shall mean (A) 0.50% per annum in respect of any such ABR Loan or (B) 1.50% per annum in respect of any such Eurodollar Loan, as the case may be; and
provided
        (c)         with respect to commitment fees in respect of Delayed Draw Commitments payable under Section 2.12(b), 1.75% per annum.
        For purposes of the foregoing clause (a), (i) if either Moody's or S&P shall not have in effect a rating for the Index Debt (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this definition), then such rating agency shall be deemed to have established a rating in Category 1; (ii) subject to clause (iii) below, Category 2 or Category 3 shall apply only if both ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moody's and S&P for the Index Debt fall within such Category and, if they do not, Category 1, Category 4 or Category 5 shall apply, as applicable; and (iii) if the ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moody's and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories, the Applicable Rate shall be based on the higher of the two Categories unless one of the two ratings is two or more Categories lower than the other, in which case the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category next below that of the higher of the two Categories (it being understood that (A) if one rating falls in Category 1 and the other rating does not fall in Category 4 or Category 5, Category 1 shall apply, and (B) if one rating falls in Category 4 or Category 5 and the other rating is lower and falls in Category 2 or Category 3, this clause (iii) shall apply).
        For purposes of the foregoing clause (b), if either Moody's or S&P shall not have in effect a rating for the Index Debt (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this definition), then such rating agency shall be deemed to have established a rating lower than BB+ or Ba1, as applicable.
        For purposes of the foregoing clauses (a) and (b), if the ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moody's and S&P for the Index Debt shall be changed (other than as a result of a change in the rating system of Moody's or S&P), such change shall be effective as of the date on which it is first announced by the applicable rating agency, irrespective of when notice of such change shall have been furnished by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 or otherwise. Each change in the Applicable Rate shall apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change. If the rating system of Moody's or S&P shall change, or if either such rating agency shall cease to be in the business of rating corporate debt obligations, the Borrower and the Lenders shall negotiate in good faith to amend this definition to reflect such changed rating system or the unavailability of ratings from such rating agency and, pending the effectiveness of any such amendment, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the rating most recently in effect prior to such change or cessation.
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(b).
Approved Fund
        "" means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as "well-capitalized" and within supervisory subgroup "B" (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States; that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid, then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
Assessment Rate
provided
        "" means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
        "" means the sum of (a) the Three-Month Secondary CD Rate multiplied by the Statutory Reserve Rate plus (b) the Assessment Rate.
Base CD Rate
        "" means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
        "" means Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Borrower
        "" means (a) Loans of the same Class and Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
        "" means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
        "" means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term "Business Day" shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
        "" means, in respect of any fiscal year for which Excess Cash Flow is required to be calculated hereunder, an amount equal to any liabilities in respect of payment for Capital Expenditures for such fiscal year that are included in the Borrower's consolidated current liabilities as of the end of such fiscal year for purposes of determining the increase or decrease in Net Working Capital for such fiscal year, but only to the extent that such liabilities are paid in cash prior to the last day of the first fiscal quarter of the immediately succeeding fiscal year; that the Borrower may elect, in its discretion, to exclude any such amount in calculating the Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year, in which case the "Capex Adjustment" shall be such lesser amount (not less than zero) as the Borrower shall elect in calculating Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year.
Capex Adjustment
provided
        "" means, for any period, (a) the additions to property, plant and equipment and other capital expenditures of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries that are (or would be) set forth in a consolidated statement of cash flows of the Borrower for such period prepared in accordance with GAAP and (b) without duplication, Capital Lease Obligations incurred by the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries during such period.
Capital Expenditures
        "" of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
        "" means the "Cash Concentration Account", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Cash Concentration Account
        "" means at any time, (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person other than Holdings of any shares of capital stock of the Borrower; (b) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of Rule 13d-5 under the United States Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 in effect on the date hereof), of shares representing more than 25% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding capital stock of Holdings; or (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of Holdings by Persons who were not Continuing Directors.
Change in Control
        "" means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the Effective Date, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the Effective Date or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Bank (or, for purposes of Section 2.15(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
Change in Law
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are Revolving Loans, Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans or Swingline Loans and, when used in reference to any Commitment, refers to whether such Commitment is a Revolving Commitment, Tranche A Commitment, Tranche B Commitment or Delayed Draw Commitment.
Class
        "" means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
        "" means any and all "Collateral", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral
        "" means the "Collateral Agent", as defined in any applicable Security Document.
Collateral Agent
        "" means the "Collection Deposit Account", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Collection Deposit Account
        "" means the "Collection Deposit Letter Agreement", as defined in the Security Agreement.
Collection Deposit Letter Agreement
        "" means a Revolving Commitment, Tranche A Commitment, Tranche B Commitment, Delayed Draw Commitment or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Commitment
        "" means, for any period, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (a) consolidated interest expense for such period, (b) the aggregate amount of letter of credit fees accrued during such period, (c) the aggregate amount of income tax expense for such period, (d) all depreciation and amortization expense for such period and (e) other non-cash charges for such period (excluding any non-cash charges that constitute an accrual of or reserve for future cash payments), and minus, without duplication and to the extent added to revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, all non-cash gains during such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis with respect to Holdings and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated EBITDA
        "" means, for any period, the interest expense of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP; that, in the case of Holdings, interest expense in respect of the Holdings Senior Discount Debentures shall be included only to the extent paid in cash.
Consolidated Interest Expense
provided
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Consolidated EBITDA to (b) Consolidated Interest Expense (net of interest income) for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of the Borrower ended as of such date, all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio
        "" means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Net Income
        "" means the directors of Holdings on the Effective Date and each other director, if, in each case, such other director's nomination for election to the board of directors of Holdings is approved by a majority of the then Continuing Directors.
Continuing Directors
        "" means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. "" and "" have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
        "" means, as of any date of determination, the amount of all inventory and accounts receivable (excluding all accounts receivable sold or transferred pursuant to any Receivables Program) owned by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Loan Parties as of such date, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Current Assets
        "" means Discount Auto Parts, Inc., a Florida corporation.
DAP
        "" means the contribution by Holdings of the Equity Interests of DAP to the Borrower as a capital contribution after consummation of the DAP Merger.
DAP Equity Transfer
        "" means the merger of Newco Sub with and into DAP, in accordance with the Merger Agreement.
DAP Merger
        "" means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
        "" means any call premiums, write-offs of unamortized discounts or deferred financing costs and fees and any expenses relating to or incurred in connection with the redemption of the Senior Subordinated Notes and Holdings Senior Discount Debentures, as well as any write-offs relating to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Debt Retirement Costs
        "" means a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that allows executives of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to defer receipt of specified portions of base and bonus earnings each calendar year. Deferrals are maintained as a liability, along with assets owned by the Borrower, in a trust owned by the Borrower.
Deferred Compensation Obligations
        "" means the period from and including the Effective Date to and excluding the date that is twelve months after the Effective Date.
Delayed Draw Availability Period
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement to make a Delayed Draw Term Loan on or after the Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Delayed Draw Term Loans to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08 or (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Delayed Draw Commitment is set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Delayed Draw Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Delayed Draw Commitments is $100,000,000.
Delayed Draw Commitment
        "" means a Lender with a Delayed Draw Commitment or an outstanding Delayed Draw Term Loan.
Delayed Draw Lender
        "" means September 30, 2010.
Delayed Draw Maturity Date
        "" means a Delayed Draw Term Loan made pursuant to Section 3 of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Delayed Draw Term Loan
        "" means any vendor or supplier from which the Borrower purchases inventory and that has been designated by the Borrower as a participant in a Permitted Vendor Financing.
Designated Vendor
        "" means (a) accounts receivable owed by the Borrower in respect of inventory purchased from a Designated Vendor or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower as payment in full of one or more of such accounts receivable; that such accounts receivable or drafts shall constitute Designated Vendor Accounts only after having been sold by such Designated Vendor to a DVA Creditor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and only so long as owed to a DVA Creditor.
Designated Vendor Accounts
provided
        "" means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
        "" means U.S. Bank N.A. and Bank of America N.A.
Documentation Agents
        "" means (a) any financial institution that (i) has agreed to purchase one or more Designated Vendor Accounts from a Designated Vendor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and (ii) has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement (or is represented by an agent that has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement binding upon such financial institution) and (b) any successor or assignee of any such financial institution that holds any Designated Vendor Accounts originally purchased by such financial institution, provided that such successor or assignee (i) is not a Designated Vendor, a Loan Party or an Affiliate of a Designated Vendor or a Loan Party and (ii) has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement (or is represented by an agent that has entered into an Intercreditor Agreement binding upon such successor or assignee).
DVA Creditor
        "" means the obligations of the Borrower to pay Designated Vendor Accounts. For purposes of this Agreement, the amount of any DVA Obligation at any time shall be the entire amount payable in respect thereof as and when due.
DVA Obligations
        "" or "" refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
        "" has the meaning given such term in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Effective Date
        "" means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
        "" means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
        "" means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person or any warrants, options or other rights to acquire such interests.
Equity Interests
        "" means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
        "" means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
        "" means (a) any "reportable event", as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an "accumulated funding deficiency" (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
        "" means, for any fiscal year, the sum (without duplication) of:
Excess Cash Flow
        "" means any shares of capital stock of Holdings that constitute "margin stock" within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board and are held as treasury stock by Holdings.
Excluded Margin Stock
        "" means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.19(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lender's failure to comply with Section 2.17(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.17(a).
Excluded Taxes
        "" has the meaning given to such term in the recitals hereto.
Existing Credit Agreement
        "" means all letters of credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date.
Existing Letters of Credit
        "" means the Revolving Commitments (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) of the Revolving Lenders (as defined in the Existing Credit Agreement) under the Existing Credit Agreement.
Existing Revolving Commitments
        "" means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
        "" means the chief financial officer, vice president of finance, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of Holdings or the Borrower, as applicable.
Financial Officer
        "" means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
        "" means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
        "" means, as of any date, Total Debt as of such date.
Funded Senior Debt
        "" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
        "" means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
        "" of or by any Person (the "") means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the "") in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term "Guarantee" shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
        "" means the Guarantee Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit C, made by Holdings and the Subsidiary Loan Parties in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Guarantee Agreement
        "" means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
        "" means any interest rate protection agreement, foreign currency exchange agreement, commodity price protection agreement or other interest or currency exchange rate or commodity price hedging arrangement.
Hedging Agreement
        "" means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Holdings
        "" means the Senior Discount Debentures due 2009 issued by AHC Holdings on April 15, 1998, that became Indebtedness of Holdings as a result of the AHC Merger and were redeemed by Holdings in April 2003.
Holdings Senior Discount Debentures
        "" of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 90 days and (ii) Deferred Compensation Obligations), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers' acceptances and (j) all DVA Obligations. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Person's ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. The amount of any Indebtedness described in clause (f) above shall be limited to the maximum amount payable under the applicable Guarantee of such Person if such Guarantee contains limitations on the amount payable thereunder.
Indebtedness
        "" means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
        "" means the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, among Holdings, the Borrower, the Subsidiary Loan Parties and the Administrative Agent.
Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement
        "" means the Indebtedness of the Borrower under this Agreement.
Index Debt
        "" means an intercreditor agreement substantially in the form of Exhibit F, among the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent and the DVA Creditor (or an agent for one or more DVA Creditors) named therein.
Intercreditor Agreement
        "" means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.07.
Interest Election Request
        "" means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months' duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months' duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
Interest Payment Date
        "" means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, to the extent made available by all participating Lenders, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
        "" means, as of any date of determination, (a) "inventory", as defined in the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York and (b) all finished goods, wares and merchandise, finished or unfinished parts, components, assemblies held for sale to third party customers based on perpetual inventory reports, including reconciling items to the perpetual reports, defined and classified by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on a basis consistent with current and historical accounting practice in accordance with GAAP.
Inventory
        "" means (a) JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as the issuer of (i) Letters of Credit hereunder and (ii) Existing Letters of Credit under the Existing Credit Agreement, in each case including its successors in such capacity as provided in Section 2.05(i), or (b) any other Lender approved by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term "Issuing Bank" shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
Issuing Bank
        "" means a payment made by the Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
        "" means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Revolving Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
        "" means the Persons listed on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term "Lenders" includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
        "" means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement. Each Existing Letter of Credit will be deemed to constitute a Letter of Credit for all purposes under the Loan Documents as though each Existing Letter Credit had been issued hereunder on the Effective Date.
Letter of Credit
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Leverage Ratio
        "" means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Markets Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
        "" means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
        "" means this Agreement, the promissory notes, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.09(e), the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Reaffirmation Agreement, the Guarantee Agreement, the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement, the Intercreditor Agreements, if any, and the Security Documents.
Loan Documents
        "" means Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Loan Parties.
Loan Parties
        "" means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to, or that are outstanding under, this Agreement.
Loans
        "" means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under any Loan Document or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Lenders under any Loan Document.
Material Adverse Effect
        "" means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Hedging Agreements, of any one or more of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $5,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the "principal amount" of the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Hedging Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Hedging Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
        "" means the Agreement and Plan of Merger dated as of August 7, 2001, by and among Holdings, AHC Holdings, the Borrower, Newco Sub and DAP.
Merger Agreement
        "" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc.
Moody's
        "" means a mortgage, deed of trust, assignment of leases and rents, leasehold mortgage or other security document granting a Lien on any Mortgaged Property to secure the Obligations. Each Mortgage shall be satisfactory in form and substance to the Collateral Agent.
Mortgage
        "" means, initially, each parcel of real property and the improvements thereto owned or leased by a Loan Party and identified on Schedule 1.01(b), and includes each other parcel of real property and improvements thereto with respect to which a Mortgage is granted pursuant to Section 5.12 or 5.13.
Mortgaged Property
        "" means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
        "" means, with respect to any event (a) the cash proceeds received in respect of such event including (i) any cash received in respect of any non-cash proceeds, but only as and when received, (ii) in the case of a casualty, insurance proceeds, and (iii) in the case of a condemnation or similar event, condemnation awards and similar cash payments, net of (b) the sum of (i) all commissions, fees and out-of-pocket expenses paid by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to third parties (other than Affiliates) in connection with such event, (ii) in the case of a sale, transfer or other disposition of an asset (including pursuant to a sale and leaseback transaction or a casualty or other damage or condemnation or similar proceeding), the amount of all payments required to be made by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries as a result of such event to repay Indebtedness (other than Loans) secured by such asset or otherwise subject to mandatory prepayment as a result of such event, and (iii) the amount of all taxes paid (or reasonably estimated to be payable) by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries, and the amount of any reserves established by Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to fund (A) retained liabilities relating to the assets sold or (B) contingent liabilities reasonably estimated to be payable, in each case during the year that such event occurred or the next two succeeding years and that are directly attributable to such event (as determined reasonably and in good faith by the chief financial officer of the Borrower).
Net Cash Proceeds
        "" means, at any date, (a) the consolidated current assets of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (excluding cash and Permitted Investments) minus (b) the consolidated current liabilities of the Borrower and its consolidated Subsidiaries as of such date (excluding current liabilities in respect of Indebtedness). Net Working Capital at any date may be a positive or negative number. Net Working Capital increases when it becomes more positive or less negative and decreases when it becomes less positive or more negative.
Net Working Capital
        "" means AAP Acquisition Corporation, a Florida corporation and a wholly owned subsidiary of Holdings.
Newco Sub
        "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Security Agreement.
Obligations
        "" means the Credit Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001, among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent.
Original Credit Agreement
        "" means November 28, 2001, the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 of the Original Credit Agreement were satisfied.
Original Effective Date
        "" means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
Other Taxes
        "" means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
        "" means a certificate in the form of Annex 1 to the Security Agreement or any other form approved by the Collateral Agent.
Perfection Certificate
        "" means any acquisition by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person if, immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would result therefrom, (b) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable laws, (c) all the Equity Interests of each Subsidiary formed for the purpose of or resulting from such acquisition shall be owned directly by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower and all actions required to be taken with respect to such acquired or newly formed Subsidiary under Sections 5.12 and 5.13 have been taken, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Sections 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition (and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, with any new Indebtedness being deemed to be amortized over the applicable testing period in accordance with its terms, and assuming that any Revolving Loans borrowed in connection with such acquisition are repaid with excess cash balances when available) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (e) the Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent an officers' certificate to the effect set forth in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above, together with all relevant financial information for the Person or assets to be acquired.
Permitted Acquisition
        "" means any transfer of properties or assets by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries in which at least 80% of the consideration received by the transferor consists of properties or assets (other than cash) that will be used in the business of such transferor, that (a) the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of the property or assets (including cash) being transferred by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, is not greater than the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of the property or assets (including cash) received by the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as the case may be, in such exchange and (b) the aggregate fair market value (as determined in good faith by the board of directors of the Borrower) of all property or assets transferred by the Borrower and any of its Subsidiaries in connection with exchanges in any period of twelve consecutive months shall not exceed $40,000,000.
Permitted Asset Swap
provided
        "" means:
Permitted Encumbrances
that the term "Permitted Encumbrances" shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
        "" means:
Permitted Investments
        "" means a financing arrangement pursuant to which a Designated Vendor sells to a financial institution that is a DVA Creditor (a) accounts receivable owed to such Designated Vendor by the Borrower or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower to replace such accounts receivable; that such financing arrangement complies with the applicable provisions of this Agreement.
Permitted Vendor Financing
provided
        "" means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
        "" means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an "employer" as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
        "" means the Pledge Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit D, among the Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiaries party thereto and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Pledge Agreement
        "" means:
Prepayment Event
that with respect to any event (other than a Specified Lease Financing) described in clause (a), if the Borrower shall deliver a certificate of a Financial Officer to the Administrative Agent at the time of such event setting forth the Borrower's or a Subsidiary's intent to use the Net Cash Proceeds of such event to acquire other assets to be used in the same line of business within 270 days of receipt of such Net Cash Proceeds and certifying that no Default has occurred and is continuing, such event shall not constitute a Prepayment Event except to the extent the Net Cash Proceeds therefrom are not so used at the end of such 270-day period, at which time such event shall be deemed a Prepayment Event with Net Cash Proceeds equal to the Net Cash Proceeds so remaining unused.
provided
        "" means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
        "" means the Reaffirmation Agreement, entered into in connection with the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, attached thereto as Exhibit C, among Holdings, the Borrower and the other Reaffirming Parties (as defined therein).
Reaffirmation Agreement
        "" means Indebtedness of the Borrower and/or its Subsidiaries arising from Receivables Programs in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding, at any time, (a) the sum of (i) 3.5% of the total aggregate amount of all accounts receivables sold or transferred during the preceding 12-month period by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to any Person other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to a Receivables Program or for which value has been received from any Person other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to a Receivables Program and (ii) $3,000,000 or (b) the amounts permitted pursuant to clause (viii) of Section 6.01(a).
Receivables Indebtedness
        "" means an arrangement or arrangements under which the Borrower and its Subsidiaries sell, transfer or otherwise receive value with respect to accounts receivable pursuant to documentation reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
Receivables Program
        "" has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
        "" means, with respect to any specified Person, such Person's Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Person's Affiliates.
Related Parties
        "" means, collectively, (a) the AHC Merger, (b) the DAP Merger and (c) the DAP Equity Transfer.
Reorganization
        "" means transition, conversion and integration expenses of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries relating to the Reorganization and bonuses paid for management and other employees of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (including the Subsidiaries acquired in the Reorganization) in connection with the Reorganization.
Reorganization Expenses
        "" means the repurchases by Holdings of its capital stock with the proceeds of Delayed Draw Term Loans.
Repurchases
        "" means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures, Term Loans and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures, outstanding Term Loans and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
        "" means Indebtedness of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, the payment, prepayment, redemption, repurchase or defeasance of which is restricted under Section 6.07(b).
Restricted Indebtedness
        "" means (a) any dividend or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property) with respect to any Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, (b) any payment (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancelation or termination of any such Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or (c) any loans or advances made by the Borrower or any Subsidiary to Holdings.
Restricted Payment
        "" means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
Revolving Availability Period
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lender's Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Revolving Commitments is $200,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
        "" means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lender's Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
Revolving Exposure
        "" means a Lender with a Revolving Commitment or, if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, a Lender with Revolving Exposure.
Revolving Lender
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01(a).
Revolving Loan
        "" means September 30, 2009.
Revolving Maturity Date
        "" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Group, Inc.
S&P
        "" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the Security Agreement.
Secured Parties
        "" means the Security Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit E, among Holdings, the Borrower, the Subsidiary Loan Parties and the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties.
Security Agreement
        "" means the Security Agreement, the Pledge Agreement, the Mortgages and each other security agreement or other instrument or document executed and delivered pursuant to Section 5.12 or 5.13 to secure any of the Obligations.
Security Documents
        "" means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Funded Senior Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Senior Leverage Ratio
        "" means the Senior Subordinated Notes due April 2008 issued by the Borrower on or prior to the Original Effective Date, which Senior Subordinated Notes were redeemed by the Borrower prior to and during April 2003.
Senior Subordinated Notes
        "" means the confidential Lender presentation dated October 5, 2004, relating to Holdings, the Borrower and the Transactions and related projections.
Slide Presentation
        "" means any sale or transfer by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of any Specified Property that is subsequently rented or leased by the Borrower or such Subsidiary; that (a) the consideration for such sale or transfer consists solely of cash and (b) the fair market value of all Specified Properties that are sold or disposed of on or after the Original Effective Date pursuant to such transactions shall not exceed $50,000,000 in the aggregate.
Specified Lease Financing
provided
        "" means any property, real or personal, owned by the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Specified Property
        "" means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject (a) with respect to the Base CD Rate, for new negotiable nonpersonal time deposits in dollars of over $100,000 with maturities approximately equal to three months and (b) with respect to the Adjusted LIBO Rate, for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as "Eurocurrency Liabilities" in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
        "" means all owned and leasehold properties where Inventory owned by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries is sold to the public.
Stores
        "" means, with respect to any Person (the "") at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parent's consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
        "" means any subsidiary of Holdings or the Borrower, as the context requires.
Subsidiary
        "" means any Subsidiary of the Borrower other than any Foreign Subsidiary that, if it were to Guarantee the Obligations, would result in adverse tax consequences to Holdings or the Borrower.
Subsidiary Loan Party
        "" means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
        "" means JPMorgan Chase Bank, in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder or any successor in such capacity pursuant to Section 2.04(d).
Swingline Lender
        "" means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.04.
Swingline Loan
        "" means SunTrust Bank and Wachovia Bank, National Association.
Syndication Agents
        "" means any swap, derivative or other agreement or combination of agreements pursuant to which Holdings, the Borrower or a Subsidiary is or may become obligated to make (a) any payment in connection with a purchase by a third party from a Person other than Holdings, the Borrower or a Subsidiary of any Equity Interest or Restricted Indebtedness or (b) any payment (other than on account of a permitted purchase by it of any Equity Interest or any Restricted Indebtedness) the amount of which is determined by reference to the price or value at any time of any Equity Interest or Restricted Indebtedness; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only to current or former directors, officers, consultants, advisors or employees of Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries (or to their heirs or estates) shall be deemed to be a Synthetic Purchase Agreement.
Synthetic Purchase Agreement
provided
        "" means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
        "" means Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche B Term Loans and Delayed Draw Term Loans.
Term Loans
        "" means, for any day, the secondary market rate for three-month certificates of deposit reported as being in effect on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, the next preceding Business Day) by the Board through the public information telephone line of the Federal Reserve Bank of New York (which rate will, under the current practices of the Board, be published in Federal Reserve Statistical Release H.15(519) during the week following such day) or, if such rate is not so reported on such day or such next preceding Business Day, the average of the secondary market quotations for three-month certificates of deposit of major money center banks in New York City received at approximately 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such day (or, if such day is not a Business Day, on the next preceding Business Day) by the Administrative Agent from three negotiable certificate of deposit dealers of recognized standing selected by it.
Three-Month Secondary CD Rate
        "" means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to all Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries outstanding on such date, excluding Indebtedness described in clauses (e), (f) and (h) of the definition of "Indebtedness"; that any letters of credit and letters of guaranty referred to in clause (h) of the definition "Indebtedness" shall not be excluded from Total Debt to the extent issued to support any other obligations constituting Indebtedness.
Total Debt
provided
        "" means the aggregate principal amount of Delayed Draw Term Loans borrowed by the Borrower during the Delayed Draw Availability Period.
Total Delayed Draw Term Borrowings
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement to make a Tranche A Term Loan on the Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Tranche A Term Loan to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Tranche A Commitment is set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Tranche A Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Tranche A Commitments is $200,000,000.
Tranche A Commitment
        "" means a Lender with a Tranche A Commitment or an outstanding Tranche A Term Loan.
Tranche A Lender
        "" means September 30, 2009.
Tranche A Maturity Date
        "" means a Tranche A Term Loan made pursuant to Section 3 of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Tranche A Term Loan
        "" means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement to make a Tranche B Term Loan on the Effective Date, expressed as an amount representing the maximum principal amount of the Tranche B Term Loan to be made by such Lender, as such commitment may be reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lender's Tranche B Commitment is set forth opposite such Lender's name on Schedule 1 to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Tranche B Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders' Tranche B Commitments is $170,000,000.
Tranche B Commitment
        "" means a Lender with a Tranche B Commitment or an outstanding Tranche B Term Loan.
Tranche B Lender
        "" means September 30, 2010.
Tranche B Maturity Date
        "" means a Tranche B Term Loan made pursuant to Section 3 of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Tranche B Term Loan
        "" has the meaning set forth in the Existing Credit Agreement.
Tranche D Term Loan
        "" has the meaning set forth in the Existing Credit Agreement.
Tranche E Term Loan
        "" means the execution and delivery of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement by each Person party thereto, the satisfaction of the conditions to the effectiveness thereof, and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, including (a) the borrowing of Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche B Term Loans on the Effective Date and the use of the proceeds thereof to prepay all Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans outstanding on the Effective Date, (b) the borrowing of Delayed Draw Term Loans during the Delayed Draw Availability Period and the use of the proceeds thereof to effect the Repurchases and (c) the establishment of the Revolving Commitments to replace the Existing Revolving Commitments.
Transactions
        "", when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans constituting such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
        "" means any van, truck, tractor or trailer (other than a commercial delivery vehicle) that is covered by a certificate of title issued under the laws of any jurisdiction in the United States of America and used in the distribution and delivery of inventory.
Vehicle
        "" means Advance Trucking Corporation, a Virginia corporation, and wholly owned Subsidiary of the Borrower.
Vehicle Subsidiary
        "" means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
        SECTION 1.02. For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Loan") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Loan") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Loan"). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Class (, a "Revolving Borrowing") or by Type (, a "Eurodollar Borrowing") or by Class and Type (, a "Eurodollar Revolving Borrowing").
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
e.g.
        SECTION 1.03. The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words "include", "includes" and "including" shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase "without limitation". The word "will" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word "shall". Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Person's successors and assigns, (c) the words "herein", "hereof" and "hereunder", and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words "asset" and "property" shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally.
        SECTION 1.04. Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Except as otherwise provided herein, all references to a fiscal month shall mean any period of four or five calendar weeks used by the Borrower for recording or reporting its interim financial information.
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.
provided
        SECTION 2.01. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lender's Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lender's Revolving Commitment. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
        (b)     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, each Lender having a Tranche A Commitment made Tranche A Term Loans to the Borrower on the Effective Date in a principal amount equal to its Tranche A Commitment.
        (c)     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, each Lender having a Tranche B Commitment made Tranche B Term Loans to the Borrower on the Effective Date in a principal amount equal to its Tranche B Commitment.
        (d)     Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, each Lender having a Delayed Draw Commitment agrees to make Delayed Draw Term Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Delayed Draw Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding such Lender's Delayed Draw Commitment; that the minimum aggregate principal amount of Delayed Draw Term Loans borrowed on any date shall be $50,000,000.
provided
        (e)     Amounts repaid in respect of Term Loans may not be reborrowed. All Letters of Credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement on the Effective Date shall remain outstanding hereunder on the terms set forth herein.
        SECTION 2.02. (a) Each Loan (other than a Swingline Loan) shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Class and Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments of the applicable Class. The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lender's failure to make Loans as required.
Loans and Borrowings.
provided
        (b)     Subject to Section 2.14, each Revolving Borrowing and Term Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, all Borrowings made on the Effective Date shall be ABR Borrowings. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
        (c)     At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $3,000,000. At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $1,000,000; that (i) an ABR Revolving Borrowing or ABR Delayed Draw Term Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Revolving Commitments or Delayed Draw Commitments, as applicable, and (ii) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $200,000. Borrowings of more than one Type and Class may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 8 Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
        (d)     Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Revolving Maturity Date, Tranche A Maturity Date, Tranche B Maturity Date or Delayed Draw Maturity Date, as applicable.
        SECTION 2.03. To request a Revolving Borrowing, Tranche A Term Borrowing, Tranche B Term Borrowing or Delayed Draw Term Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e) may be given not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Borrowings.
provided
        (i)   the aggregate amount of such Borrowing;
        (ii)   the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
        (iii)    whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
        (iv)   in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period"; and
        (v)   the location and number of the Borrower's account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.06.
        If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lender's Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
        SECTION 2.04. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $30,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Exposures exceeding the total Revolving Commitments; that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
Swingline Loans.
provided
        (b)     To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a credit to the general deposit account of the Borrower with the Swingline Lender (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e), by remittance to the Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
        (c)     The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Revolving Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Revolving Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Revolving Lender, specifying in such notice such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Revolving Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Revolving Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Revolving Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Revolving Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
mutatis
mutandis
        (d)     A Swingline Lender may be replaced by any other Lender at any time that there are no outstanding Swingline Loans by a written agreement among the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and successor Swingline Lender. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Swingline Lender. From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Swingline Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Swingline Lender under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term "Swingline Lender" shall be deemed to refer to such successor Swingline Lender. After the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), the replaced Swingline Lender shall not be required to make any Swingline Loans. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Section 9.04, at no time following the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), may the Swingline Lender as of such time make an assignment or assignments the effect of which would be to reduce its Revolving Commitment to zero.
Replacement of Swingline Lender.
        SECTION 2.05. (a) Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit.
General.
        (b)     To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If there is more than one Issuing Bank, the Borrower may select among the Issuing Banks in connection with the issuance of any Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Bank's standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $70,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
        (c)     Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Revolving Maturity Date.
Expiration Date.
        (d)     By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Revolving Lender, and each Revolving Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lender's Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Bank, such Lender's Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
        (e)     If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of the receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $100,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.04 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrower's obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Revolving Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lender's Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Revolving Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Revolving Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Revolving Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Revolving Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Revolving Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
Reimbursement.
provided
mutatis
mutandis
        (f)     The Borrower's obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision herein or therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrower's obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Bank, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by the Issuing Bank's failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
Obligations Absolute.
provided
        (g)     The Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. The Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the Revolving Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
        (h)     If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.13(c) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Revolving Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest.
provided
        (i)     An Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the successor to such Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.12(c). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued by it thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term "Issuing Bank" shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
Replacement of the Issuing Bank.
        (j)     If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders (or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated, Revolving Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure) demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrower's risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of Revolving Lenders with LC Exposure representing greater than 50% of the total LC Exposure), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
Cash Collateralization.
provided
        (k)     The Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the Effective Date, a schedule identifying all Existing Letters of Credit issued by it. The Issuing Bank also shall notify the Administrative Agent of any LC Disbursement or any expiration, termination or renewal of any Existing Letters of Credit issued by it.
        SECTION 2.06. (a) Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.04. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
provided
        (b)     Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lender's Loan included in such Borrowing.
        SECTION 2.07. (a) Each Revolving Borrowing and Term Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections.
         (b)   To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
         (c)   Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02 and paragraph (f) of this Section:
         (i)   the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
         (ii)   the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
         (iii)    whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
         (iv)    if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term "Interest Period".
        If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one month's duration.
        (d)     Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lender's portion of each resulting Borrowing.
        (e)     If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
        (f)     A Borrowing of any Class may not be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing if after giving effect thereto (i) the Interest Period therefor would commence before and end after a date on which any principal of the Loans of such Class is scheduled to be repaid and (ii) the sum of the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Eurodollar Borrowings of such Class with Interest Periods ending on or prior to such scheduled repayment date plus the aggregate principal amount of outstanding ABR Borrowings of such Class would be less than the aggregate principal amount of Loans of such Class required to be repaid on such scheduled repayment date.
        SECTION 2.08. (a) Unless previously terminated, (i) the Tranche A Commitments and Tranche B Commitments shall terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the Effective Date, (ii) the Delayed Draw Commitments shall terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the last day of the Delayed Draw Availability Period and (iii) the Revolving Commitments shall terminate on the Revolving Maturity Date. The Delayed Draw Commitment of each Lender shall be reduced on the date of each Delayed Draw Term Loan made by such Lender by the amount of such Delayed Draw Term Loan.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments.
        (b)     The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.11, the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
provided
        (c)     The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
provided
        SECTION 2.09. (a) The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Revolving Maturity Date, (ii) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Term Loan of such Lender as provided in Section 2.10 and (iii) to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15th or last day of a calendar month and is at least two Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
provided
        (b)     Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
        (c)     The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Class and Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lender's share thereof.
        (d)     The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
        (e)     Any Lender may request that Loans of any Class made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
        SECTION 2.10. (a) Subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, the Borrower shall repay Tranche A Term Borrowings on each date set forth below in the aggregate principal amount set forth opposite such date:
Amortization of Term Loans.
        (b)     Subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, the Borrower shall repay Tranche B Term Borrowings on each date set forth below in the aggregate principal amount set forth opposite such date:
        (c)     Subject to adjustment pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, the Borrower shall repay Delayed Draw Term Borrowings on each date set forth below in the aggregate principal amount set forth opposite such date (expressed as a percentage of Total Delayed Draw Term Borrowings):
        (d)     To the extent not previously paid, (i) all Tranche A Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Tranche A Maturity Date, (ii) all Tranche B Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Tranche B Maturity Date and (iii) all Delayed Draw Term Loans shall be due and payable on the Delayed Draw Maturity Date.
        (e)     Any prepayment of a Term Borrowing of any Class shall be applied to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section ratably; that any prepayment made pursuant to Section 2.11(a) shall be applied, first, to reduce the next scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section in chronological order, to the extent such repayments are scheduled to be due within 12 months after such prepayment is made, until such next scheduled repayments have been eliminated as a result of reductions hereunder and, second, to reduce the subsequent scheduled repayments of the Term Borrowings of such Class to be made pursuant to this Section ratably.
provided
        (f)     Prior to any repayment of any Term Borrowings of any Class hereunder, the Borrower shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings of the applicable Class to be repaid and shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such selection not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the scheduled date of such repayment; that each repayment of Term Borrowings of any Class shall be applied to repay any outstanding ABR Term Borrowings of such Class before any other Borrowings of such Class. Each repayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the repaid Borrowing. Repayments of Term Borrowings shall be accompanied by accrued interest on the amount repaid.
provided
        SECTION 2.11. (a) The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
        (b)     In the event and on each occasion that any Net Cash Proceeds are received by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Prepayment Event, the Borrower shall, immediately after such Net Cash Proceeds are received, prepay Term Borrowings in accordance with this Section in an aggregate amount equal to such Net Cash Proceeds.
        (c)     Following the end of each fiscal year of the Borrower, commencing with the fiscal year ending December 31, 2005, the Borrower shall prepay Term Borrowings in accordance with this Section in an aggregate amount equal to 50% of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year; that the amount of the prepayment required by this paragraph shall be equal to 25% (instead of 50%) of Excess Cash Flow for such fiscal year if, at the end of such fiscal year, the Senior Leverage Ratio is less than or equal to 1.00 to 1.00. Each prepayment pursuant to this paragraph shall be made on the last day of the first fiscal quarter of the fiscal year following the fiscal year for which Excess Cash Flow is being calculated.
provided
        (d)     Prior to any optional or mandatory prepayment of Borrowings hereunder, the Borrower shall select the Borrowing or Borrowings to be prepaid and shall specify such selection in the notice of such prepayment pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section; that each prepayment of Borrowings of any Class shall be applied to prepay ABR Borrowings of such Class before any other Borrowings of such Class. In the event of any optional or mandatory prepayment of Term Borrowings made at a time when Term Borrowings of more than one Class remain outstanding, the Borrower shall select Term Borrowings to be prepaid so that the aggregate amount of such prepayment is allocated among the Tranche A Term Borrowings, Tranche B Term Borrowings and Delayed Draw Term Borrowings pro rata based on the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Borrowings of each such Class; that, so long as there are any Tranche A Term Borrowings outstanding, any Tranche B Lender or Delayed Draw Lender may elect, by notice to the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) at least one Business Day prior to the prepayment date, to decline all or any portion of any prepayment of its Tranche B Term Loans or Delayed Draw Term Loans, as applicable, pursuant to this Section (other than an optional prepayment pursuant to paragraph (a) of this Section, which may not be declined), in which case the aggregate amount of the prepayment that would have been applied to prepay Tranche B Term Loans or Delayed Draw Term Loans, as applicable, but was so declined shall be applied to prepay Tranche A Term Borrowings. The rights of the Tranche B Lenders and Delayed Draw Lenders under this Section 2.11(d) shall not be changed without the written consent of the Tranche B Lenders or Delayed Draw Lenders, as applicable, holding a majority of the outstanding Tranche B Term Loans or Delayed Draw Term Loans, as applicable.
provided
provided
        (e)     The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date, the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid and, in the case of a mandatory prepayment, a reasonably detailed calculation of the amount of such prepayment; that, if a notice of optional prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.08, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.08. Promptly following receipt of any such notice (other than a notice relating solely to Swingline Loans), the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02, except as necessary to apply fully the required amount of a mandatory prepayment. Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.13.
provided
        SECTION 2.12. (a) The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). For purposes of computing commitment fees, a Revolving Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
Fees.
        (b)     The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Delayed Draw Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the average daily amount of the Delayed Draw Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Delayed Draw Commitments terminate. Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December during the Delayed Draw Availability Period and on the date on which the Delayed Draw Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
        (c)     The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Revolving Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate as interest on Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lender's LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lender's Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to the Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 1/4 of 1% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any LC Exposure, as well as the Issuing Bank's standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to the Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
        (d)     The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
        (e)     All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
        SECTION 2.13. (a) The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
        (b)     The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
        (c)     Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Revolving Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
        (d)     Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and, in the case of Revolving Loans, upon termination of the Revolving Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Revolving Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
        (e)     All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
        SECTION 2.14. If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
        (a)     the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
        (b)     the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
        then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
        SECTION 2.15. Increased Costs. (a) If any Change in Law shall:
         (i)    impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or the Issuing Bank; or
         (ii)    impose on any Lender or the Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
        and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or the Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or the Issuing Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
        (b)     If any Lender or the Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's capital or on the capital of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by the Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's policies and the policies of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's holding company for any such reduction suffered.
        (c)     A certificate of a Lender or the Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or the Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
        (d)     Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or the Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or the Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lender's or the Issuing Bank's intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
        SECTION 2.16. In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan or Term Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.11(e) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.19, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the Eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments.
        SECTION 2.17. (a) Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes.
provided
        (b)     In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
        (c)     The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and the Issuing Bank, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability, and setting forth, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or the Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or the Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
        (d)     As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
        (e)     Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the Code, the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate. Any Foreign Lender which is not a "bank" within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and intends to claim exemption from U.S. Federal withholding tax under Section 871(h) or 881(c) of the Code with respect to payments of "portfolio interest" shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy for the Administrative Agent) a Form W-8BEN, or any subsequent versions thereof or successors thereto (and, if such Foreign Lender delivers a Form W-8BEN, a certificate representing that such Foreign Lender is not a bank for purposes of Section 881(c) of the Code, is not a ten-percent shareholder (within the meaning of Section 871(h)(3)(B) of the Code) of the Borrower and is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Borrower (within the meaning of Section 864(d)(4) of the Code)), properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender claiming complete exemption from, or a reduced rate of, U.S. Federal withholding tax on payments of interest by the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
        (f)     If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.17, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.17 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Nothing contained in this Section 2.17(f) shall require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
provided
        SECTION 2.18. (a) The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.15, 2.16 or 2.17, or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York, except payments to be made directly to the Issuing Bank or Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment under any Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
        (b)     If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
        (c)     If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans, Term Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans, Term Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
        (d)     Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
        (e)     If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.04(c), 2.05(d) or (e), 2.06(b), 2.18(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lender's obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
        SECTION 2.19. (a) If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.15 or 2.17, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
        (b)     If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.15, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.17, or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and, if a Revolving Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Bank and Swingline Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.15 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.17, such assignment will result in a material reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
        Each of Holdings and the Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders on the Effective Date and on each date thereafter as required under any Loan Document that:
        SECTION 3.01. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
        SECTION 3.02.   The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Party's corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each of Holdings and the Borrower and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of Holdings, the Borrower or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors' rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability.
        SECTION 3.03.   The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect and except filings necessary to perfect Liens created under the Loan Documents or (ii) where the failure to obtain such consent or approval or make such registration or filing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries, except Liens created under the Loan Documents.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
        SECTION 3.04. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2004, reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants, (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended July 17, 2004, certified by one of its Financial Officers and (iii) as of the end of and for each fiscal month ended after the end of the fiscal quarter ended July 17, 2004 and prior to the date 30 days prior to the Effective Date, certified by one of its Financial Officers. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Holdings and its consolidated subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to customary year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clauses (ii) and (iii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
        (b)     Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto or in the Slide Presentation and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of Holdings, the Borrower or their Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities.
        (c)     Since January 3, 2004, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
        SECTION 3.05. (a) Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business (including its Mortgaged Properties), except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes.
Properties.
        (b)     Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
        (c)     The Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent a schedule setting forth the address of each real property that is owned or leased by Holdings or any of its Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.
        (d)     As of the Effective Date, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries has received notice of, or has knowledge of, any pending or contemplated condemnation proceeding affecting any Mortgaged Property or any sale or disposition thereof in lieu of condemnation. Neither any Mortgaged Property nor any interest therein is subject to any right of first refusal, option or other contractual right to purchase such Mortgaged Property or interest therein (other than options to purchase any such Mortgaged Property leased by the Borrower as lessee).
        SECTION 3.06. (a) There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
        (b)     Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
        (c)     Since December 5, 2003, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
        SECTION 3.07. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
        SECTION 3.08. Neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries is (a) an "investment company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940 or (b) a "holding company" as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Public Utility Holding Company Act of 1935.
Investment and Holding Company Status.
        SECTION 3.09. Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
        SECTION 3.10. No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
ERISA.
        SECTION 3.11. Holdings and the Borrower have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to any of them, that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Slide Presentation nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of any Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, Holdings and the Borrower represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure.
provided
        SECTION 3.12. Holdings does not have any Subsidiaries other than the Borrower and the Borrower's Subsidiaries. Schedule 3.12 sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Borrower in, each Subsidiary of the Borrower and identifies each Subsidiary that is a Subsidiary Loan Party, in each case as of the Effective Date.
Subsidiaries.
        SECTION 3.13. Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date. As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
Insurance.
        SECTION 3.14. As of the Effective Date, there are no strikes, lockouts or slowdowns against Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary pending or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened. Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries have not been in material violation of the Fair Labor Standards Act or any other applicable Federal, state, local or foreign law dealing with the hours worked by or payments made to employees or any similar matters. All payments due from Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or for which any claim may be made against Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, on account of wages and employee health and welfare insurance and other benefits, have been paid or accrued as a liability on the books of Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, except where the failure to pay such liability individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The consummation of the Transactions will not give rise to any right of termination or right of renegotiation on the part of any union under any collective bargaining agreement to which Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary is bound.
Labor Matters.
        SECTION 3.15. Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date, and each Loan made during the Delayed Draw Availability Period to finance any Repurchases and after giving effect to the application of the proceeds of such Loans, (a) the fair value of the assets of each Loan Party, at a fair valuation, will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) each Loan Party will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) each Loan Party will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
Solvency.
        SECTION 3.16. [Intentionally Omitted].
        SECTION 3.17. (a) The Pledge Agreement is effective to create in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined in the Pledge Agreement) and, when such Collateral is delivered to the Collateral Agent, the Pledge Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected first priority Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of each pledgor thereunder in such Collateral, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person.
Security Documents.
        (b)     The Security Agreement is effective to create in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable security interest in the Collateral (as defined in the Security Agreement) and, when financing statements in appropriate form are filed in the offices specified on Schedule 6 to the Perfection Certificate, the Security Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the grantors thereunder in such Collateral other than the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Security Agreement), to the extent that a security interest can be perfected in such Collateral by filing, recording or registering a financing statement or analogous document in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law in such jurisdiction, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, other than with respect to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
        (c)     When the Security Agreement is filed in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office, the Security Agreement shall constitute a fully perfected Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in the Intellectual Property (as defined in the Security Agreement) in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registering a security agreement, financing statement or analogous document in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person other than Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02 (it being understood that subsequent recordings in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office may be necessary to perfect a Lien on registered trademarks, trademark applications and copyrights acquired by the Loan Parties after the Effective Date).
        (d)     The Mortgages are effective to create, subject to the exceptions listed in each title insurance policy covering such Mortgage (or, in the case of the Mortgages with respect to each Mortgaged Property set forth on Schedule 1.01(b) and identified with an asterisk, subject to Permitted Encumbrances), in favor of the Collateral Agent, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a legal, valid and enforceable Lien on all of the Loan Parties' right, title and interest in and to the Mortgaged Properties thereunder and the proceeds thereof, and when the Mortgages are filed in the offices specified on Schedule 3.17, the Mortgages shall constitute a Lien on, and security interest in, all right, title and interest of the Loan Parties in such Mortgaged Properties and the proceeds thereof, in each case prior and superior in right to any other Person, other than with respect to the rights of Persons pursuant to Liens expressly permitted by Section 6.02.
        SECTION 4.01. [Intentionally Omitted].
        SECTION 4.02. The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of the Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
        (a)     The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, except for representations and warranties expressly made as of an earlier date, which shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
        (b)     At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
        Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by Holdings and the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
        Until the Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
        SECTION 5.01. Financial Statements and Other Information. Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
        (a)     within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings' audited consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a "going concern" or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit or other material qualification or exception) to the effect that such consolidated and consolidating financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated and consolidating basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
        (b)     within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings' consolidated and consolidating balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated and consolidating basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
        (c)     within 30 days after the end of each month (other than the last month) of each fiscal quarter of Holdings, Holdings' consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders' equity as of the end of and for such fiscal month and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
        (d)     concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth a reasonably detailed calculation of the Leverage Ratio as of the end of the period covered by such financial statements, (iii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.12, 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 and (iv) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of Holdings' audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
        (e)     concurrently with any delivery of financial statements under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
        (f)     as soon as the same are complete, but in no event more that 60 days after the commencement of each fiscal year of Holdings, a detailed consolidated budget presented on a quarterly basis for such fiscal year (including a projected consolidated balance sheet and related statements of projected operations and cash flow as of the end of and for such fiscal year) and, promptly when available, any significant revisions of such budget;
        (g)     promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by Holdings to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
        (h)     promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
        (i)     promptly upon the occurrence of any change of rating of the Index Debt by Moody's or S&P, a certificate of a Financial Officer setting forth the new rating, the effective date thereof and, if applicable, notice of any change in the Applicable Rate as a result thereof; and
        (j)     promptly after the same are furnished to the Borrower, copies of any "Management Letter" delivered to Holdings and the Borrower by their independent certified public accountants in connection with the delivery of financial statements contemplated by Section 5.01(a) if such Letter discloses any material weaknesses in internal financial controls or other material concerns relating to the financial statements identified by such accountants.
        SECTION 5.02. Upon Holdings or the Borrower obtaining knowledge thereof, Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
        (a)     the occurrence of any Default;
        (b)     the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
        (c)     the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $1,000,000; and
        (d)     any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
        Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of Holdings or the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
        SECTION 5.03. (a) Holdings or the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent prompt written notice of any change (i) in any Loan Party's corporate name, (ii) in the jurisdiction of incorporation or organization of any Loan Party, (iii) in any office in which any Loan Party maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it or (iv) in any Loan Party's Organizational Identification Number. Holdings and the Borrower agree not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the Uniform Commercial Code or otherwise that are required in order for the Administrative Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected security interest in all the Collateral. Holdings and the Borrower also agree promptly to notify the Administrative Agent if any material portion of the Collateral is damaged or destroyed.
Information Regarding Collateral.
        (b)     Each year, at the time of delivery of annual financial statements with respect to the preceding fiscal year pursuant to clause (a) of Section 5.01, Holdings or the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent a certificate of a Financial Officer of Holdings or the Borrower (i) setting forth the information required pursuant to Section 2 of the Perfection Certificate or confirming that there has been no change in such information since the date of the Perfection Certificate delivered on the Effective Date or the date of the most recent certificate delivered pursuant to this Section and (ii) certifying that all Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings, as applicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations, including all refilings, rerecordings and reregistrations, containing a description of the Collateral have been filed of record in each governmental, municipal or other appropriate office in each jurisdiction identified pursuant to clause (i) above to the extent necessary to protect and perfect the security interests under the Security Agreement for a period of not less than 18 months after the date of such certificate (except as noted therein with respect to any continuation statements to be filed within such period).
        SECTION 5.04. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
        SECTION 5.05. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings, (b) Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
        SECTION 5.06. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
        SECTION 5.07. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies (i) adequate insurance for its insurable properties, all to such extent and against such risks, including fire, casualty and other risks insured against by extended coverage, as is customary with companies in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations, (ii) such other insurance as is required pursuant to the terms of any Security Document and (iii) business interruption insurance, insuring against loss of gross earnings for a period of not less than 12 months arising from any risks or occurrences required to be covered by insurance pursuant to this Section 5.07.
Insurance.
        (b)     Fire and extended coverage policies maintained with respect to any Collateral shall be endorsed or otherwise amended to include (i) a non-contributing mortgage clause (regarding improvements to real property) and lenders' loss payable clause (regarding personal property), in each case in favor of the Administrative Agent and providing for losses thereunder to be payable to the Administrative Agent or its designee, (ii) a provision to the effect that neither the Borrower, the Administrative Agent nor any other party shall be a coinsurer and (iii) such other provisions as the Administrative Agent may reasonably require from time to time to protect the interests of the Lenders. Commercial general liability policies shall be endorsed to name the Administrative Agent as an additional insured. Business interruption policies shall name the Administrative Agent as loss payee. Each such policy referred to in this paragraph also shall provide that it shall not be canceled, modified or not renewed (i) by reason of nonpayment of premium except upon not less than 10 days' prior written notice thereof by the insurer to the Administrative Agent (giving the Administrative Agent the right to cure defaults in the payment of premiums) or (ii) for any other reason except upon not less than 30 days' prior written notice thereof by the insurer to the Administrative Agent. Holdings or the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, prior to the cancelation, modification or nonrenewal of any such policy of insurance, a copy of a renewal or replacement policy (or other evidence of renewal of a policy previously delivered to the Administrative Agent) together with evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent of payment of the premium therefor.
        SECTION 5.08. (a) Holdings or the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders prompt written notice of any casualty or other insured damage to any material portion of any Collateral or the commencement of any action or proceeding for the taking of any Collateral or any part thereof or interest therein under power of eminent domain or by condemnation or similar proceeding.
Casualty and Condemnation.
        (b)     If any event described in paragraph (a) of this Section results in Net Cash Proceeds (whether in the form of insurance proceeds, condemnation award or otherwise), the Administrative Agent is authorized to collect such Net Cash Proceeds and, if received by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, such Net Cash Proceeds shall be paid over the Administrative Agent; provided that (i) if the aggregate Net Cash Proceeds in respect of such event (other than proceeds of business income insurance) are less than $5,000,000, such Net Cash Proceeds shall be paid over to Holdings or the Borrower unless a Default has occurred and is continuing, and (ii) all proceeds of business income insurance shall be paid over to the Borrower unless a Default has occurred and is continuing. All such Net Cash Proceeds retained by or paid over to the Administrative Agent shall be held by the Administrative Agent and released from time to time to pay the costs of repairing, restoring or replacing the affected property in accordance with the terms of the applicable Security Document, subject to the provisions of the applicable Security Document regarding application of such Net Cash Proceeds during a Default.
        (c)     If any Net Cash Proceeds retained by or paid over to the Administrative Agent as provided above continue to be held by the Administrative Agent on the date that is 360 days (or, in the case of a distribution center, two years, that repair, restoration or replacement commenced within 270 days after the occurrence of such event) after the occurrence of the event resulting in such Net Cash Proceeds, then such Net Cash Proceeds shall be applied to prepay Term Borrowings as provided in Section 2.11(b).
provided
        SECTION 5.09. Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights.
        (a)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; that the Borrower shall be given the opportunity to be present at any discussion with its independent accountants.
provided
        (b)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent (including any consultants, accountants, lawyers and appraisers retained by the Administrative Agent) to conduct evaluations and appraisals of (i) the inventory of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries and (ii) the systems providing for the monitoring and reporting of such inventory, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested. The Borrower shall pay the reasonable fees and expenses of any representatives retained by the Administrative Agent to conduct any such evaluation or appraisal (including the fees and expenses associated with the services performed by the Administrative Agent's collateral monitoring department); that the Borrower shall not be required to pay such fees and expenses for more than one such evaluation or appraisal during any calendar year unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing.
provided
        SECTION 5.10. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
        SECTION 5.11. The proceeds of the Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche B Term Loans will be used (a) to prepay all Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans outstanding on the Effective Date (other than any Tranche D Term Loans and Tranche E Term Loans that have been exchanged for Tranche B Term Loans pursuant to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement), (b) to repay all Revolving Loans under the Existing Credit Agreement outstanding on the Effective Date and (c) to the extent such proceeds exceed the payments referred to in clauses (a) and (b), for general corporate purposes. The proceeds of the Delayed Draw Term Loans will be used to effect the Repurchases (or to refinance Revolving Loans incurred for such purpose). The proceeds of the Revolving Loans and Swingline Loans will be used only for general corporate purposes. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations U and X. Letters of Credit will be issued only for general corporate purposes.
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit.
        SECTION 5.12. If any additional Subsidiary is formed or acquired after the Effective Date, Holdings and the Borrower will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof and (a) if such Subsidiary is a Subsidiary Loan Party, Holdings and the Borrower will cause such Subsidiary to become a party to the Guarantee Agreement, the Indemnity Subrogation and Contribution Agreement and each applicable Security Document in the manner provided therein within three Business Days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired and promptly take such actions to create and perfect Liens on such Subsidiary's assets (other than commercial delivery vehicles and leasehold interests in Stores) to secure the Obligations as the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders shall reasonably request and (b) if any Equity Interests or Indebtedness of such Subsidiary are owned by or on behalf of any Loan Party, Holdings and the Borrower will cause such Equity Interests and promissory notes evidencing such Indebtedness to be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement within three Business Days after such Subsidiary is formed or acquired (except that, if such Subsidiary is a Foreign Subsidiary and is not a Subsidiary Loan Party, Equity Interests of such Subsidiary to be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement may be limited to 65% of the outstanding voting Equity Interests of such Subsidiary).
Additional Subsidiaries.
        SECTION 5.13. (a) Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each Subsidiary Loan Party to, execute any and all further documents, financing statements, agreements and instruments, and take all such further actions (including the filing and recording of financing statements, fixture filings, mortgages, deeds of trust and other documents), which may be required under any applicable law, or which the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders may reasonably request, to effectuate the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents or to grant, preserve, protect or perfect the Liens created or intended to be created by the Security Documents or the validity or priority of any such Lien, all at the expense of the Loan Parties. Holdings and the Borrower also agree to provide to the Administrative Agent, from time to time upon request, evidence reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent as to the perfection and priority of the Liens created or intended to be created by the Security Documents.
Further Assurances.
        (b)     If any material assets (including any real property or improvements thereto or any interest therein) are acquired by the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party after the Effective Date (other than assets constituting Collateral under the Security Agreement that become subject to the Lien of the Security Agreement upon acquisition thereof), the Borrower will notify the Administrative Agent and the Lenders thereof, and, if requested by the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders, the Borrower will cause such assets to be subjected to a Lien securing the Obligations and will take, and cause the Subsidiary Loan Parties to take, such actions as shall be necessary or reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to grant and perfect such Liens, including actions described in paragraph (a) of this Section, all at the expense of the Loan Parties; that the foregoing shall not require the Borrower to grant a Lien on assets constituting commercial delivery vehicles, leasehold interests in Stores or Vehicles owned by the Vehicle Subsidiary.
provided
        SECTION 5.14. The Borrower shall enter into and maintain Collection Deposit Letter Agreements for Collection Deposit Accounts representing the collections of Stores which account for no less than 80% of Consolidated EBITDA for the fiscal year most recently ended. The Borrower will use its reasonable best efforts to enter into and maintain Collection Deposit Agreements for all other Collection Deposit Accounts.
Collection Deposit Accounts.
        SECTION 5.15. [Intentionally Omitted].
        SECTION 5.16. As promptly as practicable, and in any event no later than 120 days after the Effective Date, the Borrower will enter into, and thereafter for a period of not less than 15 months will maintain in effect, one or more interest rate protection agreements on such terms and with such parties as shall be reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent, the effect of which shall be to fix or limit the interest cost to the Borrower with respect to 25% of the outstanding Term Loans.
Interest Rate Protection.
        Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
        SECTION 6.01. Indebtedness; Certain Equity Securities. (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness, except:
         (i)    Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
         (ii)    Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness;
         (iii)    Indebtedness of the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower and of any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party to the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04;
provided
         (iv)    Guarantees by the Borrower of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower and by any Subsidiary of the Borrower of Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that (A) the Indebtedness so guaranteed is permitted by this Section and (B) Guarantees by the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party of Indebtedness of any Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be subject to Section 6.04;
provided
         (v)    Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets after the Effective Date, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (A) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (B) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (v) (and that is not listed in Schedule 6.01) shall not exceed $75,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
         (vi)    Indebtedness of (A) any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition to the extent that such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary, (B) the Borrower or a Subsidiary to the extent that such Indebtedness is assumed in connection with a Permitted Acquisition made by the Borrower or such Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of such Permitted Acquisition and (C) the Borrower in respect of unsecured promissory notes issued as consideration for Permitted Acquisitions; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (vi) shall be subject to the limitations set forth in clause (h) of Section 6.04;
provided
         (vii)    other unsecured Indebtedness of the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $20,000,000 at any time outstanding;
         (viii)    Receivables Indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $45,000,000 at any time outstanding; and
         (ix)    DVA Obligations in an aggregate amount at any time outstanding not exceeding (A) $100,000,000 at any time on or prior to June 30, 2005, (B) $150,000,000 at any time thereafter until and including June 30, 2006, and (C) $200,000,000 at any time thereafter.
         (b)    Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness except (i) Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness, and (ii) Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents.
         (c)    Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, issue any preferred stock or other preferred Equity Interests or be or become liable in respect of any obligation (contingent or otherwise) to purchase, redeem, retire, acquire or make any other payment in respect of any Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or any option, warrant or other right to acquire any such Equity Interests; that the foregoing shall not be construed to prohibit Restricted Payments permitted by Section 6.07(a).
provided
        SECTION 6.02. (a) The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
         (i)    Liens created under the Loan Documents;
         (ii)    Permitted Encumbrances;
         (iii)    any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
         (iv)    any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; that (A) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (B) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (C) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
         (v)    Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date; that (A) such security interests secure Indebtedness permitted by clause (v) of Section 6.01(a), (B) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (C) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost (including design, engineering, sales taxes, delivery, installation and other similar costs) of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (D) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; and
provided
         (vi)    Liens arising under any Receivables Program on accounts receivables sold or transferred to Persons other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries pursuant to such Receivables Program.
         (b)    Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it (other than Excluded Margin Stock), or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect thereof, except Liens created under the Security Documents and Permitted Encumbrances.
        SECTION 6.03. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may merge into any Subsidiary Loan Party in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary Loan Party, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders and (iv) any Subsidiary may merge with another entity to implement a Permitted Acquisition; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04.
Fundamental Changes.
provided
        (b)     The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
        (c)     Holdings will not engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of all the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Borrower and activities incidental thereto. Holdings will not own or acquire any assets (other than shares of capital stock of the Borrower, cash, promissory notes held pursuant to clause (g) of Section 6.04 and Permitted Investments) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities under the Loan Documents, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities). Holdings will not have any Subsidiaries, other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries.
        SECTION 6.04.  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
        (a)     Permitted Investments;
        (b)     investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04, to the extent such investments would not be permitted under any other clause of this Section;
        (c)     investments in the Equity Interests of their respective Subsidiaries; that (i) any such Equity Interests held by a Loan Party shall be pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement (subject to the limitations applicable to Equity Interests of a Foreign Subsidiary referred to in Section 5.12) and (ii) the aggregate amount of investments in, and loans and advances to, and Guarantees of Indebtedness of, Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall not exceed $1,000,000 in the aggregate at any time outstanding;
provided
        (d)     loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower (or to Holdings, but only as permitted by Section 6.07) and made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that (i) any such loans and advances made by a Loan Party shall be evidenced by a promissory note pledged pursuant to the Pledge Agreement and (ii) the amount of all such loans and advances by Loan Parties to Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c)(ii) above;
provided
        (e)     Guarantees constituting Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01; that (i) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness of Subsidiaries that are not Loan Parties Guaranteed by any Loan Party shall be subject to the limitation set forth in clause (c)(ii) above and (ii) a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall not Guarantee any Indebtedness of any Loan Party;
provided
        (f)     investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
        (g)     promissory notes received from employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries evidencing loans made for the purpose of permitting such employees to purchase capital stock of Holdings in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
        (h)     Permitted Acquisitions; that (i) the consideration for each Permitted Acquisition shall consist solely of cash, shares of common stock of Holdings, the assumption of Indebtedness of the acquired Person or encumbering the acquired assets, Indebtedness referred to in clauses (vi) and (vii) of Section 6.01(a) or a combination thereof and (ii) the sum of all Indebtedness so assumed or otherwise resulting from Permitted Acquisitions (including Indebtedness referred to in clauses (vi) and (vii) of Section 6.01(a)) plus the cash consideration paid in connection with Permitted Acquisitions (other than cash consideration received as Net Cash Proceeds from the issuance by Holdings of additional shares of its common stock to finance Permitted Acquisitions, as contemplated by clause (c)(ii) of the definition of "Prepayment Event"), minus the book value (determined, in respect of each Permitted Acquisition, as of the date of consummation thereof) of all cash, cash equivalents, prepaid expenses, inventory and accounts receivable acquired pursuant to Permitted Acquisitions, shall not exceed, during any fiscal year of the Borrower, when aggregated with the sum of all Capital Expenditures during such fiscal year, the amount permitted for such fiscal year pursuant to Section 6.12;
provided
        (i)     loans or advances to employees in the ordinary course of business; that the aggregate amount of all loans and advances permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed $750,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
        (j)     other investments in an aggregate amount not exceeding $2,000,000 at any time outstanding;
        (k)     obligations of management to the Borrower in connection with split dollar life insurance policies; that the aggregate amount of all obligations permitted by this clause (k) shall not exceed $1,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
        (l)     promissory notes contemplated by clauses (ii), (iii), (iv) and (v) of the proviso to Section 6.05; and
        (m)     investments incurred in connection with Deferred Compensation Obligations.
        SECTION 6.05. The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, sell, transfer, lease or otherwise dispose of any asset, including any Equity Interests, nor will the Borrower permit any of its Subsidiaries to issue any additional Equity Interests in such Subsidiary, except:
Asset Sales.
        (a)     sales of inventory, used or surplus equipment and Permitted Investments in the ordinary course of business;
        (b)     (i) sales, transfers, leases and dispositions to the Borrower or a Subsidiary, that any such sales, transfers, leases or dispositions involving a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party shall be made in compliance with Section 6.08, and (ii) issuances of additional Equity Interests by any Subsidiary to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary (except that a Subsidiary Loan Party may not issue additional Equity Interests to a Subsidiary that is not a Loan Party), that any such issuances shall be made in compliance with Section 6.04;
provided
provided
        (c)     sales, transfers and dispositions of assets (other than Equity Interests of a Subsidiary) that are not permitted by any other clause of this Section; that the aggregate fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of in reliance upon this clause (c) shall not exceed $20,000,000 during any fiscal year of the Borrower and $75,000,000 in the aggregate after the Effective Date;
provided
        (d)     the Borrower may sell or otherwise convey accounts receivable pursuant to and in accordance with any Receivables Program;
        (e)     sales of fixed or capital assets made pursuant to sale and lease-back transactions permitted under Section 6.11;
        (f)     sales, transfers and dispositions of assets constituting Permitted Asset Swaps;
        (g)     sales, transfers and other dispositions of property identified on Schedule 6.05; that the fair market value of all assets sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of pursuant to this clause (g) shall not exceed, on a cumulative basis from the Effective Date, $35,000,000;
provided
        (h)     [intentionally omitted]; and
        (i)     sales of assets which as of the Original Effective Date were owned by Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc., a Delaware corporation, Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation or WASCO Insurance Agency, Inc., a Missouri corporation or which constitute the Western Auto Wholesale Network, Western Auto Specialty Stores or rights with respect to Western Auto Dealer Stores or of the capital stock of any Subsidiary of the Borrower substantially all the assets of which at the time of such sale are assets permitted to be sold pursuant to this clause (i);
that all sales, transfers, leases and other dispositions permitted hereby (other than those permitted by clause (b) above) shall be made for fair value and solely for cash consideration, except that (i) consideration for Permitted Asset Swaps may consist of non-cash consideration as contemplated by the definition of such term, (ii) up to 30% of the aggregate consideration for transactions permitted by clause (i) above may consist of promissory notes, (iii) in the case of distribution centers (other than the distribution centers listed on Schedule 1.01(a)), up to 30% of the aggregate consideration for transactions permitted by clause (g) above may consist of promissory notes, (iv) in the case of the distribution centers listed on Schedule 1.01(a), up to 100% of the aggregate consideration for the sale, transfer or other disposition of such property permitted by clause (g) above may consist of a promissory note, and (v) up to 10% of the aggregate consideration for transactions (other than those involving distribution centers) permitted by clause (g) above may consist of promissory notes.
provided
        SECTION 6.06. The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, enter into any Hedging Agreement, other than Hedging Agreements entered into in the ordinary course of business to (a) hedge or mitigate risks to which the Borrower or any Subsidiary is exposed in the conduct of its business or the management of its liabilities and (b) effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of the Borrower or any Subsidiary, that in the case of clause (b), any such agreement must be in compliance with Section 5.16.
Hedging Agreements.
provided
        SECTION 6.07. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, declare or make, or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any Restricted Payment, except:
Restricted Payments; Certain Payments of Indebtedness.
         (i)    Holdings may declare and pay dividends with respect to its capital stock payable solely in additional shares of its common stock;
         (ii)    Subsidiaries of the Borrower may make Restricted Payments to the Borrower and to wholly owned Subsidiaries of the Borrower and may declare and pay dividends ratably with respect to their Equity Interests;
         (iii)    if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower may pay dividends or make loans to Holdings at such times and in such amounts, not exceeding $1,000,000 during any fiscal year, as shall be necessary to permit Holdings to discharge its permitted liabilities;
         (iv)    Holdings may make Restricted Payments pursuant to and in accordance with stock option plans or other benefit plans for management or employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries, including the redemption or purchase of shares of common stock of Holdings held by former employees of Holdings or any Subsidiary following the termination of their employment, if (A) at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing and (B) after giving effect to any such Restricted Payment, the aggregate cumulative amount of Restricted Payments made pursuant to this clause (iv) shall not exceed the sum of (1) $2,000,000 during any fiscal year or (2) $10,000,000 in the aggregate from the Effective Date, plus the amount of Net Cash Proceeds received by Holdings and its Subsidiaries after the Effective Date and prior to making such Restricted Payment from the issuance of additional shares of its common stock to members of management or employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries; that the promissory notes permitted under Section 6.04(g) may be forgiven or returned without regard to the limitation in clause (B) above and the forgiveness or return thereof shall not be treated as Restricted Payments for purposes of determining compliance with such clause (B) above;
provided
         (v)    the Borrower may pay cash dividends or make loans to Holdings in such amounts and at such times as Holdings makes Restricted Payments permitted by clause (iv) above and clause (vii) below;
         (vi)    if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, the Borrower may pay dividends or make loans to Holdings in such amounts and at such times as required to permit Holdings to pay, as and when due, income taxes payable by Holdings with respect to the consolidated, combined tax filing group that includes the Borrower and its Subsidiaries; that dividends or loans pursuant to this clause (vi) shall not at any time exceed the amount of income taxes that would then be payable by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries if the Borrower and its Subsidiaries were not a part of a consolidated, combined tax filing group with Holdings or any other Person;
provided
         (vii)    if at the time thereof and after giving effect thereto no Default has occurred and is continuing, Holdings may make Restricted Payments in cash from time to time after the Effective Date in addition to those otherwise permitted under this Section 6.07(a); that after giving effect to each Restricted Payment made under this clause (vii), (A) the cumulative amount of all such Restricted Payments does not exceed the sum of (1) $250,000,000 (2) (in the case of any Restricted Payments made after financial statements are available for the fiscal year ending on or after December 31, 2004), during any fiscal year, 50% of Consolidated Net Income for the immediately preceding fiscal year; that if any Restricted Payments are made in any fiscal year in reliance upon this clause (vii) prior to the date that financial statements for the immediately preceding fiscal year have been made available pursuant to Section 5.01, (x) such Restricted Payments must be made in reliance upon clause (1) above when made, but (y) upon such financial statements becoming available, such Restricted Payments shall be deemed made in reliance upon clause (2) above (and not clause (1) above) to the extent that such Restricted Payments do not exceed 50% of Consolidated Net Income for the immediately preceding fiscal year; and (B) the Borrower shall be in compliance on a pro forma basis with Sections 6.13, 6.14, 6.15 and 6.17 after giving effect to such Restricted Payment; and (C) the Leverage Ratio, calculated on a pro forma basis, shall be less than 2.00 to 1.00.
provided
plus
provided
         (b)    Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, make or agree to pay or make, directly or indirectly, any payment or other distribution (whether in cash securities or other property) in respect of principal of or interest on any Indebtedness, or any payment or other distribution (whether in cash, securities or other property), including any sinking fund or similar deposit, on account of the purchase, redemption, retirement, acquisition, cancelation or termination of any Indebtedness, except:
         (i)    payment of Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents;
         (ii)    payment of interest, stated premiums and principal payments in respect of any Indebtedness;
         (iii)    refinancings of Indebtedness to the extent permitted by Section 6.01;
         (iv)    payment of secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness; and
         (v)    payment of intercompany Indebtedness between or among the Borrower and its Subsidiaries permitted under clause (iii) of Section 6.01(a) and payment of Indebtedness permitted under clauses (vii) and (viii) of Section 6.01(a);
         (c)    Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into or be party to, or make any payment under, any Synthetic Purchase Agreement unless (i) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement related to any Equity Interest of Holdings, the payments required to be made by Holdings are limited to amounts permitted to be paid under Section 6.07(a), (ii) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement related to any Restricted Indebtedness, the payments required to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries thereunder are limited to the amount permitted under Section 6.07(b) and (iii) in the case of any Synthetic Purchase Agreement, the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries thereunder are subordinated to the Obligations on terms satisfactory to the Required Lenders.
        SECTION 6.08. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, sell, lease or otherwise transfer any property or assets to, or purchase, lease or otherwise acquire any property or assets from, or otherwise engage in any other transactions with, any of its Affiliates, except (a) transactions that do not involve Holdings and are at prices and on terms and conditions not less favorable to the Borrower or such Subsidiary than could be obtained on an arm's-length basis from unrelated third parties, that the Borrower delivers to the Administrative Agent (i) with respect to any transaction or series of related transactions involving aggregate consideration in excess of $2,000,000, a resolution of the Borrower's board of directors set forth in an officers' certificate certifying that such transaction complies with this clause (a) and that such transaction has been approved by a majority of the disinterested members of the Borrower's board of directors and (ii) with respect to any transaction or series of related transactions involving aggregate consideration in excess of $10,000,000, an opinion as to the fairness to the Lenders of such transaction from a financial point of view issued by an accounting, appraisal or investment banking firm of national standing, (b) transactions between or among the Borrower and its Subsidiaries that are Subsidiary Loan Parties which do not involve any other Affiliate, (c) any Restricted Payment permitted by Section 6.07, (d) loans to management of Holdings or the Borrower permitted by clause (g) of Section 6.04, (e) payments made under and in accordance with agreements in effect on the Effective Date and specified in Schedule 6.08 (without giving effect to any amendment or modification thereof that has not been approved by the Required Lenders), (f) any employment agreements, stock option or other compensation agreements or plans (and the payment of amounts or the issuance of securities thereunder) and other reasonable fees, compensation, benefits and indemnities paid or entered into by Holdings or any of its Subsidiaries in the ordinary course of business of Holdings or such Subsidiary to or with the officers, directors or employees of Holdings or its Subsidiaries and (g) sales of common stock of Holdings, when such sales are exclusively for cash.
Transactions with Affiliates.
provided
        SECTION 6.09. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any shares of its capital stock or to make or repay loans or advances to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.09 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases or other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
        SECTION 6.10. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, amend, modify or waive any of its rights under (a) any agreement specified in Schedule 6.08, (b) its certificate of incorporation, by-laws or other organizational documents or (c) the documents governing any Receivables Program or the documents governing the McDuffie County industrial revenue bonds, except amendments and modification to agreements and documents referred to in clauses (b) and (c) shall be permitted to the extent that the cumulative effect of all such amendments and modifications does not have a Material Adverse Effect or a material adverse effect on the interests of the Lenders; that amendments and modifications to documents governing Receivables Programs that have a monetary effect on the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries shall be deemed not to have a Material Adverse Effect or adversely affect the Lenders in any material respect so long as the cumulative net monetary effect of such amendments and modifications does not exceed $5,000,000 from the Effective Date (compared to the monetary effect of the existing Receivables Programs).
Amendment of Material Documents.
provided
        SECTION 6.11. Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any Person whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property which it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred, except for (a) any such sale and leaseback of property involving the sale of fixed or capital assets (other than those acquired pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition), at a price not less than the cost thereof, that is consummated within 270 days after the date that such assets are acquired and (b) Specified Lease Financings.
Sale and Lease-Back Transactions.
        SECTION 6.12. The Borrower will not permit the sum of (a) the aggregate amount of Capital Expenditures made by the Borrower and the Subsidiaries in any fiscal year (excluding those permitted by the last paragraph of this Section 6.12), plus (b) all amounts that are to be aggregated with Capital Expenditures for such fiscal year as provided in clause (h) of Section 6.04 (the sum of the amounts referred to in clauses (a) and (b) being referred to as ""), to exceed the amount set forth below opposite such year; , that the Restricted Expenditures in any fiscal year (the "") may be increased by an amount (not exceeding $25,000,000) equal to the excess, if any, of the amount set forth below under "Amount" for the fiscal year referred to below immediately preceding the Pending Fiscal Year, minus the Restricted Expenditures for such immediately preceding fiscal year:
Capital Expenditures.
Restricted Expenditures
provided
Pending Fiscal Year
        The Borrower and the Subsidiaries may make additional Capital Expenditures not included in the foregoing provisions of this Section; that (i) such Capital Expenditures are made for the purpose of constructing Stores to be sold pursuant to sale leaseback transactions permitted by clause (a) of Section 6.11 and (ii) the aggregate amount of such Capital Expenditures allowed under this paragraph shall be limited to the sum of (A) $20,000,000 plus (B) the Net Cash Proceeds received by the Borrower or the Subsidiaries from such sale leaseback transactions.
provided
        SECTION 6.13. Leverage Ratio. The Borrower will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date to be in excess of 2.00 to 1.00.
        SECTION 6.14. The Borrower will not permit the Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio as of the last day of any fiscal quarter to be less than 3.50 to 1.00.
Consolidated Interest Expense Coverage Ratio.
        SECTION 6.15. The Borrower will not permit the ratio of (a) Current Assets to (b) Funded Senior Debt, in each case as of the end of any fiscal quarter, to be less than 1.75 to 1.00.
Current Assets to Funded Senior Debt Ratio.
        SECTION 6.16. (a) Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary (other than the Vehicle Subsidiary) to, own, purchase, acquire or hold title to, any Vehicle.
Purchase and Sale of Vehicles; Vehicle Subsidiary.
        (b)     The Vehicle Subsidiary will not engage in any business or activity other than acquiring, owning and disposing of Vehicles used in the business of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries, and activities incidental thereto. The Vehicle Subsidiary will not own or acquire any assets (other than Vehicles) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, Indebtedness created under the Loan Documents and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities). The Vehicle Subsidiary will not have any Subsidiaries or other investments. The Borrower will not make or permit any investments in the Vehicle Subsidiary, other than contributions of equity capital by the Borrower to the extent necessary to permit the Vehicle Subsidiary to acquire Vehicles and to satisfy its permitted liabilities as and when done.
        SECTION 6.17. Senior Leverage Ratio. The Borrower will not permit the Senior Leverage Ratio as of any date to be in excess of 2.00 to 1.00.
        SECTION 6.18. . Permitted Vendor Financings will not (a) impose any obligations on any Loan Party (including any covenants or cross defaults related to any Loan Party) other than the obligation of the Borrower to pay or make funds available to the DVA Creditors (or their agents) for payment of any amounts due in respect of the Designated Vendor Accounts on the scheduled payment date with respect thereto and for payment of interest, bank charges, return fees and reasonable attorneys' fees with respect to Designated Vendor Accounts which are not paid when due or (b) provide for any right to require accelerated payment of the Designated Vendor Accounts by reason of default or otherwise; that such Permitted Vendor Financings with respect to the Designated Vendor Accounts may (i) require accelerated payment following acceleration of the Obligations and (ii) provide for the automatic acceleration of all of the outstanding Designated Vendor Accounts and other obligations with respect thereto immediately and without notice upon the filing by the Borrower of any petition in any Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding. For the purposes of this Section 6.18, the term "" means (a) any voluntary or involuntary case or proceeding under Title 11 of the United States Code or any similar Federal, state, or foreign law for the relief of debtors with respect to Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary of the Borrower that has granted a Lien on any Collateral pursuant to any Security Document (each such Subsidiary, a ""), (b) any other voluntary or involuntary insolvency, reorganization or bankruptcy case or proceeding, or any receivership, liquidation, reorganization or other similar case or proceeding with respect to Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor or with respect to any of their respective assets, (c) any liquidation, dissolution, reorganization or winding up of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor whether voluntary or involuntary and whether or not involving insolvency or bankruptcy or (d) any assignment for the benefit of creditors or any other marshalling of assets and liabilities of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Guarantor.
Permitted Vendor Financings
provided
Insolvency or Liquidation Proceeding
Subsidiary Guarantor
        If any of the following events ("") shall occur:
Events of Default
        (a)     the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
        (b)     the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
        (c)     any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
        (d)     Holdings or the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.04 (with respect to the existence of Holdings or the Borrower) or 5.11 or in Article VI;
        (e)     any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
        (f)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable;
        (g)     any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
        (h)     an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
        (i)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
        (j)     Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
        (k)     one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $5,000,000 shall be rendered against Holdings, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor (and such action is not effectively stayed) to attach or levy upon any assets of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
        (l)     an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $3,000,000 in any year or (ii) $5,000,000 for all periods;
        (m)     any Lien purported to be created under any Security Document shall cease to be, or shall be asserted by any Loan Party not to be, a valid and perfected Lien on any Collateral, with the priority required by the applicable Security Document, except (i) as a result of the sale or other disposition of the applicable Collateral in a transaction permitted under the Loan Documents or (ii) as a result of the Collateral Agent's failure to maintain possession of any stock certificates, promissory notes or other instruments delivered to it under the Pledge Agreement;
        (n)     a Change in Control shall occur;
        then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
        Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
        The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
        The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by Holdings, the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
        The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
        The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of each Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
        Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor the Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Bank and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower (except that no consultation is required during an Event of Default), to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Bank, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agent's resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
        Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
        The provisions of this Article applicable to the Administrative Agent also shall apply to the Collateral Agent, . The parties hereto acknowledge and agree that none of the Syndication Agents or Documentation Agents has any right, duty or liability under any Loan Document in its capacity as Syndication Agent or Documentation Agent, as applicable.
mutatis
mutandis
        SECTION 9.01. (a) Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices.
         (i)    if to Holdings or the Borrower, to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated at 5004 Valley View Boulevard, Roanoke, Virginia 24012, Attention of Chief Financial Officer  (Telecopy No. (540) 561-1699);
         (ii)    if to the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Deepa Madhavan (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, 4th Floor, New York 10017, Attention of Neil Boylan (Telecopy No. (212) 270-6637);
         (iii)    if to the Issuing Bank, to JPMorgan Chase Bank in care of JPMorgan Treasury Services, 10420 Highland Manor Drive, 4th Floor, Tampa, Florida 33610, Attention of Standby LC Department (Telecopy No. (813) 432-5161);
         (iv)    if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Deepa Madhavan (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932); and
         (v)    if to any other Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
         (b)    Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
provided
         (c)    Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
        SECTION 9.02. (a) No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, any Lender or the Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
        (b)     Neither this Agreement nor any other Loan Document nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent, as applicable, and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.18(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of "Required Lenders" or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders (or Lenders of any Class) required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender (or each Lender of such Class, as the case may be), (vi) release Holdings or any Subsidiary Loan Party from its Guarantee under the Guarantee Agreement (except as expressly provided in the Guarantee Agreement), or limit its liability in respect of such Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender, (vii) except in strict accordance with the express provisions thereof, release all or any substantial part of the Collateral from the Liens of the Security Documents, without the written consent of each Lender, (viii) change any provisions of any Loan Document in a manner that by its terms adversely affects the rights in respect of payments due to Lenders holding Loans of any Class differently than those holding Loans of any other Class, without the written consent of Lenders holding a majority in interest of the outstanding Loans and unused Commitments of each affected Class (in addition to any other consent required under this paragraph), (ix) amend, modify or waive any condition precedent set forth in Section 4.02 with respect to the making of Revolving Loans, without the written consent of Revolving Lenders holding a majority in interest of the Revolving Commitments or (x) change the rights of the Tranche B Lenders and Delayed Draw Lenders to decline mandatory prepayments as provided in Section 2.11, without the written consent of Tranche B Lenders or Delayed Draw Lenders, as applicable, holding a majority of the outstanding Tranche B Term Loans or Delayed Draw Term Loans, as applicable; that (A) no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, and (B) any waiver, amendment or modification of this Agreement that by its terms affects the rights or duties under this Agreement of the Revolving Lenders (but not any other Lenders), the Tranche A Lenders (but not any other Lenders), the Tranche B Lenders (but not any other Lenders) or the Delayed Draw Lenders (but not any other Lenders) may be effected by an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and requisite percentage in interest of the affected Class of Lenders that would be required to consent thereto under this Section if such Class of Lenders were the only Class of Lenders hereunder at the time. In furtherance of clause (ix) of this Section 9.02(b), (i) any amendment or modification to or waiver of Section 6.12, 6.13, 6.14 or 6.15 of this Agreement or (ii) any amendment or modification to or waiver of any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document at a time when any Default has occurred and is continuing, and that would have the effect of eliminating any such Default, shall not be deemed to be effective for purposes of determining whether the conditions precedent set forth in Section 4.02 to the making of any Revolving Loan have been satisfied unless the Revolving Lenders holding a majority in interest of the Revolving Commitments shall have consented to such amendment, modification or waiver; that the foregoing shall not be construed to affect any amendment or modification to any provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document (other than any amendment or modification to Section 6.12, 6.13, 6.14 or 6.15 of this Agreement) if no Default has occurred and is continuing at the time of such amendment or modification. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are affected thereby, the Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
provided
provided
further
provided
        SECTION 9.03. (a) The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Agents and their respective Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Agents, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
        (b)     The Borrower shall indemnify the Agents, the Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an "") against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by the Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any Mortgaged Property or any other property currently or formerly owned or operated by Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, except that this clause (iii) shall not apply to Environmental Liabilities related to a Mortgaged Property that are attributable solely to acts or events occurring after completion of foreclosure proceedings with respect to such Mortgaged Property and surrender of possession thereof by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries to or as directed by the Collateral Agent or the purchasers at any such foreclosure sale, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
Indemnitee
provided
        (c)     To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lender's pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such. For purposes hereof, a Lender's "pro rata share" shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures, outstanding Term Loans and unused Commitments at the time.
provided
        (d)     To the extent permitted by applicable law, neither Holdings nor the Borrower shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
        (e)     All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
        SECTION 9.04. (a) The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of the Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
         (b)    (i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
         (A)    the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
provided
         (B)    the Administrative Agent, that no consent of the Administrative Agent shall be required for an assignment of all or any portion of a Term Loan; and
provided
         (C)    the Issuing Bank; that no consent of the Issuing Bank shall be required for an assignment of all or any portion of a Term Loan.
provided
         (ii)    Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
         (A)    except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lender's Commitment or Loans of any Class, the amount of the Commitment or Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $1,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
         (B)    each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, that this clause shall not be construed to prohibit the assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lender's rights and obligations in respect of one Class of Commitments or Loans;
provided
         (C)    the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500 (except in the case of an assignment to an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender, with only one such fee payable in connection with simultaneous assignments to or by two or more Approved Funds of a single Lender); and
         (D)    the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire.
        For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term "Approved Fund" has the following meaning:
        "" means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
         (iii)    Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
         (iv)    The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in the City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ""). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, the Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
         (v)    Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignee's completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
         (c)    (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a "") in all or a portion of such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lender's obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lender's rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.15, 2.16 and 2.17 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.18(c) as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
provided
         (ii)    A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.15 or 2.17 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrower's prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.17 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.17(e) as though it were a Lender.
         (d)    Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
         (e)    Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a "") may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle (an ""), identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, the option to provide to the Borrower all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPV to make any Loan and (ii) if an SPV elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to provide all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof. The making of a Loan by an SPV hereunder shall utilize the Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender. Each party hereto hereby agrees that no SPV shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement (all liability for which shall remain with the Granting Lender). In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior indebtedness of any SPV, it will not institute against, or join any other person in instituting against, such SPV any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof. In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 9.04, any SPV may (i) with notice to, but without the prior written consent of, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and without paying any processing fee therefor, assign all or a portion of its interests in any Loans to the Granting Lender or to any financial institutions (consented to by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent) providing liquidity and/or credit support to or for the account of such SPV to support the funding or maintenance of Loans and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety, guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPV. As this Section 9.04(e) applies to any particular SPV, this Section may not be amended without the written consent of such SPV.
Granting Lender
SPV
provided
        SECTION 9.05. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
        SECTION 9.06. This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Document and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. This Agreement shall become effective as provided in the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
        SECTION 9.07. Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
        SECTION 9.08. If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
        SECTION 9.09. (a) This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
        (b)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Holdings, the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
        (c)     Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
        (d)     Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
        SECTION 9.10. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
        SECTION 9.11. Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
        SECTION 9.12. Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below) in accordance with their customary procedures, except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' and Approved Funds' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document or the enforcement of rights hereunder or thereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement, (g) with the consent of the Borrower, (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis from a source other than Holdings or the Borrower or (i) to any creditor or direct or indirect contractual counterparty with a Lender or its affiliates in a swap agreement or such counterparty's professional advisor (so long as such creditor contractual counterparty or professional advisor to such contractual counterparty agrees to be bound by the provisions of this Section 9.12). For the purposes of this Section, " means all information received from Holdings or the Borrower relating to Holdings or the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a nonconfidential basis prior to disclosure by Holdings or the Borrower; that, in the case of information received from Holdings or the Borrower after the Effective Date, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information. Nothing in this Section 9.12 is intended to prohibit any Lender (or any Affiliate or Approved Fund of any Lender) from acquiring or disposing of any of the Borrower's debt securities from or to an institutional "accredited investor" (as defined in Regulation D under the Securities Act of 1933); that in connection with any such acquisition or disposition, such Lender (or Affiliate or Approved Fund of such Lender) shall not disclose to its trade counterparty or any other Person any Information relating to the Borrower except in accordance with this Section 9.12.
Confidentiality.
"Information
provided
provided
        SECTION 9.13. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively, the ""), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the "") which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
        SECTION 9.14. .  Each Lender hereby notifies each of the Borrower and Holdings that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), (the ""), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies each of the Borrower and Holdings, which information includes the name and address of each of the Borrower and Holdings and other information that will allow such Lender to identify each of the Borrower and Holdings in accordance with the Act.
USA Patriot Act
Act
        SECTION 9.15. Until this Agreement becomes effective in accordance with the terms of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the Existing Credit Agreement shall remain in full force and effect and shall not be affected hereby. After the Effective Date, all obligations of the Borrower under the Existing Credit Agreement shall become obligations of the Borrower hereunder, secured by the Security Documents, and the provisions of the Existing Credit Agreement shall be superseded by the provisions hereof.
Existing Credit Agreement; Effectiveness of Amendment and Restatement.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.

Exhibit 10.5
        Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "") and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), Collateral Agent and as issuing bank (in such capacity, the ""), (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent, and (c) the Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of December 5, 2003 (the ""), among the parties hereto as in effect the date hereof.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agent
Issuing Bank
Guarantee Agreement
Existing Security Agreement
        The parties desire to amend and restate the Existing Security Agreement to exclude Excluded Margin Stock from the Collateral. Accordingly, the parties hereto agree by execution and delivery of this Agreement that the Existing Security Agreement will be deemed to be amended and restated as provided herein.
        The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Bank has agreed to issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subject to the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement. Each of Holdings and the Subsidiary Guarantors has agreed to guarantee, among other things, all the obligations of the Borrower under the Credit Agreement. DVA Creditors may from time to time agree to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts. The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit, and the agreement from time to time of DVA Creditors to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts, are conditioned upon, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Grantors of an agreement in the form hereof to secure (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements, interest thereon and obligations to provide cash collateral, and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Secured Parties under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Loan Parties under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents, (c) the due and punctual payment and performance of all obligations in respect of overdrafts and related liabilities owed to JPMCB, any Affiliate thereof, the Administrative Agent or the Collateral Agent arising from or in connection with treasury, depositary or cash management services or in connection with any automated clearinghouse transfer of funds, (d) unless otherwise agreed to in writing by the applicable Lender party thereto, the due and punctual payment and performance of all monetary obligations of the Borrower under each Hedging Agreement entered into with any counterparty that was a Lender (or an Affiliate of a Lender) at the time such Hedging Agreement was entered into and (e) the due and punctual payment of all DVA Obligations (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), when and as due (all the monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) through (e) being collectively called the "").
Obligations
        Accordingly, the Grantors and the Collateral Agent, on behalf of itself and each Secured Party (and each of their respective successors or assigns), hereby agree as follows:
        SECTION 1.01. Capitalized terms used in this Agreement and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings specified in the Credit Agreement. All terms defined in the New York UCC (as defined herein) and not defined in this Agreement shall have the meanings specified therein; the term "instrument" shall have the meaning specified in Article 9 of the New York UCC.
Definition of Terms Used Herein
.
        SECTION 1.02. As used herein, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
Definition of Certain Terms Used Herein
.
        "" shall mean any Person who is or who may become obligated to any Grantor under, with respect to or on account of an Account.
Account Debtor
        "" shall mean the cash concentration account maintained by the Borrower with the Cash Concentration Bank in Roanoke, Virginia (account number 2001000059003), to which the Borrower will cause to be transferred, on each Business Day, amounts deposited in the Collection Deposit Accounts on such Business Day.
Cash Concentration Account
        "" shall mean the "Cash Concentration Bank" as defined in the Cash Concentration Letter Agreement.
Cash Concentration Bank
        "" shall mean the agreement among the Cash Concentration Bank, the Borrower and the Collateral Agent, in substantially the form of Annex 1-A hereto, pursuant to which the Borrower shall maintain the Cash Concentration Account, as such Cash Concentration Letter Agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.
Cash Concentration Letter Agreement
        "" shall mean all right, title or interest now owned or at anytime hereafter acquired by any Grantor or in which such Grantor now has or at any time in the future may acquire any right, title or interest in all (a) Accounts, (b) Chattel Paper, (c) Deposit Accounts (including the Cash Concentration Account and the Collection Deposit Accounts), (d) Documents, (e) Equipment, (f) General Intangibles, (g) Instruments, (h) Inventory, (i) Investment Property (other than Excluded Margin Stock), (j) all books and records pertaining to the foregoing and (k) to the extent not otherwise included, all Proceeds and products of any of the foregoing and all collateral security and guarantees given by any Person with respect to any of the foregoing; that the term "Collateral" shall not include any property of the type specified in clauses (c) and (f) above if the assignment, granting, creation, mortgage, pledge, hypothecation or transfer thereof by such Grantor hereunder, would violate the terms of, or otherwise constitute a default or termination or similar event under any document or instrument to which any Loan Party is a party (other than those documents or instruments between or among the Loan Parties and/or their Affiliates only) relating to the ownership of, or pertaining to any rights or interests held in such property, that (i) the terms to be violated or default or termination or similar event that would result in the event of the granting of the Lien hereunder, are consistent with such Loan Party's current business practice in connection with the type of document or instrument to which they relate and (ii) each Loan Party shall use its best efforts to ensure that the assignment, granting, creation, mortgage, pledge, hypothecation or transfer of any such property by any Grantor will not violate the terms of, or otherwise constitute a default or termination or similar event under any document or instrument to which such Loan Party is a party.
Collateral
provided
provided
        "" shall mean each collection deposit account maintained by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors pursuant to a Collection Deposit Letter Agreement (and prior to the execution of a Collection Deposit Letter Agreement with respect to such account, any other collection deposit accounts maintained by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors) into which the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors will deposit all Daily Receipts.
Collection Deposit Account
        "" shall mean an agreement among the Borrower, any Lender or other bank and the Collateral Agent, in substantially the form of Annex 1-B hereto, pursuant to which, the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall maintain a Collection Deposit Account, as such Collection Deposit Agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented from time to time.
Collection Deposit Letter Agreement
        "" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting any right to any third party under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any Grantor or which such Grantor otherwise has the right to license, or granting any right to such Grantor under any Copyright now or hereafter owned by any third party, and all rights of such Grantor under any such agreement.
Copyright License
        "" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor: (a) all copyright rights in any work subject to the copyright laws of the United States or any other country, whether as author, assignee, transferee or otherwise, and (b) all registrations and applications for registration of any such copyright in the United States or any other country, including registrations, recordings, supplemental registrations and pending applications for registration in the United States Copyright Office, including those listed on Schedule II.
Copyrights
        "" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the preliminary statement of this Agreement.
Credit Agreement
        "" shall mean all amounts received by the Borrower and the Subsidiary Guarantors, whether in the form of cash, checks, any moneys received or receivable in respect of charges made by means of credit cards, and other negotiable instruments, in each case as a result of the sale of Inventory.
Daily Receipts
        "" shall mean all instruments, files, records, ledger sheets and documents covering or relating to any of the Collateral.
Documents
        "" shall mean all choses in action and causes of action and all other assignable intangible personal property of any Grantor of every kind and nature (other than Accounts) now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including limited partnership or limited liability company interests, corporate or other business records, indemnification claims, contract rights (including rights under leases, whether entered into as lessor or lessee, Hedging Agreements and other agreements), Intellectual Property, goodwill, registrations, franchises, tax refund claims and any letter of credit, guarantee, claim, security interest or other security held by or granted to any Grantor to secure payment by an Account Debtor of any of the Accounts. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the term "General Intangibles" shall not include any accounts receivable sold or created pursuant to any Receivables Program, except to the extent the same are transferred back or charged back to a Grantor pursuant to the applicable documents governing such Receivables Program.
General Intangibles
        "" shall mean all intellectual and similar property of any Grantor of every kind and nature now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor, including inventions, designs, Patents, Copyrights, Licenses, Trademarks, trade secrets, confidential or proprietary technical and business information, know-how, show-how or other data or information, software and databases and all embodiments or fixations thereof and related documentation, registrations and franchises, and all additions, improvements and accessions to, and books and records describing or used in connection with, any of the foregoing.
Intellectual Property
        "" shall mean any Patent License, Trademark License, Copyright License or other license or sublicense to which any Grantor is a party, including those listed on Schedule III (other than those license agreements in existence on the date hereof and listed on Schedule III and those license agreements entered into after the date hereof, which by their terms prohibit assignment or a grant of a security interest by such Grantor as licensee thereunder).
License
        "" shall mean the Uniform Commercial Code as from time to time in effect in the State of New York.
New York UCC
        "" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in the preliminary statement of this Agreement.
Obligations
        "" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any third party any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent, now or hereafter owned by any Grantor or which any Grantor otherwise has the right to license, is in existence, or granting to any Grantor any right to make, use or sell any invention on which a Patent, now or hereafter owned by any third party, is in existence, and all rights of any Grantor under any such agreement.
Patent License
        "" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor: (a) all letters patent of the United States or any other country, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all applications for letters patent of the United States or any other country, including registrations, recordings and pending applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office or any similar offices in any other country, including those listed on Schedule IV, and (b) all reissues, continuations, divisions, continuations-in-part, renewals or extensions thereof, and the inventions disclosed or claimed therein, including the right to make, use and/or sell the inventions disclosed or claimed therein.
Patents
        "" shall mean a certificate substantially in the form of Annex 2 hereto, completed and supplemented with the schedules and attachments contemplated thereby, and duly executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower.
Perfection Certificate
        "" shall have the meaning specified in Section 9-102 of the New York UCC.
Proceeds
        "" shall mean (a) the Lenders, (b) the Administrative Agent, (c) the Collateral Agent, (d) the Issuing Bank, (e) each counterparty to a Hedging Agreement entered into with the Borrower if such counterparty was a Lender (or an affiliate of a Lender) at the time the Hedging Agreement was entered into, (f) the beneficiaries of each indemnification obligation undertaken by any Grantor under any Loan Document, (g) the DVA Creditors and (h) the successors and assigns of each of the foregoing.
Secured Parties
        "" shall have the meaning assigned to such term in Section 2.01.
Security Interest
        "" shall mean any written agreement, now or hereafter in effect, granting to any third party any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any Grantor or which any Grantor otherwise has the right to license, or granting to any Grantor any right to use any Trademark now or hereafter owned by any third party, and all rights of any Grantor under any such agreement.
Trademark License
        "" shall mean all of the following now owned or hereafter acquired by any Grantor: (a) all trademarks, service marks, trade names, corporate names, company names, business names, fictitious business names, trade styles, trade dress, logos, other source or business identifiers, designs and general intangibles of like nature, now existing or hereafter adopted or acquired, all registrations and recordings thereof, and all registration and recording applications filed in connection therewith, including registrations and registration applications in the United States Patent and Trademark Office, any State of the United States or any similar offices in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, and all extensions or renewals thereof, including those listed on Schedule V, (b) all goodwill associated therewith or symbolized thereby and (c) all other assets, rights and interests that uniquely reflect or embody such goodwill.
Trademarks
        SECTION 1.03. Rules of Interpretation. The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement shall be applicable to this Agreement.
        SECTION 2.01. As security for the payment or performance, as the case may be, in full of the Obligations, each Grantor hereby grants, mortgages, pledges, hypothecates and transfers to the Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, and hereby grants to the Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in, all of such Grantor's right, title and interest now owned or at any time hereafter acquired by such Grantor or in which such Grantor now has or any time in the future may acquire any right, title or interest, in, to and under the Collateral (the ""). Each Grantor hereby irrevocably authorizes the Collateral Agent at any time and from time to time to file in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financing statements (including fixture filings), and amendments thereto that contain the information required by Article 9 of the Uniform Commercial Code of each applicable jurisdiction for the filing of any financing statement or amendment, including (a) whether the Grantor is an organization, the type of organization and any organizational identification number issued to the Grantor and (b) in the case of a financing statement filed as a fixture filing or covering Collateral constituting minerals or the like to be extracted or timber to be cut, a sufficient description of the real property to which such Collateral relates. The Grantor agrees to provide such information to the Collateral Agent promptly upon request. Each Grantor also ratifies its authorization for the Collateral Agent to file in any relevant jurisdiction any initial financing statements or amendments thereto if filed prior to the date hereof.
Security Interest
.
Security Interest
        The Collateral Agent is further authorized to file filings with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or United States Copyright Office (or any successor office or any similar office in any other country) or other documents for the purpose of perfecting, confirming, continuing, enforcing or protecting the Security Interest granted by each Grantor, without the signature of any Grantor, and naming any Grantor or the Grantors as debtors and the Collateral Agent as secured party.
        SECTION 2.02. The Security Interest is granted as security only and shall not subject the Collateral Agent or any other Secured Party to, or in any way alter or modify, any obligation or liability of any Grantor with respect to or arising out of the Collateral.
No Assumption of Liability
.
        The Grantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties that:
        SECTION 3.01. Each Grantor has good and valid rights in and title to the Collateral with respect to which it has purported to grant a Security Interest hereunder and has full power and authority to grant to the Collateral Agent the Security Interest in such Collateral pursuant hereto and to execute, deliver and perform its obligations in accordance with the terms of this Agreement, without the consent or approval of any other Person other than any consent or approval which has been obtained.
Title and Authority
.
        SECTION 3.02. (a) The Perfection Certificate has been duly prepared, completed and executed and the information set forth therein, including the exact legal name of each Grantor, is correct and complete in all material respects. Fully executed Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings, as applicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations containing a description of the Collateral have been delivered to the Collateral Agent for filing in each governmental, municipal or other office specified in Schedule 6 to the Perfection Certificate, which are all the filings, recordings and registrations (other than filings required to be made in the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office in order to perfect the Security Interest in Collateral consisting of United States Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights) that are necessary to publish notice of and protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Collateral Agent (for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties) in respect of all Collateral in which the Security Interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary in any such jurisdiction, except as provided under applicable law with respect to the filing of continuation statements or amendments.
Filings
.
    (b)        Each Grantor represents and warrants that fully executed security agreements in the form hereof and containing a description of all Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property with respect to United States Patents and United States registered Trademarks (and Trademarks for which United States registration applications are pending) and United States registered Copyrights have been delivered to the Collateral Agent for recording by the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and the regulations thereunder, as applicable, and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of any other necessary jurisdiction, to protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Collateral Agent (for the benefit of the Secured Parties) in respect of all Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and United States registered Copyrights in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, or in any other necessary jurisdiction, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary (other than the financing statements referred to above in Section 3.02(a) and such actions as are necessary to perfect the Security Interest with respect to any Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights (or registration or application for registration thereof) acquired or developed after the date hereof).
        SECTION 3.03. The Security Interest constitutes (a) a legal and valid security interest in all the Collateral securing the payment and performance of the Obligations, (b) subject to the filings described in Section 3.02 above, a perfected security interest in all Collateral in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registering a financing statement or analogous document in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions pursuant to the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law in such jurisdictions and (c) a security interest that shall be perfected in all Collateral in which a security interest may be perfected upon the receipt and recording of this Agreement with the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office, as applicable, within the three month period (commencing as of the date hereof) pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of any other necessary jurisdiction. The Security Interest is and shall be prior to any other Lien on any of the Collateral, other than Liens expressly permitted to be prior to the Security Interest pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.
Validity of Security Interest
.
        SECTION 3.04. The Collateral is owned by the Grantors free and clear of any Lien, except for Liens expressly permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement. The Grantor has not filed or consented to the filing of (a) any financing statement or analogous document under the Uniform Commercial Code or any other applicable laws covering any Collateral, (b) any assignment in which any Grantor assigns any Collateral or any security agreement or similar instrument covering any Collateral with the United States Patent and Trademark Office or the United States Copyright Office or (c) any assignment in which any Grantor assigns any Collateral or any security agreement or similar instrument covering any Collateral with any foreign governmental, municipal or other office, which financing statement or analogous document, assignment, security agreement or similar instrument is still in effect, except, in each case, for Liens expressly permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement. None of the Grantors holds any commercial tort claim except as indicated on the Perfection Certificate.
Absence of Other Liens
.
        SECTION 4.01.   (a) Each Grantor agrees promptly to notify the Collateral Agent in writing of any change (i) in its corporate name, (ii) in the location of its chief executive office, its principal place of business, any office in which it maintains books or records relating to Collateral owned by it or any office or facility at which Collateral owned by it is located (including the establishment of any such new office or facility) other than with respect to Collateral (A) consisting of goods in transit between facilities, whether in vehicles owned by the applicable Grantor or on common carriers and (B) located in temporary warehousing which will remain in such warehousing for no longer than one month, (iii) in its identity or type of organization or corporate structure, (iv) in its Federal Taxpayer Identification Number or organizational identification number, as applicable, or (v) in its jurisdiction of organization. Each Grantor agrees promptly to provide the Collateral Agent with certified organizational documents reflecting any of the changes described in the preceding sentence. Each Grantor agrees not to effect or permit any change referred to in the preceding sentence unless all filings have been made under the Uniform Commercial Code or otherwise that are required in order for the Collateral Agent to continue at all times following such change to have a valid, legal and perfected first priority security interest in all the Collateral. Each Grantor agrees promptly to notify the Collateral Agent if any material portion of the Collateral owned or held by such Grantor is damaged or destroyed.
Change of Name; Location of Collateral; Records; Place of Business
.
    (b)        Each Grantor agrees to maintain, at its own cost and expense, such complete and accurate records with respect to the Collateral owned by it as is consistent with its current practices and in accordance with such prudent and standard practices used in industries that are the same as or similar to those in which such Grantor is engaged, but in any event to include complete accounting records indicating all payments and proceeds received with respect to any part of the Collateral, and, at such time or times as the Collateral Agent may reasonably request, promptly to prepare and deliver to the Collateral Agent a duly certified schedule or schedules in form and detail satisfactory to the Collateral Agent showing the identity, amount and location of any and all Collateral.
        SECTION 4.02. Each year, at the time of delivery of annual financial statements with respect to the preceding fiscal year pursuant to Section 5.01 of the Credit Agreement, the Borrower shall deliver to the Collateral Agent a certificate executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower (a) setting forth the information required pursuant to this Section 2 of the Perfection Certificate or confirming that there has been no change in such information since the date of such certificate or the date of the most recent certificate delivered pursuant to this Section 4.02 and (b) certifying that all Uniform Commercial Code financing statements (including fixture filings, as applicable) or other appropriate filings, recordings or registrations, including all refilings, rerecordings and reregistrations, containing a description of the Collateral have been filed of record in each governmental, municipal or other appropriate office in each jurisdiction identified pursuant to clause (a) above to the extent necessary to protect and perfect the Security Interest for a period of not less than 18 months after the date of such certificate (except as noted therein with respect to any continuation statements to be filed within such period). Each certificate delivered pursuant to this Section 4.02 shall identify in the format of Schedule II, III, IV or V, as applicable, all Patents, Trademarks, Copyrights and Licenses of any Grantor in existence on the date thereof and not then listed on such Schedules or previously so identified to the Collateral Agent.
Periodic Certification
.
        SECTION 4.03. Each Grantor shall, at its own cost and expense, take any and all actions necessary to defend title to the Collateral against all Persons and to defend the Security Interest of the Collateral Agent in the Collateral and the priority thereof against any Lien not expressly permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement.
Protection of Security
.
        SECTION 4.04. Each Grantor agrees, at its own expense, to execute, acknowledge, deliver and cause to be duly filed all such further instruments and documents and take all such actions as the Collateral Agent may from time to time reasonably request to better assure, preserve, protect and perfect the Security Interest and the rights and remedies created hereby, including the payment of any fees and taxes required in connection with the execution and delivery of this Agreement, the granting of the Security Interest and the filing of any financing statements (including fixture filings) or other documents in connection herewith or therewith. If any amount payable under or in connection with any of the Collateral shall be or become evidenced by any promissory note or other instrument, such note or instrument shall be promptly pledged and delivered to the Collateral Agent, duly endorsed in a manner satisfactory to the Collateral Agent.
Further Assurances
.
        Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor hereby authorizes the Collateral Agent, with prompt notice thereof to the Grantors, to supplement this Agreement by supplementing Schedule II, III, IV or V hereto or adding additional schedules hereto to specifically identify any asset or item that may constitute Copyrights, Licenses, Patents or Trademarks; provided, , that any Grantor shall have the right, exercisable within 10 days after it has been notified by the Collateral Agent of the specific identification of such Collateral, to advise the Collateral Agent in writing of any inaccuracy of the representations and warranties made by such Grantor hereunder with respect to such Collateral. Each Grantor agrees that it will use its best efforts to take such action as shall be necessary in order that all representations and warranties hereunder shall be true and correct with respect to such Collateral within 30 days after the date it has been notified by the Collateral Agent of the specific identification of such Collateral.
however
        SECTION 4.05. The Collateral Agent and such Persons as the Collateral Agent may reasonably designate shall have the right, subject to compliance with Section 5.09 of the Credit Agreement, to inspect the Collateral, all records related thereto (and to make extracts and copies from such records) and the premises upon which any of the Collateral is located, to discuss the Grantors' affairs with the officers of the Grantors and their independent accountants and to verify under reasonable procedures the validity, amount, quality, quantity, value, condition and status of, or any other matter relating to, the Collateral, including, in the case of Accounts or Collateral in the possession of any third person, by contacting Account Debtors or the third person possessing such Collateral for the purpose of making such a verification; , , that representatives of the Grantors shall be entitled to participate in such discussions. The Collateral Agent shall have the absolute right to share any information it gains from such inspection or verification with any Secured Party.
Inspection and Verification
.
provided
however
        SECTION 4.06. At its option and after notice to the applicable Grantor, the Collateral Agent may discharge past due taxes, assessments, charges, fees, Liens, security interests or other encumbrances at any time levied or placed on the Collateral and not permitted pursuant to Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement, and may pay for the maintenance and preservation of the Collateral to the extent any Grantor fails to do so as required by the Credit Agreement or this Agreement, and each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to reimburse the Collateral Agent on demand for any payment made or any expense incurred by the Collateral Agent pursuant to the foregoing authorization; , , that nothing in this Section 4.06 shall be interpreted as excusing any Grantor from the performance of, or imposing any obligation on the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to cure or perform, any covenants or other promises of any Grantor with respect to taxes, assessments, charges, fees, liens, security interests or other encumbrances and maintenance as set forth herein or in the other Loan Documents.
Taxes; Encumbrances
.
provided
however
        SECTION 4.07. If at any time any Grantor shall take a security interest in any property of an Account Debtor or any other Person to secure payment and performance of an Account, such Grantor shall promptly assign such security interest to the Collateral Agent. Such assignment need not be filed of public record unless necessary to continue the perfected status of the security interest against creditors of and transferees from the Account Debtor or other Person granting the security interest.
Assignment of Security Interest
.
        SECTION 4.08. Each Grantor shall remain liable to observe and perform all the conditions and obligations to be observed and performed by it under each contract, agreement or instrument relating to the Collateral, all in accordance with the terms and conditions thereof, and each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties from and against any and all liability for such performance.
Continuing Obligations of the Grantors
.
        SECTION 4.09. None of the Grantors shall make or permit to be made an assignment, pledge or hypothecation of the Collateral or shall grant any other Lien in respect of the Collateral, except as expressly permitted by Section 6.02 of the Credit Agreement. None of the Grantors shall make or permit to be made any transfer of the Collateral and each Grantor shall remain at all times in possession of the Collateral owned by it, except that (a) Inventory, obsolete or worn out assets, Permitted Investments and other assets having a fair market value (alone or together with other related assets sold or to be sold) of less than $25,000 may be sold, in each case in the ordinary course of business and (b) unless and until the Collateral Agent shall notify the Grantors that an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing and that during the continuance thereof the Grantors shall not sell, convey, lease, assign, transfer or otherwise dispose of any Collateral (which notice may be given by telephone if promptly confirmed in writing), the Grantors may use and dispose of the Collateral in any lawful manner not inconsistent with the provisions of this Agreement, the Credit Agreement or any other Loan Document. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor agrees that it shall not permit any Inventory to be in the possession or control of any warehouseman, bailee, agent or processor at any time unless such warehouseman, bailee, agent or processor shall have been notified of the Security Interest and shall have agreed in writing to hold the Inventory subject to the Security Interest and the instructions of the Collateral Agent and to waive and release any Lien held by it with respect to such Inventory, whether arising by operation of law or otherwise.
Use and Disposition of Collateral
.
        SECTION 4.10.   None of the Grantors will, without the Collateral Agent's prior written consent, grant any extension of the time of payment of any of the Accounts included in the Collateral, compromise, compound or settle the same for less than the full amount thereof, release, wholly or partly, any Person liable for the payment thereof or allow any credit or discount whatsoever thereon, other than extensions, credits, discounts, compromises or settlements granted or made in the ordinary course of business and consistent with its current practices and in accordance with such prudent and standard practices used in industries that are the same as or similar to those in which such Grantor is engaged.
Limitation on Modification of Accounts
.
        SECTION 4.11. The Grantors, at their own expense, shall maintain or cause to be maintained insurance covering physical loss or damage to the Inventory and Equipment in accordance with Section 5.07 of the Credit Agreement. Each Grantor irrevocably makes, constitutes and appoints the Collateral Agent (and all officers, employees or agents designated by the Collateral Agent) as such Grantor's true and lawful agent (and attorney-in-fact) for the purpose, during the continuance of an Event of Default, of making, settling and adjusting claims in respect of Collateral under policies of insurance, endorsing the name of such Grantor on any check, draft, instrument or other item of payment for the proceeds of such policies of insurance and for making all determinations and decisions with respect thereto. In the event that any Grantor at any time or times shall fail to obtain or maintain any of the policies of insurance required hereby or to pay any premium in whole or part relating thereto, the Collateral Agent may, without waiving or releasing any obligation or liability of the Grantors hereunder or any Event of Default, in its sole discretion, obtain and maintain such policies of insurance and pay such premium and take any other actions with respect thereto as the Collateral Agent deems advisable. All sums disbursed by the Collateral Agent in connection with this Section 4.11, including reasonable attorneys' fees, court costs, expenses and other charges relating thereto, shall be payable, upon demand, by the Grantors to the Collateral Agent and shall be additional Obligations secured hereby.
Insurance
.
        SECTION 4.12. Each Grantor shall legend, in form and manner satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, its Chattel Paper and its books, records and documents evidencing or pertaining thereto with an appropriate reference to the fact that such Chattel Paper have been assigned to the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Secured Parties and that the Collateral Agent has a security interest therein.
Legend
.
        SECTION 4.13. (a) Each Grantor agrees that it will not, nor will it permit any of its licensees to, do any act, or omit to do any act, whereby any Patent which is material to the conduct of such Grantor's business may become invalidated or dedicated to the public, and agrees that it shall continue to mark any products covered by a Patent with the relevant patent number as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable patent laws.
Covenants Regarding Patent, Trademark and Copyright Collateral
.
    (b)        Each Grantor (either itself or through its licensees or its sublicensees) will, for each Trademark material to the conduct of such Grantor's business, (i) maintain such Trademark in full force free from any claim of abandonment or invalidity for non-use, (ii) maintain the quality of products and services offered under such Trademark, (iii) display such Trademark with notice of Federal or foreign registration to the extent necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable law and (iv) not knowingly use or knowingly permit the use of such Trademark in violation of any third party rights.
    (c)        Each Grantor (either itself or through licensees) will, for each work covered by a material Copyright, continue to publish, reproduce, display, adopt and distribute the work with appropriate copyright notice as necessary and sufficient to establish and preserve its maximum rights under applicable copyright laws.
    (d)        Each Grantor shall notify the Collateral Agent immediately if it knows or has reason to know that any Patent, Trademark or Copyright material to the conduct of its business may become abandoned, lost or dedicated to the public, or of any adverse determination or development (including the institution of, or any such determination or development in, any proceeding in the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any court or similar office of any country) regarding such Grantor's ownership of any Patent, Trademark or Copyright, its right to register the same, or to keep and maintain the same.
    (e)        In no event shall any Grantor, either itself or through any agent, employee, licensee or designee, file an application for any Patent, Trademark or Copyright (or for the registration of any Trademark or Copyright) with the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any office or agency in any political subdivision of the United States or in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, unless it promptly informs the Collateral Agent, and, upon request of the Collateral Agent, executes and delivers any and all agreements, instruments, documents and papers as the Collateral Agent may request to evidence the Collateral Agent's security interest in such Patent, Trademark or Copyright, and each Grantor hereby appoints the Collateral Agent as its attorney-in-fact to execute and file such writings for the foregoing purposes, all acts of such attorney being hereby ratified and confirmed; such power, being coupled with an interest, is irrevocable.
    (f)        Each Grantor will take all necessary steps that are consistent with the practice in any proceeding before the United States Patent and Trademark Office, United States Copyright Office or any office or agency in any political subdivision of the United States or in any other country or any political subdivision thereof, to maintain and pursue each material application relating to the Patents, Trademarks and/or Copyrights (and to obtain the relevant grant or registration) and to maintain each issued Patent and each registration of the Trademarks and Copyrights that is material to the conduct of any Grantor's business, including timely filings of applications for renewal, affidavits of use, affidavits of incontestability and payment of maintenance fees, and, if consistent with good business judgment, to initiate opposition, interference and cancelation proceedings against third parties.
    (g)        In the event that any Grantor has reason to believe that any Collateral consisting of a Patent, Trademark or Copyright material to the conduct of any Grantor's business has been or is about to be infringed, misappropriated or diluted by a third party, such Grantor promptly shall notify the Collateral Agent and shall, if consistent with good business judgment, promptly sue for infringement, misappropriation or dilution and to recover any and all damages for such infringement, misappropriation or dilution, and take such other actions as are appropriate under the circumstances to protect such Collateral.
    (h)        Upon and during the continuance of an Event of Default, each Grantor shall use its best efforts to obtain all requisite consents or approvals by the licensor of each Copyright License, Patent License or Trademark License to effect the assignment of all of such Grantor's right, title and interest thereunder to the Collateral Agent or its designee.
    (i)        Each Grantor shall ensure that fully executed security agreements in the form hereof and containing a description of all Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property shall have been received and recorded within three months after the execution of this Agreement with respect to United States Patents, United States registered Trademarks (and Trademarks for which United States registration applications are pending) and United States registered Copyrights have been delivered to the Collateral Agent for recording by the United States Patent and Trademark Office and the United States Copyright Office pursuant to 35 U.S.C.  261, 15 U.S.C.  1060 or 17 U.S.C.  205 and the regulations thereunder, as applicable, and otherwise as may be required pursuant to the laws of any other necessary jurisdiction, to protect the validity of and to establish a legal, valid and perfected security interest in favor of the Collateral Agent (for the ratable benefit of the Secured Parties) in respect of all Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and registered Copyrights in which a security interest may be perfected by filing, recording or registration in the United States (or any political subdivision thereof) and its territories and possessions, or in any other necessary jurisdiction, and no further or subsequent filing, refiling, recording, rerecording, registration or reregistration is necessary (other than such actions as are necessary to perfect the Security Interest with respect to any Collateral consisting of Patents, Trademarks and Copyrights (or registration or application for registration thereof) acquired or developed after the date of this amendment and restatement).
        SECTION 4.14. In order to further insure the attachment, perfection and priority of, and the ability of the Collateral Agent to enforce, the Collateral Agent's security interest in the Collateral, each Grantor agrees, in each case at such Grantor's own expense, to take the following actions with respect to the following Collateral:
Other Actions.
    (a)        If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire any Instruments or Tangible Chattel Paper (other than such Instruments or Tangible Chattel Paper held in the ordinary course of such Grantor's business and in an aggregate amount not exceeding $100,000), such Grantor shall forthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Collateral Agent, accompanied by such instruments of transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Collateral Agent may from time to time specify.
Instruments and Tangible Chattel Paper.
    (b)        If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire any certificated securities (other than any such certificated securities having an aggregate fair market value not in excess of $50,000 and held in the ordinary course of such Grantor's business), such Grantor shall forthwith endorse, assign and deliver the same to the Collateral Agent, accompanied by such instruments of transfer or assignment duly executed in blank as the Collateral Agent may from time to time specify. If any securities now or hereafter acquired by any Grantor are uncertificated and are issued to such Grantor or its nominee directly by the issuer thereof, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the Collateral Agent's request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, either (a) cause the issuer to agree to comply with instructions from the Collateral Agent as to such securities, without further consent of any Grantor or such nominee, or (b) arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the registered owner of the securities. If any securities, whether certificated or uncertificated, or other investment property now or hereafter acquired by any Grantor are held by such Grantor or its nominee through a securities intermediary or commodity intermediary, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the Collateral Agent's request and option, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, either (i) cause such securities intermediary or (as the case may be) commodity intermediary to agree to comply with entitlement orders or other instructions from the Collateral Agent to such securities intermediary as to such securities or other investment property, or (as the case may be) to apply any value distributed on account of any commodity contract as directed by the Collateral Agent to such commodity intermediary, in each case without further consent of any Grantor or such nominee, or (ii) in the case of Financial Assets or other Investment Property held through a securities intermediary, arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the entitlement holder with respect to such investment property, with the Grantor being permitted, only with the consent of the Collateral Agent, to exercise rights to withdraw or otherwise deal with such investment property. The Collateral Agent agrees with each of the Grantors that the Collateral Agent shall not give any such entitlement orders or instructions or directions to any such issuer, securities intermediary or commodity intermediary, and shall not withhold its consent to the exercise of any withdrawal or dealing rights by any Grantor, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, or, after giving effect to any such investment and withdrawal rights would occur. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to (A) any financial assets credited to a securities account for which the Collateral Agent is the securities intermediary or (B) Excluded Margin Stock.
Investment Property.
    (c)        If any Grantor at any time holds or acquires an interest in any electronic chattel paper or any "transferable record," as that term is defined in Section 201 of the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act, or in  16 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act as in effect in any relevant jurisdiction, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the request of the Collateral Agent, shall take such action as the Collateral Agent may reasonably request to vest in the Collateral Agent control under UCC 9-105 of such electronic chattel paper or control under Section 201 of the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act or, as the case may be, 16 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act, as so in effect in such jurisdiction, of such transferable record. The Collateral Agent agrees with such Grantor that the Collateral Agent will arrange, pursuant to procedures satisfactory to the Collateral Agent and so long as such procedures will not result in the Collateral Agent's loss of control, for the Grantor to make alterations to the electronic chattel paper or transferable record permitted under UCC 9-105 or, as the case may be, Section 201 of the Federal Electronic Signatures in Global and National Commerce Act or 16 of the Uniform Electronic Transactions Act for a party in control to allow without loss of control, unless an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing or would occur after taking into account any action by such Grantor with respect to such electronic chattel paper or transferable record.
Electronic Chattel Paper and Transferable Records.
    (d)        If any Grantor is at any time a beneficiary (other than in the ordinary course of its business and in respect of letters of credit in an aggregate amount not exceeding $150,000) under a letter of credit now or hereafter issued in favor of such Grantor, such Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent thereof and, at the request and option of the Collateral Agent, such Grantor shall, pursuant to an agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Collateral Agent, either (i) arrange for the issuer and any confirmed of such letter of credit to consent to an assignment to the Collateral Agent of the proceeds of any drawing under the letter of credit or (ii) arrange for the Collateral Agent to become the transferee beneficiary of the letter of credit, with the Collateral Agent agreeing, in each case, that the proceeds of any drawing under the letter of credit are to be applied as provided in the Credit Agreement.
Letter-of-credit Rights.
    (e)        If any Grantor shall at any time hold or acquire a commercial tort claim for an amount exceeding $100,000, the Grantor shall promptly notify the Collateral Agent in a writing signed by such Grantor of the brief details thereof and grant to the Collateral Agent in such writing a security interest therein and in the proceeds thereof, all upon the terms of this Agreement, with such writing to be in form and substance satisfactory to the Collateral Agent.
Commercial Tort Claims.
        SECTION 5.01. (a) From and after the Effective Date, each Grantor agrees to deposit all Daily Receipts into the Collection Deposit Accounts on a daily basis.
Collection Deposit Accounts.
    (b)        From and after the Effective Date, the Grantors agree to transfer, or cause to be transferred, on each Business Day, all amounts on deposit in any Collection Deposit Account to the Cash Concentration Account other than amounts necessary (i) for the payment of routine bank service fees, (ii) for change orders and (iii) to reconcile deposit balances.
    (c)        Unless and until the happening of an Event of Default, the Borrower may at any time withdraw any of the funds contained in the Cash Concentration Account for use, subject to the provisions of the Credit Agreement, for general corporate purposes.
    (d)        Upon the occurrence of an Event of Default, each Collection Deposit Account and the Cash Concentration Account will, without any further action taken on the part of any Grantor or the Collateral Agent, automatically convert into a closed account under the exclusive dominion and control of the Collateral Agent in which funds are held subject to the rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder. No Grantor shall thereafter have any right or power to withdraw any funds from any Collection Deposit Account or the Cash Concentration Account without the prior written consent of the Collateral Agent.
    (e)        In the event that a Grantor directly receives any remittances on Accounts included in the Collateral, notwithstanding the arrangements for payment directly into the Collection Deposit Accounts pursuant to Section 5.02, such remittances shall be held for the benefit of the Collateral Agent and the Lenders and shall be segregated from other funds of such Grantor, subject to the Security Interest granted hereby, and such Grantor shall cause such remittances and payments to be deposited into a Collection Deposit Account or the Cash Concentration Account as soon as practicable after such Grantor's receipt thereof.
    (f)        All payments by any Grantor into any Cash Deposit Account or the Cash Collateral Account pursuant to this Section 5.01, whether in the form of cash, checks, notes, drafts, bills of exchange, money orders or otherwise, in the relevant Cash Deposit Account or Cash Collateral Account in precisely the form in which received (but with any endorsements of such Grantor necessary for deposit or collection), and until they are so deposited such payments shall be held in trust by such Grantor for and as the property of the Collateral Agent.
        SECTION 5.02. (a) From and after the Effective Date, each Grantor agrees to notify and direct promptly each Account Debtor and every other Person obligated to make payments with respect to the Accounts included in the Collateral to make all such payments to a Collection Deposit Account established by it. Each Grantor shall use all reasonable efforts to cause each Account Debtor and every other Person identified in the preceding sentence to make all payments with respect to the Accounts included in the Collateral directly to such Collection Deposit Account.
Collections.
    (b)        Without the prior written consent of the Collateral Agent, no Grantor shall, in a manner adverse to the Lenders, change the general instructions given to Account Debtors in respect of payment on Accounts to be deposited in any Collection Deposit Account. Until the Collateral Agent shall have advised the Grantors to the contrary, each Grantor shall, and the Collateral Agent hereby authorizes each Grantor to, enforce and collect all amounts owing on the Inventory and Accounts included in the Collateral, for the benefit and on behalf of theCollateral Agent and the other Secured Parties; , , that such privilege may at the option of the Collateral Agent be terminated upon the occurrence and during the continuance of any Event of Default.
provided
however
        SECTION 5.03. Each Grantor irrevocably makes, constitutes and appoints the Collateral Agent (and all officers, employees or agents designated by the Collateral Agent) as such Grantor's true and lawful agent and attorney-in-fact, and in such capacity the Collateral Agent shall have the right, with power of substitution for each Grantor and in each Grantor's name or otherwise, for the use and benefit of the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties, upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default (a) to receive, endorse, assign and/or deliver any and all notes, acceptances, checks, drafts, money orders or other evidences of payment relating to the Collateral or any part thereof; (b) to demand, collect, receive payment of, give receipt for and give discharges and releases of all or any of the Collateral; (c) to sign the name of any Grantor on any invoice or bill of lading relating to any of the Collateral; (d) to send verifications of Accounts included in the Collateral to any Account Debtor; (e) to commence and prosecute any and all suits, actions or proceedings at law or in equity in any court of competent jurisdiction to collect or otherwise realize on all or any of the Collateral or to enforce any rights in respect of any Collateral; (f) to settle, compromise, compound, adjust or defend any actions, suits or proceedings relating to all or any of the Collateral; (g) to notify, or to require any Grantor to notify, Account Debtors to make payment directly to the Collateral Agent; and (h) to use, sell, assign, transfer, pledge, make any agreement with respect to or otherwise deal with all or any of the Collateral, and to do all other acts and things necessary to carry out the purposes of this Agreement, as fully and completely as though the Collateral Agent were the absolute owner of the Collateral for all purposes; , , that nothing herein contained shall be construed as requiring or obligating the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to make any commitment or to make any inquiry as to the nature or sufficiency of any payment received by the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party, or to present or file any claim or notice, or to take any action with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or the moneys due or to become due in respect thereof or any property covered thereby, and no action taken or omitted to be taken by the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof shall give rise to any defense, counterclaim or offset in favor of any Grantor or to any claim or action against the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party. It is understood and agreed that the appointment of the Collateral Agent as the agent and attorney-in-fact of the Grantors for the purposes set forth above is coupled with an interest and is irrevocable. The provisions of this Section shall in no event relieve any Grantor of any of its obligations hereunder or under any other Loan Document with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof or impose any obligation on the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party to proceed in any particular manner with respect to the Collateral or any part thereof, or in any way limit the exercise by the Collateral Agent or any Secured Party of any other or further right which it may have on the date of this Agreement or hereafter, whether hereunder, under any other Loan Document, by law or otherwise.
Power of Attorney
.
provided
however
        SECTION 6.01. Upon the occurrence and during the continuance of an Event of Default, each Grantor agrees to deliver each item of Collateral to the Collateral Agent on demand, and it is agreed that the Collateral Agent shall have the right to take any of or all the following actions at the same or different times: (a) with respect to any Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property, on demand, to cause the Security Interest to become an assignment, transfer and conveyance of any of or all such Collateral by the applicable Grantors to the Collateral Agent, or to license or sublicense, whether general, special or otherwise, and whether on an exclusive or non-exclusive basis, any such Collateral throughout the world on such terms and conditions and in such manner as the Collateral Agent shall determine (other than in violation of any then-existing licensing arrangements to the extent that waivers cannot be obtained), and (b) with or without legal process and with or without prior notice or demand for performance, to take possession of the Collateral and without liability for trespass to enter any premises where the Collateral may be located for the purpose of taking possession of or removing the Collateral and, generally, to exercise any and all rights afforded to a secured party under the Uniform Commercial Code or other applicable law. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, each Grantor agrees that the Collateral Agent shall have the right, subject to the mandatory requirements of applicable law, to sell or otherwise dispose of all or any part of the Collateral, at public or private sale or at any broker's board or on any securities exchange, for cash, upon credit or for future delivery as the Collateral Agent shall deem appropriate. The Collateral Agent shall be authorized at any such sale (if it deems it advisable to do so) to restrict the prospective bidders or purchasers to Persons who will represent and agree that they are purchasing the Collateral for their own account for investment and not with a view to the distribution or sale thereof, and upon consummation of any such sale the Collateral Agent shall have the right to assign, transfer and deliver to the purchaser or purchasers thereof the Collateral so sold. Each such purchaser at any such sale shall hold the property sold absolutely, free from any claim or right on the part of any Grantor, and each Grantor hereby waives (to the extent permitted by law) all rights of redemption, stay and appraisal which such Grantor now has or may at any time in the future have under any rule of law or statute now existing or hereafter enacted.
Remedies upon Default
.
        The Collateral Agent shall give the Grantors 10 days' written notice (which each Grantor agrees is reasonable notice within the meaning of Section 9-504(3) of the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions) of the Collateral Agent's intention to make any sale of Collateral. Such notice, in the case of a public sale, shall state the time and place for such sale and, in the case of a sale at a broker's board or on a securities exchange, shall state the board or exchange at which such sale is to be made and the day on which the Collateral, or portion thereof, will first be offered for sale at such board or exchange. Any such public sale shall be held at such time or times within ordinary business hours and at such place or places as the Collateral Agent may fix and state in the notice (if any) of such sale. At any such sale, the Collateral, or portion thereof, to be sold may be sold in one lot as an entirety or in separate parcels, as the Collateral Agent may (in its sole and absolute discretion) determine. The Collateral Agent shall not be obligated to make any sale of any Collateral if it shall determine not to do so, regardless of the fact that notice of sale of such Collateral shall have been given. The Collateral Agent may, without notice or publication, adjourn any public or private sale or cause the same to be adjourned from time to time by announcement at the time and place fixed for sale, and such sale may, without further notice, be made at the time and place to which the same was so adjourned. In case any sale of all or any part of the Collateral is made on credit or for future delivery, the Collateral so sold may be retained by the Collateral Agent until the sale price is paid by the purchaser or purchasers thereof, but the Collateral Agent shall not incur any liability in case any such purchaser or purchasers shall fail to take up and pay for the Collateral so sold and, in case of any such failure, such Collateral may be sold again upon like notice. At any public (or, to the extent permitted by law, private) sale made pursuant to this Section, any Secured Party may bid for or purchase, free (to the extent permitted by law) from any right of redemption, stay, valuation or appraisal on the part of any Grantor (all said rights being also hereby waived and released to the extent permitted by law), the Collateral or any part thereof offered for sale and may make payment on account thereof by using any claim then due and payable to such Secured Party from any Grantor as a credit against the purchase price, and such Secured Party may, upon compliance with the terms of sale, hold, retain and dispose of such property without further accountability to any Grantor therefor. For purposes hereof, a written agreement to purchase the Collateral or any portion thereof shall be treated as a sale thereof; the Collateral Agent shall be free to carry out such sale pursuant to such agreement and no Grantor shall be entitled to the return of the Collateral or any portion thereof subject thereto, notwithstanding the fact that after the Collateral Agent shall have entered into such an agreement all Events of Default shall have been remedied and the Obligations paid in full. As an alternative to exercising the power of sale herein conferred upon it, the Collateral Agent may proceed by a suit or suits at law or in equity to foreclose this Agreement and to sell the Collateral or any portion thereof pursuant to a judgment or decree of a court or courts having competent jurisdiction or pursuant to a proceeding by a court-appointed receiver. Any sale pursuant to the provisions of this Section 6.01 shall be deemed to conform to the commercially reasonable standards as provided in Section 9-504(3) of the Uniform Commercial Code as in effect in the State of New York or its equivalent in other jurisdictions.
        SECTION 6.02. The Collateral Agent shall apply the proceeds of any collection or sale of the Collateral, as well as any Collateral consisting of cash, as follows:
Application of Proceeds
.
        The Collateral Agent shall have absolute discretion as to the time of application of any such proceeds, moneys or balances in accordance with this Agreement. Upon any sale of the Collateral by the Collateral Agent (including pursuant to a power of sale granted by statute or under a judicial proceeding), the receipt of the purchase money by the Collateral Agent or of the officer making the sale shall be a sufficient discharge to the purchaser or purchasers of the Collateral so sold and such purchaser or purchasers shall not be obligated to see to the application of any part of the purchase money paid over to the Collateral Agent or such officer or be answerable in any way for the misapplication thereof. For purposes of making any payment hereunder in respect of any DVA Obligations, the Collateral Agent may rely upon any statement or certificate presented to it by any Grantor or DVA Creditor (or any agent for such DVA Creditor) with respect to the amount of such DVA Obligation, and any distribution by the Collateral Agent of funds to any agent for any of the DVA Creditors shall be sufficient to discharge the obligations of the Collateral Agent in respect of such DVA Obligations, and the Collateral Agent shall not be required to see to the application of such funds by such agent.
        SECTION 6.03. For the purpose of enabling the Collateral Agent to exercise rights and remedies under this Article at such time as the Collateral Agent shall be lawfully entitled to exercise such rights and remedies, each Grantor hereby grants to the Collateral Agent an irrevocable, non-exclusive license (exercisable without payment of royalty or other compensation to the Grantors) to use, license or sub-license any of the Collateral consisting of Intellectual Property now owned or hereafter acquired by such Grantor, and wherever the same may be located, and including in such license reasonable access to all media in which any of the licensed items may be recorded or stored and to all computer software and programs used for the compilation or printout thereof. The use of such license by the Collateral Agent shall be exercised, at the option of the Collateral Agent, upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default; that any license, sub-license or other transaction entered into by the Collateral Agent in accordance herewith shall be binding upon the Grantors notwithstanding any subsequent cure of an Event of Default.
Grant of License to Use Intellectual Property
.
provided
        SECTION 7.01. All communications and notices hereunder shall (except as otherwise expressly permitted herein) be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be given to it at its address or telecopy number set forth on Schedule I, with a copy to the Borrower.
Notices
.
        SECTION 7.02. All rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder, the Security Interest and all obligations of the Grantors hereunder shall be absolute and unconditional irrespective of (a) any lack of validity or enforceability of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document, any agreement with respect to any of the Obligations or any other agreement or instrument relating to any of the foregoing, (b) any change in the time, manner or place of payment of, or in any other term of, all or any of the Obligations or any other amendment or waiver of or any consent to any departure from the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument, (c) any exchange, release or non-perfection of any Lien on other collateral, or any release or amendment or waiver of or consent under or departure from any guarantee, securing or guaranteeing all or any of the Obligations, or (d) any other circumstance that might otherwise constitute a defense available to, or a discharge of, any Grantor in respect of the Obligations or this Agreement.
Security Interest Absolute
.
        SECTION 7.03. All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by any Grantor herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Secured Parties and shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans, and the execution and delivery to the Lenders of any notes evidencing such Loans, regardless of any investigation made by the Lenders or on their behalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until this Agreement shall terminate.
Survival of Agreement
.
        SECTION 7.04. This Agreement shall become effective as to any Grantor when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of such Grantor shall have been delivered to the Collateral Agent and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Collateral Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon such Grantor and the Collateral Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Grantor, the Collateral Agent and the other Secured Parties and their respective successors and assigns, except that no Grantor shall have the right to assign or transfer its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein or in the Collateral (and any such assignment or transfer shall be void) except as expressly contemplated by this Agreement or the Credit Agreement. This Agreement shall be construed as a separate agreement with respect to each Grantor and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived or released with respect to any Grantor without the approval of any other Grantor and without affecting the obligations of any other Grantor hereunder.
Binding Effect; Several Agreement
.
        SECTION 7.05. Whenever in this Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of any Grantor or the Collateral Agent that are contained in this Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of their respective successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns
.
        SECTION 7.06. (a) Each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to pay upon demand to the Collateral Agent the amount of any and all reasonable expenses, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of its counsel and of any experts or agents, which the Collateral Agent may incur in connection with (i) the administration of this Agreement, (ii) the custody or preservation of, or the sale of, collection from or other realization upon any of the Collateral, (iii) the exercise, enforcement or protection of any of the rights of the Collateral Agent hereunder or (iv) the failure of any Grantor to perform or observe any of the provisions hereof.
Collateral Agent's Fees and Expenses; Indemnification
.
    (b)        Without limitation of its indemnification obligations under the other Loan Documents, each Grantor jointly and severally agrees to indemnify the Collateral Agent and the other Indemnitees against, and hold each of them harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel, incurred by or asserted against any of them arising out of, in any way connected with, or as a result of, the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement or any claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating hereto or to the Collateral, whether or not any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses are determined by a court of competent jurisdiction by final and nonappealable judgment to have resulted from the gross negligence or willful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
provided
    (c)        Any such amounts payable as provided hereunder shall be additional Obligations secured hereby and by the other Security Documents. The provisions of this Section 7.06 shall remain operative and in full force and effect regardless of the termination of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of any of the Loans, the invalidity or unenforceability of any term or provision of this Agreement or any other Loan Document, or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Collateral Agent or any Lender. All amounts due under this Section 7.06 shall be payable on written demand therefor.
        SECTION 7.07. GOVERNING LAW. THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
        SECTION 7.08. (a) No failure or delay of the Collateral Agent in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Collateral Agent hereunder and of the Collateral Agent, the Issuing Bank, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provisions of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Grantor therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. No notice to or demand on any Grantor in any case shall entitle such Grantor or any other Grantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
Waivers; Amendment
.
    (b)        Neither this Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Collateral Agent and the Grantor or Grantors with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification is to apply, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement or any Intercreditor Agreement.
        SECTION 7.09. EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR ANY OF THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS. EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, AS APPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 7.09.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; APPOINTMENT OF RECEIVER
.
        SECTION 7.10. In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Agreement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
Severability
.
        SECTION 7.11. SECTION 7.11 This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which when taken together shall constitute but one contract (subject to Section 7.04), and shall become effective as provided in Section 7.04. Delivery of an executed signature page to this Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart hereof.
Counterparts
.
        SECTION 7.12. Article and Section headings used herein are for the purpose of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings
.
        SECTION 7.13. (a) Each Grantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any New York State court or Federal court of the United States of America sitting in New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement shall affect any right that the Collateral Agent, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents against any Grantor or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process
.
    (b)        Each Grantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any New York State or Federal court. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
    (c)        Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 7.01. Nothing in this Agreement will affected the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
        SECTION 7.14. (a) This Agreement and the Security Interest shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than the DVA Obligations and other than inchoate indemnification and reimbursement rights) have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Lenders have no further commitment to lend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Bank has no further commitment to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement, at which time the Collateral Agent shall execute and deliver to the Grantors, at the Grantors' expense, all Uniform Commercial Code termination statements and similar documents which the Grantors shall reasonably request to evidence such termination. Any execution and delivery of termination statements or documents pursuant to this Section 7.14 shall be without recourse to or warranty by the Collateral Agent.
Termination
.
    (b)        A Subsidiary Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations hereunder and the Security Interest in the Collateral of such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be automatically released in the event that all the capital stock of such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be sold, transferred or otherwise disposed of to a Person that is not an Affiliate of the Borrower in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement; that the Lenders shall have consented to such sale, transfer or other disposition (to the extent required by the Credit Agreement) and the terms of such consent did not provide otherwise.
provided
    (c)        Upon any sale or other transfer by any Grantor of any Collateral that is permitted under the Credit Agreement to any Person that is not a Grantor, or, upon the effectiveness of any written consent to the release of the security interest granted hereby in any Collateral pursuant to Section 9.02(b) of the Credit Agreement, the security interest in such Collateral shall be automatically released.
    (d)        The Collateral Agent shall, in connection with a financing contemplated by Section 6.01(a)(vi) and 6.02(a)(v) of the Credit Agreement, at the request of the lender providing the financing, (i) subordinate the security interest under this Agreement on the specific assets or improvement being financed to the security interest of such lender pursuant to an intercreditor and/or subordination agreement in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such lender, the Administrative Agent and the Grantor or (ii) release the Lien and security interest under this Agreement on the specific assets or improvement being financed; that such Lien and security interest shall be reinstated upon the repayment in full of the loans of such lender and the obligations of the Grantor to such lender arising from or related to such financing secured by such assets or improvement and, in connection with such reinstatement, the Grantors shall execute and deliver, at the Grantors' expense, any Uniform Commercial Code financing statements or other documents necessary to effect and evidence such reinstatement as may be reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent. In connection with any subordination or release of Lien and security interest pursuant to this Section 7.14(d), the Collateral Agent shall execute and deliver, at the Grantors' expense, any documents necessary to effect and evidence such subordination as may be reasonably requested by the Grantors.
provided
        SECTION 7.15. Upon execution and delivery by the Collateral Agent and a Subsidiary of Holdings of an instrument in the form of Annex 3 hereto, such Subsidiary shall become a Grantor hereunder with the same force and effect as if originally named as a Grantor herein. The execution and delivery of any such instrument shall not require the consent of any Grantor hereunder. The rights and obligations of each Grantor hereunder shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the addition of any new Grantor as a party to this Agreement.
Additional Grantors
.
        SECTION 7.16. The rights hereunder with respect to the DVA Creditors and the DVA Obligations are subject to the applicable Intercreditor Agreements.
Intercreditor Agreement
.
30
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
SCHEDULE I
Advance Trucking Corporation Western Auto Supply Company Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc. Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc. Western Auto Supply of Ontario Limited Advance Merchandising Company, Inc. Advance Aircraft Company, Inc. Discount Auto Parts, Inc.
SCHEDULE II
None.
SCHEDULE III
None.
SCHEDULE IV
None.
4
SCHEDULE V
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONS OWNER:     Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.
Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application DateADV                                                         2,049,823                    04/01/1997ADVANCE AUTO PARTS                                          1,815,267                    01/04/1994ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 1,847,137                    07/26/1994ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 1,484,796                    04/12/1988ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/258905                    06/05/2003ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/258959                    06/05/2003ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/453252                    07/20/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/453265                    07/20/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/453277                    07/20/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/453288                    07/20/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/453301                    07/20/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 78/465180                    08/10/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS.  WE'RE READY IN ADVANCE. &              78/258939                    06/05/2003designADVANCE AUTO PARTS.  WE'RE READY IN ADVANCE. &              78/258981                    06/05/2003designAMERICAN SPIRIT                                             1,242,721                    06/21/1983AUTOCRAFT                                                   1,622,118                    11/13/1990AUTOCRAFT CASTAWAY                                          2,640,809                    10/22/2002AUTOXPRESS                                                  78/470757                    08/20/2004CARCARE101                                                  2,391,747                    10/03/2000CARCARE101 & design                                         2,391,746                    10/03/2000DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                                2,415,619                    12/26/2000DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                                2,539,168                    02/19/2002ENDURANCE & design                                          78/470767                    08/20/2004HYDRO FORCE                                                 2,731,342                    07/01/2003INFO-TRAK                                                   1,792,873                    09/14/1993JOE'S GARAGE EST. 1932 & design                             78/484603                    09/16/2004LASTACELL                                                   1,494,948                    07/05/1988MECHANIC'S CHOICE & design                                  78/470776                    08/20/2004MORE PARTS, LOWER PRICES                                    2,482,142                    08/28/2001PARTS AMERICA                                               2,280,955                    09/28/1999PARTS EXPRESS                                               2,381,242                    08/29/2000PDQ                                                         1,395,226                    05/27/1986PRO2CALL                                                    2,228,513                    03/02/1999PROFESSIONAL'S FAVORITE                                     76/469754                    11/26/2002PROTECTION PLUS                                             78/362151                    02/04/2004RIGHT PART.  RIGHT AWAY.                                    76/060218                    05/30/2000
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONS OWNER:     Advance Merchandising Company, Inc. (continued)
SENTRY                                                      0,255,631                    04/30/1929SOUNDXPRESS & design                                        78/471990                    08/23/2004SPARK FORCE                                                 2,361,786                    06/27/2000THE BEST PART IS OUR PEOPLE                                 2,167,375                    06/23/1998THE FRONT RUNNER                                            1,850,319                    08/16/1994TIRE SOURCE                                                 1,956,753                    02/13/1996TOUGH ONE                                                   1,715,139                    09/15/1992TOUGH ONE ENGINES & design                                  78/368578                    02/16/2004TRAK AUTO                                                   1,168,761                    09/08/1981TRAK                                                        1,574,103                    01/02/1990TRAK AUTO & design                                          1,418,151                    11/25/1986TROUBLE FREE                                                1,490,825                    06/07/1988TROUBLE FREE                                                2,133,425                    01/27/1998WEAREVER                                                    2,044,917                    03/11/1997WEAREVER                                                    1,650,703                    07/16/1991WESTERN FLYER                                               0,440,857                    10/05/1948WIZARD                                                      0,837,072                    10/17/1967
FEDERAL MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONS OWNER:     Western Auto Supply Company
Registration or                      Mark                         Serial or Registration No.         Application DateENDURANCE                                                   1,197,174                    06/08/1982WESTERN AUTO                                                0,883,548                    12/30/1969WESTERN AUTO                                                0,883,524                    12/30/1969checkered flag design                                       1,209,010                    09/14/1982flag design                                                 1,652,836                    08/06/1991WESTERN FLYER                                               0,289,563                    12/01/1931
STATE MARK REGISTRATIONS/APPLICATIONS OWNER:     Advance Merchandising Company, Inc.
State                                  Registration or                                                                                Serial or                       Mark                                                  Registration No.      Application DateADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                               Colorado             20041247079            07/14/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                               Colorado             20041247078            07/14/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                Florida             T04000000969           07/30/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                Florida             T04000000968           07/30/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000329           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000328           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000327           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000330           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000331           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000423           04/02/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000332           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000334           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000335           03/12/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000001063           08/17/2004ADVANCE DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS & design                       Florida             T04000000333           03/12/2004DISCOUNT AUTO PARTS                                        Florida                922243              04/11/1980DRIVING HOME THE SAVINGS*                                  Florida             T95000000733           06/13/1995ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                               Minnesota              973172-2             07/15/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                              New Jersey               21848               07/16/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                              New Jersey               21849               07/16/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             No. Carolina             T-18015              07/14/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                             No. Carolina             T-18014              07/14/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 Texas               800365224             08/12/2004ADVANCE AUTO PARTS & design                                 Texas               800365220             08/12/2004
* This mark was included in the sale from Discount Auto to Advance. The owner of record reflected in the state's records is Rose Auto Stores.
        Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Borrower, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), the lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Secured Parties.
Credit Agreement
Holdings
    A.        The Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein) (the Subsidiary Guarantors, the Borrower and Holdings being collectively referred to as the "") and the Collateral Agent are parties to an Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""). Pursuant to the terms of the Security Agreement, the Grantors have granted to the Collateral Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in the Grantors' Accounts and other Collateral, to secure the payment and performance of the Obligations. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Security Agreement.
Grantors
Security Agreement
    B.        The Cash Concentration Bank has agreed to act as collection sub-agent of the Collateral Agent to receive (a) amounts transferred to the Cash Concentration Account (as defined below) (such amounts, the "") and (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.
Transferred Receipts
    C.        The parties hereto desire to define hereunder certain rights and obligations among them with respect to the appointment of the Cash Concentration Bank.
        NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:
    1.        The Collateral Agent hereby appoints the Cash Concentration Bank as its collection sub-agent under the Security Agreement and authorizes the Cash Concentration Bank, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, to receive and hold on deposit (a) Transferred Receipts and (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.
    2.        Prior to or contemporaneously with the execution and delivery by the Cash Concentration Bank of this Agreement, and for the purposes of this Agreement, the Cash Concentration Bank has established and will (except as otherwise provided in paragraph 12 below) maintain a cash concentration account in Wachovia Bank, National Association (account number 2001000059003) in the name of the Borrower (the ""). The Cash Concentration Bank shall deposit in the Cash Concentration Account all Transferred Receipts received by the Cash Concentration Bank and all payments received by the Cash Concentration Bank in respect of the Accounts included in the Collateral. The Cash Concentration Bank agrees to give the Collateral Agent prompt notice if the Cash Concentration Bank receives notice that the Cash Concentration Account is subject to any writ, judgment, warrant of attachment, execution or similar process. As security for the payment and performance of the Obligations, the Borrower hereby pledges, assigns and transfers to the Cash Concentration Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, and hereby creates and grants to the Cash Concentration Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, a security interest in the Cash Concentration Account and all property and assets held therein. The Cash Concentration Bank acknowledges the security interest of the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Lenders in the Cash Concentration Account.
Cash Concentration Account
    3.        [The Cash Concentration Bank shall transmit all funds, if any, then on deposit in the Cash Concentration Account at the end of each Business Day to the cash concentration account maintained by the Borrower with Wachovia Bank, National Association (account number 2001000059003); that funds on deposit which are subject to collection shall be transmitted promptly upon collection.] The Collateral Agent hereby authorizes the Cash Concentration Bank to permit the Borrower to make withdrawals from the Cash Concentration Account, so long as the Cash Concentration Bank has not received prior written notice from the Collateral Agent pursuant to the next succeeding sentence. Promptly upon receipt of written, telex or telecopy notice from the Collateral Agent so directing the Cash Concentration Bank at any time (which direction shall be given by the Collateral Agent only upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default and which notice shall be sent simultaneously to the Borrower), except to the extent and subject to such terms as may be specified in such notice, the Cash Concentration Bank shall no longer permit withdrawals from the Cash Concentration Account to be made by the Borrower without the written consent of the Collateral Agent, and, if so directed in such notice, shall promptly transmit to the Collateral Agent, at the office specified in such notice, all funds, if any, then on deposit in the Cash Concentration Account ( that funds on deposit that are subject to collection shall be transmitted promptly upon collection). If so directed in such notice, the Cash Concentration Bank shall deliver directly to the Collateral Agent at the office specified in such notice all checks, drafts and other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Transferred Receipts or Accounts included in the Collateral in the possession of the Cash Concentration Bank without depositing such checks, drafts or other instruments in the Cash Concentration Account.
provided
provided
    4.        Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, the Cash Concentration Bank shall, if requested by the Collateral Agent, furnish the Collateral Agent with monthly statements, in the form and manner typical for the Cash Concentration Bank, of amounts on deposit in, and amounts withdrawn from, the Cash Concentration Account and such other information relating to the Cash Concentration Account at such times as shall be reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent.
    5.        For purposes of this Agreement, any officer of the Collateral Agent shall be authorized to act, and to give instructions and notice, for the purposes set forth in this Agreement on behalf of the Collateral Agent hereunder.
    6.        The fees for the services of the Cash Concentration Bank shall be mutually agreed upon between the Borrower and the Cash Concentration Bank. The Collateral Agent shall not have any responsibility or liability for the payment of any such fee.
    7.        The Cash Concentration Bank may perform any of its duties hereunder by or through its agents, officers or employees and shall be entitled to rely upon the advice of counsel as to its duties. The Cash Concentration Bank shall not be liable to the Collateral Agent for any action required of the Cash Concentration Bank under the terms of this Agreement, if such action was taken or omitted to be taken by it in the absence of gross negligence or willful misconduct, nor shall the Cash Concentration Bank be responsible to the Collateral Agent or the Borrower for the consequences of any oversight or error of judgment or be answerable to the Collateral Agent for the same unless the same shall happen through its gross negligence or wilful misconduct.
    8.        The Borrower consents to the appointment of the Cash Concentration Bank and agrees that it will not withdraw, or request to withdraw, funds from the Cash Concentration Account upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default unless such withdrawal is consented to in writing by the Collateral Agent.
    9.        The Cash Concentration Bank undertakes to perform only such duties as are expressly set forth in this Agreement.
    10.        The Cash Concentration Bank accepts its obligations as set forth in this Agreement upon the terms and conditions hereof, including the following, to all of which the Borrower and the Collateral Agent agree:
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized officers as of the date first above written.
Annex 1-B to the Security Agreement
        Reference is made to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Borrower, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (""), the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the "").
Credit Agreement
Holdings
Administrative Agent
    A.        The Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein) (the Subsidiary Guarantors, the Borrower and Holdings being collectively referred to herein as the "") and the Collateral Agent are parties to an Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (the ""). Pursuant to the terms of the Security Agreement, the Grantors have granted to the Collateral Agent, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, a security interest in the Grantors' Accounts and other Collateral, to secure the payment and performance of the Obligations. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Security Agreement.
Grantors
Security Agreement
    B.        The Collection Deposit Bank has agreed to receive on behalf of the Grantors (a) Daily Receipts and (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.
    C.        The parties hereto desire to define hereunder certain rights and obligations among them with respect to the appointment of the Collection Deposit Bank.
        NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the premises and the mutual covenants and agreements hereinafter set forth, the parties hereto agree as follows:
    1.        The Collateral Agent hereby authorizes the Collection Deposit Bank, on the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, to receive (a) Daily Receipts and (b) payments on the Accounts included in the Collateral.
    2.        Contemporaneously with the execution and delivery by the Collection Deposit Bank of this Agreement, and for the purposes of this Agreement, the Collection Deposit Bank has established and shall maintain (except as otherwise provided in paragraph 8 below) for the benefit of the Collateral Agent upon the occurrence of an Event of Default one or more collection accounts in the name of the Borrower (all such accounts, collectively, the ""). All Daily Receipts received by the Collection Deposit Bank and all payments received by the Collection Deposit Bank in respect of the Accounts included in the Collateral shall be deposited by the Borrower in the Collection Deposit Account, and such Daily Receipts and payments shall not be commingled with other funds of the Borrower. All funds at any time on deposit in the Collection Deposit Account shall be held by the Collection Deposit Bank subject to the terms of this Agreement. The Collection Deposit Bank agrees to give the Collateral Agent prompt notice if the Collection Deposit Bank receives notice that the Collection Deposit Account is subject to any writ, judgment, warrant of attachment, execution or similar process. As security for the payment and performance of the Obligations, the Borrower hereby pledges, assigns and transfers to the Collection Deposit Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, and hereby creates and grants to the Collection Deposit Bank, for the benefit of the Collateral Agent, a security interest in the Collection Deposit Account and all property and assets held therein. The Collection Deposit Bank acknowledges the security interest of the Collateral Agent for the benefit of the Lenders in the Collection Deposit Account.
Collection Deposit Account
    3.        The Collateral Agent hereby authorizes the Collection Deposit Bank to permit the Borrower to make withdrawals from the Collection Deposit Account, so long as the Collection Deposit Bank has not received notice from the Collateral Agent pursuant to the next succeeding sentence. Upon receipt of written, telex, facsimile or telephonic notice (which, in the case of telephonic notice, shall be promptly confirmed in writing) from the Collateral Agent so directing the Collection Deposit Bank at any time (which direction shall be given by the Collateral Agent only upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default and which notice shall be sent simultaneously to the Borrower), except to the extent and subject to such terms as may be specified in such notice, the Collection Deposit Bank shall no longer permit withdrawals from the Collection Deposit Account to be made by the Borrower, and, if so directed in such notice, shall promptly transmit to the cash concentration account maintained by the Borrower with Wachovia Bank, National Association (account number 2001000059003) (the "") all funds, if any, then on deposit in, or otherwise to the credit of, the Collection Deposit Account ( that funds on deposit that are subject to collection shall be transmitted promptly upon collection). If so directed in such notice, the Collection Deposit Bank shall transmit directly to the Borrower Cash Concentration Account all Daily Receipts and all checks, drafts and other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Accounts included in the Collateral in the possession of the Collection Deposit Bank without depositing such Daily Receipts or such checks, drafts or other instruments in the Collection Deposit Account or any other account.
Borrower Cash Concentration Account
provided
    4.        Upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, the Collection Deposit Bank shall, if requested by the Collateral Agent, furnish the Collateral Agent with monthly statements, in the form and manner typical for the Collection Deposit Bank, of amounts of deposits in, and amounts withdrawn from, the Collection Deposit Account and such other information relating to the Collection Deposit Account at such times as shall be reasonably requested by the Collateral Agent.
    5.        For purposes of this Agreement, any officer of the Collateral Agent shall be authorized to act, and to give instructions and notice, for the purposes set forth in this Agreement on behalf of the Collateral Agent hereunder.
    6.        The fees for the services of the Collection Deposit Bank shall be mutually agreed upon between the Borrower and the Collection Deposit Bank. The Collateral Agent shall not have any responsibility or liability for the payment of any such fee.
    7.        The Collection Deposit Bank may perform any of its duties hereunder by or through its agents, officers or employees and shall be entitled to rely upon the advice of counsel as to its duties. The Collection Deposit Bank shall not be liable to the Collateral Agent for any action required of the Collection Deposit Bank under the terms of this Agreement, if such action was taken or omitted to be taken by it in good faith, nor shall the Collection Deposit Bank be responsible to the Collateral Agent or the Borrower for the consequences of any oversight or error of judgment or be answerable to the Collateral Agent for the same unless the same shall happen through its gross negligence or willful misconduct.
    8.        In the event that the Borrower shall replace the Collection Deposit Bank (of which the Borrower shall notify the Collateral Agent in advance), the Collection Deposit Bank or the Borrower, as applicable, will (a) immediately transmit to the Borrower Cash Concentration Account all funds, if any, then on deposit in, or otherwise to the credit of, the Collection Deposit Account, (b) deliver directly to the successor collection deposit bank at the office specified in writing by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent all subsequently received Daily Receipts and all checks, drafts and other instruments for the payment of money relating to the Accounts included in the Collateral that would have been deposited with the Collection Deposit Bank and (c) deliver any Daily Receipts or payments relating to the Accounts included in the Collateral by the Collection Deposit Bank after such replacement, in whatever form received, directly to the successor collection deposit bank at the office specified in writing by the Borrower to the Collateral Agent.
    9.        The Borrower consents to the appointment of the Collection Deposit Bank and agrees that it will not withdraw, or request to withdraw, funds from the Collection Deposit Account upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default unless such withdrawal is consented to in writing by the Collateral Agent. The Borrower acknowledges that the Collection Deposit Bank shall incur no liability to the Borrower as a result of any action taken pursuant to an instruction given by the Collateral Agent in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement.
    10.        The Collateral Agent agrees that it will provide the Collection Deposit Bank with notice as specified in paragraph 3 of this Agreement only if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing under this Agreement or any other Loan Document.
    11.        The term of this Agreement shall extend from the date hereof until the earlier of (a) the date on which all Obligations (other than the DVA Obligations) have been paid in full and (b) any date on which the Collection Deposit Bank shall not be serving in its capacity as collection deposit bank hereunder as provided in paragraph 8 above. The obligations of the Collection Deposit Bank contained in the third sentence of paragraph 8 shall survive the termination of this Agreement.
    12.        All notices and communications hereunder shall be in writing (except where telephonic instructions or notices are authorized herein) and shall be deemed to have been received and shall be effective on the day on which delivered (including delivery by telex or facsimile) (a) in the case of the Collateral Agent, addressed to JPMorgan Chase Bank, Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, to the attention of Deepa Madhavan (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932) with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York 10017, to the attention of Neil Boylan, (Telecopy No. (212) 552-5658), and (b) in the case of the Collection Deposit Bank, addressed to [ ], to the attention of [ ].
    13.        The Collection Deposit Bank will not (except as contemplated in paragraph 8 above) assign or transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder (other than to the Collateral Agent) without the prior written consent of the other parties hereto.
    14.        This Agreement may be amended only by a written instrument executed by the Collateral Agent, the Collection Deposit Bank and the Borrower, acting by their representative officers thereunto duly authorized.
    15.        Except as otherwise provided in the Credit Agreement with respect to rights of set-off available to the Collection Deposit Bank in the event that it is also a Lender under the Credit Agreement, the Collection Deposit Bank hereby irrevocably waives, effective upon the occurrence and during the continuation of an Event of Default, any right to set-off against, or otherwise deduct from, any funds (with the exception of service fees and deposited items which have been returned) then or at any time thereafter held in the Collection Deposit Account for any indebtedness or other claim then or at any time thereafter owed by the Borrower to the Collection Deposit Bank.
    16.        Except to the extent the laws of the state of [           ] govern the Collection Deposit Account, this Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the laws of the State of New York.
    17.        This Agreement (a) shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the Collateral Agent, the Collection Deposit Bank, the Borrower and their respective successors and assigns and (b) may be executed simultaneously in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be executed by their duly authorized officers as of the date first above written.
Annex 2 to theSecurity Agreement
        Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (""), Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (the ""), the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "") and JPMorgan Chase Bank, as administrative agent for the Lenders, Collateral Agent and issuing bank, (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined therein), Holdings and the Collateral Agent and (c) the Amended and Restated Security Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Borrower, Holdings, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Collateral Agent. All capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given such terms in the Credit Agreement or the Security Agreement, as applicable.
Credit Agreement
Holdings
Borrower
Lenders
Guarantee Agreement
Security Agreement
        The undersigned, a Financial Officer of the Borrower, hereby certifies to the Collateral Agent and each other Secured Party as follows:
    1.        (a) The exact corporate name of each Grantor, as such name appears in its respective certificate of incorporation, is as follows:
Names
    (b)        Set forth below is each other corporate name each Grantor has had in the past five years, together with the date of the relevant change:
    (c)        Except as set forth in Schedule 1 hereto, no Grantor has changed its identity or corporate structure in any way within the past five years. Changes in identity or corporate structure would include mergers, consolidations and acquisitions, as well as any change in the form, nature or jurisdiction of corporate organization. If any such change has occurred, include in Schedule 1 the information required by Sections 1 and 2 of this certificate as to each acquiree or constituent party to a merger or consolidation.
    (d)        The following is a list of all other names (including trade names or similar appellations) used by each Grantor or any of its divisions or other business units in connection with the conduct of its business or the ownership of its properties at any time during the past five years:
    (e)        Set forth below is the Federal Taxpayer Identification Number of each Grantor:
    (f)        Set forth below is the organizational number of each Grantor that is a registered organization:
    2.        (a) The chief executive office of each Grantor is located at the address set forth opposite its name below:
Current Locations
.
                                                                                                      
Grantor
Mailing Address
County
State
    (b)        Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all locations where such Grantor maintains any books or records relating to any Accounts (with each location at which chattel paper, if any, is kept being indicated by an "*"):
                                                                                                      
Grantor
Mailing Address
County
State
    (c)        The jurisdiction of formation of each Grantor that is a registered organization is set forth opposite its name below:
                                                                                                                              
Grantor
Jurisdiction
    (d)        Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the places of business of such Grantor not identified in paragraph (a), (b) or (c) above:
                                                                                                      
Grantor
Mailing Address
County
State
    (e)        Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are all the locations where such Grantor maintains any Collateral not identified above:
                                                                                                      
Grantor
Mailing Address
County
State
    (f)        Set forth below opposite the name of each Grantor are the names and addresses of all Persons other than such Grantor that have possession of any of the Collateral of such Grantor:
                                                                                                      
Grantor
Mailing Address
County
State
    3.        All Accounts have been originated by the Grantors and all Inventory has been acquired by the Grantors in the ordinary course of business.
Unusual Transactions.
    4.        File search reports have been obtained from each Uniform Commercial Code filing office identified with respect to such Grantor in Section 2 hereof, and such search reports reflect no liens against any of the Collateral other than those permitted under the Credit Agreement.
File Search Reports
.
    5.        Duly [authenticated] [signed] financing statements on Form UCC-1 in substantially the form of Schedule 5 hereto have been prepared for filing in the Uniform Commercial Code filing office in each jurisdiction identified with respect to such Grantor in [Section 2] [Section 2(a) or 2(b)] hereof.
UCC Filings
.
    6.        Attached hereto as Schedule 5 is a schedule setting forth, with respect to the filings described in Section 5 above, each filing and the filing office in which such filing is to be made.
Schedule of Filings.
    7.        All filing fees and taxes payable in connection with the filings described in Section 5 above have been or will be paid.
Filing Fees
.
    8.        Attached hereto as Schedule 8 is a true and correct list of all the duly authorized, issued and outstanding stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other equity interests in the Borrower and of each Subsidiary and the record and beneficial owners of such stock, partnership interests, limited liability company membership interests or other equity interests. Also set forth on Schedule 8 is each equity investment of Holdings and each Subsidiary that represents 50% or less of the equity of the entity in which such investment was made.
Stock Ownership
.
    9.        Attached hereto as Schedule 9 is a true and correct list of all instruments, including promissory notes and other evidence of indebtedness, held by Holdings and each Subsidiary, including all intercompany notes between Holdings and each Subsidiary of Holdings and between each Subsidiary of Holdings and each other such Subsidiary.
Debt Indebtedness
.
    10.        Attached hereto as Schedule 10 is (a) a true and correct list of all advances made by Holdings to any Subsidiary of Holdings or made by any Subsidiary of Holdings to Holdings or any other Subsidiary of Holdings, which advances will be on and after the date hereof evidenced by one or more intercompany notes pledged to the Collateral Agent under the Pledge Agreement, and (b) a true and correct list of all unpaid intercompany transfers of goods sold and delivered by or to Holdings or any Subsidiary of Holdings.
Advances
.
    11.        Attached hereto as Schedule 11 is a schedule setting forth, with respect to each Mortgaged Property, (a) the exact corporate name of the corporation that owns such property as such name appears in its certificate of incorporation, (b) if different from the name identified pursuant to clause (a), the exact name of the current record owner of such property reflected in the records of the filing office for such property identified pursuant to the following clause and (c) the filing office in which a Mortgage with respect to such property must be filed or recorded in order for the Collateral Agent to obtain a perfected security interest therein.
Mortgage Filings
.
    12.        Attached hereto as Schedule 12(A) in proper form for filing with the United States Patent and Trademark Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Patents, Patent Licenses, Trademarks and Trademark Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and the expiration date of each Patent, Patent License, Trademark and Trademark License owned by any Grantor. Attached hereto as Schedule 12(B) in proper form for filing with the United States Copyright Office is a schedule setting forth all of each Grantor's Copyrights and Copyright Licenses, including the name of the registered owner, the registration number and the expiration date of each Copyright or Copyright License owned by any Grantor.
Intellectual Property.
    13.        Attached hereto as Schedule 13 is a true and correct list of commercial tort claims held by any Grantor, including a brief description thereof.
Commercial Tort Claims.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the undersigned has duly executed this certificate on this _____ day of November 2004.
Annex 3 to the
Security Agreement
    A.        Reference is made to (a) the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as further amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Borrower, Holdings, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the "") and JPMCB, as administrative agent for the Lenders (in such capacity, the ""), Collateral Agent and as issuing bank (in such capacity, the ""), and (b) the Guarantee Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ""), among the Subsidiary Guarantors, Holdings and the Collateral Agent.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agent
Issuing Bank
Guarantee Agreement
    B.        Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Security Agreement or the Credit Agreement, as applicable.
    C.        The Grantors have entered into the Security Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans, the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit and DVA Creditors to purchase Designated Vendor Accounts. Section 7.15 of the Security Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries of Holdings may become Grantors under the Security Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement. The undersigned Subsidiary (the "") is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement to become a Grantor under the Security Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans, the Issuing Bank to issue additional Letters of Credit and DVA Creditors to purchase additional Designated Vendor Accounts, and as consideration for Loans previously made, Letters of Credit previously issued and Designated Vendor Accounts previously purchased.
New Grantor
        Accordingly, the Collateral Agent and the New Grantor agree as follows:
        SECTION 1. In accordance with Section 7.15 of the Security Agreement, the New Grantor by its signature below becomes a Grantor under the Security Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as a Grantor, and the New Grantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Security Agreement applicable to it as a Grantor thereunder and (b) represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties that the representations and warranties made by it as a Grantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof. In furtherance of the foregoing, the New Grantor, as security for the payment and performance in full of the Obligations (as defined in the Security Agreement), does hereby create and grant to the Collateral Agent, its successors and assigns, for the benefit of the Secured Parties, their successors and assigns, a security interest in and lien on all of the New Grantor's right, title and interest in and to the Collateral (as defined in the Security Agreement) of the New Grantor. Each reference to a "Grantor" in the Security Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Grantor. The Security Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
        SECTION 2. The New Grantor represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
        SECTION 3. This Supplement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Supplement shall become effective when the Collateral Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Grantor and the Collateral Agent. Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually signed counterpart of this Supplement.
        SECTION 4. The New Grantor hereby represents and warrants to the Collateral Agent and the Secured Parties that (a) set forth on Schedule I attached hereto is a true and correct schedule of the location of any and all Collateral of the New Grantor other than Collateral (i) consisting of goods in transit between facilities, whether in vehicles owned by the applicable Grantor or on common carriers and (ii) located in temporary warehousing which will remain in such warehousing for no longer than one month and (b) set forth under its signature hereto, is the true and correct location of the chief executive office of the New Grantor and its jurisdiction of formation.
        SECTION 5. Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Security Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
         SECTION 6. THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
        SECTION 7. In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the Security Agreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
        SECTION 8. All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 7.01 of the Security Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to the New Grantor shall be given to it at the address set forth under its signature below.
        SECTION 9. The New Grantor agrees to reimburse the Collateral Agent for its reasonable out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, other charges and disbursements of counsel for the Collateral Agent.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Grantor and the Collateral Agent have duly executed this Supplement to the Security Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
SCHEDULE I
to Supplement No. [ ] to theSecurity Agreement
                                                                                                                                                 
Description
Location

Exhibit 10.43
        WHEREAS, Holdings and the Borrower have requested, and the Required Restatement Lenders and the Administrative Agent have agreed, upon the terms and subject to the conditions set forth herein, that (a) the Tranche A Lenders referred to below extend credit in the form of Tranche A Term Loans on the Effective Date, in an aggregate principal amount equal to $200,000,000, (b) the Tranche B Lenders referred to below extend credit in the form of Tranche B Term Loans on the Effective Date, in an aggregate principal amount equal to $170,000,000, the proceeds of which, together with the proceeds of the Tranche A Term Loans, will be used as set forth in Section 5.11 of the Restated Credit Agreement referred to below, (c) the Delayed Draw Lenders referred to below extend credit in the form of Delayed Draw Term Loans on or after the Effective Date, in an aggregate principal amount of up to $100,000,000, the proceeds of which will be used to repurchase shares of the capital stock of Holdings, (d) the New Revolving Lenders referred to below make commitments on the Effective Date to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans under the Restated Credit Agreement (the ""), in an aggregate principal amount equal to $200,000,000, to replace all Revolving Commitments existing under the Existing Credit Agreement and (e) the Existing Credit Agreement be amended and restated as provided herein.
New Revolving Commitments
        NOW, THEREFORE, Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Restatement Lenders and the Administrative Agent hereby agree as follows:
        SECTION 1. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Restated Credit Agreement. As used in this Agreement, (i) "" has the meaning assigned to such term in the Existing Credit Agreement and (ii) "" means, at any time, (A) the Required Lenders and (B) each of the Tranche A Lenders, Tranche B Lenders, Delayed Draw Lenders and New Revolving Lenders set forth on Schedule 1 hereto.
Defined Terms
.
Required Lenders
Required Restatement Lenders
        SECTION 2. (a) The transactions provided for in Sections 3 through 5 hereof shall be consummated at a closing to be held on the Effective Date at the offices of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, or at such other time and place as the parties hereto shall agree upon.
Effective Date
.
        (b)        The "" shall be specified by the Borrower, and shall be a date not later than November 3, 2004, as of which all the conditions set forth or referred to in Section 6 hereof shall have been satisfied. The Borrower shall give not less than one Business Day's written notice proposing a date as the Effective Date to the Administrative Agent, which shall send copies of such notice to the Lenders. This Agreement shall terminate at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on November 3, 2004, if the Effective Date shall not have occurred at or prior to such time.
Effective Date
        SECTION 3. (a) Each Person that agrees to make Tranche A Term Loans (a "") will, on the Effective Date and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Restated Credit Agreement, make such Tranche A Term Loans to the Borrower in the manner contemplated by paragraph (g) of this Section.
Tranche A Term Loans; Tranche B Term Loans; Prepayment of Existing Term Loans; Delayed Draw Term Loans; New Revolving Commitments
.
Tranche A Lender
        (b)        Each Person that agrees to make Tranche B Term Loans (a "") will, on the Effective Date and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Restated Credit Agreement, make such Tranche B Term Loans to the Borrower in the manner contemplated by paragraph (g) of this Section.
Tranche B Lender
        (c)        Each Person that agrees to make Delayed Draw Term Loans (a "") will, on or after the Effective Date and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Restated Credit Agreement, make such Delayed Draw Term Loans to the Borrower in the manner contemplated by paragraph (g) of this Section.
Delayed Draw Lender
        (d)        Each Person that agrees to make a New Revolving Commitment (a "") will, on the Effective Date and subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the Restated Credit Agreement, be deemed to have made a New Revolving Commitment in an amount set forth for each such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto.
New Revolving Lender
        (e)        Each Required Lender that executes and delivers this Agreement solely in the capacity of a Required Lender and not specifically as a Tranche A Lender, Tranche B Lender, Delayed Draw Lender, or New Revolving Lender shall be deemed to have agreed to this Agreement but will not be deemed by virtue of such execution and delivery to have undertaken any commitment to make Tranche A Terms Loans, Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans or a New Revolving Commitment.
        (f)        Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Restated Credit Agreement (in the case of Loans to be made after the Effective Date), (i) each Tranche A Lender agrees to make a Tranche A Term Loan to the Borrower on the Effective Date in a principal amount equal to the Tranche A Commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto, (ii) each Tranche B Lender agrees to make a Tranche B Term Loan to the Borrower on the Effective Date in a principal amount equal to the Tranche B Commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto, (iii) each Delayed Draw Lender agrees to make Delayed Draw Term Loans to the Borrower during the Delayed Draw Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount up to the Delayed Draw Commitment set forth for such Delayed Draw Lender on Schedule 1 hereto and (iv) each New Revolving Lender agrees to make a New Revolving Commitment on the Effective Date in an amount equal to the New Revolving Commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto. All Borrowings made on the Effective Date shall be made as ABR Borrowings. The Required Lenders hereby waive the requirements of Section 6.01 of the Existing Credit Agreement to the extent, but only to the extent, necessary to permit the Borrower to incur the Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans and New Revolving Commitments and make Borrowings thereunder on or after, as applicable, the Effective Date. The Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans and Revolving Loans shall be made in the manner contemplated by paragraph (g) of this Section. For purposes hereof, a Person shall become a Tranche A Lender, Tranche B Lender, Delayed Draw Lender or New Revolving Lender, as the case may be, and a party to the Restated Credit Agreement by executing and delivering to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the Effective Date, a signature page to this Agreement. The "" of any Tranche A Lender will be the amount of such commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto. The "" of any Tranche B Lender will be the amount of such commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto. The "" of any Delayed Draw Lender will be the amount of such commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto. The "" of any New Revolving Lender will be the amount of such commitment set forth for such Lender on Schedule 1 hereto. The commitments of the Tranche A Lenders, Tranche B Lenders, Delayed Draw Lenders and New Revolving Lenders are several and no such Lender will be responsible for any other Lender's failure (A) to make Tranche A Term Loans, Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans or Revolving Loans or (B) to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans under the Restated Credit Agreement.
Tranche A Commitment
Tranche B Commitment
Delayed Draw Commitment
New Revolving Commitment
        (g)        Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein and in the Restated Credit Agreement, (i) each Tranche A Lender will make Tranche A Term Loans on the Effective Date, (ii) each Tranche B Lender will make Tranche B Term Loans on the Effective Date, (iii) each Delayed Draw Lender will make Delayed Draw Term Loans from time to time during the Delayed Draw Availability Period and (iv) each New Revolving Lender will make Revolving Loans from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period, in each case in the manner contemplated by Section 2.06 of the Restated Credit Agreement.
        (h)        Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, any Tranche B Lender that has Tranche D Term Loans or Tranche E Term Loans (collectively, "") outstanding immediately prior to the Effective Date may, with the prior consent of the Administrative Agent, exchange its Existing Term Loans for Tranche B Term Loans in an equal principal amount (to the extent the aggregate principal amount of such Existing Term Loans does not exceed the Tranche B Commitment of such Lender); that such Lender (i) makes an election to do so by providing written notice thereof to the Administrative Agent not later than the time it delivers an executed counterpart of the signature page hereof to the Administrative Agent and (ii) transfers to the Administrative Agent, in the manner contemplated by Section 2.06 of the Restated Credit Agreement, an amount equal to the excess, if any, of its Tranche B Commitment over the principal amount of its Existing Term Loans exchanged pursuant to this paragraph (h).
Existing Term Loans
provided
        (i)        On the Effective Date, the Borrower shall apply the proceeds of the Tranche A Term Loans and Tranche B Term Loans and such other amounts as may be necessary to (i) prepay in full all Existing Term Loans (other than Existing Term Loans exchanged for Tranche B Term Loans pursuant to paragraph (h) of this Section), (ii) pay all accrued and unpaid interest on all Existing Term Loans, (iii) pay to each existing Tranche D Lender and Tranche E Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement (collectively, the ") all amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.16 of the Existing Credit Agreement as a result of the prepayment of such Lender's Existing Term Loans and all other obligations then due and owing to such Lenders under the Existing Credit Agreement in their capacities as such, (iv) pay to each Revolving Lender under the Existing Credit Agreement (an "" and, together with the Existing Term Lenders, the "") (A) all outstanding Revolving Loans, (B) all accrued and unpaid commitment fees payable pursuant to Section 2.12(a) of the Existing Credit Agreement, (C) all accrued and unpaid participation fees payable pursuant to Section 2.12(b) and (D) all other obligations then due and owing to such Lenders under the Existing Credit Agreement in their capacities as such, and (v) pay to the Issuing Bank any unreimbursed LC Disbursements payable pursuant to Section 2.05(e) of the Existing Credit Agreement. The exchange of any Existing Term Loans for Tranche B Term Loans pursuant to paragraph (h) of this Section shall be treated as a prepayment of such Existing Term Loans for purposes of Section 2.16 of the Existing Credit Agreement.
"Existing Term Lenders
Existing Revolving Lender
Existing Lenders
        (j)        On the Effective Date, each Issuing Bank that has issued an Existing Letter of Credit shall be deemed, without further action by any New Revolving Lender or any other party hereto or to the Restated Credit Agreement, to have granted to each New Revolving Lender, and each New Revolving Lender shall have been deemed to have purchased from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit in accordance with Section 2.05(d) of the Restated Credit Agreement. Concurrently with such grant, the participations in the Existing Letters of Credit granted to the Existing Revolving Lenders under the Existing Credit Agreement shall be automatically canceled without further action by any of the parties thereto. On and after the Effective Date, each Existing Letter of Credit shall constitute a Letter of Credit for all purposes of the Restated Credit Agreement.
        (k)        Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lender's share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with this Section. If any Lender shall default in the payment of any amount due from it under this Section, then such Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such defaulted amount (to the extent so advanced by the Administrative Agent on behalf of such defaulting Lender) to the Administrative Agent, together with interest on such amount at the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans of the same Class from the date of the Borrowing to the date of payment. Upon any such payment by the Borrower, the Borrower shall have the right, at the defaulting Lender's expense, upon notice to the defaulting Lender and to the Administrative Agent, to require such defaulting Lender to transfer and assign without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04 of the Restated Credit Agreement) all its interests, rights and obligations under the Restated Credit Agreement to another financial institution which shall assume such interests, rights and obligations; that (i) no such assignment shall conflict with any law, rule or regulation or order of any Governmental Authority and (ii) the assignee shall pay to the defaulting Lender or the Administrative Agent (as applicable), in immediately available funds on the date of such assignment, the outstanding principal of and interest accrued to the date of payment on the Loans made by such defaulting Lender (or advanced by the Administrative Agent on its behalf, as applicable) under the Restated Credit Agreement, if any, and all other amounts accrued for such defaulting Lender's (or, if applicable, the Administrative Agent's) account or owed to it under the Restated Credit Agreement in respect of such Loans.
provided
        SECTION 4. The Required Restatement Lenders hereby (a) authorize the Collateral Agent to execute and deliver any amendments or modifications to the Security Documents that the Collateral Agent determines to be necessary or appropriate to permit the Transactions and (b) consent to all such amendments or modifications; that such amendments or modifications to the Security Documents shall not become effective prior to the Effective Date.
Amendment of Security Documents
.
provided
        SECTION 5. Effective immediately after the prepayment of the Existing Term Loans and outstanding Revolving Loans under Section 3 above, the Existing Credit Agreement is hereby amended and restated to read in its entirety as set forth in Exhibit A hereto (the ""), and the Administrative Agent is hereby directed by the Required Restatement Lenders to enter into such Loan Documents and to take such other actions as may be required to give effect to the transactions contemplated hereby. From and after the effectiveness of such amendment and restatement, (i) the terms "Agreement", "this Agreement", "herein", "hereinafter", "hereto", "hereof" and words of similar import, as used in the Restated Credit Agreement, shall, unless the context otherwise requires, refer to the Existing Credit Agreement as amended and restated in the form of the Restated Credit Agreement and (ii) the term "Credit Agreement", as used in the other Loan Documents, shall mean the Restated Credit Agreement.
Amendment and Restatement of the Existing Credit Agreement
.
Restated Credit Agreement
        SECTION 6. The consummation of the transactions set forth in Sections 3 through 5 of this Agreement shall be subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions precedent:
Conditions
.
        The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the consummation of the transactions set forth in Sections 3 through 5 of this Agreement and the obligations of the Tranche A Lenders to make Tranche A Term Loans, the Tranche B Lenders to make Tranche B Term Loans, the Delayed Draw Lenders to make Delayed Draw Term Loans and the New Revolving Lenders to make New Revolving Commitments hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 7 below) at or prior to 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on November 3, 2004 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Tranche A Commitments, Tranche B Commitments, Delayed Draw Commitments and New Revolving Commitments shall terminate at such time).
        SECTION 7. (a) This Agreement shall become effective when copies hereof which bear the signatures of Holdings, the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Required Restatement Lenders shall have been received by the Administrative Agent. This Agreement may not be amended nor may any provision hereof be waived except pursuant to a writing signed by Holdings, the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Required Restatement Lenders. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Effectiveness; Counterparts; Amendments; Fees
.
        SECTION 8. This Agreement shall not extinguish the Loans outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the Loans outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement, which (except to the extent repaid as provided herein) shall remain outstanding after the Effective Date as modified hereby. Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement, the provisions of Sections 2.15, 2.16, 2.17 and 9.03 of the Existing Credit Agreement as in effect immediately prior to the Effective Date will continue to be effective as to all matters arising out of or in any way related to facts or events existing or occurring prior to the Effective Date.
No Novation
.
        SECTION 9. (a) Each Lender authorizes the Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent to enter into one or more Intercreditor Agreements, and any amendments thereto or modifications thereof (including any amendments to or modifications of Intercreditor Agreements already in effect for the purpose of binding any Lenders not already parties thereto or otherwise), and agrees that each such Intercreditor Agreement, amendment or modification so entered into by the Administrative Agent and Collateral Agent shall be binding upon such Lender and its successors and assigns.
Intercreditor Agreements.
        (b)        The Administrative Agent agrees to furnish to the Lenders a draft of each Intercreditor Agreement, or amendment or modification thereto, prior to entering into such Intercreditor Agreement, amendment or modification.
        SECTION 10. All notices hereunder shall be given in accordance with the provisions of Section 9.01 of the Restated Credit Agreement or, in the case of a notice to any Existing Lender, in accordance with Section 9.01 of the Existing Credit Agreement.
Notices
.
        SECTION 11. (A)
Applicable Law; Waiver of Jury Trial
.
  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH AND GOVERNED BY THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
    
        (B)
EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY AGREES AS SET FORTH IN SECTION 9.10 OF THE RESTATED CREDIT AGREEMENT AS IF SUCH SECTION WERE SET FORTH IN FULL HEREIN.
        SECTION 12. The Section headings used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and are not to affect the construction of, or to be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first written above.
Name of Institution* ____________________________________________________
_________________
*Each Lender must sign separately in each capacity in which it is agreeing to the terms of this Agreement.

Exhibit 10.44
        WHEREAS Holdings, the Borrower, the Lenders party thereto, and JPMCB have entered into an Amendment and Restatement Agreement (the ""), dated as of November 3, 2004, which amends and restates the Credit Agreement dated as of November 28, 2001, as amended and restated as of June 28, 2002, as amended and restated as of March 6, 2003, as amended and restated as of December 5, 2003 (the "", and, as amended and restated after giving effect to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, the ""), among Holdings, the Borrower, the Lenders from time to time party thereto and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent;
Amendment and Restatement Agreement
Existing Credit Agreement
Restated Credit Agreement
        WHEREAS each of the Reaffirming Parties is party to one or more of the Security Documents (such term and each other capitalized term used but not defined herein having the meaning assigned in the Restated Credit Agreement), the Guarantee Agreement and the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement (the Security Documents, the Guarantee Agreement and the Indemnity, Subrogation and Contribution Agreement are collectively referred to herein as the "");
Reaffirmed Documents
        WHEREAS each Reaffirming Party expects to realize, or has realized, substantial direct and indirect benefits as a result of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement becoming effective and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby; and
        WHEREAS the execution and delivery of this Agreement is a condition precedent to the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Amendment and Restatement Agreement.
        NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
        SECTION 1.01. (a) Each of the Reaffirming Parties hereby consents to the Amendment and Restatement Agreement and the transactions contemplated thereby and hereby confirms its respective guarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other agreements, as applicable, under each of the Reaffirmed Documents to which it is party, and agrees that notwithstanding the effectiveness of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby, such guarantees, pledges, grants of security interests and other agreements shall continue to be in full force and effect and shall accrue to the benefit of the Lenders under the Restated Credit Agreement. Each of the Reaffirming Parties further agrees to take any action that may be required or that is reasonably requested by the Administrative Agent to ensure compliance by Holdings and the Borrower with Sections 5.12 and 5.13 of the Restated Credit Agreement to the extent such covenant pertains to such Reaffirming Party and hereby reaffirms its obligations under each similar provision of each Reaffirmed Document to which it is party.
Reaffirmation.
        (b)        Each of the Reaffirming Parties hereby confirms and agrees that the obligations of the Borrower in respect of the Tranche A Term Loans, the Tranche B Term Loans, Delayed Draw Term Loans and Revolving Exposure of each Lender and the DVA Obligations constitute Obligations under each of the Reaffirmed Documents.
        SECTION 1.02. On and after the effectiveness of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement, (i) each reference in each Reaffirmed Document to the "Credit Agreement", "thereunder", "thereof" or words of like import shall mean and be a reference to the Restated Credit Agreement as such agreement may be amended, modified or supplemented and in effect from time to time and (ii) the definition of any term defined in any Reaffirmed Document by reference to the terms defined in the "Credit Agreement" shall be amended to be defined by reference to the defined term in the Restated Credit Agreement, as the same may be amended, modified or supplemented and in effect from time to time.
Amendment and Restatement.
        Each Reaffirming Party hereby represents and warrants, which representations and warranties shall survive execution and delivery of this Agreement, as follows:
        SECTION 2.01. Such Reaffirming Party is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization.
Organization.
        SECTION 2.02. Such Reaffirming Party has the power and authority to execute, deliver and carry out the terms and provisions of this Agreement and has taken all necessary action to authorize the execution, delivery and performance by it of this Agreement. Such Reaffirming Party has duly executed and delivered this Agreement, and this Agreement constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
Authority; Enforceability.
        SECTION 2.03. The representations and warranties of such Reaffirming Party contained in each Reaffirmed Document are true and correct on and as of the date hereof with the same effect as though made on and as of such date, except to the extent such representations and warranties expressly relate to an earlier date (in which case such representations and warranties shall have been true and correct as of such earlier date).
Reaffirmed Documents.
        SECTION 3.01. All notices and other communications hereunder shall be made at the addresses, in the manner and with the effect provided in Article IX of the Restated Credit Agreement; that, for this purpose, the address of each Reaffirming Party shall be the one specified for the Borrower under the Restated Credit Agreement.
Notices.
provided
        SECTION 3.02. Each Reaffirming Party agrees to pay all reasonable costs, fees and expenses (including reasonable attorneys' fees and time charges of attorneys for JPMCB or any Lender, which attorneys may be employees of JPMCB or any Lender) incurred by JPMCB or any Lender in collecting or enforcing any Reaffirming Party's obligations under this Agreement.
Expenses.
        SECTION 3.03. This Agreement is a Loan Document executed pursuant to the Restated Credit Agreement and shall (unless otherwise expressly indicated herein) be construed, administered and applied in accordance with the terms and provisions thereof.
Loan Document.
        SECTION 3.04. Section captions used in this Agreement are for convenience of reference only and shall not affect the construction of this Agreement.
Section Captions.
        SECTION 3.05. Wherever possible each provision of this Agreement shall be interpreted in such manner as to be effective and valid under applicable law, but if any provision of this Agreement shall be prohibited by or invalid under such law, such provision shall be ineffective to the extent of such prohibition or invalidity, without invalidating the remainder of such provision or the remaining provisions of this Agreement.
Severability.
        SECTION 3.06. This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.
Successors and Assigns.
        SECTION 3.07. This Agreement may be waived, modified or amended only by a written agreement executed by each of the parties hereto.
Amendment.
        SECTION 3.08. This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts and by the different parties hereto on separate counterparts, each of which when so executed and delivered shall be an original but all of which shall together constitute one and the same agreement. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by facsimile or other electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts.
        SECTION 3.09. Neither this Agreement nor the execution, delivery or effectiveness of the Amendment and Restatement Agreement shall extinguish the obligations for the payment of money outstanding under the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or the Restated Credit Agreement or discharge or release the Lien or priority of any Security Document or any other security therefor. Nothing herein contained shall be construed as a substitution or novation of the obligations outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement or instruments securing the same, which shall remain in full force and effect, except to any extent modified hereby or by instruments executed concurrently herewith. Nothing implied in this Agreement, the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or in any other document contemplated hereby or thereby shall be construed as a release or other discharge of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary Loan Party under any Loan Document from any of its obligations and liabilities as "Holdings", the "Borrower", a "Subsidiary Loan Party", a "Pledgor" or a "Grantor" under the Restated Credit Agreement or the Loan Documents. Each of the Existing Credit Agreement and the Loan Documents shall remain in full force and effect, until (as applicable) and except to any extent modified hereby or by the Amendment and Restatement Agreement or in connection herewith and therewith.
No Novation.
      [The remainder of this page intentionally left blank]
        IN WITNESS WHEREOF, each Reaffirming Party and JPMCB, as Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders, have caused this Agreement to be duly executed and delivered as of the date first above written.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20041209163118.txt.gz
TIME:20041209163118
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On December 3, 2004, the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. elected William S. Oglesby as a new director. Mr. Oglesby is the Senior Managing Director for The Blackstone Group, L.P.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

FOR IMMEDIATE RELEASE
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) is pleased to announce that William S. Oglesby, Senior Managing Director for The Blackstone Group, L.P., has been elected to its Board of Directors.
Roanoke, Virginia, December 7, 2004
Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts, stated, "We are delighted to welcome Bill Oglesby to our Board of Directors. His numerous accomplishments and talents, including a strong background in finance, will further strengthen our Board. We look forward to his contributions to our Board and our Company."
Mr. Oglesby joined The Blackstone Group, L.P., in April 2004 as the partner in charge of the Southeastern Corporate Advisory Services, including merger and acquisition services, corporate advisory and capitalization strategy activities. Mr. Oglesby has over 20 years of investment banking experience as a result of holding managing director positions with Credit Suisse First Boston; Donaldson Lufkin & Jenrette; and Kidder, Peabody & Co.
Headquartered in Roanoke, VA, Advance Auto Parts is a leading retailer of automotive parts and products in the United States. At October 9, 2004, the Company had 2,612 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at .
www.advanceautoparts.com
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20041223115757.txt.gz
TIME:20041223115757
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          Effective December 17, 2004, John M. Roth resigned from his position as a Director on the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050216170640.txt.gz
TIME:20050216170640
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On February 16, 2005, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 1, 2005. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2005 first quarter, second quarter and fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive parts, today announced record revenue and earnings for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 1, 2005. Fiscal 2004 included 52 weeks of operations compared to 53 weeks in fiscal 2003, with the additional week falling in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2003.
ROANOKE, Va., February 16, 2005
Fourth Quarter 2004
Earnings per diluted share for the fourth quarter were $0.43 compared to prior year earnings per diluted share of $0.41. Earnings per diluted share from continuing operations rose 21.1% to $0.46 before refinancing costs of $2.8 million versus comparable earnings per diluted share from continuing operations of $0.38 last year. These results compare to the high end of the Company's guidance range of $0.42 to $0.46, which excluded these refinancing costs. Comparable results for last year exclude the benefit of the fifty-third week and integration expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' acquisition.
Net sales increased 3.4% in the fourth quarter to $848.8 million from $821.3 million last year. Excluding $63.0 million in sales from the extra week in fiscal 2003, sales increased 11.9%. Same store sales grew 9.7% in the fourth quarter compared to 7.0% in the same quarter last year. Do-it-yourself (DIY) same store sales increased 5.6% and do-it-for-me (DIFM) same store sales increased 29.7%.
Commenting on the fourth quarter results, Larry Castellani, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer, noted, "We are pleased with the sales momentum our team produced during the quarter as demonstrated by the strong 9.7% same store sales growth, and we have sustained strong sales increases into the first six weeks of 2005. Our strong and consistent growth continues to be driven by the execution of our strategic initiatives and our positive industry fundamentals."
Advance Auto Parts Reports Record Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2004 Results February 16, 2005 Page 2
Fourth quarter gross margin increased 83 basis points to 46.4% of net sales compared to 45.6% in the same quarter of last year, reflecting the positive impact of category management and shrink reduction initiatives.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses increased by 64 basis points to 39.4% of net sales versus the comparable SG&A of 38.7% last year as a result of higher costs from our self-insured workers' compensation, liability, and medical programs. These incremental costs, which totaled 127 basis points, or $10.8 million in the fourth quarter, reflect a higher projected cost trend to close these claims. The Company's guidance for 2005 fully reflects its expectations for the costs of these programs. In addition, higher team member incentive costs, driven by the strong fourth-quarter results, also contributed to the higher SG&A percent in the fourth quarter. Together, these two areas increased SG&A expenses by 167 basis points for the quarter. On a GAAP basis, SG&A expenses for the prior year were 38.3% of net sales.
Fourth quarter operating margin rose to 7.0% of net sales versus last year's comparable 6.8% of net sales and 7.2% on a GAAP basis. Earnings from continuing operations for the fourth quarter increased to $32.1 million versus comparable earnings from continuing operations of $28.8 million for the fourth quarter of last year. GAAP earnings from continuing operations were $33.3 million for the same quarter of last year.
Comparable results are non-GAAP measures because they exclude the benefit of the extra week in the fourth quarter last year, expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures, as reconciled on the accompanying financial tables. The Company uses these non-GAAP measures as an indication of its earnings from its core operations and believes it is important to the Company's stockholders due to the nature and significance of the excluded expenses.
Fiscal 2004
Net sales increased 7.9% to $3.8 billion from $3.5 billion. Excluding the impact of the extra week in fiscal 2003, sales rose 9.9% in fiscal 2004 compared to fiscal 2003. Same store sales rose 6.1% for the year compared to 3.1% last year. Do-it-yourself (DIY) same store sales increased 2.8% and do-it-for-me (DIFM) same store sales increased 22.9%.
For 2004, gross profit margin improved 57 basis points to 46.5% of net sales from 45.9% last year. SG&A expenses were 37.8% of net sales for the year versus the comparable SG&A expenses of 37.5% for the prior year. GAAP SG&A expenses were 37.7% of net sales for fiscal 2003.
Fiscal 2004 operating margin rose to 8.7% of net sales. Comparable operating margins were 8.4% of net sales for the prior year, while GAAP operating margins were 8.3% of net sales. As noted earlier, comparable results exclude the benefit from the fifty-third week, expenses associated with the Discount Auto Parts' integration and the early redemption of notes and debentures.
Advance Auto Parts Reports Record Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2004 Results February 16, 2005 Page 3
Earnings from continuing operations for the year were $188.0 million, an increase of 21.2% versus prior year comparable earnings from continuing operations of $155.1 million. GAAP earnings from continuing operations were $125.3 million in 2003. Earnings per diluted share from continuing operations were $2.49 in fiscal 2004 versus $1.68 last year. Excluding the fourth quarter refinancing costs of $2.8 million, earnings per diluted share from continuing operations rose 20.7% to $2.51 in fiscal 2004 versus comparable earnings per diluted share from continuing operations of $2.08 in 2003.
In fiscal 2004, the Company opened 125 new stores, closed 12 stores and relocated 34 stores, resulting in a total store count of 2,652 at January 1, 2005.
Guidance
The Company is issuing guidance for earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.85 to $0.90 for the first quarter of 2005 compared to last year's $0.68, and $0.82 to $0.88 for the second quarter of 2005 compared to last year's $0.70. The Company also is initiating guidance for earnings per diluted share of $3.00 to $3.10 for fiscal 2005, an increase of 20% to 24% over last year. The Company has not included in its guidance any cost associated with expensing of stock options, as it is still evaluating the impact of this new accounting pronouncement, including date of implementation. The Company currently estimates the expensing of options to approximate $0.02 to $0.03 per diluted share each quarter.
Castellani added, "We believe we can achieve our long term goal of increasing our earnings per share 20% or more for the next several years, by continuing to execute our strategic initiatives and investing for the long term. We are extremely proud of our 2004 results and believe we are well positioned to have an outstanding 2005."
He added, "We plan to open between 150 to 175 new stores this year, and we expect to have more than half of our stores operating with our new 2010 store format by the end of 2005, as we work to achieve our goal of having the newest, freshest store base in the industry."
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on February 17, 2005, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its fourth quarter and fiscal year results. To listen to the live webcast, please log on to http://www.advanceautoparts.com. The call will be archived on the Company's website http://www.advanceautoparts.com until February 16, 2006.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second largest retailer of automotive parts in the United States. At January 1, 2005, the Company had 2,652 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Advance Auto Parts Reports Record Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2004 Results February 16, 2005 Page 4
Certain statements contained in this news release are forward-looking statements. These
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth, store development and expansion strategy, business strategies, future revenues and future performance, including our future free cash flow and earnings per share. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other risk factors listed from time to time in the Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
NOTE:
These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
Note: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050310170843.txt.gz
TIME:20050310170843
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On March 4, 2005, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("Advance Auto") and Advance Stores Company, Incorporated ("Advance Stores"), a wholly owned subsidiary of Advance Auto, (Advance Auto and Advance Stores collectively referred to as the "Company") entered into a Severance, Release and Noncompetition Agreement with Robert E. Hedrick in connection with Mr. Hedrick's resignation from the Company, effective as of March 31, 2005. Mr. Hedrick currently serves as the Company's Senior Vice President of Human Resources and is a "named executive officer" of the Company, as such term is defined under Item 402 of Regulation S-K.
                          Under the severance agreement, Mr. Hedrick is entitled to receive the following severance payments or other benefits from the Company: (1) the sum of $157,677 payable in installments through December 2005, which represents nine months of salary; (2) a lump sum bonus payment attributable to the Company's fourth fiscal quarter of 2004 equal to the amount which Mr. Hedrick would have been entitled to receive had he remained employed with the Company; (3) a lump sum payment representing accrued but unused vacation; (4) outplacement services for twelve months; and (5) COBRA health insurance coverage through December 31, 2005, including payment of Mr. Hedrick's cost for COBRA continuation coverage (less any amounts which Mr. Hedrick would have to pay for health insurance had he remained employed by the Company). Under the severance agreement, Mr. Hedrick agreed to release and waive any claims against the Company by reason of his employment or the cessation of his employment with the Company. The severance agreement also contains other customary terms, including those related to non-solicitation and non-disclosure of non-public information regarding the Company.
                          The above description of the severance agreement is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the severance agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.45 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 10.45
        This Severance, Release and Noncompetition Agreement ("Agreement") is entered into as of March 4, 2005 by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc. ("AAP"), Advance Stores Company, Incorporated ("ASCI") ("AAP" and "ASCI" are jointly and severally hereinafter referred to as "Advance") and Robert E. Hedrick ("Employee").
        WHEREAS, Advance and Employee have determined that their mutual interests are best served if Employee terminates his employment with Advance, and have further agreed that Employee will resign from his employment with Advance effective as of March 31, 2005 (the "Effective Date");
        WHEREAS, Advance has agreed to provide to Employee the benefits and payments provided for in this Agreement, which are in addition to the benefits and payments which Advance is otherwise obligated to provide to Employee in connection with the termination of Employee's employment with Advance (which additional benefits and payments include, but are not limited to, salary continuation for nine (9) months and bonus eligibility continuation for the remainder of fiscal 2004) in return for the additional covenants, agreements and obligations of Employee provided for in this Agreement; and
        WHEREAS, Employee is willing to accept the additional benefits and payments to him provided for in this Agreement and to comply with the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and the terms and conditions of all other agreements between Advance and Employee (as modified herein) which survive the termination of Employee's employment with Advance.
        NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises, the mutual promises of the parties set forth herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
By his notarized signature below, Employee acknowledges that he has read this Agreement, understands the terms of the Agreement and its legal and binding effect, and is voluntarily executing this Agreement.
          The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by ______________________, this _____ day of ____________, 2005.
My commission expires:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050422171843.txt.gz
TIME:20050422171843
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On April 18, 2005, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company"), hired Elwyn G. Murray III as its Executive Vice President, Administration. Additionally, Mr. Murray is expected to be appointed as an executive officer of the Company by the Company's board of directors at its May 18, 2005 meeting.
                          The Company's Compensation Committee approved the terms of Mr. Murray's employee arrangement. Under the terms of his employment arrangement, Mr. Murray, who is an at-will employee, is entitled to receive an annual salary of $300,000. Mr. Murray is also eligible to participate in the Company's annual incentive bonus plan at a maximum target rate approximating 115 percent of his annual base salary (assuming all financial targets as specified in the bonus plan are exceeded) and to participate in the Company's other compensation and benefits programs that are available to the Company's senior executive management team. In addition, on April 20, 2005, Mr. Murray was granted stock options to purchase 60,000 shares of the Company's common stock at a price equal to the closing price of the Company's common stock on the date of grant. The options vest in three equal annual installments beginning one year from the date of grant.
                          Additional terms of Mr. Murray's employment arrangement are also set forth in Exhibit 10.42 of this current report on Form 8-K.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 10.42
        In accordance with the employment arrangement effective April 18, 2005 for Elwyn G. Murray III, Executive Vice President, Administration of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company"), this summary sheet sets forth the terms of this arrangement, which was approved by the Company's Compensation Committee, as follows:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050518171732.txt.gz
TIME:20050518171732
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
                          On May 18, 2005, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its first quarter ended April 23, 2005. This release also includes forward looking statements related to Advance Auto Parts, Inc.'s 2005 second quarter, third quarter and fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
                         
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced record revenue and earnings for its first quarter ended April 23, 2005.
ROANOKE, Va., May 18, 2005
Earnings per diluted share for the first quarter were $0.94, a 38% increase compared to earnings per diluted share of $0.68 for the first quarter last year.
Net sales increased 12.1% in the quarter to $1.26 billion compared to $1.12 billion in the first quarter last year. Same-store sales grew 9.2% in the quarter, comprised of 5.1% do-it-yourself (DIY) same-store sales and 27.2% do-it-for-me (DIFM) same-store sales.
"Our team once again produced strong sales and earnings growth during the quarter," said President and Chief Executive Officer Michael Coppola. "We are seeing strong demand from both our retail and commercial customers. We continue to focus on having the newest, most vibrant stores in our industry, with the right people, parts, and prices available to serve our customers' automotive needs."
First quarter gross margin improved to 47.8% of net sales, compared to 46.4% in the same quarter last year, primarily reflecting the positive impact of a more-favorable mix of higher-margin categories, as well as the impact of category management and supply-chain initiatives.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses improved to 38.2% of net sales, compared to 38.4% in the first quarter last year, primarily as a result of the leverage caused by our higher comp-store sales.
First quarter operating margin rose to 9.6% of net sales compared to 8.0% in the first quarter last year.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.94 FOR FIRST QUARTER 2005 May 18, 2005 Page 2
During the first quarter, the Company opened 26 new stores, closed three stores, relocated 19 existing stores, and converted 68 stores to Advance's 2010 format. The Company continues to expect an acceleration in store openings, with 150-175 new stores planned for 2005. In addition, the Company celebrated its entry into New Mexico, with the grand opening of its Clovis, NM store last month. This expands Advance's footprint to 40 states in the continental United States (in addition to its stores in Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands). The Company operated 2,675 stores as of April 23, 2005, of which 1,266 were the Company's new 2010-format stores.
Store Openings
As a result of its strong first-quarter results, the Company is raising its earnings per diluted share guidance for fiscal 2005 to a range of $3.04 to $3.14, representing an increase of 22% to 26% over fiscal 2004. For the second quarter, the Company is reiterating its earnings per diluted share guidance in the range of $0.82 to $0.88, representing an increase of 17% to 26% over earnings per diluted share of $0.70 in the second quarter last year. For the third quarter, the Company is initiating earnings per diluted share guidance in the range of $0.78 to $0.83, representing an increase of 15% to 22% over earnings per diluted share of $0.68 in the third quarter last year.
Guidance
Mr. Coppola continued: "Our performance reflects continued execution toward achieving our four key goals: 1) Improving sales per store, 2) Expanding our operating margin, 3) Generating strong free cash flow, and 4) Improving our return on invested capital. We continue to see tremendous opportunity to drive improved performance, by continuing to implement our strategic initiatives and leveraging positive industry dynamics."
"We remain committed to our goal of increasing our annual earnings per share 20% or more over the next several years," Mr. Coppola said. "Our philosophy of investing for the long term is paying off, and we will continue to invest in our people, brand, and business to sustain our growth. We are pleased by our strong start to 2005, and believe we are well positioned to continue growing our market share."
The Company's Annual Meeting of Stockholders was held earlier today. At the meeting, stockholders:
Annual Meeting Announcements
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.94 FOR FIRST QUARTER 2005 May 18, 2005 Page 3
The Company's planned CEO transition from Larry Castellani to Mike Coppola also officially took place. Mr. Castellani continues to serve as the Company's Chairman of the Board.
"It has been my privilege to lead this fine company for the past five years," Mr. Castellani said. "I can't think of a more able successor than Mike Coppola to drive Advance Auto Parts to even greater success in the years ahead. It has been a pleasure to work with such a dedicated and talented team, and I will continue to do so on a strategic basis as non-executive Chairman of the Board. I thank each and every member of our team for their hard work and determination to serve our customers better than anyone."
The Company will host a conference call tomorrow, May 19, 2005, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its first quarter results. To listen to the live call, please log on to , or dial 866.800.8651. The call will be archived on the Company's website until May 18, 2006.
Investor Conference Call
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, in the United States, based on sales and store count. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
About Advance Auto Parts
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events, developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including sales per store, operating margin, free cash flow, return on invested capital, and earnings per share for second quarter, third quarter and fiscal year 2005. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.94 FOR FIRST QUARTER 2005 May 18, 2005 Page 4
NOTE:
These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared balance sheets filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual reports, but do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles for complete financial statements.
Note: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050524172652.txt.gz
TIME:20050524172652
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to                                 respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
[    ]   Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
[    ]   Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
[    ]   Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
           As further discussed below, on May 18, 2005, the board of directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company") approved certain changes in the Company's management. In connection with these changes, the compensation committee of the Company's board of directors approved the following compensation arrangements:
Changes in Management Employment Arrangements.
           On May 18, 2005, the Company's board of directors appointed Keith A. Oreson as Senior Vice President, Human Resources effective May 23, 2005. The Company's compensation committee approved the terms of Mr. Oreson's at-will employment arrangement pursuant to which Mr. Oreson will be entitled to receive an annual base salary of $225,000. Mr. Oreson also will be eligible to participate in the Company's annual incentive bonus plan at a target rate of 80 percent of his annual base salary and to participate in the Company's other compensation and benefits programs that are available to the Company's senior executive management team. On May 25, 2005, Mr. Oreson will receive options to purchase 30,000 shares of the Company's common stock at a price equal to the closing price of the common stock on the date of grant. The options will vest in three equal annual installments beginning one year from the date of grant. Additional terms of Mr. Oreson's employment arrangement are set forth on Exhibit 10.43 of this current report on Form 8-K.
Appointment of New Senior Vice President.
        On May 18, 2005, the Company's board of directors appointed Michael N. Coppola as its President and Chief Executive Officer effective upon the retirement of Lawrence P. Castellani as the Company's previous Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Castellani will continue to serve as Chairman of the Board. Additionally, on May 18, 2005, Jimmie L. Wade relinquished his position as President of the Company and was appointed to the new position of Executive Vice President, Business Development.
        Mr. Coppola, 56, became a director of the Company in September 2004 and had served as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer of the Company since August 2003. From August 2001 to August 2003, Mr. Coppola served as Senior Vice President, Merchandising. Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Coppola operated his own retail company for two years and from April 1991 through December 1997, served as Executive Vice President of Marketing at Tops Friendly Markets, a division of Ahold USA.
        The information regarding Mr. Coppola's employment arrangement set forth under Item 1.01 "Entry Into a Material Definitive Agreement" is incorporated herein by reference.
         On May 18, 2005, the Company issued a press release announcing certain changes in its management as discussed above. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
         Additionally, on May 23, 2005, the Company issued a press release announcing the appointment of Keith A. Oreson as Senior Vice President, Human Resources. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.2 and incorporated by reference herein.
        
Note: The information contained in Item 7.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibits 99.1 and 99.2) shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
        Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.

Exhibit 10.43
          In accordance with the compensation arrangements effective May 18, 2005 for Michael N. Coppola, Lawrence P. Castellani and Jimmie L. Wade, this summary sheet sets forth the terms of these arrangements, which were approved by the compensation committee of the Company's board of directors:
Changes in Management Employment Arrangements.
Michael N. Coppola
Lawrence P. Castellani
Jimmie L. Wade
           In accordance with the compensation arrangement effective May 23, 2005 for Keith A. Oreson, Senior Vice President, Human Resources, this summary sheet sets forth the terms of these arrangements, which were approved by the compensation committee of the Company's board of directors on May 18, 2005:
Appointment of New Senior Vice President.

Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, announced today that the Board of Directors unanimously appointed Mike Coppola as President and Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts following Larry Castellani's planned retirement as Chief Executive Officer. Castellani will remain as the Company's Chairman of Board.
ROANOKE, Va., May 18, 2005
"It has been a privilege to lead this fine company and team for the past five years," said Castellani. "I can't think of a more able successor than Mike Coppola to drive Advance Auto Parts and lead our team to even greater success in the years ahead. Mike is a tremendous leader and retailer, and I look forward to supporting him as non-executive Chairman of the Board."
This leadership transition marks only the fifth chief executive officer in Advance's 73-year history. Coppola has been with Advance since February 2001, having served most recently as Executive Vice President and Chief Operating Officer. Prior to joining Advance, Coppola was with Tops Friendly Markets in Buffalo, New York, where he was Executive Vice President of Marketing.
"I am honored to assume this significant leadership role and am excited about the opportunities ahead for Advance," said Coppola. "In addition, I am thankful for the vote of confidence from Larry and our Board of Directors. I look forward to leading our team and continuing the strong growth that our company has seen under Larry's leadership."
The Company also announced that Jim Wade has been appointed Executive Vice President, Business Development. In this role, Wade will be responsible for guiding strategic planning to drive sales, maximize profitability, and increase shareholder value through the optimal deployment of capital.
Coppola said, "Jim will bring considerable value to this new position. He will be our key executive responsible for our store growth strategy, retail and commercial long-term planning, and potential new ventures. His many years of expertise will be a tremendous asset in driving our company's continued success."
Advance Auto Parts Names New Chief Executive Officer May 18, 2005 Page 2
"I have worked together with Mike for the past four years and we share a common vision for the future of Advance Auto Parts," said Wade. "I look forward to this opportunity to focus on optimizing our future growth, and driving shareholder value."
Headquartered in Roanoke, VA, Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, in the United States, based on sales and store count. At April 23, 2005, the Company had 2,675 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
About Advance Auto Parts
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at .
www.advanceautoparts.com

 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, announced today that Keith Oreson has joined the Company as Senior Vice President, Human Resources. Mr. Oreson also will join the Company's Executive Committee and will report to Mike Coppola, President and Chief Executive Officer.
ROANOKE, Va., May 23, 2005
"I am pleased to announce the addition of Keith to our team," said Mike Coppola. "His previous human resources experience and his interpersonal skills will be strong assets in enhancing our Company's culture and the operating effectiveness of our team for the long term."
Prior to joining the Company, Mr. Oreson most recently served as Vice President of Human Resources for Frank's Nursery & Crafts, Inc., based in Troy, Michigan. He has over 20 years of experience in the human resources field including such companies as GTE, PepsiCo, and ARAMARK. He received both his Bachelor of Science in Business Administration and Master of Labor and Industrial Relations from Michigan State University, Kalamazoo, Michigan.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second largest automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items in the United States, based on sales and store count. At April 23, 2005, the Company had 2,675 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
About Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's web site at .
www.advanceautoparts.com


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20050810171439.txt.gz
TIME:20050810171439
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 

   
  
              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Contact:
              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Adam Bergman
              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Adam.Bergman@advanceautoparts.com
   
         
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Direct 540-561-8450
   
  
              
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
   
Fax    540-561-6445
   
  
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., August 10, 2005
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced record revenue and earnings for its second quarter ended July 16, 2005.
Earnings per diluted share for the second quarter were $0.90, a 28.6% increase compared to earnings per diluted share of $0.70 in last years second quarter.
 
Net sales increased 12.6% in the quarter to $1.02 billion from $908.4 million in the second quarter last year. Same-store sales grew 9.0% in the quarter, comprised of 4.9% do-it-yourself (DIY) same-store sales and 27.1% do-it-for-me (DIFM) same-store sales.
These results reflect our teams continued strong execution of our initiatives, President and Chief Executive Officer Michael Coppola said. We continue to work hard to provide customers a more-complete shopping experience, and our recent rollout of factory-direct ordering and an improved local sourcing program are enhancing our ability to satisfy more of our customers auto parts needs.
Second quarter gross margin increased to 47.1% of net sales, compared to 46.5% in the same quarter of last year, reflecting the positive impact of category management and supply-chain initiatives.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses improved to 36.1% of net sales, compared to 36.4% in last years second quarter, primarily as a result of the leverage gained from strong comparable-store sales.
Second quarter operating margin rose to 11.0% of net sales compared to 10.0% in the second quarter last year. This is the highest operating margin percentage in the Companys public history.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.90 FOR SECOND QUARTER 2005
August 10, 2005
Page 2
 
 
For the first half of the year, sales grew 12.3% to $2.28 billion. Comparable-store sales grew 9.1% over this time, comprised of a 5.0% increase in DIY same-store sales and a 27.2% increase in DIFM same-store sales. First half operating margin expanded to 10.2% of sales, compared to 8.9% last year, and earnings per diluted share increased 34.3% to $1.84 compared to $1.37 last year.
Store
Information
During the quarter, the Company opened
36 new stores, closed three stores, relocated 13 existing stores, and converted 51 stores to the Companys innovative 2010 format. For the first half of the year, the Company has opened 62 new stores, closed six stores, relocated 32 stores, and converted 119 stores to the 2010 format. With the previously announced acquisition of 19 Lappen Auto Supply stores, the Company anticipates new-store openings to be at the higher end of its 150-175 range. As of July 16, 2005, the Company operated 2,708 stores, of which 1,333 were the Companys new 2010-format stores.
Stock Repurchase Authorization
In separate news, the Companys Board of Directors earlier today authorized a new $300 million stock repurchase program. This new authorization replaces the Companys prior $200 million stock buyback program, which was authorized in August 2004 and had been nearly completed. Under the $200 million authorization, Advance repurchased approximately 4.7 million shares of its common stock at an average price of approximately $40.50 per share.
Our business continues to generate significant free cash flow, Chief Financial Officer Jeff Gray said, and as a growing company within a growing industry, we continue to reinvest in our business to drive long-term growth. Our strong cash flow and financial flexibility are enabling us to accelerate our growth, while also returning capital to shareholders. Opportunistic share repurchases are among the ways we are driving higher return on capital, which is one of our four key financial objectives.
Stock Split
Advances Board of Directors today approved a three-for-two split of the Companys common stock, which will be effected in the form of a 50% stock dividend. The Company anticipates the additional shares associated with this stock dividend will be distributed on or about September 23, 2005 to stockholders of record as of September 9, 2005. The Companys common stock will begin trading on a post-split basis on September 26, 2005, the first trading day following the distribution date.
Guidance
As a result of its strong second-quarter results, the Company is raising its earnings per diluted share guidance for fiscal 2005 to a
range of $3.12 to $3.18 on a pre-split basis ($2.08 to $2.12 after the pending 3-for-2 split), representing an increase of 25% to 28% over last years diluted EPS. For the third quarter, the Company is reiterating its guidance for earnings per diluted share to be in the range of $0.78 to $0.83 on a pre-split basis ($0.52 to $0.55 after the pending 3-for-2 split), representing an increase of 15% to 22% compared to last years third quarter. For the fourth quarter, the Company is initiating a guidance range for
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.90 FOR SECOND QUARTER 2005
August 10, 2005
Page 3
 
 
earnings per diluted share of $0.50 to $0.54 on a pre-split basis ($0.33 to $0.36 after the pending 3-for-2 split), representing an increase of 16% to 26% compared to last years fourth quarter.
Our strong first half of 2005 leaves us even more convinced about our opportunities to sustain strong growth for the foreseeable future, Coppola continued. As we continue to reinvest to grow the Company for the long run, we remain committed to our goal of achieving 11-12% annual operating margin by 2007.
 
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on August 11, 2005, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
, or dial
866.800.8651
. The call will be archived on the Companys website
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
until August 10, 2006.
Annual Investor Conference
Advance will host its annual investor conference next Wednesday, August 17, 2005, in Charlotte, NC. A webcast of managements presentations and a question-and-answer session will be available on the investor relations section of the Companys website,
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of July 16, 2005, the Company operated 2,708 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events, developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store openings, sales per store, operating margin, effective tax rate, free cash flow, return on invested capital, and earnings per share for third quarter, fourth quarter and fiscal year 2005. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may materially differ from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of the news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20051103073621.txt.gz
TIME:20051103073621
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., November 3, 2005
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced record revenue and earnings for its fiscal third quarter ended October 8, 2005.
Earnings per diluted share for the third quarter were $0.55, a 22% increase compared to earnings per diluted share of $0.45 in last years third quarter. (All per-share amounts referenced in this release reflect the Companys 3-for-2 stock split, which took effect September 26, 2005).
 
Sales increased 14.6% in the quarter to $1.02 billion from $890.2 million in the third quarter last year. Same-store sales grew 10.0% in the quarter, comprised of 6.1% do-it-yourself (DIY) same-store sales and 26.5% do-it-for-me (DIFM) same-store sales.
We again produced strong sales and earnings growth for the quarter, President and Chief Executive Officer Michael Coppola said. Our ability to achieve our goals in spite of two major hurricanes within the quarter is a significant accomplishment. The temporary effects of these storms on our operations are minor compared to the losses sustained by a number of our Team Members and our customers, whose lives were dramatically impacted. It was gratifying to see our team pull together and respond heroically to these challenges by helping each other and our customers. Another quarter of solid results demonstrates that The Best Part is Our People and Were Ready in Advance are much more than advertising slogans - theyre the culture that our team demonstrates every day, as they focus on driving the business to superior levels of performance.
Third quarter gross margin increased to 47.2% of net sales, compared to 46.8% in the same quarter of last year, reflecting the positive impact of category management and supply-chain initiatives.
Selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 36.9% of net sales, flat compared to last years third quarter. This reflects leverage gained from strong comparable-store sales, which was offset by higher
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.55 FOR THE THIRD QUARTER 2005
November 3, 2005
Page 2
 
 
fuel and utility costs, as well as the related impact from two major hurricanes. In addition, SG&A for third quarter 2005 reflects higher incentives paid to Team Members, following a strong sales quarter.
Third quarter operating margin rose to 10.3% of sales compared to 9.9% in the third quarter last year.
Through the first three quarters of the year, sales grew 13.0% to $3.3 billion. Comparable-store sales grew 9.4% over this time, comprised of a 5.3% increase in DIY same-store sales and a 27.0% increase in DIFM same-store sales. For the first three quarters of 2005, operating margin expanded to 10.2% of sales, compared to 9.2% last year, and earnings per diluted share increased 30% to $1.78 compared to $1.37 last year.
Store
Information
During the quarter, the Company
increased its store count by 121 stores (including 80 acquired stores), relocated 12 existing stores, and remodeled 46 stores to the Companys innovative 2010 format. During the first three quarters of the year, the Company added 183 new stores (including 80 acquired stores), closed 6 stores, relocated 44 stores, and remodeled 165 stores to the 2010 format. Including acquired stores, the Company continues to anticipate adding 220-230 stores this year. As of October 8, 2005, the Company operated 2,829 stores, of which 1,437 were the Companys new 2010-format stores.
Our ongoing investments to refresh our store base are delivering very solid returns, Coppola said. We continue to make excellent progress converting more stores to our customer-friendly 2010 format. During the third quarter, we began converting the acquired Lappen stores in Massachusetts, acquired Autopart International, and this month we will complete the remodeling of all the former Discount Auto Parts stores. With attractive stores, knowledgeable Team Members and quality parts at competitive prices, Advance offers what customers want.
Guidance
For the fourth quarter, the Company is reiterating its guidance range for earnings per diluted share of $0.33 to $0.36, which would represent an increase of 14% to 24% compared to last years fourth quarter.
For the 2005 fiscal year, the Company anticipates its earnings per diluted share to be in the
range of $2.10 to $2.13, which would represent an increase of 27% to 28% compared to last year.
For 2006, the Company anticipates new-store growth in the range of 6% to 7%, in addition to 200 to 250 re-models and approximately 50 relocations. The Company will provide more-detailed 2006 guidance in its fiscal year-end press release.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on November 3, 2005, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
, or dial (
866) 800-8651
. The call will be archived on the Companys website
http://www.advanceautoparts.com
until November 2, 2006.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.55 FOR THE THIRD QUARTER 2005
November 3, 2005
Page 3
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of October 8, 2005, the Company operated 2,829 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events, developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including new-store growth, store remodels, store relocations, and earnings per share for fourth quarter 2005, fiscal year 2005 and fiscal year 2006. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20051123175407.txt.gz
TIME:20051123175407
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20051208192557.txt.gz
TIME:20051208192557
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.41
 
In connection with the compensation arrangement effective December 15, 2005 for Michael O. Moore, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer, this summary sheet sets forth the terms of these arrangements, which were approved by the Companys Compensation Committee on November 8, 2005:

 
       
   
   
Contact
              Adam Bergman
   
   
   
   
 
             adam.bergman
   
   
   
   
            @advanceautoparts.com
   
   
   
   
   Direct 540-561-8450
   
   
   
     
             Fax 540-561-6445
   
   
   
   
ROANOKE, Va., December 8, 2005
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories and maintenance items, today announced that it has named Michael O. Moore executive vice president and chief financial officer. In his role as CFO, Mr. Moore will be responsible for all financial aspects of the company, including accounting, internal audit, investor relations, and tax. Mr. Moore will be a member of Advances executive committee, and will report directly to President and Chief Executive Officer Michael Coppola.
I am pleased to announce the addition of Michael to our team, Coppola said. He has 30 years of finance and operations experience in addition to a very strong retail background. His leadership skills, coupled with his solid understanding of retail finance operations, will help Advance accelerate its profitable growth in the years ahead, with a best-in-class finance department.
 
Prior to joining Advance, Mr. Moore worked for the Cato Corporation, based in Charlotte N.C., from 1998 to present where he served as executive vice president, chief financial officer and secretary. Mr. Moore also served on Catos Board of Directors. Prior to Cato, Mr. Moore held executive financial positions with a variety of retailers, including Davids Bridal and Bloomingdales.
A native of Indiana, Mr. Moore graduated from Indiana University, with a masters of business administration in finance and a bachelors of arts degree in economics.
About Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive parts, accessories batteries and maintenance items in the United States based on sales and store count. As of October 8, 2005, the company had 2,829 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Additional information about the company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the company's web site at
www.advanceautoparts.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20051222172946.txt.gz
TIME:20051222172946
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20051229154507.txt.gz
TIME:20051229154507
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
    Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060104171814.txt.gz
TIME:20060104171814
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
    Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.46
This Severance, Release and Noncompetition Agreement (Agreement) is entered into as of December 8, 2005 by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (AAP), Advance Stores Company, Incorporated (ASCI) (AAP and ASCI are jointly and severally hereinafter referred to as Advance) and Jeffrey T. Gray (Employee).
WHEREAS, Advance and Employee have determined that their mutual interests are best served if Employee terminates his employment with Advance, and have further agreed that Employee will resign from his employment with Advance effective as of February 28, 2006 (the Effective Date);
WHEREAS, Employee has determined he will resign from all officer and director positions at Advance and all subsidiary and affiliated Companies, effective immediately;
WHEREAS, Advance has agreed to provide to Employee the benefits and payments provided for in this Agreement, which are in addition to the benefits and payments which Advance is otherwise obligated to provide to Employee in connection with the termination of Employees employment with Advance (which additional benefits and payments include, but are not limited to, salary continuation for Ten (10) months and bonus eligibility continuation for the remainder of fiscal 2005) in return for the additional covenants, agreements and obligations of Employee provided for in this Agreement; and
WHEREAS, Employee is willing to accept the additional benefits and payments to him provided for in this Agreement and to comply with the terms and conditions of this Agreement, and the terms and conditions of all other agreements between Advance and Employee (as modified herein) which survive the termination of Employees employment with Advance.
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the foregoing premises, the mutual promises of the parties set forth herein, and other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
If to Advance:
5673 Airport Road
Roanoke, Virginia 24012
Attention: Chief Executive Officer
Telephone: (540) 561-4109
Fax: (540) 561-1699
 
cc: General Counsel
Telephone: (540) 561-3225
Fax: (540) 561-1448
 
If to Employee:
Jeffrey T. Gray
 
 
 
 
Address:
Telephone: 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
By his notarized signature below, Employee acknowledges that he has read this Agreement, understands the terms of the Agreement and its legal and binding effect, and is voluntarily executing this Agreement.
/s/Jeffrey T. Gray__________
Jeffrey T. Gray
Team Member ID: xxxxx
 
 
The foregoing instrument was acknowledged before me by ______________________, this _____ day of ____________, 2005.
___________________________
Notary Public
My commission expires:
___________________
ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED
 
By:
/s/ Eric M. Margolin
_
Name:
Eric M. Margolin
 
 
Title: Senior Vice President,
General Counsel and Secretary
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
 
By:
/s/ Eric M. Margolin
_
Name:
Eric M. Margolin
 
 
Title: Senior Vice President,
General Counsel and Secretary


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060216074628.txt.gz
TIME:20060216074628
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., February 16, 2006
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced record revenue and earnings for its fiscal fourth quarter ended December 31, 2005.
Earnings per diluted share for the fourth quarter were $0.36, a 24% increase compared to earnings per diluted share of $0.29 last year. (All per-share amounts referenced in this release reflect the Companys 3-for-2 stock split, which took effect September 26, 2005).
 
Sales increased 13.5% in the fourth quarter to $963.7 million from $848.8 million last year. Same-store sales grew 6.3% in the quarter, comprised of 3.1% do-it-yourself (DIY) same-store sales and 19.4% do-it-for-me (DIFM) same-store sales. The quarters 6.3% same-store sales increase compares to a 9.7% increase in comparable-store sales in last years fourth quarter.
We produced strong financial results during the fourth quarter, while continuing to invest for the future, said Michael Coppola, Advances President and Chief Executive Officer. We remain focused on providing a unique shopping experience and a compelling value proposition to our customers. Our investments in additional commercial programs, marketing and advertising, new stores and 2010 store remodels, which are providing us the newest, freshest store base, will continue to be key drivers of our performance in the years ahead.
Fourth quarter gross margin improved to 46.7% of sales, compared to 46.4% last year, reflecting the positive impact of category management and supply-chain efficiencies.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.36 FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2005
February 16, 2006
Page 2
 
Fourth quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 39.4% of sales, equal to the rate in fourth quarter 2004. This reflects lower self-insurance costs, offset by higher fuel and utility costs, depreciation and increases in tax-related expenses. SG&A expenses also reflect continued investment of additional funds in areas such as advertising and commercial-delivery programs to drive sales for the long term.
Fourth quarter operating margin rose to 7.3% of sales compared to 7.0% last year.
Fiscal 2005
For the fiscal 2005 year, sales grew to $4.26 billion, a 13.1% increase compared to 2004. Comparable-store sales grew 8.7% for the year, comprised of a 4.8% increase in DIY same-store sales and a 25.2% increase in DIFM same-store sales. Improvements in both gross margin and SG&A drove a record 9.6% operating margin, compared to 8.7% in 2004. Earnings per diluted share increased 28% to $2.13 in 2005, compared to $1.66 in 2004.
In 2005, we achieved a number of significant milestones, Coppola said, including a record number of store openings and the acquisition of Lappen Auto Supply and Autopart International. We successfully opened our new distribution center in Pennsylvania, which enabled us to provide better service to our stores and customers in the Northeast. We also achieved a record store in-stock level in 2005, helping to drive improved customer satisfaction. And in December, we completed the conversion of the remaining Discount Auto Parts stores to Advances 2010 format, bringing a fresh look to all of our stores in the state of Florida. For the year, Advance achieved its highest-ever operating margin. We enter 2006 well-positioned for future growth.
Store
Information
During the
fourth quarter, the Company opened 48 new stores, closed five stores, relocated 10 existing stores, and remodeled 21 stores to the Companys innovative 2010 format. For the fiscal year, the Company added 231 stores (including 80 acquired stores), closed 11 stores, relocated 54 stores, and remodeled 189 stores to the 2010 format. At year-end 2005, the Company operated 2,872 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, of which 1,531 are the Companys innovative 2010-format stores.
2006 Guidance
For 2006 the Company expects to open 170 to 180 new Advance stores (representing square footage growth in the range of 6% to 7%), in addition to remodeling 200 to 225 stores, and relocate approximately 50 stores.
For the 2006 fiscal year, the Company anticipates earnings per diluted share to be in the
range of $2.37 to $2.47, inclusive of approximately $0.12 of annual stock-option expense. For comparative purposes, 2005 EPS of $2.13 do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.09 per share. The Companys 2006 guidance represents an 11% to 16% increase in EPS, as compared to 2005. On a long-term basis, the Company continues to view its target of 20% annual EPS growth as achievable. Advance targets growth in
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.36 FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2005
February 16, 2006
Page 3
 
 
EPS through a balanced combination of new-store growth, comparable-store sales growth, gross margin improvement, and SG&A leverage.
We continue to see significant opportunities to serve our customers even better, Coppola added, which is what gives us confidence that our future is so bright. We will continue to lead the industry with new merchandise offerings, better-tailored assortments, additional store-related enhancements, and other programs that differentiate Advance as a customer-focused company. By satisfying more customers, we will drive further progress in sales per store and operating margin, two of our key financial goals.
For first quarter 2006, the Company is initiating guidance for earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.68 to $0.71, inclusive of approximately $0.03 of stock-option expense, representing an EPS increase of 8% to 13% compared to last years first quarter. For comparative purposes, first quarter 2005 results of $0.63 do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.02 per share. First quarter guidance is based on mid-single-digit comparable-store sales gains. Through the first six weeks this year the Company is running low single-digit comps against 14% comps in the same six weeks last year. For the 10 weeks remaining in the quarter the Company expects to run high single-digit comps against 7% comps in the same period last year. As a reminder, in first quarter 2005, the Company experienced very strong gross margin improvements and robust comp-store sales.
Initiation of Quarterly Cash Dividend
On February 15, 2006, the Companys Board of Directors approved the initiation of a quarterly cash dividend, the first in the Companys history. Stockholders of record as of March 24, 2006 will be entitled to the Companys first quarterly dividend payment of $0.06 per share, payable on April 7, 2006.
This dividend reflects the strength of Advances financial position, and its ability to generate consistent cash flow while continuing to accelerate its growth rate, Coppola said. Advance is in the strong position of being able to invest for the future while also returning capital to stockholders.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on February 16, 2006, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on (866) 800-8651. The call will be archived on the Companys website until February 15, 2007.
to , or dial
www.advanceautoparts.com
www.advanceautoparts.com
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of December 31, 2005, the Company operated 2,872 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events,
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS OF $0.36 FOR FOURTH QUARTER 2005
February 16, 2006
Page 4
 
 
developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including new-store growth, store remodels, store relocations, the impact of stock-option expensing, comparable-store sales and earnings per share for first-quarter 2006 and fiscal year 2006. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060217172001.txt.gz
TIME:20060217172001
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060223091047.txt.gz
TIME:20060223091047
EVENTS:	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
TEXT:
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060406165924.txt.gz
TIME:20060406165924
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 10.37
 
 
AGREEMENT (the Agreement), dated as of March 31, 2006, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance), a Delaware corporation, and Advance Stores Company, Inc. (Stores), a Virginia corporation (collectively, the Company), and ______________ (the Executive).
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
1.
  
Position; Term of Employment
.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive agrees to serve the Company, as its _______________ (Executives Position). The parties intend that the Executive shall continue to so serve in this capacity throughout the Term (as such term is defined below).
  Subject to earlier termination under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below, the term of Executives employment by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall commence on March 31, 2006 and shall continue through March 31, 2007 and then renew for an additional one year term on March 31, 2007 and each subsequent annual anniversary thereof unless at least three (3) months prior to such renewal or a subsequent annual anniversary thereof either Executive or Company gives to the other written notice that the term shall not be renewed at such annual anniversary, in which case the term shall expire on the day before such subsequent anniversary (the Term).
   
   
2.
  
Duties.
The Executive shall perform faithfully, competently, diligently, exclusively and to the best of his ability the duties and responsibilities of Executives Position and such other duties and responsibilities reasonably consistent with the Executives Position as the Company may request from time to time. The Executive shall observe and conform to the applicable policies and directives promulgated from time to time by the Company and its Board of Directors or by any superior officer(s) of the Company. The Executive shall devote his full time and undivided professional attention during normal business hours to the business and affairs of the Company and its subsidiaries and affiliates, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities), except for holidays and vacations consistent with applicable Company policy and except for illness or incapacity. Nothing in this Agreement shall preclude the Executive from serving as a director or a member of an advisory committee of any organization involving no conflict of interest with the Company and its Related Entities (subject to prior approval of his appointment to such position in certain cases as provided below), from engaging in charitable and community activities, and from managing his personal investments, provided that such activities do not interfere with the performance of his duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement. The Executive shall not accept any proposed appointment to serve as a director, manager, general partner, trustee or the equivalent of any for-profit business organization without the prior approval of the Chief Executive Officer. The Executive shall not accept any appointment to serve as a director of a public company without the prior approval of the Nominating and Corporate Governance Committee of Advances Board of Directors. The Executive shall report directly to the individual designated by the Company. The services to be performed by Executive hereunder may be changed from time to time at the discretion of the Company. The Company shall retain full direction and control of the means and methods by which Executive performs his services and of the place or places at which such services are to be rendered.
 
3.
  
Compensation
.
  (a)
   
   
  
Salary
.
During the Term, the Company shall pay to the Executive a salary of $______________per annum, payable consistent with the Companys standard payroll practices then in effect. Such salary shall be reviewed by the Compensation Committee of Advances Board of Directors (hereinafter the Compensation Committee) at least annually, with any changes taking into account, among other factors, Company and individual performance.
  (b)
   
   
  
Bonus
.
The Executive shall receive a bonus in such amounts and based upon achievement of such corporate and individual performance and other criteria as shall be approved by the Compensation Committee from time to time, which bonus shall be paid in a manner consistent with the Companys bonus practices then in effect.
  (c)
   
   
  
Benefit Plans
.
During the Term, the Executive shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans of the Company that are generally available to senior executives of the Company. Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans, as the same shall be amended from time to time.
  (d)
   
   
  
Business Expenses
.
During the Term, the Company shall, in accordance with policies then in effect with respect to payments of business expenses, pay or reimburse the Executive for all reasonable out-of-pocket travel and other expenses (other than ordinary commuting expenses) incurred by the Executive in performing services hereunder. All such expenses shall be accounted for in such reasonable detail as the Company may require.
 
.
4
  
Termination
.
  (a)
   
   
  
Death
.
In the event of the death of the Executive during the Term, his employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to his annual salary, shall be paid to his designated beneficiary, or in the absence of such designation, to the estate or other legal representative of the Executive. Except in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and other plans then in effect, after his date of death, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
  (b)
   
   
  
Disability
.
In the event of the Executives Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below). In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executives base salary for a one year period commencing on the Disability Termination Date. Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Companys benefit programs and other plans then in effect, Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
   Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Executives incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing his complete and full-time absence from his duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least
   
   
   
2
 
180 days within any 270-day period. Any determination of the Executives Disability made in good faith by the Board shall be conclusive and binding on the Executive, unless within 10 days after written notice to Executive of such determination, Executive elects by written notice to Company to challenge such determination, in which case the determination of Disability shall be made by arbitration pursuant to Section 10 below (provided that Company shall not be required to provide Executive any compensation or benefits after the determination by the Board unless the arbitration results in a determination that Executive is not disabled, in which case the Company shall pay to Executive within 10 days after such arbitration decision all compensation due through the date of such arbitration decision, and further provided that Company shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations related to such compensation and benefits under this Agreement if it makes such payment within 10 days after such arbitration decision). The Disability Termination Date shall be the date on which the Board makes such determination of Executives Disability unless the arbitration, if any, results in a determination that Executive is not disabled.
  (c)
   
   
  
Termination by the Company for Due Cause
.
Nothing herein shall prevent the Company from terminating the Executives employment at any time for Due Cause. The Executive shall continue to receive the salary provided for in this Agreement only through the period ending with the date of such termination. Any rights and benefits he may have under employee benefit plans and programs of the Company shall be determined in accordance with the terms of such plans and programs. Except as provided in the two immediately preceding sentences, after termination of employment for Due Cause, Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
   The term Due Cause, as used herein, shall mean (i) a material violation by the Executive of the Executives obligations hereunder or a directive from the Board of Directors or the Executives superior (1) which is willful and deliberate on the Executives part, (2) which is not due to the Disability of the Executive (within the meaning of Paragraph 4(b) but without regard to the requirement that it continue for more than six months or 180 days within a 270-day period) and (3) which, if curable, has not been cured by the Executive within 15 business days after notice to the Executive specifying the nature of such violations; (ii) a material violation by the Executive of the Executives Loyalty Obligations as provided in Section 19; (iii) an act or acts of dishonesty on the Executives part which are intended to or do result in either the Executives personal enrichment or material adverse affect upon the Companys assets, business, prospects or reputation; (iv) conviction of a felony involving fraud, breach of trust, or misappropriation; or, (v) a determination by the Board of Directors of the Company that Executive is addicted to a Controlled Substance (as defined in 21 U.S.C.A. Section 812 and 844) which has not been obtained directly or pursuant to a valid prescription from a licensed medical doctor acting within the course of his professional practice.
   
   
   
  (d)
   
   
 
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, the Company may terminate the Executives employment for any or no reason, as it may deem appropriate in its sole discretion and judgment;
provided
,
however
, that in the event such termination is not due to death, Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall (i) be entitled to a Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and (ii) be sent written notice stating the termination is not due to death, Disability or Due Cause.
 
3
   If the Company terminates the Executives employment for other than death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Term, the term Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of (i) an amount equal to the Executives annual salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (the Termination Salary Payment), and (ii) a pro rata portion of any bonus that would have been payable to the Executive under Paragraph 3(b) with respect to all periods prior to termination of employment, provided the criteria for such bonus other than the Executives continued employment are satisfied (the Termination Bonus Payment). The Termination Salary Payment shall be payable in 26 equal installments beginning on the next regularly scheduled pay day following the date of termination. The Termination Bonus Payment shall be paid at the time such bonus payments are made to other executives. In addition, the Company will pay the normal employer portion of the premium cost for the Executive to receive any group health coverage that the Company provides under Section 4980B of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986 (COBRA Coverage) for one (1) year following Executives termination of employment. Following the Executives termination of employment under this Paragraph 4(d), the Executive will have no further obligation to provide services to the Company pursuant to Paragraphs 1 and 2. Except for the Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and plans then in effect, after termination by the Company of employment for other than death, Disability or Due Cause, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
   
   
   
  (e)
   
   
 
Constructive Termination of Employment by the Company Without Due Cause
.
Termination by the Company without Due Cause under Paragraph 4 (d) shall be deemed to have occurred if the Executive elects to terminate his employment as a result of: (i) a failure by the Company to pay Executive any compensation due Executive (which failure is not cured within 10 days after written notice thereof by Executive to the Chief Executive Officer, which notice shall specifically describe such alleged failure and which failure does not recur); (ii) the assignment to Executive of any duties materially inconsistent (except in the nature of a promotion or lateral move) with the position in the Company that he held immediately prior to the reassignment or a substantial adverse alteration in the nature or status of his position or responsibilities from those in effect immediately prior to the reassignment; or (iii) The Companys requiring Executive to be based more than 60 miles from the Companys office at which he was principally employed immediately prior to the date of the relocation.
  (f)
   
   
 
Voluntary Termination
.
In the event that the Executive terminates his employment at his own volition prior to the expiration of the Term (except as provided in Paragraph 4(e) above), such termination shall constitute a Voluntary Termination and in such event the Executive shall be limited to the same rights and benefits as provided in connection with a termination for Due Cause under Paragraph 4 (c) above.
  (g)
   
   
 
Election Not to Renew
.
An election by either the Company or Executive pursuant to Paragraph 1 above not to renew the Term shall not be deemed a termination of employment by either party. After the expiration of the Term because of either the Companys or Executives election not to renew, except in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit plans and programs then in effect, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
 
4
  (h)
   
   
 
Notice of Termination, Resignation and Release
.
Any termination under Section 4(b) by the Company for Disability or Section 4(c) for Due Cause or by the Executive pursuant to a constructive termination under Section 4(e) shall be communicated by Notice of Termination to the other party thereto given in accordance with Paragraph 9. For purposes of this Agreement, a Notice of Termination means a written notice which (i) indicates the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, (ii) sets forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Executives employment under the provision so indicated and (iii) if the termination date is other than the date of receipt of such Notice, specifies the termination date (which date shall not be prior to the date of such notice or more than 15 days after the giving of such Notice).
 
   Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in order to be eligible to receive any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination or expiration of the Executives employment, in addition to fulfilling all other conditions precedent to such receipt, the Executive (if he has the legal capacity to do so and if not, his legal representative) must within 10 days after the termination date (i) resign as a member of the Board, if applicable, and as an officer, manager and employee of the Company and its Related Entities and (ii) on behalf of the Executive and his estate, heirs and representatives, execute a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Companys and such Related Entities respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to any payments or benefits under Section 3 or 4 of this Agreement related to the termination of Executives employment (provided that Executives post-termination of employment obligations under Section 19 shall cease upon the Companys failure to make any such payments when due if within 15 days after written notice of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment).
   
   
   
 
  (i)
   
   
 
Earned and Accrued Payments
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, upon the termination of the Executives employment at any time, for any reason, the Executive shall be paid all amounts that had already been earned and accrued as of the time of termination, including but not limited to (i) pay for unused vacation accrued in accordance with the Companys vacation policy; (ii) any bonus that had been earned but not yet paid; and (iii) reimbursement for any business expenses accrued in accordance with Section 3(d).
 
  (j)
   
   
 
Employment at Will.
 
Executive hereby agrees that Company may terminate his employment under this Section 4 without regard to: (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to Executive, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to Executives relationship with Company; or (iii) assignment of Due Cause by the Company.
 
5.
  
Successors and Assigns
.
  (a)
   
   
  
Assignment by the Company
.
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company or any corporation or other entity to which the Company may transfer all or substantially all of its assets and business and to which the Company may assign this Agreement, in which case the term Company, as used herein, shall mean such corporation or other
 
5
 
entity, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the Company from any obligations hereunder, whether arising prior to or after such assignment.
 
  (b)
   
   
  
Assignment by the Executive
.
The Executive may not assign this Agreement or any part hereof without the prior written consent of the Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall preclude the Executive from designating one or more beneficiaries to receive any amount that may be payable following occurrence of his legal incompetency or his death and shall not preclude the legal representative of his estate from assigning any right hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto under his will or, in the case of intestacy, to the person or persons entitled thereto under the laws of intestacy applicable to his estate. The term beneficiaries, as used in this Agreement, shall mean a beneficiary or beneficiaries so designated to receive any such amount or, if no beneficiary has been so designated, the legal representative of the Executive (in the event of his incompetency) or the Executives estate.
 
6.
  
Governing Law
.  
This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
 
7.
  
Entire Agreement
.  
This Agreement contains all of the understandings and representations between the parties hereto pertaining to the matters referred to herein, and supersedes all undertakings and agreements, whether oral or in writing, previously entered into by them with respect thereto, including any previous employment, severance and/or noncompetition agreements. This Agreement may only be modified by an instrument in writing.
 
8.
  
Waiver of Breach
.  
The waiver by any party of a breach of any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall not operate or be construed to be a waiver of a similar or dissimilar provision or condition at the same or any prior or subsequent time.
 
9.
  
Notices
.  
Any notice to be given hereunder shall be in writing and delivered personally, or sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such other address as such party may subsequently give notice of hereunder in writing:
 
If to the Company
:
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: General Counsel
With a copy to:
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: Chief Executive Officer
6
If to the Executive:
___________________
___________________
___________________
 
 
10.
  
Arbitration
.  
Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or any breach thereof, excepting only the enforcement of any Loyalty Obligations arising under Section 19 of this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association then in effect in the Commonwealth of Virginia and judgment upon such award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. The board of arbitrators shall consist of one arbitrator to be appointed by the Company, one by the Executive, and one by the two arbitrators so chosen. The arbitration shall be held at such place as may be agreed upon at the time by the parties to the arbitration. The cost of arbitration shall be borne as determined by the arbitrators.
 
11.
  
Withholding
.  
Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments required to be made by the Company hereunder to the Executive or his estate or beneficiaries shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts relating to taxes as the Company may reasonably determine it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation. In lieu of withholding such amounts, in whole or in part, the Company may, in its sole discretion, accept other provisions for payment of taxes and withholdings as required by law, provided it is satisfied that all requirements of law affecting its responsibilities to withhold have been satisfied.
 
12.
  
Deferred Compensation
.  
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be operated in accordance with the requirements of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the Code). In particular, and without limiting the generality of the foregoing, in the event that the Company determines that any amounts that become payable hereunder fail to satisfy the requirements of Code Section 409A, then the payment of such amounts shall not be made pursuant to the payment schedules provided herein and instead the payment of such benefits shall be delayed or otherwise restructured to the minimum extent necessary so that such benefits are not subject to the provisions of Section 409A(a)(1) of the Code.
 
13.
  
Severability
.  
In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
 
14.
  
Titles
.  
Titles to the paragraphs in this Agreement are intended solely for convenience and no provision of this Agreement is to be construed by reference to the title of any paragraph.
 
15.
  
Legal Fees
.  
Company agrees to pay the reasonable fees and expenses of Executives legal counsel in connection with the negotiation and execution of this Agreement, not to exceed $2,500.
 
16.
  
Counterparts
.  
This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
 
7
 
17.
  
Amendment
.  
Except as provided in Section 12 above, this Agreement may not be modified or amended except by written instrument signed by all parties hereto.
 
18.
  
Counsel
.  
This Agreement has been prepared with the assistance of LeClair Ryan Flippin Densmore, a Professional Corporation, as counsel to the Company (Counsel), after full disclosure of its representation of the Company and with the consent and direction of the Company and the Executive. The Executive has reviewed the contents of this Agreement and fully understands its terms. The Executive acknowledges that he is fully aware of his right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company, that Counsel has advised him of such right and disclosed to him the risks in not seeking such independent advice, and that he fully understands the potentially adverse interests of the parties with respect to this Agreement. The Executive further acknowledges that neither the Company nor its Counsel has made representations or given any advice with respect to the tax or other consequences of this Agreement or any transactions contemplated by this Agreement to him, that he has been advised of the importance of seeking independent counsel with respect to such consequences, and that he had obtained independent counsel with respect to such consequences. By executing this Agreement, the Executive represents that he has, after being advised of the potential conflicts between him and the Company with respect to the future consequences of this Agreement, either consulted independent legal counsel or elected, notwithstanding the advisability of seeking such independent legal counsel, not to consult with such independent legal counsel.
 
19.
  
Loyalty Obligations
.  
The Executive agrees that the following obligations (Loyalty Obligations) shall apply in consideration of Executives employment by or continued employment with the Company:
 
 
  (a)    
   
   
 
Confidential Information
.
   (i)
   
   
   
 
Company Information
. Executive agrees at all times during the term of Executives employment and thereafter, to hold in strictest confidence, and not to use (except for the benefit of the Company to fulfill Executives employment obligations) or to disclose to any person, firm or corporation without written authorization of the Board of Directors of the Company, any Confidential Information of the Company or its subsidiary, affiliate or parent entities, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities). Executive agrees that Confidential Information means any proprietary information, technical data, trade secrets or know-how in which the Company or Related Entities have an interest, including, but not limited to, research, product or service plans, products, services, customer lists and customers (including, but not limited to, vendors the Company or Related Entities on whom Executive called, with whom Executive dealt or with whom Executive became acquainted during the term of Executives employment), pricing, costs, markets, summaries, marketing and other strategies, software, developments, inventions, processes, formulas, technology, designs, drawings, engineering, hardware configuration or marketing, financial or other business information obtained by Executive or disclosed to Executive by the Company or Related Entities or any other person or entity during the term of Executives employment with the Company either directly or indirectly in writing, orally by drawings, by observation of services, systems or other aspects of the business of the Company or Related Entities or otherwise.
   (ii)
   
   
   
 
Third Party Information
. Executive recognizes that the Company and Related Entities have received and in the future will receive from third parties their confidential
 
8
 
or proprietary information subject to a duty on the part of the Company or Related Entities to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to use it only for certain limited purposes. Executive agrees to hold all such confidential or proprietary information in the strictest confidence and not to disclose it to any person, firm or corporation or to use it except as necessary in carrying out Executives work for the Company consistent with the obligations of the Company or Related Entities with such third party.
  (b)     
   
   
Conflicting Employment
. Executive agrees that, during the term of Executives employment with the Company, Executive will not engage in any other employment, occupation, consulting or other business activity directly related to the business in which the Company or Related Entities are now involved or become involved during the term of Executives employment. Nor will Executive engage in any other activities that conflict with the business of the Company or Related Entities. Furthermore Executive agrees to devote such time as may be necessary to fulfill Executives obligations to the Company.
  (c)    
   
   
 
Returning Company Property
. Executive agrees that, at the time of leaving the employ of the Company, Executive will deliver to the Company (and will not keep in Executives possession, recreate or deliver to anyone else) any and all devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items developed by Executive or others pursuant to or during Executives employment with the Company or otherwise belonging to the Company or Related Entities and their respective successors or assigns. In the event of the termination of Executives employment, Executive agrees to sign and deliver the Termination Certification attached hereto as
Exhibit A
.
  (d)    
   
   
 
Notification of New Employer
. In the event that Executive leaves the employ of the Company, Executive hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to Executives new employer (whether Executive is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, executive or manager) about Executives obligations under this Agreement.
  (e)     
   
   
 
Non-Solicitation
. Executive agrees that while Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination or expiration of Executives employment with the Company, Executive shall not directly or indirectly, either on behalf of Executive or any other person or entity, (i) solicit, induce, recruit or encourage any employee of the Company or Related Entities or independent contractor of the Company or Related Entities who provides services to or in behalf of the Company or Related Entities to leave his, her or its employment or engagement with the Company or Related Entities, or attempt to solicit, recruit, or take away any such employees or independent contractors (or induce or encourage any such employee or independent contractor to terminate its employment or engagement with the Company or Related Entities), provided that after termination or expiration of Executives employment, this provision shall only apply to those employees or independent contractors of the Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to the date of such termination or expiration, (ii) interfere in any manner with the contractual or employment relationship between the Company and Related Entities and any employee, independent contractor, customer or supplier of the Company or Related Entities or cause any such employee, customer, independent contractor or
 
9
 
supplier to cease employment with, cease doing business with or reduce the amount of business it does with the Company or Related Entities, provided that after termination or expiration of Executives employment, this provision shall apply only to the employees, independent contractors, customers or suppliers of Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to such termination or expiration, or (iii) whether as a direct solicitor or provider of such services, or in a management or supervisory capacity over others who solicit or provide such services, solicit or provide services that fall within the definition of Restricted Activities to any customer of the Company or Related Entities, provided that after the expiration or termination of Executives employment, this provision shall only apply to those customers of the Company or Related Entities who were such a customer at any time within 12 months prior to the termination or expiration of Executives employment with the Company.
  (f)    
   
   
 
Covenants Not to Compete
. For purposes of this Agreement, the term Non-Compete Period shall mean a period from the date hereof until, one (1) year immediately following the termination or expiration of Executives employment with the Company. During the Non-Compete Period, Executive covenants and agrees that Executive will not, directly or indirectly, (i) own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 1% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder of any company or business that derives revenue from the Restricted Activities (as defined below) within the Restricted Area (as defined below), or any company or business controlling, controlled by or under common control with any company or business directly engaged in such Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area (any of the foregoing, a Restricted Company) or (ii) engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, executive, partner, independent contractor, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area. Nothing in this Subsection 19(g) shall preclude Executive from accepting employment with a multi-division company so long as (x) Executives employment is not within a division of the new employer that engages in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area, (y) during the course of such employment, Executive does not communicate related to Restricted Activities with any division of Executives new employer engaged in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area and (z) Executive does not engage in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
   (i)
   
   
   
 
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Activities means the retail, wholesale or commercial sale of aftermarket auto parts and accessories. The term Restricted Area means the United States of America, including its territories and possessions.
   (ii)
   
   
   
 
In the event that Executive intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, executive or director) with any Restricted Company during the Non-Compete Period, Executive must provide information in writing to the Board of Directors of the Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by Executive for such Restricted Company. All such current associations are set forth on
Exhibit B
to this Agreement. In the event that the Board of Directors of the Company consents in writing to Executives engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by Executive shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of Subsection 19(g) hereof.
 
10
  (g)    
   
   
 
Specific Enforcement; Remedies Cumulative; Attorney Fees
. Executive acknowledges that the Company and Related Entities, as the case may be, will be irreparably injured if the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(c), 19(e), and 19(f) hereof are not specifically enforced and Executive agrees that the terms of such provisions (including without limitation the periods set forth in Subsections 19(e) and 19(f)) are reasonable and appropriate. If Executive commits or, in the reasonable belief of the Company, threaten to commit a breach of any of the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(c), 19(e) or 19(f) hereof,
the Company and/or Related Entities, as the case may be, shall have the right and remedy, in addition to and not in limitation of any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, to have the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(c), 19(e) or 19(f) hereof specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction through immediate injunctive and other equitable relief
, it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach will cause irreparable injury to the Company and/or Related Entities and that money damages will not provide an adequate remedy therefore. Such injunction shall be available without the posting of any bond or other security, and Executive hereby consents to the issuance of such injunction. Executive agrees to pay to the Company and/or Related Entities their reasonable attorneys fees and court costs in obtaining enforcement of, or determining the validity of, this Agreement or any provision hereof, whether in an action, suit, motion or matter brought by Executive or the Company and/or Related Entities (or any other person or entity), provided the Company and/or Related Entities is a prevailing party in such action, suit, motion or matter.
  (h)    
   
   
 
Re-Set of Period for Non-Competition and Non-Solicitation
.
In the event that a legal or equitable action is commenced with respect to any of the provisions of Subsections 19(f) or 19(g) hereof and Executive has not strictly observed the provisions in such sections with respect to which such action has been commenced, then the one-year period, as described in such sections not strictly observed by Executive shall begin to run anew from the date of any Final Judicial Determination of such legal action. Final Judicial Determination shall mean the expiration of time to file any possible appeal from a final judgment in such legal action or, if an appeal is taken, the final determination of the final appellate proceeding and that any failure to do so shall constitute a breach of the provisions hereof.
  (i)     
   
   
 
Adherence to Company Policies
.
Executive agrees to diligently adhere to all established Company policies and procedures, including but not limited to the Companys Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and, if applicable, the Code of Ethics for Financial Professionals. Executive agrees that if Executive does not adhere to any of the provisions of such Guidelines, Executive will be in breach of the provisions hereof.
  (j)    
   
   
 
Representations
. Executive agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement. Executive represents that Executives performance of all the terms of this Agreement will not breach any agreement to keep in confidence proprietary information acquired by Executive in confidence or in trust prior to Executives employment by the Company. Executive has not entered into, and Executive agrees Executive will not enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith and Executives employment by the Company and Executives services to the Company will not violate the terms of any oral or written agreement to which Executive is a party.
 
11
  (k)    
   
   
WITH RESPECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY AND ALL LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS ARISING UNDER SECTION 19, THE FOLLOWING SUBSECTIONS 19(k) AND 19(l) SHALL APPLY. THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY CONSENT TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE FOLLOWING COURTS IN MATTERS RELATED TO THIS SECTION 19 AND AGREE NOT TO COMMENCE ANY SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING THERETO EXCEPT IN ANY OF SUCH COURTS: THE STATE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA OR THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE CITY OF ROANOKE, VIRGINIA (OR IN ANY MUNICIPALITY WHEREIN AN OFFICE OF COMPANY IS LOCATED, IN WHICH OFFICE EXECUTIVE WAS PHYSICALLY PRESENT WHILE RENDERING SERVICES FOR COMPANY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING OR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE TERMINATION OR EXPIRATION OF EXECUTIVES EMPLOYMENT, IF TERMINATED OR EXPIRED).
  (l)    
   
   
 
EXECUTIVE AGREES TO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BASED UPON, OR RELATED TO, ANY LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS. THIS WAIVER IS KNOWINGLY, INTENTIONALLY, AND VOLUNTARILY MADE BY EXECUTIVE, AND EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT, EXCEPT FOR THE COMPANYS AGREEMENT TO LIKEWISE WAIVE ITS RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY (WHICH THE COMPANY HEREBY MAKES), COMPANY HAS NOT MADE ANY REPRESENTATIONS OF FACTS TO INDUCE THIS WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY OR IN ANY WAY TO MODIFY OR NULLIFY ITS EFFECT. EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS BEEN REPRESENTED (OR HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO BE REPRESENTED) IN THE SIGNING OF THIS AGREEMENT AND IN THE MAKING OF THIS WAIVER BY INDEPENDENT LEGAL COUNSEL, SELECTED OF EXECUTIVES OWN FREE WILL, AND THAT EXECUTIVE HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS THIS WAIVER WITH COUNSEL. EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE MEANING AND RAMIFICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER AND AS EVIDENCE OF THIS FACT SIGNS THIS AGREEMENT BELOW.
12
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
13
 
   
This is to certify that I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return, any devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items belonging to the Company.
I further certify that I have, to the best of my knowledge, complied with all the terms of my Employment Agreement with the Company.
 
____ None
____ Additional Sheets Attached
Signature of Employee: __________________________
Print Name of Employee: _________________________
 
Date: _________________
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060518074141.txt.gz
TIME:20060518074141
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., May 18, 2006
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced record revenue and earnings for its fiscal first quarter ended April 22, 2006.
Earnings per diluted share for the first quarter were $0.68, compared to $0.63 last year, an increase of 8%, on top of a 39% increase in last years first quarter. First quarter results include approximately $0.03 per share of stock-option expense, whereas results in last years quarter do not include pro forma stock-option expense of approximately $0.02 per share. Adjusted for comparable treatment of stock options, adjusted EPS grew 11% compared to last year. (All per-share amounts referenced in this release reflect the Companys 3-for-2 stock split, which took effect September 26, 2005).
 
In the first quarter, sales increased to $1.39 billion from $1.26 billion last year, a 10.7% increase. Same-store sales increased 3.9% in the quarter, comprised of 0.5% do-it-yourself (DIY) same-store sales and 16.3% do-it-for-me (DIFM) same-store sales. The 3.9% same-store sales increase compares to a 9.2% increase in last years first quarter.
First quarter sales reflect the previously announced slow start to the quarter, somewhat offset by stronger sales in the latter part of the quarter.
I am disappointed that sales came in at the low end of our mid-single-digit comp guidance, said Mike Coppola, chairman and CEO, and as a result, earnings per share were also disappointing, coming in at the low end of our guidance of $0.68 to $0.71. Higher energy prices and higher interest rates are reducing consumers discretionary income. In addition, very mild winter weather unfavorably impacted first quarter sales. Our team is working diligently on a large number of sales-enhancing initiatives, and focusing as well on curtailing selected expenses in non-sales-related areas.
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2006
May 18, 2006
Page 2
 
First quarter gross margin was 47.8% of sales, equal to last year, which was up 137 basis points over the prior year.
First quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 38.7% of sales, compared to 38.2% in first quarter 2005. Non-comparable stock-option expense impacted SG&A in this years quarter by 36 basis points. This years SG&A rate also reflects the cost of the companys store manager conference, held every other year, which exceeded 30 basis points. In addition, SG&A includes approximately 20 basis points of unplanned expenses related to the resolution of certain legal matters and property damage costs.
The quarters income tax rate was 36.6%, and benefited from the resolution of certain tax contingencies. The company anticipates its tax rate to be in the range of 38.0% to 38.2% for the balance of 2006.
While first quarter DIY sales did not materialize to the extent we would have liked, the internal drivers of our business remain solid, Coppola added. Our in-stock percentage is at an all-time high, and our average transaction size is also at a record level, all of which tells us that Advance is doing a good job fulfilling customers expectations. Additionally, our commercial business continues to perform well, with sales on-plan. Our focus is to maximize our results for the balance of 2006.
Store
Information
During the
first quarter, the Company opened 58 new stores, closed three stores, relocated 11 existing stores, and remodeled 65 stores to the Companys innovative 2010 format. The Company is raising its guidance for new-store openings in 2006 to a range of 185 to 195, compared to previous guidance for 170 to 180 new stores. At quarter end, the Company operated 2,927 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands, of which 1,661 are the Companys innovative 2010-format stores.
2006 Guidance
Due to the current macroeconomic environment that is affecting our customers, the Company is forecasting comp-store sales to be in the range of 3% to 5% for the remainder of 2006. The Company forecasts operating margin improvement for the balance of the year, and therefore continues to target 2006 earnings per diluted share in the range
of $2.37 to $2.47. 2006 results will include approximately $0.12 per share of stock-option expense in accordance with new accounting requirements, whereas 2005 results did not include such expenses. For second quarter 2006, the Company forecasts 3% to 5% comps and earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.65 to $0.68, inclusive of approximately $0.03 of stock-option expense. Last years second quarter EPS of $0.60 do not include stock-option expense of approximately $0.02 per share. Through the first three weeks of the quarter, comps have run consistent with first quarters run-rate. For the year, the Company continues to expect capital expenditures to be in the range of $260 million to $280 million.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2006
May 18, 2006
Page 3
Annual Meeting Announcements
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 17, 2006. At the meeting, stockholders:
Following the stockholders meeting, the Board of Directors unanimously elected Michael Coppola to serve as Chairman of the Board, in addition to his current responsibilities as President and CEO.
It has been my privilege to serve Advance Auto Parts as its CEO, and more recently as Chairman of the Board, Larry Castellani said. I look forward to continuing to serve the company as a board member. Meanwhile, I couldnt be more enthusiastic that Mike Coppola will guide this company both operationally and strategically, in his additional role of Chairman of the Board. Mikes leadership, extensive retail experience, and the quality team supporting him are propelling Advance to be best-in-class.
Quarterly Dividend
The Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on July 7, 2006 to stockholders of record as of June 23, 2006.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on May 18, 2006, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to
www.advanceautoparts.com
, or dial (
866) 800-8651
. The call will be archived on the Companys website
www.advanceautoparts.com
until May 17, 2007.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of April 22, 2006, the Company operated 2,927 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RECORD EPS FOR FIRST QUARTER 2006
May 18, 2006
Page 4
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events, developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including new-store growth, the impact of stock-option expensing, gross margin and SG&A rates, capital expenditures, tax rate, comparable-store sales and earnings per share for second-quarter 2006 and fiscal year 2006. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060629120544.txt.gz
TIME:20060629120544
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., June 29, 2006
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today is providing updated financial guidance for its fiscal second quarter, which ends July 15, 2006.
For the quarter, comparable-store sales are now expected to increase approximately 1% to 2%, versus a 9% increase last year. This compares to prior guidance of a 3% to 5% increase. In addition, both gross margin and SG&A rates are expected to be less favorable than prior expectations. Accordingly, the company now expects second quarter earnings per diluted share to be in the range of $0.57 to $0.59, compared to prior guidance of $0.65 to $0.68. Earnings per diluted share guidance includes approximately $0.03 of non-comparable stock option expense. Earnings per diluted share in last years second quarter were $0.60, which did not include pro forma stock option expense of approximately $0.02.
Our quarter-to-date results have been lower than we expected, said Mike Coppola, Chairman, President and CEO. In the interest of timely communication, we felt it is important to share this information with you now. We believe that macro-economic factors, including, higher energy prices, ever-higher interest rates, and higher required credit card payments are further reducing discretionary income for our lower- and middle-income customers and has unfavorably impacted customer traffic. Both do-it-yourself (DIY) and do-it-for-me (DIFM) sales have been running below expectations. Our history shows that customers can defer purchases of non-discretionary replacement parts only for a limited period of time. With our core customers pressured by macro factors, we must provide customers more reasons than ever to visit our stores. We accept that challenge, and know that we must drive additional traffic to our stores.
As we focus on driving our sales, we also are working hard to manage our expenses in-line with our current sales trend, said Coppola. In addition, we are working on a number of expense-reduction initiatives that will further reduce our expense base.
Even if current sales trends persist, the Company continues to expect growth in earnings per diluted share for 2006, compared to 2005, albeit at a lower rate of growth than previously expected. The Company will
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS PROVIDES UPDATED FINANCIAL GUIDANCE
June 29, 2006
Page 2
 
 
provide a more-detailed update to earnings guidance for fiscal 2006 on its regularly scheduled August 10 conference call.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of April 22, 2006, the Company operated 2,927 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events, developments or results, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including the impact of stock-option expensing, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for second-quarter 2006 and fiscal year 2006. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20060810074030.txt.gz
TIME:20060810074030
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., August 10, 2006
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fiscal second quarter ended July 15, 2006.
Earnings per diluted share for the second quarter were $0.59, compared to $0.60 last year. This years second quarter results include $0.03 per share of stock-option expense, whereas last years quarter does not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.02 per share. (All per-share amounts referenced in this release reflect the Companys 3-for-2 stock split, which took effect September 26, 2005).
 
In the second quarter, sales increased 8.3% to $1.11 billion from $1.02 billion last year. Comparable-store sales increased 1.2% in the quarter, comprised of a 1.0% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and a 9.1% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM). The 1.2% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 9.0% increase in last years second quarter.
Our sales for the quarter were disappointing, said Mike Coppola, Chairman and CEO. We believe that sales are being impacted unfavorably by macroeconomic conditions that have reduced our customers discretionary income, and second quarter sales compared to a strong 9.0% comparable-store increase last year. In this challenging environment, we must improve our execution in every area of the Company. We are working to continue improving our store execution, customer service and advertising effectiveness, while at the same time optimizing our expense structure. We believe that these actions will more-effectively position us for the future.
Second quarter gross margin was 47.6% of sales, a 50 basis point improvement compared to last years quarter, primarily reflecting category management initiatives and logistics efficiencies.
Second quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 37.6% of sales, compared to 36.1% in second quarter 2005. This reflects 60 basis points loss of leverage on rent, depreciation and
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RESULTS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2006
August 10, 2006
Page 2
 
other fixed costs from softer-than-anticipated comparable-store sales and the acceleration of our new-store openings. In addition, SG&A was unfavorably impacted by higher costs for fuel and insurance programs, including property, workers compensation and medical, which in total account for another 55 basis points. Non-comparable stock-option expense also increased SG&A in this years quarter by 41 basis points.
The quarters income tax rate was 38.1%, and the Company anticipates its tax rate to be in the range of 38.0% to 38.2% for the balance of 2006.
For the first half of the year, total sales grew 9.6% to $2.50 billion. Comparable-store sales grew 2.7% over this time, comprised of a 0.1% decrease in DIY and a 13.1% increase in DIFM. The 2.7% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 9.1% increase in last years first half. First half earnings per diluted share increased to $1.27 compared to $1.23 last year. Earnings in this years first half include stock-option expense of $0.06 per share, whereas last years first-half results do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.04 per share.
While we are adjusting our spending in line with a challenging macroeconomic environment and current sales trend, we remain committed to our strategic objectives, Coppola said. We have the financial and human resources to continue rolling out strategic investments, such as opening new stores, remodeling existing stores, and adding commercial-delivery programs to selected stores. These investments are key to our future. While we remain committed to our long-term goals, we are developing a leaner expense structure, which better positions Advance for the future.
Store
Information
During the
second quarter, the Company opened 44 new stores, of which six were Autopart International (AI) stores. The Company also relocated 10 existing stores, and remodeled 56 stores to the innovative Advance 2010 format. Year-to-date, the Company has opened 102 new stores. Since acquiring AI in September 2005, AI has opened 11 new stores, and now operates a total of 72 locations. Advance now expects to open 205 to 215 new stores in 2006, including AI. This level of new-store openings represents unit growth of 7% to 8% compared to 2005, and compares to prior guidance of 185 to 195 new stores (or 6% to 7% unit growth). As of July 15, 2006, 1,765 (or 61%) of the Companys stores are 2010-format stores, and approximately 81% of the Companys stores offer commercial delivery programs.
2006 Guidance
Based on recent sales trends, the Company projects comparable-store sales to be in the range of zero
to 2% for the third quarter (compared to a 10% increase in last years third quarter), and slightly higher in the fourth quarter (compared to a 6.3% increase in last years fourth quarter). The Company continues to anticipate gross margin improvement for the balance of the year, with pressure on SG&A, particularly in the third quarter, as a result of modest comparable-store sales. Accordingly, the Company is projecting 2006 earnings per diluted share in the range of $2.10 to $2.20, inclusive of $0.12 per share of stock-option expense; 2005 EPS of $2.13 did not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.09 per share. For the year, the Company now expects capital expenditures to be in the range of $245 million to $255 million.
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RESULTS FOR SECOND QUARTER 2006
August 10, 2006
Page 3
 
For third quarter 2006, the Company forecasts earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.50 to $0.55, inclusive of $0.03 of stock-option expense. Last years third quarter EPS of $0.55 do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.02 per share.
Share Repurchases and Quarterly Dividend
During the second quarter, the Company repurchased 2.4 million shares of its common stock for $84 million. Cumulatively since August 2004, the Company has repurchased over 12 million shares of its common stock for $385 million.
On August 8, 2006, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share be paid on October 6, 2006 to stockholders of record as of September 22, 2006.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on August 10, 2006, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial (
866) 800-8651
. The call will be archived on the Companys website until August 9, 2007.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of July 15, 2006, the Company operated 2,971 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including new-store growth, the impact of stock-option expense, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, capital expenditures and earnings per share for third-quarter 2006 and fiscal year 2006. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20061012164753.txt.gz
TIME:20061012164753
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
Exhibit 10.1
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SCHEDULES
:
 
 
 
EXHIBITS
:
 
 
 
 
CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of October 5, 2006, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, the LENDERS party hereto, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
 
The parties hereto agree as follows:
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
  
Defined Terms.
As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
 
ABR
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
 
Adjusted Consolidated Net Income
 means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP,
provided
that, without duplication, (a) there shall be excluded (i) the income of any Person in which any other Person (other than the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) has a joint interest, except such income shall be included to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries by such Person during such period, (ii) the income (or loss) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or the date that Persons assets are acquired by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries and (iii) gains and losses from, or incurred in connection with, the sale, liquidation or other disposition of assets outside the ordinary course of business and (b) for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to any Permitted Acquisitions and any divestitures by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of all or substantially all the assets of , or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person occurring during such period as if such transactions had occurred on the first day of such period.
 
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 means an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, (i) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (ii) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
 
Administrative Agent
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
 
Administrative Questionnaire
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
 
 
2
 
Affiliate
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
 
Alternate Base Rate
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greater of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day and (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%. Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
 
Applicable Percentage
 means, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Revolving Commitments represented by such Lenders Revolving Commitment. If the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments.
 
Applicable Rate
 means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan or with respect to commitment fees in respect of Revolving Commitments payable under Section 2.11(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption ABR Spread, Eurodollar Spread or Commitment Fee Rate, as the case may be, based upon the Ratings by S&P and Moodys, respectively, applicable on such date:
 
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (a) if either Moodys or S&P shall not have in effect a Rating (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this paragraph), then such rating agency shall be deemed to have established a Rating in Category 6; (b) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories, the Applicable Rate shall be based on the higher of the two Ratings unless one of the two Ratings is two or more Categories lower than the other, in which case the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category next below that of the higher of the
 
3
 
two Ratings; and (c) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P shall be changed (other than as a result of a change in the rating system of Moodys or S&P), such change shall be effective as of the date on which it is first announced by the applicable rating agency, irrespective of when notice of such change shall have been furnished by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 or otherwise. Each change in the Applicable Rate apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change. If the rating system of Moodys or S&P shall change, or if either such rating agency shall cease to be in the business of rating corporate debt obligations, the Borrower and the Lenders shall negotiate in good faith to amend this definition to reflect such changed rating system or the unavailability of Ratings from such rating agency and, pending the effectiveness of any such amendment, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Rating most recently in effect prior to such change or cessation.
 
Approved Fund
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(b).
 
Assessment Rate
 means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as well-capitalized and within supervisory subgroup B (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States;
provided
that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid, then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
 
Assignment and Assumption
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
 
Board
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
 
Borrower
 means Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
 
Borrowing
 means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, or (b) a Swingline Loan.
 
Borrowing Request
 means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
 
4
 
Business Day
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed;
provided
that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
 
Capital Lease Obligations
 of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
 
Change in Control
 means at any time, (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person other than Holdings of any shares of capital stock of the Borrower; (b) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of Rule 13d-5 under the United States Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 in effect on the date hereof), of shares representing more than 25% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding capital stock of Holdings; or (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of Holdings by Persons who were not Continuing Directors.
 
Change in Law
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the date of this Agreement, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date of this Agreement or (c) compliance by any Lender or the Issuing Bank (or, for purposes of Section 2.14(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lenders or the Issuing Banks holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
 
Code
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
 
Consolidated Coverage Ratio
 means, for any period, the ratio of (a) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period to (b) the sum of Consolidated Interest Expense plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
 
Commitment
 means a Revolving Commitment, an Incremental Revolving Commitment, or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
 
Consolidated EBITDA
 means, for any period, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (a) consolidated interest expense for such period, (b) the aggregate amount of letter of credit fees accrued during such period, (c) the aggregate amount of income tax expense for such period,
 
5
 
(d) all depreciation and amortization expense for such period and (e) other non-cash charges for such period (excluding any non-cash charges that constitute an accrual of or reserve for future cash payments), and minus, without duplication and to the extent added to revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, all non-cash gains during such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis with respect to Holdings and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP.
 
Consolidated EBITDAR
 means, for any period, the sum of Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
 
Consolidated Interest Expense
 means, for any period, the interest expense of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, less, to the extent included in interest expense, the amortization during such period of debt issuance and deferred financing costs, commissions and fees;
provided
,
however
, that the aggregate amount of such amortization that may be excluded in calculating Consolidated Interest Expense in respect of any financing transaction shall not exceed 3.5% of the aggregate amount of such financing.
 
Consolidated Net Income
 means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
 
Consolidated Rent Expense
 means, for any period , the rental expense attributable to leases of real property that is deducted in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
 
Continuing Directors
 means the directors of Holdings on the Effective Date and each other director, if, in each case, such other directors nomination for election to the board of directors of Holdings is approved by a majority of the then Continuing Directors.
 
Control
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise. 
Controlling
 and 
Controlled
 have meanings correlative thereto.
 
Default
 means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
 
Deferred Compensation Obligations
 means a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that allows executives of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to defer receipt of specified portions of base and bonus earnings each calendar year. Deferrals are maintained as a liability, along with assets owned by the Borrower, in a trust owned by the Borrower.
 
6
 
Designated Vendor
 means any vendor or supplier from which the Borrower purchases inventory and that has been designated by the Borrower as a participant in a Permitted Vendor Financing.
 
Designated Vendor Accounts
 means (a) accounts receivable owed by the Borrower in respect of inventory purchased from a Designated Vendor or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower as payment in full of one or more of such accounts receivable;
provided
that such accounts receivable or drafts shall constitute Designated Vendor Accounts only after having been sold by such Designated Vendor to a DVA Creditor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and only so long as owed to a DVA Creditor.
 
Disclosed Matters
 means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
 
DVA Creditor
 means (a) any financial institution that has agreed to purchase one or more Designated Vendor Accounts from a Designated Vendor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and (b) any successor or assignee of any such financial institution that holds any Designated Vendor Accounts originally purchased by such financial institution, provided that such successor or assignee is not a Designated Vendor, a Loan Party or an Affiliate of a Designated Vendor or a Loan Party.
 
DVA Obligations
 means the obligations of the Borrower to pay Designated Vendor Accounts. For purposes of this Agreement, the amount of any DVA Obligation at any time shall be the entire amount payable in respect thereof as and when due.
 
dollars
 or 
$
 refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
 
Effective Date
 means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
 
Environmental Laws
 means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
 
Environmental Liability
 means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
 
7
 
Equity Interests
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person or any warrants, options or other rights to acquire such interests.
 
ERISA
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
 
ERISA Affiliate
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
 
ERISA Event
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an accumulated funding deficiency (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
 
Eurodollar
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
 
Event of Default
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
 
Excluded Margin Stock
 means any shares of capital stock of Holdings that constitute margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board and are held as treasury stock by Holdings.
 
Excluded Taxes
 means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal
 
8
 
office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.18(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lenders failure to comply with Section 2.16(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.16(a).
 
Existing Credit Agreement
 means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated November 3, 2004, as amended, among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
 
Existing Letters of Credit
 means all letters of credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date.
 
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
 
Financial Officer
 means the chief financial officer, vice president of finance, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of Holdings or the Borrower, as applicable.
 
Foreign Lender
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located. For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
 
Foreign Subsidiary
 means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
 
GAAP
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
 
Governmental Authority
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity
 
9
 
exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
 
Guarantee
 of or by any Person (the 
guarantor
) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the 
primary obligor
) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation;
provided
, that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
 
Guarantee Agreement
 means the Guarantee Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, made by Holdings in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders.
 
Hazardous Materials
 means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
 
Holdings
 means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
 
Indebtedness
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 90 days and (ii) Deferred Compensation Obligations), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances and (j) all DVA Obligations. The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity
 
10
 
(including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor. The amount of any Indebtedness described in clause (f) above shall be limited to the maximum amount payable under the applicable Guarantee of such Person if such Guarantee contains limitations on the amount payable thereunder.
 
Indemnified Taxes
 means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
 
Index Debt
 means senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money of Holdings that is not guaranteed by any other Person or subject to any other credit enhancement.
 
Information Memorandum
 means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated September 2006 relating to the Borrower and the Transactions.
 
Interest Election Request
 means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.07.
 
Interest Payment Date
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
 
Interest Period
 means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, to the extent made available by all Lenders, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower may elect;
provided
, that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period. For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
 
Issuing Bank
 means (a) JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as the issuer of (i) Letters of Credit hereunder and (ii) Existing Letters of Credit under the Existing Credit Agreement, in each case including its successors in such capacity as
 
11
 
provided in Section 2.05(i), or (b) any other Lender approved by the Administrative Agent and the Borrower. An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term Issuing Bank shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate.
 
LC Disbursement
 means a payment made by the Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
 
LC Exposure
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time. The LC Exposure of any Revolving Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
 
Lenders
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption. Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
 
Letter of Credit
 means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement. Each Existing Letter of Credit will be deemed to constitute a Letter of Credit for all purposes under the Loan Documents as though each Existing Letter of Credit had been issued hereunder on the Effective Date.
 
Leverage Ratio
 means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
 
LIBO Rate
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Markets Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period. In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
 
12
 
Lien
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
 
Loan Documents
 means this Agreement, the promissory notes, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.09(e), and the Guarantee Agreement.
 
Loan Parties
 means Holdings and the Borrower.
 
Loans
 means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement.
 
Material Adverse Effect
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under any Loan Document or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Lenders under any Loan Document.
 
Material Indebtedness
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000. For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the principal amount of the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
 
Moodys
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
 
Multiemployer Plan
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
 
Other Taxes
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
 
PBGC
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
 
Permitted Acquisition
 means any acquisition by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division, line of business or business unit of a Person if, immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or
 
13
 
would result therefrom, (b) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable laws, (c) all the Equity Interests of any Subsidiary formed for the purpose of or resulting from such acquisition shall be owned directly by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Sections 6.08 and 6.09 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition (and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, with any new Indebtedness being deemed to be amortized over the applicable testing period in accordance with its terms, and assuming that any Revolving Loans borrowed in connection with such acquisition are repaid with excess cash balances when available) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (e) the Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent an officers certificate to the effect set forth in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above, together with all relevant financial information for the Person or assets to be acquired.
 
Permitted Encumbrances
 means:
 
(a)
Liens imposed by law for taxes or government assessments that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
 
(b)
carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 60 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
 
(c)
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
 
(d)
deposits (and, to the extent securing a trade contract or indemnity bond, Liens on assets to which such contract or bond relates) to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety, indemnity and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(e)
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
 
(f)
easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of Holdings or any Subsidiary;
 
(g)
any interest or title of a lessor under any lease that is limited to the property subject to such lease; and
 
14
 
(h)
unperfected Liens of any vendor on inventory sold by such vendor securing the unpaid purchase price of such inventory, to the extent such Liens are stated to be reserved in such vendors sale documents (and not granted by separate agreement of the Borrower or any Subsidiary);
 
provided
that the term Permitted Encumbrances shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
 
Permitted Investments
 means:
 
(a)
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
 
(b)
investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, a credit rating from S&P of A1 or higher or from Moodys of P1 or higher;
 
(c)
investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within 180 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
 
(d)
fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
 
(e)
investments in money market or mutual funds substantially all the assets of which are comprised of securities of the types described in any of clauses (a) through (d) above; and
 
(f) corporate notes and corporate bonds or municipal securities which includes variable rate demand notes and auction rate municipals, assigned a credit rating from S&P of A2 or higher or from Moodys of A or higher.
 
Permitted Vendor Financing
 means a financing arrangement pursuant to which a Designated Vendor sells to a financial institution that is a DVA Creditor (a) accounts receivable owed to such Designated Vendor by the Borrower or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower to replace such accounts receivable.
 
Person
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
 
15
 
Plan
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
 
Prime Rate
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
 
Rating
 means (a) the rating by the applicable rating agency of the Index Debt or (b) in the absence of Index Debt, the corporate rating or corporate family rating or the equivalent applicable to Holdings by the applicable rating agency.
 
Register
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
 
Related Parties
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
 
Required Lenders
 means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments at such time.
 
Revolving Availability Period
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
 
Revolving Commitment
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04. The initial amount of each Lenders Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01 or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Revolving Commitment, as applicable. The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders Revolving Commitments is $750,000,000.
 
Revolving Exposure
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
 
Revolving Lender
 means a Lender with a Revolving Commitment or, if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, a Lender with Revolving Exposure.
 
16
 
Revolving Loan
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01.
 
Revolving Maturity Date
 means October 5, 2011.
 
Sale and Leaseback
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.07.
 
S&P
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc.
 
Statutory Reserve Rate
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board). Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D. Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation. The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
 
subsidiary
 means, with respect to any Person (the 
parent
) at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
 
Subsidiary
 means any subsidiary of Holdings or the Borrower, as the context requires.
 
Swap Agreement
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions;
provided
that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
 
17
 
Swingline Exposure
 means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time. The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
 
Swingline Lender
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder or any successor in such capacity pursuant to Section 2.04(d).
 
Swingline Loan
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.04.
 
Taxes
 means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
 
Total Debt
 means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to all Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries outstanding on such date, excluding Indebtedness described in clauses (e), (f) and (h) of the definition of Indebtedness;
provided
that any letters of credit and letters of guaranty referred to in clause (h) of the definition Indebtedness shall not be excluded from Total Debt to the extent issued to support any other obligations constituting Indebtedness.
 
Transactions
 means the execution and delivery by each Loan Party of each Loan Document to which it is a party, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
 
Type
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans constituting such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
 
Withdrawal Liability
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
 
SECTION 1.02.
  
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Type (
e.g.
, a Eurodollar Loan). Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Type (
e.g.
, a Eurodollar Borrowing).
 
SECTION 1.03.
  
Terms Generally.
The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined. Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms. The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation. The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall. Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein),
 
18
 
(b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
 
SECTION 1.04.
  
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.
Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time;
provided
that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith. Except as otherwise provided herein, all references to a fiscal month shall mean any period of four or five calendar weeks used by the Borrower for recording or reporting its interim financial information.
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
  
Commitments.
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lenders Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lenders Revolving Commitment. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
 
SECTION 2.02.
  
Loans and Borrowings.
 
(a)
Each Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Revolving Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments. The failure of any Lender to make any Revolving Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder;
provided
that the Revolving Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make Revolving Loans as required.
 
(b)
  
Subject to Section 2.13, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith. Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan. Each Lender at its option may
 
19
 
make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan;
provided
that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
 
(c)
  
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000. At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $5,000,000;
provided
that (i) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Revolving Commitments and (ii) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e). Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $200,000. Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time;
provided
that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 8 Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
 
(d)
  
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Revolving Maturity Date.
 
SECTION 2.03.
  
Requests for Borrowings.
To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing;
provided
that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e) may be given not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing. Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower. Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
 
(i)
  
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing;
 
(ii)
  
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
  
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
20
 
(iv)
  
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period; and
 
(v)
  
the location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.06.
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing. If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration. Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.04.
  
Swingline Loans.
 
(a)
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $50,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Exposures exceeding the total Revolving Commitments;
provided
that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding Swingline Loan. Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
 
(b)
  
To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan. The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower. The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a credit to the general deposit account of the Borrower with the Swingline Lender (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e), by remittance to the Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
 
(c)
  
The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Revolving Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding. Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Revolving Lenders will participate. Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon
 
21
 
receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans. Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever. Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply,
mutatis
 
mutandis
, to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender. Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear. The purchase of participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
 
(d)
  
Replacement of Swingline Lender.
A Swingline Lender may be replaced by any other Lender at any time that there are no outstanding Swingline Loans by a written agreement among the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and successor Swingline Lender. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Swingline Lender. From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Swingline Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Swingline Lender under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term Swingline Lender shall be deemed to refer to such successor Swingline Lender. After the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), the replaced Swingline Lender shall not be required to make any Swingline Loans. Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Section 9.04, at no time following the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), may the Swingline Lender as of such time make an assignment or assignments the effect of which would be to reduce its Revolving Commitment to zero.
 
SECTION 2.05.
  
Letters of Credit.
 
(a)
General.
Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period. In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with,
 
22
 
an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
 
(b)
  
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit. If there is more than one Issuing Bank, the Borrower may select among the Issuing Banks in connection with the issuance of any Letter of Credit. If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Banks standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit. A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $300,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
 
(c)
  
Expiration Date.
Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Revolving Maturity Date;
provided
,
however
, that a Letter of Credit may, if requested by the Borrower, provide by its terms for renewal for successive periods of up to one year each (but not beyond the Revolving Maturity Date) unless and until the Issuing Bank shall have delivered a notice of nonrenewal, in accordance with such Letter of Credit, prior to the then expiry thereof to the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit.
 
(d)
  
Participations.
By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from the Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit. In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Issuing Bank, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by the Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason. Each
 
23
 
Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
 
(e)
  
Reimbursement.
If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of the receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt;
provided
that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $100,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.04 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan. If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof. Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply,
mutatis
 
mutandis
, to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders. Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and the Issuing Bank as their interests may appear. Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse the Issuing Bank for any LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
 
(f)
  
Obligations Absolute.
The Borrowers obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision herein or therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a
 
24
 
Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by the Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers obligations hereunder. Neither the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Bank, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of the Issuing Bank;
provided
that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse the Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by the Issuing Banks failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof. The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of the Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), the Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination. In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, the Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
 
(g)
  
Disbursement Procedures.
The Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit. The Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether the Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder;
provided
that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
 
(h)
  
Interim Interest.
If the Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans;
provided
that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC
 
25
 
Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.12(c) shall apply. Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse the Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
 
(i)
  
Replacement of the Issuing Bank.
An Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the successor to such Issuing Bank. The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank. At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.11(c). From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued by it thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Bank shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require. After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
 
(j)
  
Cash Collateralization.
If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon;
provided
that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII. Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account. Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrowers risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest. Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account. Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Bank for LC Disbursements for which it has not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of the Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement. If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as
 
26
 
aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
 
(k)
  
The Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the Effective Date, a schedule identifying all Existing Letters of Credit issued by it. The Issuing Bank also shall notify the Administrative Agent of any LC Disbursement or any expiration, termination or renewal of any Existing Letters of Credit issued by it.
 
SECTION 2.06.
  
Funding of Borrowings.
 
(a)
Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders;
provided
that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.04. The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request;
provided
that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
 
(b)
  
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount. In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans. If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.07.
  
Interest Elections.
 
(a)
Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request. Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section. The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing. This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
 
27
 
(b)
  
To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election. Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
 
(c)
  
Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
 
(i)
  
the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii)
  
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
  
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv)
  
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(d)
  
Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)
  
If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing. Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
28
 
SECTION 2.08.
  
Termination and Reduction of Commitments.
 
(a)
Unless previously terminated, the Revolving Commitments shall terminate on the Revolving Maturity Date.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Revolving Commitments;
provided
that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.10, the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
 
(c)
  
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof. Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable;
provided
that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied. Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent. Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.09.
  
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
 
(a)
The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Revolving Maturity Date and (ii)  to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15th or last day of a calendar month and is at least two Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made;
provided
that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
 
(b)
  
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)
  
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
29
 
(d)
  
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be
prima
 
facie
evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein;
provided
that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
 
(e)
  
Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note. In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent. Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
 
SECTION 2.10.
  
Prepayment of Loans.
 
(a)
The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date of prepayment. Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid;
provided
that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.08, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.08. Promptly following receipt of any such notice (other than a notice relating solely to Swingline Loans), the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof. Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02. Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing. Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.12.
 
SECTION 2.11.
  
Fees.
 
(a)
The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the average daily unused amount of the Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate. Accrued
 
30
 
commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date. All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). For purposes of computing commitment fees, a Revolving Commitment of a Lender shall be deemed to be used to the extent of the outstanding Revolving Loans and LC Exposure of such Lender (and the Swingline Exposure of such Lender shall be disregarded for such purpose).
 
(b)
  
The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate as interest on Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 1/8 of 1% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any such LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Banks standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder. Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date;
provided
that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand. Any other fees payable to an Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand. All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
 
(c)
  
The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
 
(d)
  
All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the applicable Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto. Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
 
31
 
SECTION 2.12.
  
Interest.
 
(a)
The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
 
(b)
  
The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
 
(c)
  
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
(d)
  
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Revolving Commitments;
provided
that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Revolving Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
 
(e)
  
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day). The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.13.
  
Alternate Rate of Interest.
If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
 
(a)
  
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
 
(b)
  
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
32
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.14.
  
Increased Costs.
 
(a)
If any Change in Law shall:
 
(i)
  
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or any Issuing Bank; or
 
(ii)
  
impose on any Lender or any Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or Issuing Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
  
If any Lender or any Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders or any Issuing Banks capital or on the capital of such Lenders or any Issuing Banks holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or Issuing Bank or such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders or Issuing Banks policies and the policies of such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank or such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
  
A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be
 
33
 
conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d)
  
Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders or Issuing Banks right to demand such compensation;
provided
that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or an Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lenders or an Issuing Banks intention to claim compensation therefor;
provided
 
further
that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
 
SECTION 2.15.
  
Break Funding Payments.
In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.10(b) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.18, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event. In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the Eurodollar market. A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error. The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
SECTION 2.16.
  
Taxes.
 
(a)
Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes;
provided
that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so
 
34
 
that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
 
(b)
  
In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
 
(c)
  
The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Bank, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority. A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability, and setting forth, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or an Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or an Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(d)
  
As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)
  
Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the Code, the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate. Any Foreign Lender which is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and intends to claim exemption from U.S. Federal withholding tax under Section 871(h) or 881(c) of the Code with respect to payments of portfolio interest shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy for the Administrative Agent) a Form W-8BEN, or any subsequent versions thereof or successors thereto (and, if such Foreign Lender delivers a Form W-8BEN, a certificate representing that such Foreign Lender is not a bank for purposes of Section 881(c) of the Code, is not a ten-percent shareholder (within the meaning of Section 871(h)(3)(B) of the Code) of the Borrower and is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Borrower (within the meaning of Section
 
35
 
864(d)(4) of the Code)), properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender claiming complete exemption from, or a reduced rate of, U.S. Federal withholding tax on payments of interest by the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
 
(f)
  
If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.16, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.16 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund);
provided
that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority. Nothing contained in this Section 2.16(f) shall require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
 
SECTION 2.17.
  
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
 
(a)
The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.14, 2.15, 2.16, or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim. Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon. All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York, except payments to be made directly to an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein. The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof. If any payment under any Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension. All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
 
(b)
  
If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first,
 
36
 
towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
 
(c)
  
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans;
provided
that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply). The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
 
(d)
  
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or an Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due. In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
37
 
(e)
  
If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.04(c), 2.05(d) or (e), 2.06(b), 2.17(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lenders obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
 
SECTION 2.18.
  
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
 
(a)
If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.14, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.16, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.14 or 2.16, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender. The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
 
(b)
  
If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.14, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.16, or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment);
provided
that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and, if a Revolving Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Bank and Swingline Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.14 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.16, such assignment will result in a material reduction in such compensation or payments. A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
 
SECTION 2.19.
  
Increase in Revolving Commitments.
 
(a)
The Borrower may, by written notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders), request that the total Revolving Commitments be increased;
provided
that the total Revolving Commitments shall not be increased by more than
 
38
 
$250,000,000 during the term of this Agreement pursuant to this Section. Such notice shall set forth the amount of the requested increase in the total Revolving Commitments and the date on which such increase is requested to become effective (which shall be not less than 10 Business Days or more than 60 days after the date of such notice), and shall offer each Lender the opportunity to increase its Revolving Commitment by its Applicable Percentage of the proposed increased amount. Each Lender shall, by notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent given not more than 10 days after the date of the Borrowers notice, either agree to increase its Revolving Commitment by all or a portion of the offered amount (each Lender so agreeing being an 
Increasing Lender
) or decline to increase its Revolving Commitment (and any Lender that does not deliver such a notice within such period of 10 days shall be deemed to have declined to increase its Revolving Commitment). In the event that, on the 10th day after the Borrower shall have delivered a notice pursuant to the first sentence of this paragraph, the Lenders shall have agreed pursuant to the preceding sentence to increase their Commitments by an aggregate amount less than the increase in the total Revolving Commitments requested by the Borrower, the Borrower may arrange for one or more banks or other financial institutions (any such bank or other financial institution being called an 
Augmenting Lender
), which may include any Lender, to extend Revolving Commitments or increase their existing Revolving Commitments in an aggregate amount equal to the unsubscribed amount; provided that each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender (such approvals not to be unreasonably withheld), and the Borrower and each Augmenting Lender shall execute all such documentation as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably specify to evidence its Revolving Commitment and/or its status as a Lender hereunder. Any increase in the total Revolving Commitments may be made in an amount which is less than the increase requested by the Borrower if the Borrower is unable to arrange for, or chooses not to arrange for, Augmenting Lenders.
 
(b)
  
On the effective date (the 
Increase Effective Date
) of any increase in the total Revolving Commitments pursuant to this Section 2.20 (the 
Commitment Increase
), if any Revolving Loans are outstanding, then (unless the Commitment Increase is being effected by an increase in each Lenders Revolving Commitment ratably in accordance with their Applicable Percentage) the Borrower (i) shall prepay all Revolving Loans then outstanding (including all accrued but unpaid interest thereon) and (ii) may, at its option, fund such prepayment by simultaneously borrowing Revolving Loans of the Types and for the Interest Periods specified in a Borrowing Request delivered pursuant to Section 2.03, which Revolving Loans shall be made by the Lenders (including the Increasing Lenders and the Augmenting Lenders, if any) ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments (calculated after giving effect to the Commitment Increase). The payments made pursuant to clause (i) above in respect of each Eurodollar Loan shall be subject to Section 2.15.
 
(c)
  
Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.19 shall become effective on the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of paragraph (a) above;
provided
that the Borrower may, with the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld), extend such date by up to 30 days by delivering written notice to the
 
39
 
Administrative Agent no less than two Business Days prior to the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of paragraph (a) above.
 
(d)
  
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the total Revolving Commitments (or in the Revolving Commitment of any Lender) or addition of an Augmenting Lender shall become effective under this Section unless (i) on the date of such increase, the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower, and (ii) the Administrative Agent shall have received (with sufficient copies for each of the Lenders) documents consistent with those delivered on the Effective Date under clauses (b) and (c) of Section 4.01.
 
 
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders on the Effective Date and on each date thereafter as required hereunder that:
 
SECTION 3.01.
  
Organization; Powers.
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
 
SECTION 3.02.
  
Authorization; Enforceability.
  The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Partys corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action. This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which either Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
 
SECTION 3.03.
  
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect or (ii) where the failure to obtain such consent or approval or make such registration or filing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental
 
40
 
Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (other than under the Existing Credit Agreement), and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 3.04.
  
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
 
(a)
Holdings has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended July 15, 2006, certified by one of its Financial Officers. Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Holdings and its consolidated subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to customary year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
 
(b)
  
Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of Holdings, the Borrower or their Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities.
 
(c)
  
Since December 31, 2005, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
 
SECTION 3.05.
  
Properties.
 
(a)
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes.
 
(b)
  
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.06.
  
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
 
(a)
There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material
 
41
 
Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
 
(b)
  
Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)
  
Since December 31, 2005, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.07.
  
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. No Default has occurred and is continuing.
 
SECTION 3.08.
  
Investment Company Status.
Neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries is an investment company as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
 
SECTION 3.09.
  
Taxes.
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.10.
  
ERISA.
No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most
 
42
 
recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
 
SECTION 3.11.
  
Disclosure.
Holdings and the Borrower have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to any of them, that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect. Neither the Information Memorandum nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of either Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading;
provided
that, with respect to projected financial information, Holdings and the Borrower represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
 
SECTION 3.12.
  
Subsidiaries.
Holdings does not have any Subsidiaries other than the Borrower and the Borrowers Subsidiaries. Schedule 3.12 sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Borrower in, each Subsidiary of the Borrower as of the Effective Date.
 
SECTION 3.13.
  
Insurance.
Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date. As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
 
SECTION 3.14.
  
Solvency.
Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of each Loan Party, at a fair valuation, will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) each Loan Party will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) each Loan Party will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
 
 
 
SECTION 4.01.
  
Effective Date.
The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become
 
43
 
effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
 
(a)
  
The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from each party hereto either a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) from Holdings a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement signed on behalf of Holdings or written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy transmission of a signed signature page of the Guarantee Agreement) that Holdings has signed a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement.
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Bingham McCutchen LLP and LeClair Ryan, counsel for the Loan Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibits C-1 and C-2, respectively, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request. Holdings and the Borrower hereby request such counsel to deliver such opinions.
(b)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of the Loan Parties, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(c)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it that, prior to or on the Effective Date, all commitments under the existing Credit Agreement shall be terminated and all loans and other amounts accrued and owing thereunder shall be paid.
 
(d)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received, from the agents and/or lenders under the Existing Credit Agreement, all releases, terminations and other documents necessary to release all Liens securing obligations thereunder, in form suitable for filing or recording.
 
(e)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and other information as the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may reasonably request to satisfy the requirements of bank regulatory authorities under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act.
 
(f)
  
The conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to such effect, dated the Effective Date and signed by the President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of the Borrower.
 
44
 
(g)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower hereunder.
 
(h)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it that the insurance required by Section 5.06 is in effect.
 
(i)
  
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 9.02) at or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on October 5, 2006 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Revolving Commitments shall terminate at such time).
 
SECTION 4.02.
  
Each Credit Event.
The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of any Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
 
(a)
  
The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, except for representations and warranties expressly made as of an earlier date, which shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)
  
At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by Holdings and the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
 
 
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 5.01.
  
Financial Statements and Other Information.
 Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
 
45
 
(a)
  
within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings audited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit or other material qualification or exception) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b)
  
within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)
  
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.08 and 6.09 as of the end of the period covered by such financial statements and (iii) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of Holdings audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
 
(d)
  
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
 
(e)
  
as soon as the same are complete, but in no event more that 60 days after the commencement of each fiscal year of Holdings, a detailed consolidated budget presented on a quarterly basis for such fiscal year (including a projected consolidated balance sheet and related statements of projected operations and cash flow as of the end of and for such fiscal year) and, promptly when available, any significant revisions of such budget;
 
46
 
(f)
  
promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by Holdings to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(g)
  
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(h)
  
promptly upon the occurrence of any change of Rating by Moodys or S&P, a certificate of a Financial Officer setting forth the new Rating, the effective date thereof and, if applicable, notice of any change in the Applicable Rate as a result thereof; and
 
(i)
  
promptly after the same are furnished to the Borrower, copies of any Management Letter delivered to Holdings and the Borrower by their independent certified public accountants in connection with the delivery of financial statements contemplated by Section 5.01(a) if such Letter discloses any material weaknesses in internal financial controls or other material concerns relating to the financial statements identified by such accountants.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any financial statements or other reports or filings required to be furnished by Holdings and the Borrower pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (f) of this Section 5.01 shall be deemed to have been furnished if Holdings or the Borrower has (i) filed the same with the Securities and Exchange Commission via the EDGAR filing system and the same are publicly available and (ii) delivered notice thereof to the Administrative Agent.
 
SECTION 5.02.
  
Notices of Material Events.
Upon Holdings or the Borrower obtaining knowledge thereof, Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
 
(a)
  
the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)
  
the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(c)
  
the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $1,000,000; and
 
47
 
(d)
  
any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of Holdings or the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5.03.
  
Existence; Conduct of Business.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business;
provided
that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
 
SECTION 5.04.
  
Payment of Obligations.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith (in the case of Tax liabilities or obligations to Government Authorities by appropriate proceedings), (b) Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 5.05.
  
Maintenance of Properties.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
 
SECTION 5.06.
  
Insurance.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies adequate insurance for its insurable properties, all to such extent and against such risks, including fire, casualty and other risks insured against by extended coverage, as is customary with companies in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
 
SECTION 5.07.
  
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities. Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records,
 
48
 
and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested;
provided
that the Borrower shall be given the opportunity to be present at any discussion with its independent accountants.
 
SECTION 5.08.
  
Compliance with Laws.
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 5.09.
  
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit.
The proceeds of the Loans will be used for general corporate purposes, including to prepay all loans under the Existing Credit Agreement outstanding on the Effective Date. No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations U and X. Letters of Credit will be issued only for general corporate purposes.
 
 
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 6.01.
  
Subsidiary Indebtedness.
The Borrower will not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to create, incur assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness (including pursuant to any Guarantee of Indebtedness of Holdings, the Borrower or any other Subsidiary), except:
 
(a)
  
Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness;
 
(b)
  
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower owing to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(c)
  
Guarantees by any Subsidiary of the Borrower of Indebtedness of any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
provided
that the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is permitted by this Section;
 
(d)
  
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets after the Effective Date, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a
 
49
 
Lien
on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof;
provided
that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (d) (and that is not listed in Schedule 6.01) and clause (e) below shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(e)
  
Indebtedness of (i) any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition to the extent that such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary and (ii) a Subsidiary to the extent that such Indebtedness is assumed in connection with a Permitted Acquisition made by such Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of such Permitted Acquisition
provided
that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e) and clause (d) above shall be subject to the limitations set forth in clause (ii) of the proviso at the end of clause (d)
 
above; and
 
(f)
  
other Indebtedness of Subsidiaries of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not exceeding $75,000,000.
 
SECTION 6.02.
  
Liens.
 
(a)
The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
 
(i)
  
Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(ii)
  
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(iii)
  
any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.02;
provided
that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
(iv)
  
any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary;
provided
that (A) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (B) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (C) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of
 
50
 
such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof; and
 
(v)
  
Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date;
provided
that (A) such security interests secure Indebtedness incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of such fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereto (and, in the case of any such Indebtedness of a Subsidiary of the Borrower, is Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01), (B) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (C) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost (including design, engineering, sales taxes, delivery, installation and other similar costs) of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (D) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets (other than proceeds of the property and assets originally encumbered by such security interests) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; and
 
(vi)
  
other Liens securing Indebtedness or other monetary obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (other than Liens on inventory);
provided
that the sum of all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations at any time outstanding secured by Liens permitted by this clause (vi), plus the fair market value of all assets sold after the Effective Date pursuant to Sale and Leaseback Transactions in reliance on clause (b) of Section 6.07, shall not at any time exceed $125,000,000.
 
(b)
  
Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it (other than Excluded Margin Stock), or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect thereof, except Permitted Encumbrances.
 
SECTION 6.03.
  
Fundamental Changes.
 
(a)
Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may merge into any other Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower ) may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the
 
51
 
Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders, (vi) any Subsidiary may merge with another entity to implement a Permitted Acquisition and (v) any Subsidiary of the Borrower may merge with another entity to implement a sale or other disposition of such Subsidiary otherwise permitted by this Agreement, provided that, after giving effect thereto, such Subsidiary shall no longer be a Subsidiary;
provided
that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
 
(c)
  
Holdings will not engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of all the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Borrower and activities incidental thereto, including the conduct of stock repurchase programs, administering payrolls for executive officers and other activities incidental to its existence as a publicly-owned holding company. Holdings will not own or acquire any assets (other than shares of capital stock of the Borrower, cash, promissory notes held pursuant to clause (g) of Section 6.04 and Permitted Investments) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities under the Loan Documents, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities). Holdings will not have any Subsidiaries, other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 6.04.
  
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
 
(a)
  
Permitted Investments;
 
(b)
  
investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04, to the extent such investments would not be permitted under any other clause of this Section;
 
(c)
  
investments in the Equity Interests of their respective Subsidiaries;
 
(d)
  
loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower (or to Holdings) and made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(e)
  
Guarantees by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries of obligations of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries;
provided
that any such Guarantees by Subsidiaries of
 
52
 
the Borrower of obligations of the Borrower shall be limited to Guarantees of Indebtedness that are permitted by Section 6.01;
 
(f)
  
investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(g)
  
promissory notes received from employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries evidencing loans made for the purpose of permitting such employees to purchase capital stock of Holdings in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(h)
  
Permitted Acquisitions;
 
(i)
  
loans or advances to employees in the ordinary course of business;
provided
that the aggregate amount of all loans and advances permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed $750,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(j)
  
obligations of management to the Borrower in connection with split dollar life insurance policies;
provided
that the aggregate amount of all obligations permitted by this clause (j) shall not exceed $2,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(k)
  
investments incurred in connection with Deferred Compensation Obligations; and
 
(l)
  
other investments in an aggregate amount not exceeding $50,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.05.
  
Swap Agreements.
Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
 
 
SECTION 6.06.
  
Restrictive Agreements.
Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any of its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary;
provided
that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.06 (but shall apply to
 
53
 
any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or any asset or property pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary, asset or property that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness and (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases, licenses, or other contracts restricting the assignment thereof.
 
SECTION 6.07.
  
Sale and Lease-Back Transactions.
Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any Person whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property which it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred (a 
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
), except for (a) any such Sale and Leaseback Transaction involving the sale of fixed or capital assets (other than those acquired pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition), at a price not less than the cost thereof, that is consummated within 360 days after the date that such assets are acquired and (b) other Sale and Leaseback Transactions consummated after the Effective Date, subject to the limitations set forth in clause (vi) of Section 6.02(a).
 
SECTION 6.08.
  
Leverage Ratio.
The Borrower will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date to be in excess of 2.50 to 1.00.
 
SECTION 6.09.
  
Consolidated Coverage Ratio.
The Borrower will not permit the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (commencing with the period ending on the last day of the first fiscal quarter ended after the Effective Date) to be less than 2.25 to 1.00.
 
 
 
If any of the following events (
Events of Default
) shall occur:
 
(a)
  
the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)
  
the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become
 
54
 
due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
 
(c)
  
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)
  
Holdings or the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.03 (with respect to the existence of Holdings or the Borrower) or 5.09 or in Article VI;
 
(e)
  
either Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable;
 
(g)
  
any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity;
provided
that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
 
(h)
  
an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar
 
55
 
law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(j)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(k)
  
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against Holdings, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor (and such action is not effectively stayed) to attach or levy upon any assets of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)
  
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $3,000,000 in any year or (ii) $5,000,000 for all periods; or
 
(m)
  
a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Revolving Commitments, and thereupon the Revolving Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
 
56
 
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity. The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct. The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by Holdings, the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
 
57
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person. The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon. The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent. The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties. The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of each Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor the Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower. Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower (except that no consultation is required during an Event of Default), to appoint a successor. If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank. Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder. The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor. After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement. Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this
 
58
 
Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
 
 
SECTION 9.01.
  
Notices.
 
(a)
Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
 
(i)
  
if to Holdings or the Borrower, to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated at 5004 Valley View Boulevard, Roanoke, Virginia 24012, Attention of Chief Financial Officer  (Telecopy No. (540) 561-1699);
 
(ii)
  
if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Timothy Rojas (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2223), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, 4th Floor, New York 10017, Attention of Barry Bergman (Telecopy No. (212) 270-6637);
 
(iii)
  
if to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Issuing Bank, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in care of JPMorgan Treasury Services, 10420 Highland Manor Drive, 4th Floor, Tampa, Florida 33610, Attention of Standby LC Department (Telecopy No. (813) 432-5161)
2
;
 
(iv)
  
if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Deepa Madhavan (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2932)
 
; and
 
(v)
  
if to any other Lender or Issuing Bank, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)
  
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent;
provided
that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender. The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it;
provided
that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
 
(c)
  
Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto. All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
59
 
SECTION 9.02.
  
Waivers; Amendments.
 
(a)
No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by either Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
 
(b)
  
Except as necessary in order to effect an increase in the Revolving Commitments in accordance with Section 2.19, neither this Agreement nor any other Loan Document nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders;
provided
that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Revolving Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Revolving Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.17(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of Required Lenders or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, or (vi) release Holdings from its Guarantee under the Guarantee Agreement, or limit its liability in respect of such Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender;
provided
 
further
that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be. Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are
 
60
 
affected thereby, the Issuing Banks and the Swingline Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Revolving Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.03.
  
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
(a)
The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an 
Indemnitee
) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto;
provided
that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
 
61
 
(c)
  
To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lenders pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount;
provided
that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such. For purposes hereof, a Lenders pro rata share shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments at the time.
 
(d)
  
To the extent permitted by applicable law, neither Holdings nor the Borrower shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
 
(e)
  
All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
SECTION 9.04.
  
Successors and Assigns.
 
(a)
The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section. Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
 
(b)
  
(i) Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A)
  
the Borrower,
provided
that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee;
 
62
 
(B)
  
the Administrative Agent; and
 
(C)
  
each Issuing Bank.
 
(ii)
  
Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A)
  
except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Revolving Commitment, the amount of the Revolving Commitment of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent,
provided
that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
 
(B)
  
each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement
.
 
(C)
  
the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
 
(D)
  
the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire
in which the assignee designates one or more Credit Contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Borrower, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignees compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws
 
For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term Approved Fund has the following meaning:
 
Approved Fund
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
 
(iii)
  
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such
 
63
 
Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03). Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
(iv)
  
The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in the City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Revolving Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the 
Register
). The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary. The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
 
(v)
  
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register. No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
 
(c) 
  
 (i) Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a 
Participant
) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans owing to it);
provided
that (A) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement. Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents;
provided
that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant,
 
64
 
agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant. Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 2.15 and 2.16 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section. To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.17(c) as though it were a Lender.
 
(ii)
  
A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.14 or 2.16 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent. A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.16 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.16(e) as though it were a Lender.
 
(d)
  
Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest;
provided
that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
 
(e)
  
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a 
Granting Lender
) may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle (an 
SPV
), identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, the option to provide to the Borrower all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement,
provided
that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPV to make any Loan and (ii) if an SPV elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to provide all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof. The making of a Loan by an SPV hereunder shall utilize the Revolving Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender. Each party hereto hereby agrees that no SPV shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement (all liability for which shall remain with the Granting Lender). In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior indebtedness of any SPV, it will not institute against, or join any other person in instituting against, such SPV any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof. In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this
 
65
 
Section 9.04, any SPV may (i) with notice to, but without the prior written consent of, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and without paying any processing fee therefor, assign all or a portion of its interests in any Loans to the Granting Lender or to any financial institutions (consented to by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent) providing liquidity and/or credit support to or for the account of such SPV to support the funding or maintenance of Loans and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety, guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPV. As this Section 9.04(e) applies to any particular SPV, this Section may not be amended without the written consent of such SPV.
 
SECTION 9.05.
  
Survival.
All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Revolving Commitments have not expired or terminated. The provisions of Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Revolving Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
 
SECTION 9.06.
  
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof. Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.07.
  
Severability.
Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be
 
66
 
ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
 
SECTION 9.08.
  
Right of Setoff.
If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
 
SECTION 9.09.
  
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(a)
This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
 
(b)
  
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Holdings, the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
  
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d)
  
Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01. Nothing in this Agreement or
 
67
 
any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.10.
  
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY). EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
 
SECTION 9.11.
  
Headings.
Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.12.
  
Confidentiality.
Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower.
 
For the purposes of this Section, "Information" means all information received from the Borrower relating to the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower; provided that, in the case
 
68
 
of information received from the Borrower after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential. Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
 
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE BORROWER AND ITS RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWER OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE BORROWER, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES. ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWER AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
SECTION 9.13.
  
Interest Rate Limitation.
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively, the 
Charges
), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the 
Maximum Rate
) which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
 
SECTION 9.14.
  
USA Patriot Act
.  Each Lender hereby notifies each of the Borrower and Holdings that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act
 
69
 
(Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), (the 
Act
), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies each of the Borrower and Holdings, which information includes the name and address of each of the Borrower and Holdings and other information that will allow such Lender to identify each of the Borrower and Holdings in accordance with the Act.
 
70
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
71
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.3
 
EXECUTION COPY
 
GUARANTEE AGREEMENT dated as of October 5, 2006, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (
Holdings
 and the 
Guarantor
), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (
JPMCB
), as administrative agent (in such capacity, the 
Administration Agent
) for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
 
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2006 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
), among Holdings, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation (the 
Borrower
), the lenders from time to time party thereto (the 
Lenders
) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the 
Administrative Agen
t) for the Lenders and as issuing bank (in such capacity, the 
Issuing Bank
). Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
 
The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Bank has agreed to issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subject to the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement. The Borrower has elected that the Guarantor guarantee the Obligations (as defined below) by entering into this Guarantee Agreement. Holdings acknowledges that it will derive substantial benefit from the making of the Loans by the Lenders and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Bank. The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit are conditioned on, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Guarantor of a Guarantee Agreement in the form hereof. As consideration therefor and in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Bank to issue Letters of Credit, the Guarantor is willing to execute this Guarantee Agreement.
 
Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
  
Guarantee.
The Guarantor unconditionally guarantees, as a primary obligor and not merely as a surety, (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements made by the Issuing Bank with respect thereto, interest thereon and obligations to provide, under certain circumstances, cash collateral in connection therewith, and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Lenders under the
 
2
 
Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents (all the monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) and (b) being collectively called the 
Obligations
). The Guarantor further agrees that the Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice to or further assent from it, and that the security interest granted hereunder and the obligations of the Guarantor will survive any extension or renewal of any Obligation.
 
SECTION 2.
  
Obligations Not Waived.
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Guarantor waives presentment to, demand of payment from and protest to the Borrower of any of the Obligations, and also waives notice of acceptance of its guarantee and notice of protest for nonpayment. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be affected by (a) the failure of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to assert any claim or demand or to enforce or exercise any right or remedy against the Borrower or the Guarantor under the provisions of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or otherwise or (b) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of, or any release from, any of the terms or provisions of this Guarantee Agreement, any other Loan Document, any Guarantee or any other agreement.
 
SECTION 3.
  
Guarantee of Payment.
The Guarantor further agrees that its guarantee constitutes a guarantee of payment when due and not of collection, and waives any right to require that any resort be had by the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to any of the security held for payment of the Obligations or to any balance of any deposit account or credit on the books of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender in favor of the Borrower or any other Person.
 
SECTION 4.
  
No Discharge or Diminishment of Guarantee.
The obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise of any of the Obligations, and shall not be subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Obligations or otherwise. Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by the failure of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy under the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, by any waiver or modification of any provision of any thereof, by any default, failure or delay, wilful or otherwise, in the performance of the Obligations, or by any other act or omission that may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of the Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of the Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations).
 
3
 
SECTION 5.
  
Defenses of Borrower Waived.
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Guarantor waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of the Borrower or the unenforceability of the Obligations or any part thereof from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of the Borrower, other than the final and indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations. The Administrative Agent and the other Lenders may, at their election, compromise or adjust any part of the Obligations, make any other accommodation with the Borrower or any other guarantor or exercise any other right or remedy available to them against the Borrower or any other guarantor, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of the Guarantor hereunder except to the extent the Obligations have been fully, finally and indefeasibly paid in cash. Pursuant to applicable law, the Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though such election operates, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or to extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of the Guarantor against the Borrower.
 
SECTION 6.
  
Agreement to Pay; Subordination.
In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right that the Administrative Agent or any other Lender has at law or in equity against the Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Borrower or any other Loan Party to pay any Obligation when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, after notice of prepayment or otherwise, the Guarantor hereby promises to and will forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, to or as directed by the Administrative Agent in cash the amount of such unpaid Obligations. Upon payment by the Guarantor of any sums to or as directed by the Administrative Agent as provided above, all rights of the Guarantor against the Borrower arising as a result thereof by way of right of subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or otherwise shall in all respects be subordinate and junior in right of payment to the prior indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Obligations. In addition, any indebtedness of any Loan Party now or hereafter owed to the Guarantor is hereby subordinated in right of payment to the prior payment in full of the Obligations. If, at any time that a Default has occurred and is continuing, any amount shall be paid to the Guarantor on account of (a) such subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or similar right or (b) any such indebtedness of any Loan Party, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent to be credited against the payment of the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents.
 
SECTION 7.
  
Information.
The Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that the Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent or the other Lenders will have any duty to advise the Guarantor of information known to it or any of them regarding such circumstances or risks.
 
4
 
SECTION 8.
  
Representations and Warranties.
The Guarantor represents and warrants that all representations and warranties relating to it contained in the Credit Agreement are true and correct.
 
SECTION 9.
  
Termination.
The guarantee made hereunder (a) shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations) have been indefeasibly paid in full and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Bank has no further obligation to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement and (b) shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of any Obligation is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Lender or the Guarantor upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Borrower, the Guarantor or otherwise.
 
SECTION 10.
  
Binding Effect; Assignments.
Whenever in this Guarantee Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of the Guarantor that are contained in this Guarantee Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns. This Guarantee Agreement shall become effective as to the Guarantor when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of the Guarantor shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent, and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon the Guarantor and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of the Guarantor, the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders, and their respective successors and assigns, except that the Guarantor shall not have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void).
 
SECTION 11.
  
Waivers; Amendment.
 
(a)
No failure or delay of the Administrative Agent in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power. The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent hereunder and of the other Lenders under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have. No waiver of any provision of this Guarantee Agreement or consent to any departure by the Guarantor therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given. No notice or demand on the Guarantor in any case shall entitle the Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
 
(b)
  
Neither this Guarantee Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Guarantor with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification
 
5
 
relates and the Administrative Agent, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 12.
  
Governing Law.
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
SECTION 13.
  
Notices.
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 14.
  
Survival of Agreement; Severability.
 
(a)
All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Guarantor herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders and shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Bank regardless of any investigation made by the Lenders or on their behalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until all the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Lenders have no further commitment to lend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Bank has no further commitment to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement.
 
(b)
  
In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Guarantee Agreement or in any other Loan Document should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and therein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
SECTION 15.
  
Counterparts.
This Guarantee Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract, and shall become effective as provided in Section 10. Delivery of an executed signature page to this Guarantee Agreement by facsimile transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Guarantee Agreement.
 
SECTION 16.
  
Rules of Interpretation.
The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement shall be applicable to this Guarantee Agreement.
 
SECTION 17.
  
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(a)
The Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any New York State court or Federal court of the United States of America sitting in New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in
 
6
 
any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court. Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law. Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any other Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Guarantor or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(b)
  
The Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any New York State or Federal court. Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(c)
  
Each party to this Guarantee Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 13. Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Guarantee Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 18.
  
Waiver of Jury Trial.
EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS. EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, AS APPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 18.
 
SECTION 19.
  
Right of Setoff.
If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other Indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender to or for the credit or the account of any Guarantor against any or all the obligations of such Guarantor now or hereafter existing under this Guarantee Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by such Lender, irrespective
 
7
 
of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations may be unmatured. The rights of each Lender under this Section 19 are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.38
 
RELEASE AND TERMINATION AGREEMENT dated as of October 5, 2006, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED (the 
Company
) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent under the Credit Agreement referred to below. Unless otherwise defined herein, capitalized terms shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement referred to below.
 
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of November 3, 2004 (as amended, the 
Credit Agreement
), among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., the Company, the lenders party thereto (the 
Lenders
) and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, the Lenders have extended credit to the Company, and have agreed to extend credit to the Company, in each case subject to the terms and conditions set forth therein; and
 
WHEREAS, the Company intends, contemporaneously with the execution of this Agreement, (a) to terminate all remaining Commitments under the Credit Agreement and (b) to repay all Loans outstanding under the Credit Agreement to pay all accrued and unpaid interest and fees payable under the Credit Agreement and to pay all other monetary obligations of the Company accrued and owing under the Credit Agreement, including amounts payable pursuant to any indemnity or expense reimbursement provisions thereof (the amounts described in this clause (b) and listed in Schedule I hereto being referred to as the 
Designated Obligations
); and
 
WHEREAS, the Designated Obligations as of the date hereof are set forth in Schedule I hereto;
 
NOW, THEREFORE, in consideration of the payment in full of the Designated Obligations simultaneously with the execution and delivery of this Agreement:
 
1.
  
The parties hereto hereby agree that (a) the Commitments are terminated and the Lenders have no further obligation to extend credit under the Credit Agreement, (b) all liability of the Company and Holdings and their respective Subsidiaries in respect of the Designated Obligations is hereby discharged and paid in full, and (c) 
the guarantees created under the Guarantee Agreement and the security interests granted by the Security Documents are hereby terminated and all liens in respect of the Collateral are hereby released;
provided
that (i) the foregoing shall not be construed to relieve any Loan Party from its obligations under any provisions, including indemnity or expense reimbursement provisions, of any Loan Document that are specified in such Loan Document to survive the termination thereof or the repayment of the Designated Obligations and (ii) it is understood that a portion of the amounts, if any, specified as Break Funding Costs on Schedule I represents an estimate of amounts payable under Section 2.16 of the Credit Agreement, and the Administrative Agent will return to the Company any excess of such estimated amount over the amounts actually owing under such Section 2.16 (and clause (i) above will apply to any shortfall).
 
2
 
2.
  
The Administrative Agent, at the Effective Time (as hereinafter defined) and from time to time as reasonably requested by the Company, on behalf of itself and the Lenders, shall prepare and file UCC termination statements, mortgage releases and other similar discharges or assignment documents, in each case, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and the Company, and, in each case, as the Company may reasonably request in connection with the termination and release of liens and security interests referred to herein. The Administrative Agent hereby authorizes the Company and the other Loan Parties to file any UCC termination statements relating to all UCC financing statements covering any assets of the Company or any other Loan Party and other appropriate instruments of release, in each case with respect to the release of the liens and security interests made hereby.
 
3.
  
The parties hereto acknowledge and confirm that all Letters of Credit shall remain outstanding subject to the terms and conditions of separate agreements between the Issuing Bank and the Company now governing the Letters of Credit. The Issuing Bank hereby consents to the release of (a) the Lenders from their participations in Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement and (b) the security interests and Liens granted pursuant to the Security Documents described in Section 1.
 
4.
  
This Agreement shall become effective (the 
Effective Time
) only after (a) counterparts hereof have been executed by the Company and the Administrative Agent and are in the possession of the Administrative Agent, (b) the Administrative Agent has received, by wire transfer of immediately available funds, the aggregate amount of the Designated Obligations, as set forth in Schedule I hereto and (c) the Credit Agreement dated as of the date hereof among Holdings, the Company, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, shall have become effective.
 
5.
  
THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
6.
  
This Agreement may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original and all of which, when taken together, shall constitute one agreement. Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopier or by electronic mail of a PDF copy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
 
3
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., October 5, 2006
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced that it has refinanced its secured credit facility to a new $750 million unsecured five-year revolving credit facility. This facility replaces the Companys existing term loans and revolver.
 
"This refinancing provides Advance Auto Parts with an attractive level of financial flexibility, enabling us to increase liquidity while reducing interest expense, said Michael Moore, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. We greatly appreciate the confidence our lenders continue to have in our future.
 
Approximately $434 million is drawn against the new facility. While the company has the ability to borrow up to the full amount of the facility, it does not expect to significantly increase its leverage. As a result of the improved borrowing costs under the new facility, the Company anticipates pre-tax interest expense savings of more than $2.5 million annually.
 
The facility bears interest at the rate of LIBOR plus a spread. The spread is currently 75 basis points, resulting in an annualized interest rate of approximately 6.1%, based on the current LIBOR. The Company has executed new swap agreements, which effectively fix the interest rate on $225 million of the new facility at approximately 5.0% plus a spread (currently 75 basis points). Under the terms of the new facility, the spread over LIBOR will adjust to reflect any future changes in the Companys credit rating.
 
In conjunction with this refinancing, the Company expects to record a charge of approximately $1.9 million of deferred financing charges associated with its prior credit facility, and record income of approximately $2.9 million associated with previously unrealized gains on interest-rate swaps. Both of these amounts will be recorded in the Companys third fiscal quarter, resulting in a net pre-tax gain of $1.0 million for the quarter.
 
The lending group, led by JP Morgan, includes Bank of America, SunTrust and BB&T.
 
About Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive parts, batteries, accessories and maintenance items in the United States based on sales and store count. As of September 14, 2006, the Company had 3,000 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, services, as well as on-line purchase of parts and accessories can be found on the Company's Web site at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, the impact of refinancing the companys credit facility, and its intentions with respect to leverage. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20061102074340.txt.gz
TIME:20061102074340
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., November 2, 2006
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fiscal third quarter ended October 7, 2006.
Earnings per diluted share for the third quarter were $0.56, compared to $0.55 last year. This years third quarter results include $0.03 per share of stock-option expense, whereas last years quarter does not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.02 per share.
 
In the third quarter, sales increased 7.8% to $1.10 billion from $1.02 billion last year. Comparable-store sales increased 1.4% in the quarter, comprised of a 0.6% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and an 8.7% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM). The 1.4% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 10.0% increase in last years third quarter.
These results reflect our initiatives to drive sales and enhance customer satisfaction, which are gaining traction, said Mike Coppola, Chairman, President and CEO. We believe that by focusing on superior customer service, we can achieve much-better financial performance, and we are committed to achieving it.
Third quarter gross margin was 48.2% of sales, a 100 basis point improvement compared to last years quarter, primarily reflecting improved procurement costs, a favorable merchandise mix compared to last year, ongoing category management initiatives and logistics efficiencies.
Third quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 38.9% of sales, compared to 36.9% in third quarter 2005. This reflects approximately 70 basis points loss of leverage on rent, depreciation and other fixed costs from modest comparable-store sales. In addition, SG&A was unfavorably impacted by higher costs for utilities, and insurance programs, including property, workers compensation
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THIRD QUARTER 2006
November 2, 2006
Page 2
 
and medical, which in total accounted for another 60 basis points. Non-comparable stock-option expense also increased SG&A in this years quarter by 42 basis points.
In the quarter, the Company recorded two items, both of which were associated with the Companys prior credit facility. These include a charge of $1.9 million, representing deferred financing costs, and $2.9 million of previously unrealized gains on interest-rate swaps. These amounts netted to a pre-tax gain of $1.0 million, and are recorded in the gain on extinguishment of debt caption on the companys statement of operations.
For the first three quarters of the year, sales grew 9.1% to $3.60 billion from $3.30 billion last year. Comparable-store sales increased 2.3% over this time, comprised of a 0.3% decrease in DIY and an 11.7% increase in DIFM. The 2.3% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 9.4% increase for the comparable period last year. Year-to-date earnings per share are $1.82 (inclusive of eight cents of non-comparable stock-option expense), compared to $1.78 over the same time period last year (which did not include pro forma stock-option expense of seven cents).
Store
Information
During the
third quarter, the Company opened 60 new stores, of which eight were Autopart International (AI) stores. The Company also closed two stores, relocated 10 existing stores, and remodeled 56 stores to the innovative Advance 2010 format. Year-to-date, the Company has opened 162 new stores. Since acquiring AI in September 2005, AI has opened 19 new stores, and now operates a total of 80 locations. The Company continues to expect to open 205 to 215 new stores in 2006, including AI. This level of new-store openings represents unit growth of 7% to 8% compared to 2005. As of October 7, 2006, 1,884 (or 64%) of the Companys stores are 2010-format stores, and more than 81% of the Companys Advance stores offer commercial delivery programs.
During the quarter, we celebrated the opening of our 3,000
th
store, a significant milestone in our companys history, Coppola said. We continue to see solid returns on our new-store investments, and believe there is an opportunity to add 1,500 more stores within our existing geography. Meanwhile, we know excellent execution and superior customer service at every store is essential. These are the factors that will separate us from the competition and provide us with the platform to continue our growth.
Guidance
Based on recent sales trends, the Company projects comparable-store sales to be in the range of
1% to 3% for the fourth quarter (compared to a 6.3% increase in last years fourth quarter). For the fourth quarter, the Company continues to anticipate gross margin improvement, and a slowing rate of growth in SG&A as compared to the third quarter. Accordingly, the Company forecasts fourth-quarter 2006 earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.33 to $0.37, inclusive of $0.03 of stock-option expense. Last years fourth-quarter EPS of $0.36 do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.02 per share.
For the year, this would result in EPS guidance of $2.15 to $2.19, inclusive of $0.12 of stock-option expense. Last years $2.13 of EPS do not include pro forma stock-option expense of $0.09 per share.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS RESULTS FOR THIRD QUARTER 2006
November 2, 2006
Page 3
 
For 2007, the Company anticipates new-store growth in the range of 7% to 8% (from the opening of both Advance and AI stores). In addition, the Company expects to remodel approximately 150 stores and relocate approximately 40 existing stores. The Company will provide more-detailed 2007 guidance in its fiscal year-end press release.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on November 2, 2006, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
. The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until November 1, 2007.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of October 7, 2006, the Company operated 3,029 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, the impact of stock-option expense, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for fourth-quarter 2006, fiscal year 2006 and fiscal year 2007. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20061115170333.txt.gz
TIME:20061115170333
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ii
 
I.
  
Offices
.
 
Section 1.01
  
Registered Office
. The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
 
Section 1.02
  
Other Offices
. The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
 
II.
  
Stockholders
.
 
Section 2.01
  
Place of Meetings
. Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
 
Section 2.02
  
Annual Meetings
. An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors. Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting. To be properly brought before the meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder. For business to be properly brought before the annual meeting by a stockholder, written notice of such business must be delivered to, or mailed to and received by, the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than forty-five (45) days or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the preceding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later that the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made. In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above. A stockholders notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of the stockholder proposing such business and the name and address of the beneficial owner, if different than the stockholder of record, on whose behalf the proposal is made, (c) the class and number of shares of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and (d) any material interest of the stockholder or such beneficial owner in such business. Notwithstanding anything in these By-Laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the
 
 
1
 
 
procedures set forth in this Section. The Chair or other person presiding at the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
Section 2.03
  
Special Meetings
. A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, or the Board of Directors and may not be called by any other person or persons. Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting.
 
Section 2.04
  
Notice of Meetings
. A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less then 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting. Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholders mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
 
Section 2.05
  
Waiver of Notice
. Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice. Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
Section 2.06
  
Quorum
. At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum. If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
 
Section 2.07
  
Adjourned Meetings
. The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place. The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented. If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting. Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
 
 
 
2
 
 
Section 2.08
  
Voting
.
 
(a)
  
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholders name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date. Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
(b)
  
Elections of directors shall not be required to be conducted by written ballot. The vote upon any other question before a meeting need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.13. At all meetings of stockholders for the election of directors a plurality of the votes cast shall be sufficient to elect such directors. All other elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
 
Section 2.09
  
Proxies
.
 
(a)
  
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date. A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
 
(b)
  
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission. If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied. Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
 
(c)
  
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then
 
 
3
 
 
 
hat one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
 
Section 2.10
  
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
.
 
(a)
  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting. If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
(b)
  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings. If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
(c)
  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.10, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action. If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(d)
  
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.10 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 2.11
  
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
.
 
(a)
  
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of the stockholders may
 
 
4
 
 
be taken without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted, and shall be delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings. Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
(b)
  
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within 60 days of the earliest dated consent delivered in the manner required by Section 2.11 (a) to the Corporation, written consents signed by a sufficient number of holders to take action are delivered to the Corporation as required by Section 2.11(a).
 
Section 2.12
  
Stockholder List
. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in
the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
 
Section 2.13
  
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
. The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
 
(a)
  
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof. The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting. Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
 
5
 
 
(b)
  
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
 
(c)
  
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting. No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
 
(d)
  
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record. If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
III.
  
Board of Directors
.
 
Section 3.01
  
General Powers; Organization
. The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders. The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings. The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting. Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Section 3.02
  
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
. The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than nine (9) nor more than fourteen (14). Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified. Directors need not be stockholders.
 
 
6
 
 
Section 3.03
  
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
.
 
(a)
  
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Corporation. Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b)
  
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office, in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
 
Section 3.04
  
Regular Meetings
. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 3.05
  
Special Meetings
. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
 
Section 3.06
  
Notice of Special Meetings
. Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
 
Section 3.07
  
Waiver of Notice
. Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given. Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
 
Section 3.08
  
Quorum
. Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
 
Section 3.09
  
Committees of Directors
.
 
(a)
  
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of
 
 
7
 
 
one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
(b)
  
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
(c)
  
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporations property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
(d)
  
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required. Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business. In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
 
Section 3.10
 
Lead Director.
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director. The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 3.11
Conference Communications
. Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other. For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.10 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
 
Section 3.12
Action by Written Consent of Directors
. Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
 
 
8
 
 
Section 3.13
Compensation
. The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
 
Section 3.14
Nomination Procedures
. Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section shall be eligible for election as Directors. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote for the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section. Such nominations, other than those made by or at
the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation. To be timely, a stockholders notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Company not less than forty-five (45) or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the proceeding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made. Such stockholders notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, and (iv) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for election of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (including without limitation such persons written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (b) as to the stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder. At the request of the Board of Directors any person nominated by the Board of Directors for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in a stockholders notice of nomination which pertains to the nominee. No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section. The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
IV.
  
Officers
.
 
Section 4.01
  
Number
. The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members. The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other
 
 
9
 
 
officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate. Any person may hold two or more offices.
 
Section 4.02
  
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
. The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors. All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal. Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
 
Section 4.03
  
Compensation
. The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 4.04
  
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
.
 
(a)
  
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation. Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
 
(b)
  
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors. Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
 
(c)
  
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
 
Section 4.05
  
Chief Executive Officer
. The Board of Directors shall designate the Chair or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. If there is no Chair, the President shall be the Chief Executive Officer. The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.
 
Section 4.06
 
Chair of the Board
. The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside. The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders. During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at meetings of the stockholders. During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
 
Section 4.07
 
President
. The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chair (if the Chair is the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation), shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect.
 
 
10
 
 
Section 4.08
 
Vice Presidents
. During the absence or disability of the Chair and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any
designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
 
Section 4.09
 
Secretary
. The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose. The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws. The Secretary shall duly give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
 
Section 4.10
 
Treasurer
. The Treasurer shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed. He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate. The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation. The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
 
Section 4.11
 
Authority and Other Duties
. All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors. Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may, without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
 
V.
  
Indemnification
.
 
Section 5.01
  
Indemnification
. The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time. The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the
 
 
11
 
 
Corporation. The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation. For such purpose, (X) Independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
 
(i)
  
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directors
-
to fill vacancies on the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
 
(ii)
  
Thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
 
(iii)
  
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
 
(iv)
  
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
 
Section 5.02
  
Insurance
. The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense. The Company shall not be obligated
 
 
12
 
 
under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
 
Section 5.03
  
Expenses Payable in Advance
. Expenses (including attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
 
VI.
  
Stock
.
 
Section 6.01
  
Certificates for Stock
.
 
(a)
  
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
 
(b)
  
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her. The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
 
(c)
  
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
 
(d)
  
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated. Any
such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
 
Section 6.02
  
Issuance of Stock
. The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors. No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend. At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of
 
 
13
 
 
any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted. The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted. Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable. Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
 
Section 6.03
  
Partly Paid Stock
. The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore. The total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated. The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
 
Section 6.04
  
Registered Stockholders
. The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
 
Section 6.05
  
Transfer of Stock
. Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholders legal representative or the stockholders duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon surrender of
the certificate or the certificates for such stock. Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books. No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
 
Section 6.06
  
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
. Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate. A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
 
 
14
 
 
Section 6.07
  
Facsimile Signatures
. Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
 
VII.
  
Miscellaneous
.
 
Section 7.01
  
Dividends
.
 
(a)
  
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporations capital stock from the Corporations surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation. Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
 
(b)
  
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
 
Section 7.02
  
Interested Directors and Officers
. No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or
 
(a)
  
the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders. Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a
 
 
15
 
 
quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
 
Section 7.03
  
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
. Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present. The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
 
Section 7.04
  
Execution of Instruments
.
 
(a)
  
All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
(b)
  
If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
 
Section 7.05
  
Advances
. The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to bet in the absence of an advance entitled to reimbursement entitled at year end of the Corporation shall be the last
 
Section 7.06
  
Fiscal Year
. The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
 
Section 7.07
  
Corporate Seal
. The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal. The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
 
Section 7.08
  
Form of Records
. Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the
 
 
16
 
 
records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time. The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
 
Section 7.09
  
Power to Amend
. These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting. If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
 
17
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070215073857.txt.gz
TIME:20070215073857
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
 
 
 
 
 
 

 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER 2006 RESULTS
February 15, 2007
Page 2
 
75 basis points. Non-comparable stock-option expense also increased SG&A in this years quarter by 45 basis points. Reductions in several other cost items partly offset the expense increases.
2006 Annual Results
For the year, sales grew to $4.62 billion from $4.26 billion last year. Comparable-store sales increased 2.1% over this time, comprised of a 0.3% decrease in DIY and a 10.8% increase in DIFM. The 2.1% comparable-store sales increase compares to an 8.7% increase in 2005. Gross margin expanded by approximately 50 basis points to 47.7%, while SG&A grew 120 basis points to 38.9% of sales, inclusive of 40 basis points of non-comparable stock-option expense. Earnings per share for the year are $2.16 (inclusive of 11 cents of non-comparable stock-option expense), compared to $2.13 in 2005 (which did not include pro forma stock-option expense of nine cents).
Store Information
During the fourth quarter, the Company opened 53 new stores, of which seven were Autopart International (AI) stores. The Company also relocated 16 existing stores, and remodeled 12 stores to the innovative Advance 2010 format in the fourth quarter. For the year, the Company relocated 47 stores, remodeled 189 stores, closed five stores, and opened 215 new stores, of which 25 were AI locations; AI now operates 87 stores. As of December 30, 2006, 1,956 (or 65%) of the Companys Advance stores are 2010-format stores, and more than 81% of the Companys Advance stores offer commercial delivery programs.
During this slower sales environment, we will invest in our store base at a more conservative pace in 2007, until we complete our re-assessment to determine how we can best allocate our capital going forward, Coppola said. We have developed a lower-cost remodel program, which we believe can continue to drive sales improvements, while delivering a better return on investment. We also plan to open, remodel, and relocate fewer stores in 2007, which we believe will improve our SG&A and return on capital performance.
Guidance
The Company is basing its earnings guidance on comparable-store sales for the first quarter
and the year in the low single-digit range. First quarter comparisons represent our most-challenging year-over-year sales comparison. Quarter-to-date results are running within that range. For the first quarter, the Company anticipates modest gross margin improvement, and a slowing rate of growth in SG&A as compared to the fourth quarter. The Company forecasts first-quarter 2007 earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.68 to $0.72, which compares to $0.68 in last years first quarter. As previously disclosed, last years first quarter earnings per share benefited by approximately two cents from the resolution of certain tax contingencies.
For 2007, the Company anticipates new-store growth in the 200-210 range, from the opening of both Advance and AI stores. In addition, the Company expects to remodel approximately 150 stores and relocate approximately 35 existing stores. With comparable-store sales gains in the low single-digit range for the year, the Company would expect top-line growth to be in the high single digits, with earnings growth in the 10% to 15% range (EPS of $2.38 to $2.48).
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER 2006 RESULTS
February 15, 2007
Page 3
 
Dividend
On February 14, 2007, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share be paid on April 6, 2007 to stockholders of record as of March 23, 2007.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on February 15, 2007, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
. The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until February 14, 2008.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of December 30, 2006, the Company operated 3,082 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for first-quarter 2007 and fiscal year 2007. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2005, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070220172505.txt.gz
TIME:20070220172505
EVENTS:	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
   
 
 
 
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070226172506.txt.gz
TIME:20070226172506
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 10.39
 
 
 
 
 
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company) has on the Award Date specified above granted to
Name
(Participant) an award (the Award) of that number of shares (the Shares) of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share (the Common Stock), indicated above in the box labeled Number of Shares, subject to certain restrictions and on the terms and conditions contained in this Award Statement and the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the Plan). A copy of the Plan is available upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
1. 
Your Rights with Respect to the Shares
. You shall have all of the rights of a shareholder of the Common Stock on and after the Award Date and until the date on which the Shares vest and the restrictions with respect to the Shares lapse in accordance with Section 2 or 3 of this Award Statement, including the right to vote the Shares and the right to receive dividends thereon, unless and until the Shares are forfeited pursuant to Section 3 or 6 of this Award Statement. Your rights with respect to the Shares shall remain forfeitable at all times prior to the date or dates on which such rights become vested, and the restrictions with respect to the Shares lapse, in accordance with Section 2 or 3 of this Award Statement.
2. 
Vesting
. Subject to the terms and conditions of this Award, 100% of the Shares shall vest, and the restrictions with respect to the Shares shall lapse, three years from the Award Date if you remain continuously employed by the Company or you serve on the Board of Directors of the Company until the respective vesting date.
3.
Stock Award Duration
.
If, prior to vesting of the Shares pursuant to Section 2 or 3 of this Award Statement,
your employment or other association with the Company
 
and its Affiliates ends
for any reason (voluntary or involuntary), then your rights to unvested Shares shall be immediately and irrevocably forfeited, except in the case of retirement, disability or death as follows:
(a)
 
If the
termination of your
employment or other association is on account of retirement, defined as termination of employment or other association upon the attainment of at least age 55 and at least 10 years of service, of which the last three must be consecutive years with the Company, then your rights will continue under this Award;
 
(b)
 
If the
termination of your
employment or other association is on account of disability, defined as having become disabled within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code, then your rights will continue under this Award;
 
(c) If the termination of your
employment is on account of death, then your Shares will vest immediately.
 
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Award, the Company may cancel this Award at any time on ninety (90) days prior notice to you in response to actions taken by you that could be considered detrimental to the Company or any of its Affiliates. Whether any of your actions could be considered detrimental will be determined by the
Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the Committee) in its sole discretion and may include, but will not be limited to the following: your employment by or other association with a direct competitor of the Company or an Affiliate; your establishment of a business which competes with the Company or an Affiliate; or your unauthorized release of confidential information of the Company or an Affiliate.
 
4. 
Transfer of Award
. Until the Shares vest pursuant to Section 2 or 3 of this Award Statement, the Shares may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged, hypothecated or otherwise disposed of or encumbered, and no attempt to transfer unvested Shares, whether voluntary or involuntary, by operation of law or otherwise, shall vest the transferee with any interest or right in or with respect to the Shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may, in the manner established by the Committee, designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries to exercise your rights to receive any property distributable with respect to the Shares upon your death.
5. 
Issuing Shares
. Effective as of the Award Date, the Company shall cause the Shares to be issued in book-entry form, registered in the Participants name
.
The Shares shall be subject to an appropriate stop-transfer order. After any of the Shares vest pursuant to Section 2 or 3 of this Award Statement and following payment of the applicable withholding taxes pursuant to Section 7 below, the Company promptly shall cause the stop-transfer order to be removed with respect to such vested Shares.
6. 
Share Adjustments
.
(a) In the event that any dividend or other distribution (whether in the form of cash,  shares of Common Stock, other securities or other property), recapitalization, stock split, reverse stock split, reorganization, merger, consolidation, split-up, spin-off, combination, repurchase or exchange of Common Stock or other securities of the Company or other similar corporate transaction or event affecting the Common Stocks would be reasonably likely to result in the diminution or enlargement of any of the benefits or potential benefits intended to be made available under the Award (including, without limitation, the benefits or potential benefits of provisions relating to the vesting of the Shares), the Committee shall, in such manner as it shall deem equitable or appropriate in order to prevent such diminution or enlargement of any such benefits or potential benefits, make adjustments to the Award, including adjustments in the number and type of Shares you would have received; provided , however , that the number of shares covered by the Award shall always be a whole number. The Company will not deliver any fractional Share but will pay, in lieu thereof, the Fair Market Value of such fractional Share.
(b) Any additional shares of Stock, any other securities of the Company and any other property (except for cash dividends or other cash distributions) distributed with respect to the Shares prior to the date or dates the Shares vest shall be subject to the same restrictions, terms and conditions as the Shares and shall be promptly deposited with
 
the Company or a custodian designated by the Company.
(c) Any cash dividends or other cash distributions payable with respect to the Shares shall be distributed at the time cash dividends or other cash distributions are generally distributed to stockholders of the Company, net of any applicable federal or state payroll, withholding, income or other taxes, which are your sole and absolute responsibility.
7. 
Income Tax Matters
.
(a) 
The Company makes no representation or warranty as to the tax treatment of your receipt or vesting of the Shares or upon your sale or other disposition of the Shares. You should rely on your own tax advisors for such advice.
In order to comply with all applicable federal or state income tax laws or regulations, the Company may take such action as it deems appropriate to ensure that all applicable federal or state payroll, withholding, income or other taxes, which are your sole and absolute responsibility, are withheld or collected from you at the time of vesting.
(b) In accordance with the terms of the Plan, and such rules as may be adopted by the Committee under the Plan, you may elect to satisfy required federal and state income tax withholding obligations arising from the receipt of, or the lapse of restrictions relating to, the Shares, by (i) delivering cash or equivalent payable to the Company, (ii) having the Company withhold a portion of the Shares otherwise to be delivered having a Fair Market Value equal to the amount of such taxes, or (iii) delivering to the Company shares of Common Stock already owned by you having a Fair Market Value equal to the amount of such taxes. Any  shares already owned by you referred to in the preceding sentence must have been owned by you for no less than six months prior to the date delivered to the Company if such shares were acquired upon the exercise of an option, stock appreciation right, or upon the vesting of restricted stock. Your tax payment election choice must be made on or before the date that the amount of tax to be withheld is determined.
8. 
Miscellaneous
.
(a) This Award does not confer on you any right with respect to the continuance of any relationship with the Company or its subsidiaries, nor will it interfere in any way with the right of the Company to terminate such relationship at any time.
(b) Neither the Plan nor this Award shall create or be construed to create a trust or separate fund of any kind or a fiduciary relationship between the Company or any Affiliate and You or any other Person. To the extent that any Person acquires a right to receive payments from the Company or any Affiliate pursuant to an Award, such right shall be no greater than the right of any unsecured creditor of the Company or any Affiliate.
(c) The Company shall not be required to deliver any Shares until the requirements of any federal or state securities laws, rules or regulations or other laws or rules (including the rules of any securities exchange) as may be determined by the Company to be applicable are satisfied.
(d) An original record of this Award and all the terms hereof, executed by the Company, is held on file by the Company. To the extent there is any conflict between the terms contained in this Award and the terms contained in the original held by the Company, the terms of the original held by the Company shall control.
 
In Witness Whereof
, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
 
 
 
By:
 
___________________________
 
 

Exhibit 10.40
 
Award Number:
 
 
    
 
 
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company) has on the Award Date specified above granted to
Name
(Participant) Stock Appreciation Rights (the SARs) with respect to the number of shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share (Stock), indicated above in the box labeled Number of Shares (the Shares). The initial value of each Share is indicated above in the box labeled Grant Price. The SARs that this Certificate represents shall vest and become exercisable in accordance with the vesting schedule, all as set forth in Section 2 below, and upon vesting shall be fully exercisable until the Expiration Date. This Award is subject to the terms and conditions set forth below and in the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the Plan). A copy of the Plan is available upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
1.
 
Duration of SAR
. Subject to the following sentence, t
his SAR
 
shall expire on the Expiration Date. However, if
your
employment or other association with the Company
 
and its Affiliates
ends before that date
, this SAR
 
shall expire on
Expiration Date or, if earlier, the date specified in
whichever of the following applies:
 
(
a)
 
If the
termination of your
employment or other association is on account of retirement or disability, ninety (90) days after the date on which your SAR becomes exercisable as to all of the Shares or, if your SAR had become exercisable as to all of the Shares prior to such termination, ninety (90) days after the date your employment or other association ends on account of retirement or disability. For all purposes of this Award, disability means having become disabled within the meaning of Section 22(e)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and retirement means termination of employment or other association upon the attainment of at least age 55 and at least 10 years of service, of which the last three must be consecutive years with the Company.
 
(b)
 
If the
termination of your
employment or other association is on account of death, or you die within ninety (90) days of the termination of your employment or other association (other than when terminated for cause), the date which is twelve (12) months after your employment or other association ends.
 
(c)
 
If the
termination of your
employment or other association is for cause, as determined in good faith by the Committee, the date your employment ends.
 
(d)
 
In all other cases, ninety (90) days after your employment or other association ends.
 
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Award, as to any SARs which have not then become exercisable, the Company may cancel this SAR at any time and without prior notice, and as to SARs which are then exercisable the Company may cancel this SAR at any time on ninety (90) days prior notice to you, in response to actions taken by you that could be considered detrimental to the Company or any of its Affiliates. Whether any of your actions could be considered detrimental will be determined by the
Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the Committee) in its sole discretion and may include, but will not be limited to the following: your employment by or other association with a direct competitor of the Company or an Affiliate; your establishment of a business which competes with the Company or an Affiliate; or your unauthorized release of confidential information of the Company or an Affiliate.
 
2.
 
Exercise
of SARs.
 
 
(a)
 
Subject to the provisions of this Section 2, until these SARs expire, you may exercise them as to the number of SARs identified in the table below, in full or in part, at any time on or after the applicable Exercise Date or dates identified in the following table.
 
(b)  No shares of Common Stock shall be issued to Participant prior to the date on which the SARs are exercised in accordance with this Section 2. Upon exercise of the Stock Appreciation Rights, the Participant shall be entitled to receive a number of Issued Shares for each share with respect to which the Stock Appreciation Rights are exercised equal to (i) the excess of the Fair Market Value of one share on the date of exercise over the Grant Price, divided by (ii) the Fair Market Value of one share on the date of exercise. The Issued Shares shall be issued in book-entry form, registered in Participants name or in the name of Participants legal representatives, beneficiaries or heirs, as the case may be. The Company will not deliver any fractional share of Common Stock but will pay, in lieu thereof, cash equal to the Fair Market Value of such fractional share.
(c)
 
During any period that this SAR remains outstanding after your employment or other association with the Company and its Affiliates ends, you may exercise it only to the extent it was exercisable immediately prior to the end of your employment or other association except in the following circumstances. If your employment or other association ends on account of retirement or disability, this SAR shall nevertheless continue to become exercisable in accordance with the table above. If your employment or other association ends on account of your death, or you die within ninety (90) days after your employment or other association ends, this SAR shall become exercisable upon the date of your death for all of the SARs if not then exercisable in full. In no event may this SAR be exercised after it expires as determined in accordance with this Section 2.
 
(d)
 
At any time, you may exercise this SAR by delivery to the Company at its principal executive offices (the date such delivery occurs is hereinafter referred to as, the Exercise Date) a notice which shall state that Participant elects to exercise the SAR as to the number of shares specified in the notice as of the date specified in the notice. Such notice should be made to the stock administrator at the Company headquarters or its designee. All notices will be acknowledged and validated by the Company prior to actual exercise of a SAR.
 
3.
 
Transfer of SAR
. You may not transfer this SAR
 
except by will or the laws of descent and distribution, and, during your lifetime, only you (or in the event of your disability, your legal guardian or representative) may exercise this SAR. Any attempt to sell, pledge, assign, hypothecate, transfer or otherwise dispose of the SAR granted by this Award in contravention of this Award or the Plan shall be void.
 
4.
 
No Rights as a Stockholder
. You shall have no rights as a stockholder of any Stock covered by this SAR until the Exercise Date and entry evidencing such ownership is made in the stock transfer books of the Company. Except as may be provided under Section 4(c) of the Plan, the Company will make no adjustment for dividends (ordinary or extraordinary whether in cash, securities or other property) or distributions or other rights for which the record date is prior to the Exercise Date.
 
5.
 
Notices.
Except as otherwise provided herein, all notices, requests, demands and other communications under this Award shall be in writing, and if by telecopy, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered when sent, or if by personal delivery or messenger or courier service, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered upon actual delivery (but in no event may notice be given by deposit in the United States mail), at the following addresses, telephone and facsimile numbers (or such other address(es), telephone and facsimile numbers a party may designate for itself by like notice):
 
If to the Company: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: General Counsel or by Telephone at (540) 561-3225 or Telecopy at (540) 561-1448;
With copy to: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: Senior Vice President, Human Resources or by Telephone at (540) 561-6841 or Telecopy at (540) 561-6918;
If to you, the Participant, to your home address on record at Advance Auto Parts or your business address at Advance Auto Parts.
 
6.
 
Miscellaneous
.
 
(a)
 
This Award is made under the provisions of the Plan and shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with it. To the extent that any provision in this Award is inconsistent with the Plan, the provisions of the Plan shall control. The interpretation of the Committee of any provision of the Plan, the SAR or this Award, and any determination with respect thereto or hereto by the Committee, shall be binding on all parties.
 
 
 
(b)
 
Nothing contained in this Agreement shall confer, intend to confer or imply any rights to an employment relationship or rights to a continued employment relationship with the Company or any Affiliate in your favor or limit the ability of the Company or an Affiliate, as the case may be, to terminate, with or without cause, in its sole and absolute discretion, your employment relationship with the Company or such Affiliate, subject to the terms of any written employment agreement to which your are a party.
(c)  Neither the Plan nor this Award shall create or be construed to create a trust or separate fund of any kind or a fiduciary relationship between the Company or any Affiliate and Participant or any other Person. To the extent that any Person acquires a right to receive payments form the Company or any Affiliate pursuant to an Award, such right shall be no greater than the right of any unsecured creditor of the Company or any Affiliate.
(d)
  
The Company shall not be required to deliver any shares of Common Stock upon exercise of any Stock Appreciation Rights until the requirements of any federal or state securities laws, rules or regulations or other laws or rules (including the rules of any securities exchange) as may be determined by the Company to be applicable are satisfied.
(e)
  
An original record of this Award and all the terms hereof, executed by the Company, is held on file by the Company. To the extent there is any conflict between the terms contained in this Award and the terms contained in the original held by the Company, the terms of the original held by the Company shall control.
(f)
 
Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meaning assigned under the Plan.
 
7
.
 
Income Tax Matters.
The Company makes no representation or warranty as to the tax treatment of your receipt or exercise of this SAR or upon your sale or other disposition of the shares acquired through the exercise of the SARs. You should rely on your own tax advisors for such advice. In order to comply with all applicable federal or state income tax laws or regulations, the Company may take such action as it deems appropriate to ensure that all applicable federal or state payroll, withholding, income or other taxes, which are your sole and absolute responsibility, are withheld or collected from you at the time of your exercise of the SARs
.
The Company will inform you of alternative methods to settle any applicable taxes due prior to the first vesting date of your Award.
 
In Witness Whereof
, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
 
 
By:
 
___________________________
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070509185102.txt.gz
TIME:20070509185102
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., May 9, 2007 -
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), (the Company) a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, batteries, accessories and maintenance items, announced that with regard to the Companys proposal in its 2007 proxy statement to amend the Companys Long-Term Incentive Plan (the Plan), on May 9, 2007, the Board of Directors adopted a resolution whereby the Company will increase the authorized reserve of shares available for issuance of awards under the Plan by three million shares, rather than five million shares previously indicated, following shareholder approval. The Company will seek shareholder approval for any further increases in the number of shares available for issuance of awards under the Plan as needed in the future to maintain a competitive level of long-term incentives.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of December 30, 2006, the Company operated 3,082 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070511171100.txt.gz
TIME:20070511171100
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Notice of Delisting or Failure to Satisfy a Continued Listing Rule or Standard; Transfer of Listing
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., May 7, 2007 -
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, batteries, accessories and maintenance items, today announced that Michael N. Coppola, Chairman, President and CEO has resigned, effective immediately, to pursue other business opportunities. The Company is commencing a national search for a new CEO.
We would like to thank Mike for his many accomplishments during his six plus year tenure at Advance, said John C. Brouillard, the Companys Lead Director.  As principal architect of our 2010 Marketing Plan, Mike has been instrumental in establishing Advance Auto Parts as a customer-focused leader in the automotive aftermarket.  We wish him well in his future endeavors.
The Board of Directors appointed Mr. Brouillard as interim Chairman, President and CEO. Mr. Brouillard has been a Board member with Advance since 2004. In connection with his appointment as interim CEO, Mr. Brouillard will relinquish his roles as Lead Director and as a member of the Boards Audit and Compensation Committees. He retired in 2005 as Chief Administrative and Financial Officer of H.E. Butt Grocery Company, one of the leading retailers in the United States. Mr. Brouillard also serves on the Board of Directors for Eddie Bauer Holdings, Inc.
Our recent comprehensive business review convinces us that we have many opportunities to continue our growth and improve our performance, Brouillard said.  Advance has a number of very experienced executives who know the auto parts industry intimately, and whom I look forward to working with even more closely, as we continue to grow our business. 
I look forward to working directly with the investment community, beginning with our first quarter earnings conference call on Thursday, May 17, 2007, Brouillard concluded.
Guidance Update
The Company is reaffirming its guidance for first quarter 2007 for comparable-store sales in the low single digit range and earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.68 to $0.72.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of December 30, 2006, the Company operated 3,082 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070516164947.txt.gz
TIME:20070516164947
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., May 16, 2007
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fiscal first quarter ended April 21, 2007.
Earnings per diluted share for the first quarter were $0.71, compared to $0.68 last year. In the first
quarter, sales increased to $1.47 billion from $1.39 billion last year. Comparable-store sales increased
1.1% in the quarter, comprised of a 0.2% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and a 5.2% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM). The 1.1% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 3.9% increase in last years first quarter.
For the first quarter, our comp store sales came in at the low end of our guidance range, which was disappointing, said Jack Brouillard, interim Chairman, President and CEO. However, largely due to our strong gross margin performance, our earnings per share of $0.71 came in at the higher end of our guidance range of $0.68 to $0.72 per share.
First quarter gross margin was 48.3% of sales, a 57 basis-point improvement compared to last years quarter, primarily reflecting improved procurement costs and lower logistics costs.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
May 16, 2007
Page 2
 
First quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 39.1% of sales, compared to 38.7% in first quarter 2006, a 46 basis point increase. This increase was primarily due to a 70 basis point loss of leverage on rent, depreciation and other fixed costs from modest comparable-store sales.
Store Information
During the first quarter, the Company opened 70 new stores, of which
eight were Autopart International (AI) stores. The Company also relocated eight existing stores, remodeled 34 stores, and closed two stores.
2007 Guidance
The Company reiterates
its earnings guidance on comparable-store sales for the second quarter and the year in the low single-digit range. Quarter-to-date results are tracking in that range. The Company forecasts second quarter 2007 earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.65 to $0.69, which compares to $0.59 in last years second quarter. The Company expects full year 2007 earnings per diluted share in the range of $2.38 to $2.48, an increase of 10% to 15% as compared to 2006.
For 2007, the Company anticipates new-store growth in the 200-210 range, from the opening of both Advance and AI stores.
Jack Brouillard, interim Chairman, President and CEO stated. I will be serving as interim CEO while we undertake a nationwide search for a new CEO. I am proud to have served as a member of Advances board of directors since 2004 and look forward to working with our very capable management team to
pursue the many opportunities we believe we have to continue our growth and improve our performance.
As a result of our comprehensive strategy review, we have been able to take a more in-depth look at the industry and our customers and we believe those understandings will help us to improve our sales growth. Through the lens of our strategy, we will be creating a more efficient business model enabling us to convert sales growth into increased profits.
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
May 16, 2007
Page 3
 
Annual Meeting Announcements
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 16, 2007.
Michael N. Coppola was also elected to the Board of Directors and resigned effective immediately following the annual meeting. Other proposals approved by the stockholders were the ratification of the appointment by the audit committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as independent auditors for 2007, the approval of an amendment to the 2004 Long-Term Incentive plan and approval of the 2007 Executive Incentive Plan.
Dividend
On May 16, 2007, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on July 6, 2007 to stockholders of record as of June 22, 2007.
 
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on May 17, 2007, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site,
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FIRST QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
May 16, 2007
Page 4
 
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
. The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until May 16, 2008.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of April 21, 2007, the Company operated 3,150 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for second-quarter 2007 and fiscal year 2007. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070521170250.txt.gz
TIME:20070521170250
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Other Events
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Other Events
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070601171200.txt.gz
TIME:20070601171200
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20070808175114.txt.gz
TIME:20070808175114
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fiscal second quarter ended July 14, 2007.
ROANOKE, Va., August 8, 2007
Earnings per diluted share for the second quarter were $0.64, compared to $0.59 last year, an 8.5% increase.  In the second quarter, sales increased to $1.17 billion from $1.11 billion last year.  Comparable-store sales increased 1.3% in the quarter, comprised of a 0.1% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and a 5.8% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM).  The 1.3% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 1.2% increase in last years second quarter.
For the second quarter, our comp store sales increase was at the lower end of our low single digit guidance range, which was consistent with our sales trend in the first quarter, said Jack Brouillard, Chairman, President and CEO. Our earnings per share of $0.64 came in slightly below our $0.65 to $0.69 guidance.
Second quarter gross margin was 48.1% of sales, a 51 basis point improvement compared to last years quarter, primarily reflecting improved procurement and logistics costs.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
August 8, 2007
Page 2
 
 
Second quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 38.0% of sales, compared to 37.6% in second quarter 2006, a 41 basis point increase.  This increase was primarily due to a 50 basis point loss of leverage on rent, depreciation and other fixed costs from modest comparable-store sales.
Year to date sales increased to $2.64 billion from $2.50 billion last year.  Year to date comparable-store sales increased 1.2% comprised of a 0.1% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and a 5.4% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM).  The year to date 1.2% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 2.7% increase last year. Year to date earnings per diluted share were $1.35, compared to $1.27 last year.
Year to date gross margin was 48.2% of sales, a 55 basis point improvement compared to last year.
Year to date selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 38.7% of sales, compared to 38.2% in 2006, a 44 basis point increase.  This increase was primarily due to a 60 basis point loss of leverage on rent, depreciation and other fixed costs from modest comparable-store sales.
Store Information
During the second quarter, the Company opened 43 new stores, of which 5 were Autopart International (AI) stores.  The Company also relocated 11 existing stores, remodeled 27 stores, and closed 6 stores.
Year to date, the Company has opened 113 new stores, of which 13 were AI stores.  The Company has also relocated 19 existing stores, remodeled 61 stores, and closed 8 stores.
Strategy Review Update
The recent business strategy review and related customer research identified a number of key strategies that the Company needed to pursue to drive comp store sales growth, reduce its expense structure, and improve return on invested capital.
To better tailor merchandise offerings to targeted customer segments, the Company has undertaken an
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
August 8, 2007
Page 3
 
initiative to improve parts availability in its stores. The Company expects to increase both DIY and DIFM sales with this initiative.  The Company believes it can fund a portion of this initiative with tighter management of its existing inventory.  Most of the increase in parts availability is expected to be in stores by year end.
The Company is placing a renewed focus on commercial sales growth with a series of initiatives to take greater advantage of the potential of the large and growing commercial market. These initiatives will be discussed in more detail as they are implemented.  All aspects of the commercial program are being reviewed including store staffing and compensation, truck utilization, and merchandising programs.
To better align the Companys cost structure with the customer segments it is pursuing and increase the return on these investments, the Company announced initiatives that will reduce certain expenses by over $20 million in the second half of 2007 and over $50 million in 2008, and reduce capital expenditures by over $20 million in the second half of 2007 and over $65 million in 2008. These initiatives include:
 
Mr. Brouillard stated, Over the past three months our team has made significant progress in taking the initial steps to position us to implement the findings from our strategy review and to strengthen our business
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
August 8, 2007
Page 4
 
 
going forward.  Many of the decisions that have been made are difficult and are only the beginning as we take steps to drive our sales and reduce our expenses to more appropriate levels. We appreciate the contributions of the team members who will be leaving our company and we will assist them as they transition to the next phases of their careers.
2007 Guidance
The Company is providing earnings guidance based on comparable-store sales of (2%) to flat for the third quarter and flat to 2% for the fourth quarter. Quarter-to-date sales results are running within that range. The Company is basing its sales guidance on an expectation that a challenging macroeconomic environment will likely continue for the remainder of the year and that the Companys sales building initiatives will positively impact sales only to a limited degree in second half 2007 because of their implementation timeframe.
The Company forecasts third quarter 2007 earnings per diluted share in the range of $0.53 to $0.57, which compares to $0.56 in last years third quarter.  Included in this guidance is $0.04 per diluted share in severance expense and asset write-offs associated with the Companys expense reduction initiatives. The Company expects full year 2007 earnings per diluted share to be in the range of $2.24 to $2.32, including the previously referenced $0.04 per share.
Capital expenditures are now anticipated to be approximately $230 to $240 million in 2007 as compared to the Companys prior guidance of $250 to $270 million.
 Free cash flow is expected to be $150 to $170 million in 2007 as compared to prior guidance of $125 to $145 million.  Free cash flow is expected to grow more than 80% over $83.2 million of free cash flow in 2006.
Share Repurchase Authorization
The Companys Board of Directors today authorized a $500 million share repurchase program. This new
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
August 8, 2007
Page 5
 
 
authorization replaces the Companys $300 million share repurchase program authorized in August 2005, which had been nearly completed.  Under the $300 million share repurchase authorization, the Company repurchased 6.2 million shares at an average price of $37.37 per share.
Dividend
The Companys Board of Directors also today declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on October 5, 2007 to stockholders of record as of September 21, 2007.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday August 9, at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site, , or dial (866) 908-1AAP.  The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until August 9, 2008.
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales.  As of July 14, 2007, the Company operated 3,187 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for third quarter 2007 and fiscal year 2007.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20071031172628.txt.gz
TIME:20071031172628
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fiscal third quarter ended October 6, 2007.
ROANOKE, Va., October 31, 2007
Earnings per diluted share for the third quarter were $.57.  Excluding severance costs and asset write-offs associated with the Companys expense reduction initiatives, earnings per diluted share were $.61 compared to $.56 last year, an 8.9% increase.  In the third quarter, sales increased to $1.16 billion from $1.10 billion last year.  Comparable-store sales increased 1.1% in the quarter, comprised of a 1.0% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and an 8.0% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM).  The 1.1% comparable-store sales increase compared to a 1.4% increase in last years third quarter.
We are pleased to report that we are on track with the initiatives that we announced at the end of our last quarter.  Although we anticipate it will take time, we believe the results of those initiatives are beginning to have a positive impact on our sales, earnings, and return on invested capital, said Jack Brouillard, Chairman, President and CEO.
Third quarter gross margin was 47.9% of sales, a 28 basis point decrease compared to last year. The decrease was primarily due to a less favorable merchandise sales mix as compared to last year. In addition, fewer discounts were earned as merchandise purchases were less than year ago levels and the Company had a greater proportion of commercial sales.
 
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS THIRD QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
October 31, 2007
Page 2
 
Third quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 39.3% of sales compared to 38.9% last year.  Excluding severance and asset write-off costs, SG&A expenses were 38.7%, a decrease of 18 basis points as compared to last year.
Year to date sales increased to $3.80 billion from $3.60 billion last year.  Year to date comparable-store sales increased 1.2% comprised of a 0.4% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) and a 6.2% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM).  The year to date 1.2% comparable-store sales increase compares to a 2.3% increase last year.
Year to date earnings per diluted share were $1.92, compared to $1.82 last year.  Year to date gross margin was 48.1% of sales, a 29 basis point improvement from last year. Year to date SG&A expenses were 38.8% of sales as compared to 38.4% in 2006, a 41 basis point increase.
Share Repurchases
In the third quarter, the Company repurchased 6.2 million shares at an average price of $33.26 for a total of $207 million. The Company currently has $335 million available under the share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in August 2007.
Store Information
During the third quarter, the Company opened 43 new stores, of which 4 are Autopart International (AI) stores.  The Company also relocated 5 stores and closed 2 stores.
Year to date, the Company has opened 156 new stores, of which 17 are AI stores.  The Company has also relocated 24 stores and closed 10 stores.
2007 Guidance
The Company forecasts fourth quarter earnings per share in the range of $.36 to $.40 as compared to $.33 last year, an increase of 9% to 21%. This guidance is based on comparable store sales growth of 0 to 2%.  Gross margin is expected to be in line with fourth quarter last year.  SG&A expenses are expected to leverage within the 0 to 2% sales guidance.
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS THIRD QUARTER 2007 RESULTS
October 31, 2007
Page 3
The Company anticipates full year 2007 earnings per diluted share to be in the range of $2.28 to $2.32.  Excluding the severance costs and asset write-offs of $.04 per share incurred in the third quarter, earnings per diluted share for the year are expected to be $2.32 to $2.36 as compared to $2.16 last year, an increase of 7% to 9%. The Company expects free cash flow for the year to be in the range of $200 to $220 million.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday November 1, 2007 at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site, , or dial (866) 908-1AAP.  The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until November 1, 2008.
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales.  As of October 6, 2007, the Company operated 3,228 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for fourth quarter 2007 and fiscal year 2007.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20071129083708.txt.gz
TIME:20071129083708
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items in the United States, today announced that Darren R. Jackson, 43, has been appointed President and Chief Executive Officer effective January 7, 2008.  Mr. Jackson, who has been a member of the Advance Auto Parts Board of Directors since 2004, and will remain on the Board, will replace interim President and Chief Executive Officer, John Brouillard.  Mr. Brouillard, who also joined the Advance Auto Parts Board in 2004, will assume the position of non-executive Chairman.
-
ROANOKE, VA,  NOVEMBER 29, 2007
Mr. Jackson joins Advance Auto Parts from Best Buy Co., Inc. where he is currently Executive Vice President of Customer Operating Groups.  In this role, Mr. Jackson leads Best Buys entertainment, PC mobility and home solutions operating groups and also has oversight for enterprise merchandising.  In addition, he oversees Best Buy Financial Services, Best Buy for Business, Magnolia Audio Video and Pacific Sales.  Mr. Jackson joined Best Buy in 2000.  He was named executive vice president, finance and chief financial officer in 2001 and began transitioning into his current position earlier in 2007.
Since May, our Board of Directors has undertaken an exhaustive search for an executive with a proven track record who can lead this company to its fullest potential, said Mr. Brouillard.  While over the past several months we interviewed and considered several outstanding candidates, the Board asked Darren to consider becoming our President and CEO for a variety of reasons.  Since joining our Board in 2004, Darren has been instrumental in facilitating the strategic redirection of the Company.  In addition, he has built an exceptionally strong track record of leadership in the retailing industry and has the unique advantage of knowing our Company based on his Board of Directors service.  Darren also provided the Board with a comprehensive overview of how Advance Auto Parts could best capitalize on growth opportunities while enhancing value for all of our stakeholders.   We are delighted that he has agreed to become our President and Chief Executive Officer and I look forward to working with him as we pursue our mutual goal of becoming the leader in our industry.
Advance Auto Parts has a great team of 45,000 members, a strong franchise, and an industry leading store format with a long runway for expansion, said Mr. Jackson.  Our opportunity is to set the standard of
 
 
DARREN R. JACKSON APPOINTED PRESIDENT & CEO OF ADVANCE AUTO PARTS
November 29, 2007
Page 2
 
excellence for the customer experience in the Commercial and Do-It-Yourself businesses.   Our goal is to become the industry leader through a relentless focus on the customer.  We expect to achieve our goal by expanding and innovating around customer needs, being a strong customer advocate and maximizing the talents of our team members.  Im honored to have this opportunity, eagerly await the ride ahead and look forward to working with the Advance Auto Parts team as well as the Board.
 
Prior to Best Buy, Mr. Jackson began his retail career with Carson Pirie Scott in Milwaukee in 1989 and moved to Seattle-based Nordstrom Stores in 1998.  Mr. Jackson holds a bachelors degree in accounting from Marquette University.  He also serves as vice chairman of the board of trustees of the University and is on the board of the Cristo Rey Network.
 
 
 
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of October 6, 2007, the Company operated 3,228 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, comparable-store sales, gross margin and SG&A rates, and earnings per share for fourth quarter 2007 and fiscal year 2007. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20071204171028.txt.gz
TIME:20071204171028
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20071210165259.txt.gz
TIME:20071210165259
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 10.30
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
[CS&M Ref. No. -- 6701-760]
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
   
 
 
  
 
i
 
   
 
 
   
 
 
   
 
 
    
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
SCHEDULES
 
 
                                                                 
:
EXHIBITS
 
 
 
iii
 
TERM LOAN CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of December 4, 2007, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, the LENDERS party hereto, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
 
The parties hereto agree as follows:
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
  
  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
 means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, that, without duplication, (a) there shall be excluded (i) the income of any Person in which any other Person (other than the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) has a joint interest, except such income shall be included to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries by such Person during such period, (ii) the income (or loss) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or the date that Persons assets are acquired by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries and (iii) gains and losses from, or incurred in connection with, the sale, liquidation or other disposition of assets outside the ordinary course of business and (b) for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to any Permitted Acquisitions and any divestitures by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person occurring during such period as if such transactions had occurred on the first day of such period.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
 means an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, (i) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (ii) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
2
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
 means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greater of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day and (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1%.  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate or the Federal Funds Effective Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
 
 means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan or with respect to commitment fees in respect of Commitments payable under Section 2.09(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption ABR Spread, Eurodollar Spread or Commitment Fee Rate, as the case may be, based upon the Ratings by S&P and Moodys, respectively, applicable on such date:
Applicable Rate
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (a) if either Moodys or S&P shall not have in effect a Rating (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this paragraph), then such rating agency shall be deemed to have established a Rating in Category 6; (b) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories, the Applicable Rate shall be based on the higher of the two Ratings unless one of the two Ratings is two or more Categories lower than the other, in which case the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category next below that of the higher of the two Ratings; and (c) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P shall be changed (other than as a result of a change in the rating system of Moodys or S&P), such change shall be effective as of the date on which it is first announced by the applicable rating agency, irrespective of when notice of such change shall have been furnished by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 or otherwise.  Each change in the Applicable Rate shall
 
3
 
apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change.  If the rating system of Moodys or S&P shall change, or if either such rating agency shall cease to be in the business of rating corporate debt obligations, the Borrower and the Lenders shall negotiate in good faith to amend this definition to reflect such changed rating system or the unavailability of Ratings from such rating agency and, pending the effectiveness of any such amendment, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Rating most recently in effect prior to such change or cessation.
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(b).
Approved Fund
 
 means J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and Banc of America Securities LLC, each in its capacity as joint lead arranger in respect of the credit facility established hereunder.
Arrangers
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Commitment Expiration Date and the date of termination of the Commitments.
Availability Period
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
 means Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Borrower
 
 means Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect.
Borrowing
 
 means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
 
  of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such
Capital Lease Obligations
 
4
 
Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
 
  means at any time, (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person other than Holdings of any shares of capital stock of the Borrower; (b) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of Rule 13d-5 under the United States Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 in effect on the date hereof), of shares representing more than 25% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding capital stock of Holdings; or (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of Holdings by Persons who were not Continuing Directors.
Change in Control
 
 means (a) the adoption of any law, rule or regulation after the date of this Agreement, (b) any change in any law, rule or regulation or in the interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority after the date of this Agreement or (c) compliance by any Lender (or, for purposes of Section 2.12(b), by any lending office of such Lender or by such Lenders holding company, if any) with any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) of any Governmental Authority made or issued after the Effective Date.
Change in Law
 
  means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
 means, for any period, the ratio of (a) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period to (b) the sum of Consolidated Interest Expense plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
Consolidated Coverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Loans pursuant to Section 2.01, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.06 and (b) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04.  The initial amount of each Lenders Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01 or in the Assignment and Assumption pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Commitment, as applicable.  The initial aggregate amount of the Commitments is $200,000,000.
Commitment
 
 means the date that is six months after the Effective Date.
Commitment Expiration Date
 
 means, for any period, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (a) consolidated interest expense for such period, (b) the aggregate amount of letter of credit fees accrued during such period, (c) the aggregate amount of income tax expense for such period, (d) all depreciation and amortization expense for such period and (e) other non-cash charges for such period (excluding any non-cash charges that constitute an accrual of or
Consolidated EBITDA
 
5
 
reserve for future cash payments), and minus, without duplication and to the extent added to revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, all non-cash gains during such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis with respect to Holdings and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP.
 
 means, for any period, the sum of Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
Consolidated EBITDAR
 
 means, for any period, the interest expense of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, less, to the extent included in interest expense, the amortization during such period of debt issuance and deferred financing costs, commissions and fees; , , that the aggregate amount of such amortization that may be excluded in calculating Consolidated Interest Expense in respect of any financing transaction shall not exceed 3.5% of the aggregate amount of such financing.
Consolidated Interest Expense
provided
however
 
 means, for any period, the rental expense attributable to leases of real property that is deducted in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Rent Expense
 
 means the directors of Holdings on the Effective Date and each other director, if, in each case, such other directors nomination for election to the board of directors of Holdings is approved by a majority of the then Continuing Directors.
Continuing Directors
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.   and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
  means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that allows executives of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to defer receipt of specified portions of base and bonus earnings each calendar year.  Deferrals are maintained as a liability, along with assets owned by the Borrower, in a trust owned by the Borrower.
Deferred Compensation Obligations
 
 means any vendor or supplier from which the Borrower purchases inventory and that has been designated by the Borrower as a participant in a Permitted Vendor Financing.
Designated Vendor
 
 means (a) accounts receivable owed by the Borrower in respect of inventory purchased from a Designated Vendor or (b) drafts
Designated Vendor Accounts
 
6
 
issued by the Borrower as payment in full of one or more of such accounts receivable; that such accounts receivable or drafts shall constitute Designated Vendor Accounts only after having been sold by such Designated Vendor to a DVA Creditor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and only so long as owed to a DVA Creditor.
provided
 
 means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
 
 means (a) any financial institution that has agreed to purchase one or more Designated Vendor Accounts from a Designated Vendor pursuant to a Permitted Vendor Financing and (b) any successor or assignee of any such financial institution that holds any Designated Vendor Accounts originally purchased by such financial institution, provided that such successor or assignee is not a Designated Vendor, a Loan Party or an Affiliate of a Designated Vendor or a Loan Party.
DVA Creditor
 
 means the obligations of the Borrower to pay Designated Vendor Accounts.  For purposes of this Agreement, the amount of any DVA Obligation at any time shall be the entire amount payable in respect thereof as and when due.
DVA Obligations
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
Effective Date
 
 means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
 
 means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
Environmental Liability
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person or any warrants, options or other rights to acquire such interests.
Equity Interests
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
7
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) the existence with respect to any Plan of an accumulated funding deficiency (as defined in Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA), whether or not waived; (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(d) of the Code or Section 303(d) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan; (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
 
 means any shares of capital stock of Holdings that constitute margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board and are held as treasury stock by Holdings.
Excluded Margin Stock
 
 means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.16(b)), any withholding tax that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lenders failure to comply with Section 2.14(e), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the
Excluded Taxes
 
8
 
time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.14(a).
 
  means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
 means the chief financial officer, vice president of finance, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of Holdings or the Borrower, as applicable.
Financial Officer
 
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located.  For purposes of this definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
Foreign Lender
 
 means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
 
9
 
issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
provided
 
 means the Guarantee Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, made by Holdings in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders.
Guarantee Agreement
 
  means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes and all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
Hazardous Materials
 
 means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Holdings
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 90 days and (ii) Deferred Compensation Obligations), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances and (j) all DVA Obligations.  The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.  The amount of any Indebtedness described in clause (f) above shall be limited to the maximum amount payable under the applicable Guarantee of such Person if such Guarantee contains limitations on the amount payable thereunder.
Indebtedness
 
 means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
 means senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money of Holdings that is not guaranteed by any other Person or subject to any other credit enhancement.
Index Debt
 
10
 
 means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated November 2007 relating to the Borrower and the Transactions.
Information Memorandum
 
 means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.05.
Interest Election Request
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan, the last day of each March, June, September and December and (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months duration after the first day of such Interest Period.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, to the extent made available by all Lenders, nine or twelve months) thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period.  For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
 
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.
Lenders
 
 means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Total Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDA for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Leverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Page 3750 of the Dow Jones Markets Service (or on any successor or substitute page of such Service, or any successor to or substitute for such Service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such page of such Service, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days
LIBO Rate
 
11
 
p
rior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 means this Agreement, the promissory notes, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.07(e), and the Guarantee Agreement.
Loan Documents
 
 means Holdings and the Borrower.
Loan Parties
 
 means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to  this Agreement.
Loans
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under any Loan Document or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Lenders under any Loan Document.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the principal amount of the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
 means October 5, 2011.
Maturity Date
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc.
Moodys
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
12
 
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
Other Taxes
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
 means any acquisition by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division, line of business or business unit of a Person if, immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would result therefrom, (b) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable laws, (c) all the Equity Interests of any Subsidiary formed for the purpose of or resulting from such acquisition shall be owned directly by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Sections 6.08 and 6.09 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition (and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, with any new Indebtedness being deemed to be amortized over the applicable testing period in accordance with its terms, and assuming that any revolving loans under the Revolving Credit Agreement borrowed in connection with such acquisition are repaid with excess cash balances when available) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (e) the Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent an officers certificate to the effect set forth in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above, together with all relevant financial information for the Person or assets to be acquired.
Permitted Acquisition
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
Liens imposed by law for taxes or government assessments that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(a)
 
carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 60 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(b)
 
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
(c)
 
deposits (and, to the extent securing a trade contract or indemnity bond, Liens on assets to which such contract or bond relates) to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety, indemnity and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(d)
 
13
 
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(e)
 
easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of Holdings or any Subsidiary;
(f)
 
any interest or title of a lessor under any lease that is limited to the property subject to such lease; and
(g)
 
unperfected Liens of any vendor on inventory sold by such vendor securing the unpaid purchase price of such inventory, to the extent such Liens are stated to be reserved in such vendors sale documents (and not granted by separate agreement of the Borrower or any Subsidiary);
(h)
 
that the term Permitted Encumbrances shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
 
 means:
Permitted Investments
 
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(a)
 
investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, a credit rating  from S&P of A1 or higher or from Moodys of P1 or higher;
(b)
 
investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within 180 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(c)
 
fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
(d)
 
investments in money market or mutual funds substantially all the assets of which are comprised of securities of the types described in any of clauses (a) through (d) above; and
(e)
 
14
 
(f) corporate notes and corporate bonds or municipal securities which includes variable rate demand notes and auction rate municipals, assigned a credit rating from S&P of A2 or higher or from Moodys of A or higher.
 
 means a financing arrangement pursuant to which a Designated Vendor sells to a financial institution that is a DVA Creditor (a) accounts receivable owed to such Designated Vendor by the Borrower or (b) drafts issued by the Borrower to replace such accounts receivable.
Permitted Vendor Financing
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, and in respect of which the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate is (or, if such plan were terminated, would under Section 4069 of ERISA be deemed to be) an employer as defined in Section 3(5) of ERISA.
Plan
 
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
 means (a) the rating by the applicable rating agency of the Index Debt or (b) in the absence of Index Debt, the corporate rating or corporate family rating or the equivalent applicable to Holdings by the applicable rating agency.
Rating
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having outstanding Loans and unused Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total outstanding Loans and unused Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
 
 means the Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2006 among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Revolving Credit Agreement
 
 means the Effective Date as such term is defined in the Revolving Credit Agreement on the date hereof.
Revolving Effective Date
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.07.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
 
15
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Group, Inc.
S&P
 
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D.  Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
 means, with respect to any Person (the ) at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
 means any subsidiary of Holdings or the Borrower, as the context requires.
Subsidiary
 
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
Swap Agreement
provided
 
 means Bank of America, N.A., in its capacity as syndication agent hereunder.
Syndication Agent
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
 
16
 
 means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to all Indebtedness of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries outstanding on such date, excluding Indebtedness described in clauses (e), (f) and (h) of the definition of Indebtedness; that any letters of credit and letters of guaranty referred to in clause (h) of the definition Indebtedness shall not be excluded from Total Debt to the extent issued to support any other obligations constituting Indebtedness.
Total Debt
provided
 
 means the execution and delivery by each Loan Party of each Loan Document to which it is a party, the borrowing of Loans and the use of the proceeds thereof.
Transactions
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans constituting such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
SECTION 1.02.
  
  For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Type (, a Eurodollar Loan).  Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Type (, a Eurodollar Borrowing).
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
 
SECTION 1.03.
  
  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally.
 
SECTION 1.04.
  
  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that, if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.
provided
 
17
 
to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith.  Except as otherwise provided herein, all references to a fiscal month shall mean any period of four or five calendar weeks used by the Borrower for recording or reporting its interim financial information.
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
  
  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Loans to the Borrower on the Effective Date and on not more than five other dates during the Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding, on the date any such Loan is made, such Lenders Commitment on such date.  Amounts prepaid or repaid in respect of Loans may not be reborrowed.
Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.02.
  
  (a)  Each Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Commitments.  The failure of any Lender to make any Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make Loans as required.
Loans and Borrowings.
provided
 
(b)
  
Subject to Section 2.11, each Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(c)
  
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000.  At the time that each ABR Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $5,000,000; that an ABR Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Commitments.  Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 10 Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
 
18
 
(d)
  
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to elect to convert or continue any Borrowing if the Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Maturity Date.
 
SECTION 2.03.
  
   (a)  To request a Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing.  Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.  Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Borrowings.
 
(i)
  
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing, which, together with the aggregate amount of each other Borrowing requested to be made on the date of such Borrowing, shall be at least equal to $25,000,000 (or, in the case of Borrowings to be made on the Effective Date, the amount specified in paragraph (b) of this Section 2.03);
 
(ii)
  
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
  
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
(iv)
  
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period; and
 
(v)
  
the location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.04.
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing.  If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.  Promptly following receipt of a Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower shall request a Borrowing or Borrowings to be made on the Effective Date in an aggregate principal amount at least equal to $50,000,000.
 
SECTION 2.04.
  
  (a)  Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the
Funding of Borrowings.
 
19
 
Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request.
 
(b)
  
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.05.
  
  (a)  Each Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request.  Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section.  The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.
Interest Elections.
 
(b)
  
To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.  Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
 
(c)
  
Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
 
(i)
  
the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the
 
20
 
portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
(ii)
  
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
  
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv)
  
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(d)
  
Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)
  
If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
SECTION 2.06.
  
  (a)  On the date that each Loan is funded, the Commitment of each Lender shall be reduced by the principal amount of Loans made by it.  Unless previously terminated, the Commitments shall terminate on the Commitment Expiration Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Commitments; that each reduction of the Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000.
provided
 
(c)
  
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a
provided
 
21
 
notice of termination of the Commitments delivered by the Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Any termination or reduction of the Commitments shall be permanent.  Each reduction of the Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.07.
  
  (a)  The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Loan of such Lender on the Maturity Date.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
 
(b)
  
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)
  
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(d)
  
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
 
(e)
  
Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
 
SECTION 2.08.
  
  (a)  The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
 
22
 
(b)
  
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment or (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that a notice of prepayment may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified prepayment date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02.  Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.10.
provided
 
SECTION 2.09.
  
  (a)  The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a commitment fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the average daily unused amount of the Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Commitments terminate.  Accrued commitment fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date.  All commitment fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Fees.
 
(b)
  
All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent for distribution to the Lenders entitled thereto.  Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
 
SECTION 2.10.
  
  (a)  The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
 
(b)
  
The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
 
(c)
  
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any
 
23
 
other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
(d)
  
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan, accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
 
(e)
  
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.11.
  
  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
 
(a)
  
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
 
(b)
  
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.12.
  
  (a)  If any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
 
(i)
  
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate); or
 
24
 
(ii)
  
impose on any Lender or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
  
If any Lender determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders capital or on the capital of such Lenders holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by such Lender to a level below that which such Lender or such Lenders holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders policies and the policies of such Lenders holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or such Lenders holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
  
A certificate of a Lender setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d)
  
Failure or delay on the part of any Lender to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lenders intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 2.13.
  
  In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.08(b) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.16, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to
Break Funding Payments.
 
25
 
such event.  In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the Eurodollar market.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
SECTION 2.14.
  
  (a)  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent or Lender (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes.
provided
 
(b)
  
In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
 
(c)
  
The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent and each Lender, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent or such Lender, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability, and setting forth, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(d)
  
As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to
 
26
 
the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)
  
Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the Code, the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.  Any Foreign Lender which is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and intends to claim exemption from U.S. Federal withholding tax under Section 871(h) or 881(c) of the Code with respect to payments of portfolio interest shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy for the Administrative Agent) a Form W-8BEN, or any subsequent versions thereof or successors thereto (and, if such Foreign Lender delivers a Form W-8BEN, a certificate representing that such Foreign Lender is not a bank for purposes of Section 881(c) of the Code, is not a ten-percent shareholder (within the meaning of Section 871(h)(3)(B) of the Code) of the Borrower and is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Borrower (within the meaning of Section 864(d)(4) of the Code)), properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender claiming complete exemption from, or a reduced rate of, U.S. Federal withholding tax on payments of interest by the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
 
(f)
  
If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.14, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.14 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority.  Nothing contained in this Section 2.14(f) shall require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
provided
 
SECTION 2.15.
  
  (a)  The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal, interest, fees or of
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
 
27
 
amounts payable under Section 2.12, 2.13, 2.14, or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after such time on any date may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to the Administrative Agent at its offices at 270 Park Avenue, New York, New York, except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.12, 2.13, 2.14 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payments received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment under any Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
 
(b)
  
If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal then due to such parties.
 
(c)
  
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
provided
 
28
 
(d)
  
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders the amount due.  In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)
  
If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.04(b), 2.15(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion (notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof), apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender to satisfy such Lenders obligations under such Sections until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid.
 
SECTION 2.16.
  
  (a)  If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.12, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.14, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.12 or 2.14, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender.  The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
 
(b)
  
If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.12, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.14, or if any Lender defaults in its obligation to fund Loans hereunder, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of
provided
 
29
 
all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.12 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.14, such assignment will result in a material reduction in such compensation or payments.  A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
 
 
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders on the Effective Date and on each date thereafter as required hereunder that:
 
SECTION 3.01.
  
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
 
SECTION 3.02.
  
  The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Partys corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each Loan Party and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which either Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability.
 
SECTION 3.03.
  
  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect or (ii) where the failure to obtain such consent or approval or make such registration or filing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries, and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
 
30
 
SECTION 3.04.
  
   (a)   Holdings has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended October 6, 2007, certified by one of its Financial Officers.  Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Holdings and its consolidated subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to customary year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
 
(b)
  
Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of Holdings, the Borrower or their Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities.
 
(c)
  
Since December 30, 2006, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
 
SECTION 3.05.
  
  (a)  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes.
Properties.
 
(b)
  
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.06.
  
  (a)  There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
 
(b)
  
Except for the Disclosed Matters and except with respect to any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply
 
31
 
with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)
  
Since December 30, 2006, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.07.
  
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
 
SECTION 3.08.
  
  Neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries is an investment company as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
 
SECTION 3.09.
  
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Taxes.
 
SECTION 3.10.
  
  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Statement of Financial Accounting Standards No. 87) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
ERISA.
 
SECTION 3.11.
  
  Holdings and the Borrower have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to any of them, that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  Neither the Information Memorandum
Disclosure.
 
32
 
nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of either Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, Holdings and the Borrower represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
provided
 
SECTION 3.12.
  
  Holdings does not have any Subsidiaries other than the Borrower and the Borrowers Subsidiaries.  Schedule 3.12 sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Borrower in, each Subsidiary of the Borrower as of the Effective Date.
Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 3.13.
  
  Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.  As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 3.14.
  
  Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of each Loan Party, at a fair valuation, will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) each Loan Party will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) each Loan Party will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
Solvency.
 
 
 
SECTION 4.01.
  
  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
Effective Date.
 
(a)
  
The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from each party hereto either a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include electronic transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) from Holdings a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement signed on behalf of Holdings or written evidence satisfactory to the
 
33
 
Administrative Agent (which may include electronic transmission of a signed signature page of the Guarantee Agreement) that Holdings has signed a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement.
 
(b)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Bingham McCutchen LLP and LeClair Ryan, counsel for the Loan Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibits C-1 and C-2, respectively, and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request.  Holdings and the Borrower hereby request such counsel to deliver such opinions.
 
(c)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it of the effectiveness of an amendment to the Revolving Credit Agreement the result of which is that no provision of the Revolving Credit Agreement, as so amended, shall be violated by, and no default thereunder shall result from, the execution, delivery or performance of this Agreement.
 
(d)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of the Loan Parties, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(e)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and other information as the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may reasonably request to satisfy the requirements of bank regulatory authorities under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA Patriot Act.
 
(f)
  
The conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to such effect, dated the Effective Date and signed by the President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of the Borrower.
 
(g)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower hereunder.
 
(h)
  
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it that the insurance required by Section 5.06 is in effect.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 9.02) at or
 
34
 
prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on December 30, 2007 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Commitments shall terminate at such time).
 
SECTION 4.02.
  
  The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
 
(a)
  
The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing, except for representations and warranties expressly made as of an earlier date, which shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)
  
At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by Holdings and the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 5.01.
  
 Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information.
 
(a)
  
within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings audited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit or other material qualification or exception) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b)
  
within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of
 
35
 
its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)
  
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.08 and 6.09 as of the end of the period covered by such financial statements and (iii) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of Holdings audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate;
 
(d)
  
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
 
(e)
  
as soon as the same are complete, but in no event more than 60 days after the commencement of each fiscal year of Holdings, a detailed consolidated budget presented on a quarterly basis for such fiscal year (including a projected consolidated balance sheet and related statements of projected operations and cash flow as of the end of and for such fiscal year) and, promptly when available, any significant revisions of such budget;
 
(f)
  
promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by Holdings to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(g)
  
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(h)
  
promptly upon the occurrence of any change of Rating by Moodys or S&P, a certificate of a Financial Officer setting forth the new Rating, the effective date thereof and, if applicable, notice of any change in the Applicable Rate as a result thereof; and
 
36
 
(i)
  
promptly after the same are furnished to the Borrower, copies of any Management Letter delivered to Holdings and the Borrower by their independent certified public accountants in connection with the delivery of financial statements contemplated by Section 5.01(a) if such Letter discloses any material weaknesses in internal financial controls or other material concerns relating to the financial statements identified by such accountants.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any financial statements or other reports or filings required to be furnished by Holdings and the Borrower pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (f) of this Section 5.01 shall be deemed to have been furnished if Holdings or the Borrower has (i) filed the same with the Securities and Exchange Commission via the EDGAR filing system and the same are publicly available and (ii) delivered notice thereof to the Administrative Agent.
 
SECTION 5.02.
  
  Upon Holdings or the Borrower obtaining knowledge thereof, Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
 
(a)
  
the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)
  
the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(c)
  
the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $1,000,000; and
 
(d)
  
any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of Holdings or the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5.03.
  
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
 
SECTION 5.04.
  
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other
Payment of Obligations.
 
37
 
obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith (in the case of Tax liabilities or obligations to Government Authorities by appropriate proceedings), (b) Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 5.05.
  
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
 
SECTION 5.06.
  
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain with financially sound and reputable insurance companies adequate insurance for its insurable properties, all to such extent and against such risks, including fire, casualty and other risks insured against by extended coverage, as is customary with companies in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 5.07.
  
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities.  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; that the Borrower shall be given the opportunity to be present at any discussion with its independent accountants.
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights.  
provided
 
SECTION 5.08.
  
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
 
SECTION 5.09.
  
  The proceeds of the Loans will be used for general corporate purposes, including to finance a portion of Holdingss share repurchase program.  No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations U and X.
Use of Proceeds.
 
38
 
 
 
Until the Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 6.01.
  
  The Borrower will not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness (including pursuant to any Guarantee of Indebtedness of Holdings, the Borrower or any other Subsidiary), except:
Subsidiary Indebtedness.
 
(a)
  
Indebtedness existing on the Revolving Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness;
 
(b)
  
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower owing to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(c)
  
Guarantees by any Subsidiary of the Borrower of Indebtedness of any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is permitted by this Section;
provided
 
(d)
  
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets after the Revolving Effective Date, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (d) (and that is not listed in Schedule 6.01) and clause (e) below shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(e)
  
Indebtedness of (i) any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Revolving Effective Date pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition to the extent that such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary and (ii) a Subsidiary to the extent that such Indebtedness is assumed in connection with a Permitted Acquisition made by such Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of such Permitted Acquisition; that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e) and
provided
 
39
 
clause (d) above shall be subject to the limitations set forth in clause (ii) of the proviso at the end of clause (d)above; and
 
 
(f)
  
other Indebtedness of Subsidiaries of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not exceeding $75,000,000.
 
SECTION 6.02.
  
  (a)  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
 
(i)
  
Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(ii)
  
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(iii)
  
any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the Revolving Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(iv)
  
any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Revolving Effective Date or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Revolving Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; that (A) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (B) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (C) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof; and
provided
 
(v)
  
Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Revolving Effective Date; that (A) such security interests secure Indebtedness incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of such fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereto (and, in the case of any such Indebtedness of a Subsidiary of the Borrower, is Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01), (B) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (C) the
provided
 
40
 
Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost (including design, engineering, sales taxes, delivery, installation and other similar costs) of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (D) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets (other than proceeds of the property and assets originally encumbered by such security interests) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary; and
 
(vi)
  
other Liens securing Indebtedness or other monetary obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (other than Liens on inventory); that the sum of all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations at any time outstanding secured by Liens permitted by this clause (vi), plus the fair market value of all assets sold after the Revolving Effective Date pursuant to Sale and Leaseback Transactions in reliance on clause (b) of Section 6.07, shall not at any time exceed $125,000,000.
provided
 
(b)
  
Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it (other than Excluded Margin Stock), or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect thereof, except Permitted Encumbrances.
 
SECTION 6.03.
  
  (a)  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may merge into any other Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower ) may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders, (vi) any Subsidiary may merge with another entity to implement a Permitted Acquisition and (v) any Subsidiary of the Borrower may merge with another entity to implement a sale or other disposition of such Subsidiary otherwise permitted by this Agreement, provided that, after giving effect thereto, such Subsidiary shall no longer be a Subsidiary; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04.
Fundamental Changes.
provided
 
(b)
  
The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the Revolving Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto.
 
(c)
  
Holdings will not engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of all the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Borrower and activities incidental thereto, including the conduct of stock repurchase programs, administering payrolls for executive officers and other activities incidental to its existence as a publicly-
 
41
 
owned holding company.  Holdings will not own or acquire any assets (other than shares of capital stock of the Borrower, cash, promissory notes held pursuant to clause (g) of Section 6.04 and Permitted Investments) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities under the Loan Documents, liabilities under the Loan Documents as such term is defined in the Revolving Credit Agreement, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities).  Holdings will not have any Subsidiaries, other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 6.04.
  
  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
 
(a)
  
Permitted Investments;
 
(b)
  
investments existing on the Revolving Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04, to the extent such investments would not be permitted under any other clause of this Section;
 
(c)
  
investments in the Equity Interests of their respective Subsidiaries;
 
(d)
  
loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower (or to Holdings) and made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(e)
  
Guarantees by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries of obligations of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries; that any such Guarantees by Subsidiaries of the Borrower of obligations of the Borrower shall be limited to Guarantees of Indebtedness that are permitted by Section 6.01;
provided
 
(f)
  
investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(g)
  
promissory notes received from employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries evidencing loans made for the purpose of permitting such employees to purchase capital stock of Holdings in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(h)
  
Permitted Acquisitions;
 
42
 
(i)
  
loans or advances to employees in the ordinary course of business; that the aggregate amount of all loans and advances permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed $750,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(j)
  
obligations of management to the Borrower in connection with split dollar life insurance policies; that the aggregate amount of all obligations permitted by this clause (j) shall not exceed $2,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(k)
  
investments incurred in connection with Deferred Compensation Obligations; and
 
(l)
  
other investments in an aggregate amount not exceeding $50,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.05.
  
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements.
 
SECTION 6.06.
  
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any  Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any of its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Revolving Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.06 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or any asset or property pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary, asset or property that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness, (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases, licenses, or other contracts restricting the assignment thereof and (vi) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by the Revolving Credit Agreement (as amended or extended from time to time), that such restrictions
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
provided
 
43
 
and conditions are not more restrictive in any material respect than those set forth in this Agreement.
 
SECTION 6.07.
  
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any Person whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property which it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred (a ), except for (a) any such Sale and Leaseback Transaction involving the sale of fixed or capital assets (other than those acquired pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition), at a price not less than the cost thereof, that is consummated within 360 days after the date that such assets are acquired and (b) other Sale and Leaseback Transactions consummated after the Revolving Effective Date, subject to the limitations set forth in clause (vi) of Section 6.02(a).
Sale and Leaseback Transactions.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
 
SECTION 6.08.
  
  The Borrower will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date to be in excess of 2.50 to 1.00.
Leverage Ratio.
 
SECTION 6.09.
  
  The Borrower will not permit the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (commencing with the period ending on the last day of the first fiscal quarter ended after the Effective Date) to be less than 2.25 to 1.00.
Consolidated Coverage Ratio.
 
 
 
If any of the following events () shall occur:
Events of Default
 
(a)
  
the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)
  
the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
 
(c)
  
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
44
 
(d)
  
Holdings or the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.03 (with respect to the existence of Holdings or the Borrower) or 5.09 or in Article VI;
 
(e)
  
either Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable;
 
(g)
  
any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
 
(h)
  
an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(j)
  
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
45
 
(k)
  
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against Holdings, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor (and such action is not effectively stayed) to attach or levy upon any assets of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)
  
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $3,000,000 in any year or (ii) $5,000,000 for all periods; or
 
(m)
  
a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Commitments, and thereupon the Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.
 
 
 
Each of the Lenders hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates
 
46
 
may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by Holdings, the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related
 
47
 
Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of each Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor Administrative Agent as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower (except that no consultation is required during an Event of Default), to appoint a successor.  If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor.  After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
 
 
SECTION 9.01.
  
  (a)  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices.
 
48
 
(i)
  
if to Holdings or the Borrower, to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia 24012, Attention of Chief Financial Officer  (Telecopy No. (540) 561-6445);
 
(ii)
  
if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Timothy Rojas (Telecopy No. (713) 750-2223), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 270 Park Avenue, 4th Floor, New York 10017, Attention of Barry Bergman (Telecopy No. (212) 270-6637); and
 
(iii)
  
if to any Lender, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)
  
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
provided
 
(c)
  
Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.  All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
SECTION 9.02.
  
  (a)  No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by either Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
 
(b)
  
Neither this Agreement nor any other Loan Document nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan
 
49
 
Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or reduce the rate of interest thereon, or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.15(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of Required Lenders or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, or (vi) release Holdings from its Guarantee under the Guarantee Agreement, or limit its liability in respect of such Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender; that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Commitment (if any) of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
provided
provided
further
 
SECTION 9.03.
  
  (a)  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Arrangers, the Administrative Agent, the Syndication Agent and their Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Arrangers, the Administrative Agent and the Syndication Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated) and (ii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
(b)
  
The Borrower shall indemnify each Arranger, the Administrative Agent, the Syndication Agent and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ) against, and hold
Indemnitee
 
50
 
each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or the use of the proceeds therefrom, (iii) any actual or alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
provided
 
(c)
  
To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to any Arranger, the Administrative Agent or the Syndication Agent under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to such Arranger, the Administrative Agent or the Syndication Agent, as the case may be, such Lenders pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against such Arranger, the Administrative Agent or the Syndication Agent in its capacity as such.  For purposes hereof, a Lenders pro rata share shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total outstanding Loans and unused Commitments at the time.
provided
 
(d)
  
To the extent permitted by applicable law, neither Holdings nor the Borrower shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or the use of the proceeds thereof.
 
(e)
  
All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
SECTION 9.04.
  
  (a)  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer
Successors and Assigns.
 
51
 
upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby, Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
 
(b)
  
(i)  Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A)
  
the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee; and
provided
 
(B)
  
the Administrative Agent.
 
(ii)
  
Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A)
  
except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Commitment and outstanding Loans, the amount of the Commitment and outstanding Loans of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $1,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
 
(B)
  
each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement;
 
(C)
  
the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
 
(D)
  
the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more Credit Contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Borrower, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignees compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws.
 
52
 
For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term Approved Fund has the following meaning:
 
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
(iii)
  
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.12, 2.13, 2.14 and 9.03).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
(iv)
  
The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in the City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v)
  
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
 
53
 
(c)
  
(i)  Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower or the Administrative Agent, sell participations to one or more banks or other entities (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant.  Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.12, 2.13 and 2.14 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section.  To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.15(c) as though it were a Lender.
Participant
provided
provided
 
(ii)
  
A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.12 or 2.14 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.14 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.14(e) as though it were a Lender.
 
(d)
  
Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
(e)
  
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a ) may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle (an ), identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, the option to provide to the Borrower all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPV to make any Loan and (ii) if an SPV elects not to exercise such
Granting Lender
SPV
provided
 
54
 
option or otherwise fails to provide all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof.  The making of a Loan by an SPV hereunder shall utilize the Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender.  Each party hereto hereby agrees that no SPV shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement (all liability for which shall remain with the Granting Lender).  In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior indebtedness of any SPV, it will not institute against, or join any other person in instituting against, such SPV any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof.  In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 9.04, any SPV may (i) with notice to, but without the prior written consent of, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and without paying any processing fee therefor, assign all or a portion of its interests in any Loans to the Granting Lender or to any financial institutions (consented to by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent) providing liquidity and/or credit support to or for the account of such SPV to support the funding or maintenance of Loans and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety, guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPV.  As this Section 9.04(e) applies to any particular SPV, this Section may not be amended without the written consent of such SPV.
 
SECTION 9.05.
  
  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and unpaid and so long as the Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of Sections 2.12, 2.13, 2.14 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
Survival.
 
SECTION 9.06.
  
  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
 
55
 
and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by electronic transmission shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
 
SECTION 9.07.
  
  Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
 
SECTION 9.08.
  
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
 
SECTION 9.09.
  
  (a)  This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
  
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or
 
56
 
proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Holdings, the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
  
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d)
  
Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.10.
  
  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
 
SECTION 9.11.
  
  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
 
SECTION 9.12.
  
  Each of the Administrative Agent and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions
Confidentiality.
 
57
 
substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower.
 
For the purposes of this Section, "Information" means all information received from the Borrower relating to the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower; provided that, in the case of information received from the Borrower after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.  Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
 
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE BORROWER AND ITS RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWER OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE BORROWER, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES.  ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWER AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
SECTION 9.13.
  
  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively, the ), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the ) which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
58
 
the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
 
SECTION 9.14.
  
.  Each Lender hereby notifies each of the Borrower and Holdings that pursuant to the requirements of the USA Patriot Act (Title III of Pub. L. 107-56 (signed into law October 26, 2001)), (the ), it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies each of the Borrower and Holdings, which information includes the name and address of each of the Borrower and Holdings and other information that will allow such Lender to identify each of the Borrower and Holdings in accordance with the Act.
USA Patriot Act
Act
 
59
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.31
 
GUARANTEE AGREEMENT dated as of December 4, 2007, between ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation ( and the ), and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (), as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ) for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
Holdings
Guarantor
JPMCB
Administration Agent
 
Reference is made to the Term Loan Credit Agreement dated as of December 4, 2007 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Holdings, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation (the ), the lenders from time to time party thereto (the ) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the t) for the Lenders.  Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Borrower
Lenders
Administrative Agen
 
The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower pursuant to, and upon the terms and subject to the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement.  The Borrower has elected that the Guarantor guarantee the Obligations (as defined below) by entering into this Guarantee Agreement.  Holdings acknowledges that it will derive substantial benefit from the making of the Loans by the Lenders.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans are conditioned on, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Guarantor of a Guarantee Agreement in the form hereof.  As consideration therefor and in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans, the Guarantor is willing to execute this Guarantee Agreement.
 
Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
  
  The Guarantor unconditionally guarantees, as a primary obligor and not merely as a surety, (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise and (ii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Lenders under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents (all the monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) and (b) being collectively called the ).  The Guarantor further agrees that the Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice to or further assent from it, and that the security interest granted hereunder and the obligations of the Guarantor will survive any extension or renewal of any Obligation.
Guarantee.
Obligations
 
2
 
SECTION 2.
  
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Guarantor waives presentment to, demand of payment from and protest to the Borrower of any of the Obligations, and also waives notice of acceptance of its guarantee and notice of protest for nonpayment.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be affected by (a) the failure of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to assert any claim or demand or to enforce or exercise any right or remedy against the Borrower or the Guarantor under the provisions of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or otherwise or (b) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of, or any release from, any of the terms or provisions of this Guarantee Agreement, any other Loan Document, any Guarantee or any other agreement.
Obligations Not Waived.
 
SECTION 3.
  
  The Guarantor further agrees that its guarantee constitutes a guarantee of payment when due and not of collection, and waives any right to require that any resort be had by the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to any of the security held for payment of the Obligations or to any balance of any deposit account or credit on the books of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender in favor of the Borrower or any other Person.
Guarantee of Payment.
 
SECTION 4.
  
  The obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise of any of the Obligations, and shall not be subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Obligations or otherwise.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of the Guarantor hereunder shall not be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by the failure of the Administrative Agent or any other Lender to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy under the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, by any waiver or modification of any provision of any thereof, by any default, failure or delay, wilful or otherwise, in the performance of the Obligations, or by any other act or omission that may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of the Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of the Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations).
No Discharge or Diminishment of Guarantee.
 
SECTION 5.
  
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Guarantor waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of the Borrower or the unenforceability of the Obligations or any part thereof from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of the Borrower, other than the final and indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations.  The Administrative Agent and the other Lenders may, at their election, compromise or adjust any part of the Obligations, make any other accommodation with the Borrower or any other guarantor or exercise any other right or remedy available to them against the Borrower or any other guarantor, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of the Guarantor hereunder except to the
Defenses of Borrower Waived.
 
3
 
extent the Obligations have been fully, finally and indefeasibly paid in cash.  Pursuant to applicable law, the Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though such election operates, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or to extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of the Guarantor against the Borrower.
 
SECTION 6.
  
  In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right that the Administrative Agent or any other Lender has at law or in equity against the Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Borrower or any other Loan Party to pay any Obligation when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, after notice of prepayment or otherwise, the Guarantor hereby promises to and will forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, to or as directed by the Administrative Agent in cash the amount of such unpaid Obligations.  Upon payment by the Guarantor of any sums to or as directed by the Administrative Agent as provided above, all rights of the Guarantor against the Borrower arising as a result thereof by way of right of subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or otherwise shall in all respects be subordinate and junior in right of payment to the prior indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Obligations.  In addition, any indebtedness of any Loan Party now or hereafter owed to the Guarantor is hereby subordinated in right of payment to the prior payment in full of the Obligations.  If, at any time that a Default has occurred and is continuing, any amount shall be paid to the Guarantor on account of (a) such subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or similar right or (b) any such indebtedness of any Loan Party, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent to be credited against the payment of the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents.
Agreement to Pay; Subordination.
 
SECTION 7.
  
  The Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that the Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent or the other Lenders will have any duty to advise the Guarantor of information known to it or any of them regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information.
 
SECTION 8.
  
  The Guarantor represents and warrants that all representations and warranties relating to it contained in the Credit Agreement are true and correct.
Representations and Warranties.
 
SECTION 9.
  
  The guarantee made hereunder (a) shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations) have been indefeasibly paid in full and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement and (b) shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of any Obligation is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Lender or the Guarantor upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Borrower, the Guarantor or otherwise.
Termination.
 
4
 
SECTION 10.
  
  Whenever in this Guarantee Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of the Guarantor that are contained in this Guarantee Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  This Guarantee Agreement shall become effective as to the Guarantor when a counterpart hereof executed on behalf of the Guarantor shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent, and a counterpart hereof shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon the Guarantor and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of the Guarantor, the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders, and their respective successors and assigns, except that the Guarantor shall not have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void).
Binding Effect; Assignments.
 
SECTION 11.
  
  (a)  No failure or delay of the Administrative Agent in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent hereunder and of the other Lenders under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Guarantee Agreement or consent to any departure by the Guarantor therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  No notice or demand on the Guarantor in any case shall entitle the Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
Waivers; Amendment.
 
(b)
  
Neither this Guarantee Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Guarantor and the Administrative Agent, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 12.
  
  THIS AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law.
 
SECTION 13.
  
  All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement.
Notices.
 
SECTION 14.
  
  (a)  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Guarantor herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Administrative Agent and the other Lenders and shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans regardless of any investigation made by the Lenders
Survival of Agreement; Severability.
 
5
 
or on their behalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until all the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement.
 
(b)
  
In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Guarantee Agreement or in any other Loan Document should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and therein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
SECTION 15.
  
  This Guarantee Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract, and shall become effective as provided in Section 10.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Guarantee Agreement by electronic transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Guarantee Agreement.
Counterparts.
 
SECTION 16.
  
  The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement shall be applicable to this Guarantee Agreement.
Rules of Interpretation.
 
SECTION 17.
  
  (a)  The Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the nonexclusive jurisdiction of any New York State court or Federal court of the United States of America sitting in New York City, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding may be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent or any other Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Guarantor or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
  
The Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any New York State or Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest
 
6
 
extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(c)
  
Each party to this Guarantee Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 13.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Guarantee Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 18.
  
  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS AGREEMENT OR THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS. EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS, AS APPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 18.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
SECTION 19.
  
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other Indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender to or for the credit or the account of the Guarantor against any or all the obligations of the Guarantor now or hereafter existing under this Guarantee Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section 19 are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
  Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries and maintenance items, today announced that it has closed on a new $200 million unsecured four-year term loan.
ROANOKE
,
Va.
,
December 4
, 200
7
 
The term loan bears interest at the rate of LIBOR plus a spread.  The Company has six months to fully draw on the $200 million loan.  The spread is currently 100 basis points, resulting in an annualized interest rate of approximately 6.1%, based on current LIBOR.  Under terms of the new facility, the spread over LIBOR will adjust to reflect any future changes in the Companys credit rating.   The Company expects to execute new swap agreements as it borrows on the term loan, which will effectively fix the interest rate on $100 million of the new term loan.
 
The Company plans to use the proceeds from the term loan to repurchase shares.  The Company's Board of Directors authorized a $500 million share repurchase program on August 8, 2007.  Under this authorization, the Company has repurchased 5.8 million shares for $195 million.
 
The lending group was led by JP Morgan and Bank of America.
 
About Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of October 6, 2007, the Company operated 3,228 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
Safe Harbor Statement
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including cost of capital, growth in shareholder value, sales, earnings, and return on invested capital. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080111154557.txt.gz
TIME:20080111154557
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 AGREEMENT (the Agreement), dated as of January 7, 2008, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Darren R. Jackson (the Executive).
 
 The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
 
1.
 
   Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive agrees to serve the Company, as its President and Chief Executive Officer (Executives Position). The parties intend that the Executive shall continue to so serve in this capacity throughout the Employment Term (as such term is defined below).  The Board of Directors of the Company (the Board) currently intends for the Executive to continue to serve his current term as a member of the Board and currently expects that the Executive shall be nominated, and recommended by the Board, for election by the shareholders to the Board during each year of the Employment Term.
  
Position; Term of Employment
.
 
 The term of Executives employment by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall commence on January 7, 2008 (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the third anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the third anniversary of the Commencement Date and on each anniversary thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such automatic extension date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end 90 days following such notice.
 
2.
 
 .
   
Duties
 
 (a)
 
The Executive shall have such duties and responsibilities of Executives Position and such other duties and responsibilities reasonably consistent with the Executives Position as a majority of the Board may request from time to time and shall perform such duties and carry out such responsibilities to the best of the Executives ability for the purpose of advancing the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities).  The Executive shall observe and conform to the applicable policies and directives promulgated from time to time by the Company and its Board of Directors.  Subject to the provisions of Subsection 2(b) below, the Executive shall devote Executives full time, skill and attention during normal business hours to the business and affairs of the Company and its Related Entities, except for holidays and vacations consistent with applicable Company policy and except for illness or incapacity.  Subject to the oversight powers and responsibilities of the Board, the Executive shall manage the Company on a daily basis.
Duties and Responsibilities; Location
.  
 
 The Executive shall not be required to change his place of residence in Minnesota in order to perform the duties and responsibilities of the Executives Position.  The Executives work location shall initially be the Store Support Center in Roanoke, VA.  Executive shall have use of the Company plane to travel to and from Roanoke, VA, and to travel to and from
 
 
charitable board meetings as necessary, subject to the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. and Subsidiaries Policy For Personal Use of Corporate Airplane.  For clarification, the Executives travel from and to his home to and from the Store Support Center shall constitute business travel on behalf of the Company which is necessary to the performance of the Executives duties and responsibilities hereunder, and shall not be deemed by the Company to be Personal Use travel.  The Company shall expend such reasonable resources and otherwise take such actions as are reasonably necessary and appropriate to cause to open, by approximately June 30, 2008 or as soon as practicable thereafter, a corporate executive center in the greater Minneapolis/St. Paul area.  After said corporate executive center is open, Executives principal office location shall be the corporate executive center.
 
  (b)
 
  During the Term of this Agreement, it shall not be a violation of this Agreement for the Executive to, and Executive shall be entitled to (i) serve on corporate, civic, charitable, including without limitation the boards of Marquette University and Cristo Rey Network and the board of the Cristo Rey Jesuit High School located in Minneapolis, Minnesota, retail industry association or professional association boards or committees within the limitations of the Companys Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, (ii) deliver lectures, fulfill speaking engagements or teach at educational institutions and (iii) manage personal investments, so long as such activities do not significantly interfere with the performance of Executives duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement and do not involve a conflict of interest with the Executives duties or responsibilities hereunder.
Other Activities
.
 
3.
 
 .
   
Compensation
 
 (a)
 
  During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay to the Executive a salary of $800,000 per annum, payable consistent with the Companys standard payroll practices then in effect (Base Salary).  Such Base Salary shall be reviewed by the Compensation Committee of Advances Board of Directors (hereinafter the Compensation Committee) at least annually, with any changes taking into account, among other factors, the Company and individual performance.
Base Salary
.
 
 (b)
 
The Executive shall receive a bonus in such amounts and based upon achievement of such corporate and individual performance and other criteria as shall be approved by the Compensation Committee from time to time, with a target amount, if such performance and other criteria are achieved, of 1.5 times the Base Salary (the Target Bonus Amount) which bonus shall be paid in a manner consistent with the Companys bonus practices then in effect.
Bonus
.  
 
 (c)
 
Effective on the Commencement Date, pursuant to and in accordance with the terms of the Advance 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan ("2004 LTIP"), and as previously approved by the Compensation Committee, the Executive shall receive equity awards as set forth in clauses (i) and (ii) below, subject to the standard terms set forth in the forms of Restricted Stock Award or Stock Appreciation Rights Award, as the case may be, previously filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC), for the last paragraph of Section 3 of the form of Restricted Stock Award and the last paragraph of Section 1 of the Stock Appreciation Rights Award, which shall be stricken from the Awards delivered to the Executive with respect to the following grants only; provided, however, that the
Equity Awards
.  
except
 
2
 
language referred to in the first clause of this sentence shall specifically apply only to the awards set forth in clauses (i) and (ii) below and not necessarily to any future award that may be made to the Executive.  For clarification, the awards set forth in clauses (i) and (ii) below are being granted to the Executive as replacement grants for awards foregone by the Executive at his prior employer, while the award set forth in clause (iii) is an original inducement grant, having an initial value of approximately $3 million, to the Executive for future service.  With the approval of the Compensation Committee, however, the Executive has voluntarily waived receipt of the grant in clause (iii) in order to create a pool of Restricted Stock Units to be used at the Executives discretion to reward Company employees, such as store managers and corporate managers, who would not otherwise participate in equity awards, for extraordinary service to customers and the Company:
 
(i)
 
110,000 shares of Restricted Stock.  Initially, none of the shares of Restricted Stock shall be considered vested shares and all shares of Restricted Stock shall be considered unvested shares.  On the third anniversary of the Commencement Date, provided that the Executive's employment has not been terminated for Due Cause or as a Voluntary Termination (as each such term is hereinafter defined), 100% of the Restricted Stock shall be considered vested shares and none of the shares of Restricted Stock shall be considered unvested.
 
(ii)
 
Stock Appreciation Rights with respect to 225,000 shares of common stock of the Company, the exercise price for which shall be 100% of the Fair Market Value (as defined in the 2004 LTIP) of the common stock at the date of grant, of which 25% shall be exercisable, subject to a one-year holding period pursuant to the 2004 LTIP, from and after the Commencement Date.  On each anniversary of the Commencement Date for three years, provided that the Executive's employment has not been terminated for Due Cause or as a Voluntary Termination (as each such term is hereinafter defined), 25% of the Stock Appreciation Rights shall become exercisable, such that all of the Stock Appreciation Rights shall be exercisable as of the third anniversary of the Commencement Date if the Executive has not been terminated for Due Cause or as has not engaged in a Voluntary Termination prior to such date.
 
(iii)
 
Restricted Stock Units with a value on the Commencement Date of three million dollars ($3,000,000) shall be placed in a pool to be used, pursuant to the authorization and delegation of the Board and the Compensation Committee made prior to the date hereof pursuant to and in accordance with the terms of the 2004 LTIP, at the Executives discretion in accordance with the terms of the 2004 LTIP, to reward Company employees, such as store managers and corporate managers, who would not otherwise participate in equity awards, for extraordinary service to customers and the Company.
 
(d)
 
  The Company Shall pay to the Executive the bonus amount Executive would have earned for 2007 under his most recent former employers (Former Employer) bonus plan for 2007, in the maximum amount of $975,000 and the minimum amount of $650,000, which amount shall be paid within a reasonable time after the Former Employer pays bonuses in 2008 but in any event within the first six months of calendar
2007 Bonus Replacement
.
 
3
 
year 2008.  Executive agrees to cooperate with the Compensation Committee to ascertain the amount of such bonus replacement.
 
 (e)
 
  During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans and programs of the Company that are generally available to senior executives of the Company.  Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans and programs, as the same shall be amended from time to time.  Executive shall be entitled to four weeks paid vacation annually.  In addition, Executive shall be provided with a Company-paid annual physical examination at the Mayo Clinic in Rochester, MN.
Benefit Plans
.
 
 (f)
 
  During the Employment Term, the Company shall, in accordance with policies then in effect with respect to payments of business expenses, pay or reimburse the Executive for all reasonable out-of-pocket travel and other expenses (other than ordinary commuting expenses) incurred by the Executive in performing services hereunder; provided, however, that, with respect to reimbursements, if any, not otherwise excludible from the Executives gross income, to the extent required to comply with the provisions of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the Code), no reimbursement of expenses incurred by the Executive during any taxable year shall be made after the last day of the following taxable year, and the right to reimbursement of such expenses shall not be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit.  All such expenses shall be accounted for in such reasonable detail as the Company may require.
Business Expenses
.
 
4.
 
 .
   
Termination of Employment
 
 (a)
 
  In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, Executives employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to the Executives annual Base Salary and Target Bonus then in effect, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Executives death, to the Executives designated beneficiary, or to the Executives estate or other legal representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of Executives death.  In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(i) of this Agreement shall vest immediately and the Stock Appreciation Rights granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(ii) of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives death for all of the SARs if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans and programs in which the Executive was participating at the time of his death.  Except in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect (including the 2004 LTIP or any successor plan thereto, as it relates to the equity grants referenced in Section 3(c) hereof), after the date of Executives death, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Death
.
 
 (b)
 
  In the event of the Executives Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below).  In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executives Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executives
Disability
.
 
4
 
separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executives behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B).  In the event of the Executives Disability during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(i) of this Agreement shall vest immediately and the Stock Appreciation Rights granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(ii) of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives Disability for all of the SARs if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans in which the Executive participates.  The purpose and intent of the preceding two sentences is to ensure that the Executive receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period.  Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Companys benefit programs and other plans then in effect, Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
 
 Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Executives incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing the Executives complete and full-time absence from the Executives duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least 180 days within any 270-day period.  Any determination of the Executives Disability made in good faith by the Company shall be conclusive and binding on the Executive, unless within 10 days after written notice to Executive of such determination, the Executive elects by written notice to the Company to challenge such determination, in which case the determination of Disability shall be made by arbitration pursuant to Paragraph 10 below.  Except as provided in this Subsection 4(b), the Company shall not be required to provide the Executive any compensation or benefits after the determination by the Company unless the arbitration results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled, in which case the Company shall pay to the Executive within 10 days after such arbitration decision all compensation due through the date of such arbitration decision.  The Company shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations related to such compensation and benefits under this Agreement if it makes such payment within 10 days after such arbitration decision.  The Disability Termination Date shall be the date on which the Company makes such determination of the Executives Disability unless the arbitration, if any, results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled.  The Executive shall have a legally binding right to the disability salary continuation benefit as of the Disability Termination Date.
 
 (c)
 
  Nothing herein shall prevent the Company from terminating the Executives employment at any time for Due Cause (as hereinafter defined).  The Executive shall continue to receive the Base Salary provided for in this Agreement only through the period ending with the date of such termination.  Any rights and benefits the Executive may have under employee benefit plans and programs of the Company shall be determined in accordance with the terms of such plans and programs.  Except as provided in the two immediately preceding sentences, after termination of employment for Due Cause, Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Termination by the Company for Due Cause
.
 
5
 
For purposes of this Agreement, Due Cause shall mean:
 
(i)
 
a material breach by the Executive of the Executives duties and obligations under this Agreement or violation in any material respect of any code or standard of conduct generally applicable to the officers of the Company  (1) which is willful and deliberate on the Executives part, (2) which is not due to the Disability of the Executive (within the meaning of Subsection 4(b) but without regard to the requirement that it continue for more than six months or 180 days within a 270-day period), (3) which is committed in bad faith or without reasonable belief that such breach is in the best interests of the Company, and (4) which, if curable, has not been cured by the Executive within 15 business days after the Executives receipt of notice to the Executive specifying the nature of such violations;
 
(ii)
 
a material violation by the Executive of the Executives Loyalty Obligations as provided in Paragraph 18;
 
(iii)
 
conviction ofa crime of moral turpitude or a felony involving  fraud, breach of trust, or misappropriation;
 
 
(iv)
 
the Executives willfully engaging in bad faith conduct that is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Company, monetarily or otherwise; or
 
(v)
 
a determination by a majority of the Board that Executive is in material violation of the Companys Substance Abuse Policy.
 
 (d)
 
  The foregoing notwithstanding, the Company may terminate the Executives employment for any or no reason, as it may deem appropriate in its sole discretion and judgment; , , that in the event such termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall (i) be entitled to a Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and (ii) be sent written notice stating the termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause.  In the event of such termination by the Company, Executive shall receive certain payments and benefits as set forth in this Subsection 4(d).
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
provided
however
 
(i)
 
If the Company terminates the Executives employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term, the term Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
Termination Payment
.  
 
(A)
 
an amount equal to the Executives annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is in connection with an action that would have enabled the Executive to terminate his employment for Good Reason pursuant to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be the Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Termination Salary Payment),
 
(B)
 
an amount equal to the Executives Target Bonus Amount, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is
 
6
 
in connection with an action that would have enabled the Executive to terminate his employment for Good Reason pursuant to Sections 4(e)(i)(A) or (E), in which case, it shall be the Target Bonus in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Target Bonus or termination of the bonus plan, respectively) (the Termination Bonus Payment), and
 
(C)
 
a lump sum payment equal to the prorated value of the Executives annual coverage under the Companys Executive Choice Program (the Termination ECP Payment).
 
(ii)
 
  The Company shall make outplacement services available to Executive, at a cost to the Company not to exceed $12,000, for a period of time not to exceed 12 months following the date of termination pursuant to the Companys executive outplacement program with the Companys selected vendor, to include consulting, search support and administrative services.
Outplacement Services
.
 
(iii)
 
  In addition, the Company shall provide Executive, Executives spouse and covered dependents with medical, dental and vision insurance benefits for three hundred sixty-five (365) days from the date of  Executives termination of employment or until such time as Executive obtains other group health coverage, whichever occurs first.  In order to trigger the Companys obligation to provide health care continuation benefits, Executive must elect continuation coverage required pursuant to the Consolidation Omnibus Budget Act of 1985, as amended (COBRA) upon such eligibility.  The Companys obligation shall be satisfied solely through the payment of Executives COBRA premiums during the 365-day period, but only to the extent that such premiums exceed the amount that would otherwise have been payable by Executive for coverage of Executive and the Executives dependents that were covered by the Companys medical, dental, and vision insurance programs at the time of Executives termination of employment had the Executive continued to be employed by the Company.
Medical Coverage
.
 
(iv)
 
The Termination Salary Payment, Termination Bonus Payment and Termination ECP Payment shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the date of the Executives Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
Timing of Payments
.  
 
(v)
 
Except as provided in Subsection 4(i) of this Agreement, following the Executives termination of employment under this Subsection 4(d), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20).  Except for the Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Entire Obligation
.  
 
7
 
(e)
 
  Termination by the Company without Due Cause under Subsection 4(d) shall be deemed to have occurred if the Executive elects to terminate Executives employment for Good Reason.
Resignation from Employment by the Company for Good Reason
.
 
(i)
 
For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason shall mean:
Good Reason
.  
 
(A)
 
a material diminution in the Executives Base Salary or Target Bonus opportunity;
 
(B)
 
a material diminution in the Executives authority, duties, or responsibilities;
 
(C)
 
the failure of the Nominating Committee of the Board to re-nominate Executive to the Board;
 
(D)
 
a majority of the Boards or a majority shareholders requiring that, or as a result of a corporate reorganization, Executive no longer reports directly to the Board;
 
(E)
 
the termination of the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Executive Incentive Plan without replacement thereof with a similar plan;
 
(F)
 
a material reduction in aggregate benefits available to the Executive if no similar reduction is made for all other senior executives of the Company;
 
(G)
 
the Companys requiring Executive to be based more than 60 miles from the Companys office at which Executive was principally employed immediately prior to the date of the relocation;
 
(H)
 
the delivery by the Company of a notice discontinuing the automatic extension of the Term of Executives employment under this Agreement; or
 
(I)
 
any other action or inaction that constitutes a material breach by the Company of the terms of this Agreement.
 
(ii)
 
In order to be considered a resignation for Good Reason for purposes of this Agreement, the Executive must provide the Company with written notice and description of the existence of the Good Reason condition within ninety (90) days of the initial discovery by the Executive of the existence of said Good Reason condition and the Company shall have 15 business days to cure such Good Reason condition.
Notice of Good Reason Condition
.  
 
(iii)
 
The effective date of the Executives resignation for Good Reason must occur no longer than one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above.  If Executive has not resigned for
Effective Date of Resignation
.  
 
8
 
Good Reason effective within one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above the Executive shall be deemed to have waived said Good Reason condition.
 
(f)
 
.  If the Company terminates the Executives employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control (as defined below), or if the Executive elects to terminate Executives employment for Good Reason prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, then (i) the Executive shall be entitled to a Change In Control Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and Executive shall receive benefits as defined in Subsections 4(d)(ii) and (iii) below, and (ii) either the Company or the Executive, as the case may be, shall provide Notice of Termination pursuant to Subsection 4(i).
Termination by the Company Other Than For Due Cause, Death or Disability or Resignation from Employment for Good Reason Within Twelve Months After a Change In Control
 
(i)
 
.  The term Change In Control Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
Change In Control Termination Payment
 
(A)
 
an amount equal to two times the Executives annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be the Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Change In Control Termination Salary Payment),
 
(B)
 
an amount equal to two times the Executives Target Bonus Amount, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Sections 4(e)(i)(A) or (E), in which case, it shall be the Target Bonus in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Target Bonus or termination of the bonus plan, respectively) (the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment), and
 
(C)
 
a lump sum payment equal to the prorated value of the Executives annual coverage under the Companys Executive Choice Program (the Change In Control Termination ECP Payment).
 
(ii)
 
The Change In Control Termination Salary Payment, the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment and the Change In Control Termination ECP Payment shall be paid in lump sum payments within forty-five days following the date of Executives Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
Timing of Payments
.  
 
(iii)
 
Except as provided in Subsection 4(i) of this Agreement, following the Executives termination of employment under this Subsection 4(f), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such
Entire Obligation
.  
 
9
 
policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20).  Except for the Change In Control Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause or after termination by the Executive for Good Reason, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
 
(iv)
 
For purposes of this Agreement, Change In Control shall have the same meaning as set forth in the 2004 LTIP, as in existence on the date hereof.
Change In Control
.  
 
(v)
 
.
Gross-Up Payment
 
(A)
 
Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that any payment or distribution by the Company, any individual or entity whose actions result in a Change in Control, or their respective subsidiaries or affiliates to or for the benefit of the Executive (including any payment or benefits received in connection with a Change in Control or the Executive's termination of employment, whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any other plan, arrangement or agreement) (all such payments and benefits, excluding the Gross-Up Payment (as defined below), being hereinafter referred to as the "Total Payments") will be subject to any excise tax imposed under section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code") (such tax, the "Excise Tax"), the Company shall pay to the Executive an additional amount (the "Gross Up Payment") such that the net amount retained by the Executive, after deduction of any Excise Tax on the Total Payments and any federal, state and local income and employment taxes and Excise Tax upon the Gross-Up Payment, and after taking into account the phase out of itemized deductions and personal exemptions attributable to the Gross-Up Payment, shall be equal to the Total Payments.
 
(B)
 
For purposes of determining whether any of the Total Payments will be subject to the Excise Tax and the amount of such Excise Tax, (i) all of the Total Payments shall be treated as "parachute payments" (within the meaning of section 280G(b)(2) of the Code) unless, in the opinion of tax counsel ("Tax Counsel") reasonably acceptable to the Executive and selected by the accounting firm which was, immediately prior to the Change in Control, the Company's independent auditor (the "Auditor") (which Tax Counsel may be the Company's general counsel), such payments or benefits (in whole or in part) do not constitute parachute payments, including by reason of section 280G(b)(4)(A) of the Code, (ii) all "excess parachute payments" within the meaning of section 280G(b)(l) of the Code shall be treated as subject to the Excise Tax unless, in the opinion of Tax Counsel, such excess parachute payments (in whole or in part) represent reasonable compensation for services actually rendered (within the meaning of section 280G(b)(4)(B) of the Code) in excess of the Base Amount allocable to such reasonable compensation, or are otherwise not subject to the Excise Tax, and
 
10
 
 
(iii) the value of any non-cash benefits or any deferred payment or benefit shall be determined by the Auditor in accordance with the principles of sections 280G(d)(3) and (4) of the Code.  For purposes of determining the amount of the Gross Up Payment, the Executive shall be deemed to pay federal income tax at the highest marginal rate of federal income taxation in the calendar year in which the Gross Up Payment is to be made and state and local income taxes at the highest marginal rate of taxation in the state and locality of the Executive's residence on the date of termination of the Executive's employment with the Company (or if there is no date of termination, then the date on which the Gross-Up Payment is calculated for purposes of this Subsection 4(f)), net of the maximum reduction in federal income taxes which could be obtained from deduction of such state and local taxes.
 
(C)
 
In the event that the Excise Tax is determined by Tax Counsel to be less than the amount taken into account hereunder in calculating the Gross-Up Payment, the Executive shall repay to the Company, within five (5) business days following the time that the amount of such reduction in the Excise Tax is so determined, the portion of the Gross Up Payment attributable to such reduction (plus that portion of the Gross Up Payment attributable to the Excise Tax and federal, state and local income and employment taxes imposed on the Gross Up Payment being repaid by the Executive), to the extent that such repayment results in a reduction in the Excise Tax and a dollar-for-dollar reduction in the Executive's taxable income and wages for purposes of federal, state and local income and employment taxes, plus interest on the amount of such repayment at 120% of the rate provided in section 1274(b)(2)(B) of the Code.  In the event that the Excise Tax is determined by Tax Counsel to exceed the amount taken into account hereunder in calculating the Gross-Up Payment (including by reason of any payment the existence or amount of which cannot be determined at the time of the Gross Up Payment), the Company shall make an additional Gross Up Payment in respect of such excess (plus any interest, penalties or additions payable by the Executive with respect to such excess) within five (5) business days following the time that the amount of such excess is determined by Tax Counsel (but, in all events, no later than the end of the Executives taxable year following the taxable year in which the Executive remits the related taxes).  The Executive and the Company shall each reasonably cooperate with the other in connection with any administrative or judicial proceedings concerning the existence or amount of liability for Excise Tax with respect to the Total Payments.
 
(D)
 
The determination by Tax Counsel shall be conclusive and binding upon al parties unless the Internal Revenue Service, a court of competent jurisdiction, or such other duly empowered governmental body or agency (a Tax Authority) determines that the Executive owes a greater or lesser amount of Excise Tax with respect to the Total Payments than the amount determined by Tax Counsel.
 
(E)
 
If a Taxing Authority makes a claim against the Executive, the Company shall be liable for and indemnify the Executive against any loss in
 
11
 
 
connection with, and all costs and expenses, including attorneys fees, which may be incurred as a result of contesting the claim.  Should a Taxing Authority finally determine that an additional Excise Tax is owed, then the Company shall, within five (5) business days of such determination, pay an additional Gross Up Payment to the Executive with respect to the additional Excise Tax and any assessed interest, fines or penalties.  Should a Taxing Authority finally determine that the Executive owes a lesser amount of Excise Tax, then the Executive shall repay such excess to the Company within five (5) business days of such determination; provided, however, that such repayment shall be reduced by the amount of any taxes paid by the Executive on such excess which is not offset by the tax benefit attributable to such repayment.
 
(g)
 
  In the event that the Executive terminates Executives employment at Executives own volition prior to the expiration of the Term (except as provided in Subsection 4(e) above), such termination shall constitute a Voluntary Termination and in such event the Executive shall be limited to the same rights and benefits as provided in connection with a termination for Due Cause under Subsection 4(c) above.
Voluntary Termination
.
 
(h)
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be interpreted and operated so that the payment of the benefits set forth herein either shall either be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A of the Code or shall comply with the requirements of such provision; provided however that in no event shall the Company be liable to the Executive for or with respect to any taxes, penalties or interest which may be imposed upon the Executive pursuant to Section 409A.  To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(iii) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Executives separation from service, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(h)(1), from the Company (his Separation from Service), the Executive is a specified employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Executive earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Executives Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death.  The 409A Payments under this Agreement that would otherwise be made during such period shall be aggregated and paid in one lump sum, without interest, on the first business day following the end of the six (6) month period or following the date of the Executives death, whichever is earlier, and the balance of the 409A Payments, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the applicable payment schedule provided in this Section 4.  The Executive hereby acknowledges that he has been advised to seek and has sought the advice of a tax advisor with respect to the tax consequences to the Executive of all payments pursuant to this Agreement, including any adverse tax consequences or penalty taxes under Code Section 409A and applicable State tax law.  Executive hereby agrees to bear the entire risk of any such adverse federal and State tax consequences and penalty taxes in the event any payment pursuant to this Agreement is deemed to be subject to Code Section 409A, and that no representations have been made to the Executive relating to the tax treatment of any payment pursuant to this Agreement under Code Section 409A and the corresponding provisions of any applicable State income tax laws.
Compliance With Code Section 409A
.  
 
12
 
(i)
 
During the term of Executives employment by the Company and for a period ofone (1) year immediately following the termination of Executives employment with the Company, Executive agrees to be reasonably available to assist the Company and its representatives and agents with any business and/or litigation (or potential litigation) matters affecting or involving the Company.  The Company will reimburse Executive for all associated reasonable costs of travel.
Cooperation
.  
 
(j)
 
  Any termination under Subsection 4(b) by the Company for Disability or Subsection 4(c) for Due Cause or by the Executive for Good Reason under Subsection 4(e) or by the Company or the Executive within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control under Subsection 4(f) or by the Executive by Voluntary Termination under Subsection 4(g) shall be communicated by Notice of Termination to the other party thereto given in accordance with Paragraph 9.
Notice of Termination, Resignation and Release
.
 
(i)
 
For purposes of this Agreement, a Notice of Termination means a written notice which (i) indicates the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, (ii) sets forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Executives employment under the provision so indicated and (iii) if the termination date is other than the date of receipt of such Notice, specifies the termination date (which date shall not be prior to the date of such notice or more than 15 days after the giving of such Notice).
Notice of Termination
.  
 
(ii)
 
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in order to be eligible to receive any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executives employment, in addition to fulfilling all other conditions precedent to such receipt, the Executive or Executives legal representative must:
Resignation and Release
.  
 
(A)
 
within 10 days after the termination date, resign as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company, if applicable, and as an officer, director, manager and employee of the Company and its Related Entities, and
 
(B)
 
within 21 days after presentation of a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel, execute said release, on behalf of the Executive and Executives estate, heirs and representatives, releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Companys and such Related Entities respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to Executives employment with the Company; termination of Executives employment; all matters alleged or which could have been alleged in a charge or complaint against the Company; any and all injuries, losses or damages to Employee, including any claims for attorneys fees; any and all claims relating to the conduct of any employee, servant, officer, director or agent of the Company; and any and all matters, transactions or things occurring prior to the date of said release, including any and all possible claims, known or unknown, which could
 
13
 
have been asserted against the Company or the Companys employees, agents, servants, officers or directors.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the form of release shall except out therefrom, and acknowledge the Executives continuing rights with respect to, the following:  (i) all vested rights that the Executive may have under all welfare, retirement and other plans and programs of the Company in which the Executive was participating at the time of his employment termination, including all equity plans and programs of the Company with respect to which equity awards were made to the Executive, (ii) all continuing rights that the Executive may have under this Agreement, and (iii) all rights that the Executive may have following the termination of his employment under the Companys Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, any applicable Company insurance and any indemnity agreements to which the Executive is a party which provide for indemnification, insurance or other, similar coverage for the Executive with respect to his actions or inactions as an officer, employee and/or member of the Board.  Executive may, within five business days of receipt from the Company of the form of release, provide comments to the Company regarding material provisions of the form of release, which the Company in good faith will consider.  For clarification, unless and until the Executive executes the release, the Company shall have no obligation to make any Termination Payment to the Executive, and, even if the Executive does not execute the release, the Executive shall be bound by the post-termination provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation Section 18.
 
(k)
 
  The foregoing notwithstanding, upon the termination of the Executives employment at any time, for any reason, the Executive shall be paid all amounts that had already been earned and accrued as of the time of termination, including but not limited to (i) pay for unused vacation accrued in accordance with the Companys vacation policy; (ii) any bonus that had been earned but not yet paid; and (iii) reimbursement for any business expenses accrued in accordance with Subsection 3(d).
Earned and Accrued Payments
.
 
(l)
 
Executive hereby agrees that the Company may terminate Executives employment under this Paragraph 4 without regard to:  (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of the Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to Executive, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to Executives relationship with the Company; or (iii) without a determination of Due Cause by the Company.
Employment at Will.
 
 
5.
 
 .
   
Successors and Assigns
 
(a)
 
  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company or any corporation or other entity to which the Company may transfer all or substantially all of its assets and business and to which the Company may assign this Agreement, in which case the term Company, as used herein, shall mean such corporation or other entity, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the Company from any obligations hereunder, whether arising prior to or after such assignment.
Assignment by the Company
.
 
14
 
(b)
 
  The Executive may not assign this Agreement or any part hereof without the prior written consent of the Company; , , that nothing herein shall preclude the Executive from designating one or more beneficiaries to receive any amount that may be payable following occurrence of Executives legal incompetency or Death and shall not preclude the legal representative of Executives estate from assigning any right hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto under Executives will or, in the case of intestacy, to the person or persons entitled thereto under the laws of intestacy applicable to Executives estate.  The term beneficiaries, as used in this Agreement, shall mean a beneficiary or beneficiaries so designated to receive any such amount or, if no beneficiary has been so designated, the legal representative of the Executive (in the event of Executives incompetency) or the Executives estate.
Assignment by the Executive
.
provided
however
 
6.
 
   This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
   
Governing Law
.
 
7.
 
   This Agreement contains all of the understandings and representations between the parties hereto pertaining to the matters referred to herein, and supersedes all undertakings and agreements, whether oral or in writing, previously entered into by them with respect thereto, including any previous employment, severance and/or non-competition agreements.  This Agreement may only be modified by an instrument in writing.
   
Entire Agreement
.
 
8.
 
   The waiver by any party of a breach of any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall not operate or be construed to be a waiver of a similar or dissimilar provision or condition at the same or any prior or subsequent time.
   
Waiver of Breach
.
 
9.
 
   Any notice to be given hereunder shall be in writing and delivered personally, or sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such other address as such party may subsequently give notice of hereunder in writing:
   
Notices
.
 
:
If to the Company
 
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA  24012
Attn:  General Counsel
 
:
With a copy to
 
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA  24012
Attn:  Chief Financial Officer
 
:
If to the Executive
 
15
Mr. Darren Jackson
290 Woodlawn Avenue
St. Paul, MN  55105
 
:
With a copy to
 
Dorsey & Whitney LLP
Suite 1500
50 South Sixth Street
Minneapolis, MN  55403
Attn:  Robert A. Rosenbaum
 
10.
 
   Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or any breach thereof, excepting only the enforcement of any Loyalty Obligations arising under Paragraph 18 of this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association then in effect in the Commonwealth of Virginia and judgment upon such award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.  The board of arbitrators shall consist of one arbitrator to be appointed by the Company, one by the Executive, and one by the two arbitrators so chosen.  The arbitration shall be held at such place as may be agreed upon at the time by the parties to the arbitration.  The cost of arbitration shall be borne as determined by the arbitrators.
   
Arbitration
.
 
11.
 
   Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments required to be made by the Company hereunder to the Executive or Executives estate or beneficiaries shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts relating to taxes as the Company may reasonably determine it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.  In lieu of withholding such amounts, in whole or in part, the Company may, in its sole discretion, accept other provisions for payment of taxes and withholdings as required by law, provided it is satisfied that all requirements of law affecting its responsibilities to withhold have been satisfied.
   
Withholding
.
 
12.
 
   In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
   
Severability
.
 
13.
 
   Titles to the paragraphs and subsections in this Agreement are intended solely for convenience and no provision of this Agreement is to be construed by reference to the title of any paragraph or subsection.
   
Titles
.
 
14.
 
   The Company agrees to pay the reasonable fees and expenses of Executives legal counsel in connection with the negotiation and execution of this Agreement.
   
Legal Fees
.
 
15.
 
 .  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
   
Counterparts
 
16.
 
 .  Except as provided in Paragraph 12 above, this Agreement may not be modified or amended except by written instrument signed by all parties hereto.
   
Amendment
 
16
 
17.
 
   This Agreement has been prepared by the Company with the assistance of Bingham McCutchen LLP, as counsel to the Company (Counsel), after full disclosure of its representation of the Company and with the consent and direction of the Company and the Executive.  The Executive has reviewed the contents of this Agreement and fully understands its terms.  The Executive acknowledges that the Executive is fully aware of the Executives right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company, that Counsel has advised him of such right and disclosed to him the risks in not seeking such independent advice, and that the Executive fully understands the potentially adverse interests of the parties with respect to this Agreement.  The Executive further acknowledges that neither the Company nor its Counsel has made representations or given any advice with respect to the tax or other consequences of this Agreement or any transactions contemplated by this Agreement to him, that the Executive has been advised of the importance of seeking independent counsel with respect to such consequences, and that the Executive had obtained independent counsel with respect to such consequences.  By executing this Agreement, the Executive represents that Executive has, after being advised of the potential conflicts between him and the Company with respect to the future consequences of this Agreement, consulted independent legal counsel at Dorsey & Whitney LLP.
   
Counsel
.
 
18.
 
 The Executive agrees that the following obligations (Loyalty Obligations) shall apply in consideration of the Executives employment by or continued employment with the Company:
   
Loyalty Obligations
.  
 
(a)
 
.
Confidential Information
 
(i)
 
.  The Executive agrees at all times during the term of the Executives employment and thereafter, to hold any Confidential Information of the Company or its Related Entities in strictest confidence, and not to use (except for the benefit of the Company to fulfill the Executives employment obligations) or to disclose to any person, firm or corporation other than the Company or those designated by it said Confidential Information without the prior authorization of the Company, except as may otherwise be required by law or legal process.  The Executive agrees that Confidential Information means any proprietary information prepared or maintained in any format, including technical data, trade secrets or know-how in which the Company or Related Entities have an interest, including, but not limited to, business records, contracts, research, product or service plans, products, services, customer lists and customers (including, but not limited to, vendors to the Company or Related Entities on whom the Executive called, with whom the Executive dealt or with whom Executive became acquainted during the term of the Executives employment), pricing data, costs, markets, expansion plans, summaries, marketing and other business strategies, software, developments, inventions, processes, formulas, technology, designs, drawings, engineering, hardware configuration or marketing, financial or other business information obtained by the Executive or disclosed to the Executive by the Company or Related Entities or any other person or entity during the term of the Executives employment with the Company either directly or indirectly electronically, in writing, orally, by drawings, by observation of services, systems or other aspects of the business of the Company or Related Entities or otherwise.  Confidential Information does not include information that: (A) was available to the public prior to the time of disclosure, whether through press
Company Information
 
17
 
releases, SEC filings or otherwise or (B) otherwise becomes available to the public through no act or omission of the Executive.
 
(ii)
 
.  The Executive recognizes that the Company and Related Entities have received and in the future will receive from third parties their confidential or proprietary information subject to a duty on the part of the Company or Related Entities to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to use it only for certain limited purposes.  The Executive agrees at all times during the Executives employment and thereafter to hold all such confidential or proprietary information in the strictest confidence and not to disclose it to any person, firm or corporation or to use it except as necessary in carrying out the Executives work for the Company consistent with the obligations of the Company or Related Entities with such third party.
Third Party Information
 
(b)
 
.  The Executive agrees that, during the term of the Executives employment with the Company, the Executive will not engage in any other employment, occupation, consulting or other business activity directly related to the business in which the Company or Related Entities are now involved or become involved during the term of the Executives employment.  Nor will the Executive engage in any other activities that conflict with the business of the Company or Related Entities.  Furthermore the Executive agrees to devote such time as may be necessary to fulfill the Executives obligations to the Company.
Conflicting Employment
 
(c)
 
.  The Executive agrees that any and all devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items developed by the Executive or others pursuant to or during the Executives employment with the Company or otherwise shall be the property of the Company or its Related Entities and their respective successors or assigns.  At the time of leaving the employ of the Company, the Executive will deliver all material Company property to the Company or to the Companys designee and will not keep in the Executives possession, recreate or deliver said property to anyone else.  In the event of the termination of the Executives employment and upon request by the Company, the Executive agrees to sign and deliver the Termination Certification attached hereto as .
Returning Company Property
Exhibit A
 
(d)
 
.  In the event that the Executive leaves the employ of the Company, the Executive hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to the Executives new employer (whether the Executive is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, executive or manager) about the Executives obligations under this Agreement.
Notification of New Employer
 
(e)
 
.  The Executive covenants and agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Executives employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall not, without the prior written approval of the Company, directly or indirectly, either on behalf of the Executive or any other person or entity, Interfere with the Company or any of its Related Entities.
Non-Interference
 
18
 
(i)
 
For purposes of this Agreement, Interfere shall mean, except in the performance of the Executives duties and responsibilities on behalf of and for the benefit of the Company, (A) to solicit, entice, persuade, induce, influence or attempt to influence, directly or indirectly, customers or prospective customers, suppliers or prospective suppliers, employees, agents or independent contractors of the Company or any of its Related Entities to restrict, reduce, sever or otherwise alter their relationship with the Company or any of its Related Entities, or (B) whether as a direct solicitor or provider of such services, or in a direct management or direct supervisory capacity over others who solicit or provide such services, to solicit or provide services that fall within the definition of Restricted Activities as defined in Subsection 18(f)(ii) below to any customer of the Company or its Related Entities.
 
(ii)
 
After termination of the Executives employment, this provision shall only apply to those employees, independent contractors, customers or suppliers of the Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to the date of such termination.
 
(f)
 
.
Covenants Not to Compete
 
(i)
 
.  Executive covenants and agrees that during the period from the date hereof until, two (2) years immediately following the termination, for any reason, of Executives employment with the Company (the Non-Compete Period),  Executive will not, directly or indirectly:
Non-Competition
 
(A)
 
own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 5% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder of any company or business that derives more than 15% of its revenue from the Restricted Activities (as defined below) within the Restricted Area (as defined below), or any company or business controlling, controlled by or under common control with any company or business directly engaged in such Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area (any of the foregoing, a Restricted Company) or
 
(B)
 
engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, executive, partner, independent contractor, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
 
(ii)
 
  For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Activities means the retail, wholesale or commercial sale of aftermarket auto parts and accessories.  The term Restricted Area means the United States of America, including its territories and possessions.
Restricted Activities/Restricted Area
.
 
(iii)
 
In the event that the Executive intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, executive or director) with any Restricted Company during the
Association with Restricted Company
.  
 
19
 
 
Non-Compete Period, the Executive must provide information in writing to the Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by the Executive for such Restricted Company.  All such current associations are set forth on to this Agreement.  In the event that the Company consents in writing to the Executives engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by the Executive shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of this Subsection 18(f).  Such consent is not intended and shall not be deemed to be a waiver or nullification of the covenant of non-competition of the Executive or other similarly bound executives.
Exhibit B
 
(iv)
 
Nothing in this Subsection 18(f) shall preclude the Executive from accepting employment with a multi-division company so long as (A) the Executives employment is not within a division of the new employer that engages in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area, (B) during the course of such employment, the Executive does not communicate related to Restricted Activities with any division of Executives new employer engaged in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area and (C) the Executive does not engage in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
Permitted Employment with Multi-Division Company
.  
 
(g)
 
.  The Executive agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year following the termination of the Executives employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive will not take any action or make any statement which disparages the Company or its practices or which disrupts or impairs its normal operations, such that it causes a material adverse impact to the Company.
Non-Disparagement
 
(h)
 
Executives post-termination of employment obligations under this Paragraph 18 shall cease upon the Companys failure to make any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executives employment when due if within 15 days after written notice of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment.  In the event that the Executive materially violates Subsection 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the applicable period under Subsection 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g), and the denominator of which is the total number of days in the applicable period under such Section.  In the event that Executive materially violates Subsection 18(a) or 18(c), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the two (2) year period immediately following the termination and the denominator of which is 730.  The Executive further agrees that such repayment obligation shall constitute liquidated damages and that the Company shall have no other right to damages under this Agreement or at law with respect to breaches of Subsection 18(a), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g),
Effect of Non-Payment of Benefits; Clawback
.  
 
20
 
 
but the Company shall have the right to seek equitable relief pursuant to Subsection 18(i) hereunder.
 
(i)
 
.  The Executive acknowledges that the Company and Related Entities, as the case may be, may be irreparably injured if the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) and 18(g) hereof are not specifically enforced and Executive agrees that the terms of such provisions (including without limitation the periods set forth in Subsections 18(e), 18(f) and 18(g)) are reasonable and appropriate.  If Executive commits, or the Company has evidence based on which it reasonably believes the Executive threatens to commit, a material breach of any of the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof, , it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach will cause irreparable injury to the Company and/or Related Entities and that money damages will not provide an adequate remedy therefore.  Such injunction shall be available without the posting of any bond or other security, and Executive hereby consents to the issuance of such injunction.
Specific Enforcement; Remedies Cumulative; Attorney Fees
the Company and/or Related Entities, as the case may be, shall have the right and remedy, in addition to and not in limitation of any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, to have the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction through immediate injunctive and other equitable relief
 
(j)
 
In the event that a legal or equitable action is commenced with respect to any of the provisions of Subsections 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof and the Executive has not complied, in all material respects, with the provisions in such subsections with respect to which such action has been commenced, then the one-year or two-year period, as described in such subsections not so complied with by the Executive, shall be extended from its original expiration date, day-for-day, for each day that the Executive is found to have not complied, in all material respects, with such subsections.
Re-Set of Period for Non-Competition and Non-Interference
.
 
(k)
 
WITH RESPECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY AND ALL LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS ARISING UNDER PARAGRAPH 18, THE SUBSECTIONS 18(k) AND 18(l) OF THIS AGREEMENT SHALL APPLY.  THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY CONSENT TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE FOLLOWING COURTS IN MATTERS RELATED TO THIS PARAGRAPH 18 AND AGREE NOT TO COMMENCE ANY SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING THERETO EXCEPT IN ANY OF SUCH COURTS: THE STATE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE CITY OF ROANOKE, VIRGINIA, OR THE STATE COURTS OR THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN ANY MUNICIPALITY WHEREIN AN OFFICE OF THE COMPANY IS LOCATED, IN WHICH OFFICE THE EXECUTIVE WAS PHYSICALLY PRESENT WHILE RENDERING SERVICES FOR THE COMPANY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING OR IMMEDIATELY  PRECEDING THE TERMINATION OF EXECUTIVES EMPLOYMENT, IF TERMINATED.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
 
 
21
 
(l)
 
EXECUTIVE AGREES TO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BASED UPON, OR RELATED TO, ANY LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS.  THIS WAIVER IS KNOWINGLY, INTENTIONALLY, AND VOLUNTARILY MADE BY EXECUTIVE, AND EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT, EXCEPT FOR THE COMPANYS AGREEMENT TO LIKEWISE WAIVE ITS RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY (WHICH THE COMPANY HEREBY MAKES), THE COMPANY HAS NOT MADE ANY REPRESENTATIONS OF FACTS TO INDUCE THIS WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY OR IN ANY WAY TO MODIFY OR NULLIFY ITS EFFECT.  EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS BEEN REPRESENTED (OR HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO BE REPRESENTED) IN THE SIGNING OF THIS AGREEMENT AND IN THE MAKING OF THIS WAIVER BY INDEPENDENT LEGAL COUNSEL, SELECTED OF EXECUTIVES OWN FREE WILL, AND THAT EXECUTIVE HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS THIS WAIVER WITH COUNSEL.  EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE MEANING AND RAMIFICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER AND AS EVIDENCE OF THIS FACT SIGNS THIS AGREEMENT BELOW.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
 
19.
 
   Executive agrees to adhere diligently to all established Company policies and procedures, including but not limited to the Companys Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and, if applicable, the Code of Ethics for Financial Professionals.  Executive agrees that if Executive does not adhere to any of the provisions of such Guidelines and Codes, Executive will be in breach of the provisions hereof.
   
Adherence to Company Policies
.
 
20.
 
 .  Executive agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement.  Executive represents that Executives performance of all the terms of this Agreement will not breach any agreement to keep in confidence proprietary information acquired by Executive in confidence or in trust prior to Executives employment by the Company.  Executive has not entered into, and Executive agrees Executive will not enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith and Executives employment by the Company and Executives services to the Company will not violate the terms of any oral or written agreement to which Executive is a party.
   
Representations
 
 
22
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
23
 
 
This is to certify that I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return, any material devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items belonging to the Company.
 
I further certify that I have, to the best of my knowledge, complied in all material respects with all the terms of my Employment Agreement with the Company.
 
 
 
LIST OF ASSOCIATIONS WITH RESTRICTED COMPANIES
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
____ None
____ Additional Sheets Attached
 
Signature of Employee:_________________________________
Print Name of Employee:________________________________
 
 
Date:_______________________
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080123121222.txt.gz
TIME:20080123121222
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., January 23, 2008
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, today announced that Michael Moore has resigned his position as Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer to pursue other business opportunities, effective February 1, 2008.  Mr. Moore joined Advance in December 2005.
 
I want to personally thank Michael for his dedicated service to Advance Auto Parts, its customers, Team Members and stockholders, said President and Chief Executive Officer Darren Jackson.
 
Advance also announced that it has named Michael Mike Norona as its Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.   In this role as CFO, Mr. Norona will be responsible for all financial aspects of the company, including accounting, internal audit, investor relations, treasury and tax, budgeting and financial management and risk finance and claims.  Mr. Norona will be a member of Advances Executive Committee, and will report directly to Jackson.
 
We are very excited to have an executive of Mikes caliber join our company, said Jackson.  Mikes global experience, financial experience and long track record of successes is going to be an asset to our team.
 
Prior to joining Advance, Mr. Norona spent his entire 19-year career in various finance capacities with Best Buy, the first 14 of which were with Future Shop, a Best Buy subsidiary in Canada.  He has held escalating Finance leadership roles, including officer positions in Shared Services, Retail Decision Support and Head of Finance of Future Shop.  Mr. Norona brings significant hands on experience in many aspects of retail and finance through his direct involvement in the company's significant growth. In 2006, Mike expanded the Financial Services area as a new growth opportunity for Best Buy and he most recently served as Best Buy's President of Financial Services.
 
Mr. Norona has a Bachelors of Commerce Degree in Accounting from the University of British Columbia, Canada, as well as Professional Accounting Designation (CGA).   He is a member of the Certified General Accountants of Canada.
 
 
 
 
 
Advance Auto Parts Announces Change of Chief Financial Officer
January 23, 2008
Page 2
 
 
 
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales. As of October 6, 2007, the Company operated 3,228 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
 
 
 
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080213172904.txt.gz
TIME:20080213172904
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va., February 13, 2008
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 29, 2007.
 
 
 
 
Fourth Quarter and Annual Highlights
Total revenue for the fourth quarter was over $1 billion.  Comparable-store sales declined by 0.4% compared to an increase of 1.6% last year.   The decrease was comprised of a 3.1% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales and an 8.2% increase in do-it-for-me (DIFM) sales.  This compares to a 0.3% decrease in DIY and a 7.9% increase in DIFM in the fourth quarter last year.
 
Fourth quarter gross margin was 47.1% of sales, which was flat compared to last year as a result of higher selling margin offset by higher shrinkage expense.
 
 
Fourth quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 41.0% of sales compared to 40.8% last year, an increase of 24 basis points due to lower than anticipated sales and higher related occupancy expenses.
 
The Company reported quarterly interest expense of $8.2 million in the quarter compared to $7.8 million last year.   During the fourth quarter, two million Advance shares or 2% of the outstanding shares were repurchased for $75 million at an average price of $37.10.
 
Fourth quarter earnings per diluted share were $0.35 compared to $0.33 in the same quarter last year.
 
For the year, total revenue increased to $4.8 billion from $4.6 billion last year. The total year comparable-store sales increase of 0.8%, comprised of a 1.0% decrease in DIY sales and a 6.7% increase in DIFM sales, compares to a 2.1% increase last year.
 
For the year, gross margin was 47.9% of sales, a 23 basis-point improvement from last year. SG&A expenses were 39.3% of sales as compared to 39.0% in 2006.  Total year earnings per diluted share were $2.28, compared to $2.16 last year, an increase of 5.6%.   The company repurchased 8.3 million shares or 8% of its outstanding shares during fiscal year 2007 at an aggregate cost of $286 million, or $34.27 per share.  Since the end of 2007, the Company has repurchased another 4.6 million shares at an average price of $34.04 for a total expenditure of $155 million.
 
 
The fourth quarter and fiscal year 2007 came up short of our financial expectations, said Darren Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.   That being said, we made significant progress in building the strategic roadmap to become a more customer-driven company.
 
 
Total sales growth decreased compared to the prior fourth quarter and year due to lower comparable store sales and fewer new stores.  Lower comparable store sales for the fourth quarter resulted from a significant deceleration in DIY sales during the holiday season.  The Florida and Gulf Coast sales results continued to be difficult.   DIY accessories and motor oil sales experienced the largest declines in the quarter. DIFM sales remained consistently strong through the fourth quarter as a result of the renewed focus on this business and the initiatives that are driving greater parts availability.   All regions experienced solid DIFM growth in the quarter ranging from 5% to 11%.   Parts and chemicals experienced the largest gains in the quarter.   The combined lower comparable store sales resulted in sales per square foot being relatively flat.
 
SG&A expenses per store declined modestly in the quarter and for the year.   The SG&A reductions offset higher inflation costs.  Overall inventory investment per store declined slightly for the year as increased parts availability was offset by the removal of less productive inventory.
 
 
Our strategic initiatives are beginning to take hold, stated Elwyn Murray, Executive Vice President, Customer Development Officer.  Our parts availability commercial trends are solid despite a tough economic environment.
 
Annual Guidance Summary
The guidance for 2008 fiscal year is based on the prevailing economic environment where the Company believes it is prudent to forecast comparable store sales to be flat until Company trends demonstrate consistent and sustainable improvement. Operating income, as a percentage of sales, is expected to be approximately flat compared to 2007.   Gross margin is expected to improve modestly from continued lower costs and leverage of the logistics network.  The SG&A rate will modestly increase from higher occupancy and other fixed costs.  The SG&A rate would be expected to leverage were the company to achieve 1% comparable store sales.  With these assumptions, earnings per diluted share are anticipated to be approximately $2.55 in 2008 compared to $2.28 in 2007, or an increase of 12%.  It is anticipated that a 1% improvement in comparable store sales versus guidance would add approximately $0.10 to earnings per diluted share.  A 10 basis point improvement in operating margin rate would be expected to add approximately $0.03 earnings per diluted share.  Fiscal year 2008 includes 53 weeks and guidance is for that period.  The 53 week is anticipated to have an approximate $0.10 positive impact on 2008 earnings per diluted share results.
rd
 
 
Our 2008 fiscal year guidance reflects our actual trends and the economic uncertainty which we believe is prudent, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  However, we are focused on achieving higher levels of sales and earnings growth based on our strategic priorities.
Dividend
On February 13, 2008, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on April 4, 2008 to stockholders of record as of March 21, 2008.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, February 14, 2008 at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site, , or dial (866) 908-1AAP.  The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until February 14, 2009.
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts is the second-largest retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, based on store count and sales.  As of December 29, 2007, the Company operated 3,261 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  The Company serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, CAPEX, comparable-store sales, gross margin,  SG&A, operating income, and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2008.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 30, 2006, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080219172510.txt.gz
TIME:20080219172510
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
ii
 
I.
 
.
Offices
 
Section  1.01
 
.  The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Registered Office
 
Section  1.02
 
.  The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
 
II.
 
.
Stockholders
 
Section  2.01
 
.  Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
Place of Meetings
 
Section  2.02
 
.  An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting.  To be properly brought before the meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder.  For business to be properly brought before the annual meeting by a stockholder, written notice of such business must be delivered to, or mailed to and received by, the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than forty-five (45) days or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the preceding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later that the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above.  A stockholders notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of the stockholder proposing such business and the name and address of the beneficial owner, if different than the stockholder of record, on whose behalf the proposal is made, (c) the class and number of shares of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and (d) any material interest of the stockholder or such beneficial owner in such business.  Notwithstanding anything in these By-Laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the
Annual Meetings
 
1
 
procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair or other person presiding at the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
Section  2.03
 
.  A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, or the Board of Directors and may not be called by any other person or persons.  Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting.
Special Meetings
 
Section  2.04
 
.  A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less then 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting.  Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholders mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
Notice of Meetings
 
Section  2.05
 
.  Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice.  Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  2.06
 
.  At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum.  If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
Quorum
 
Section  2.07
 
.  The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place.  The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented.  If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.  Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken.  At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
Adjourned Meetings
 
2
 
Section  2.08
 
.  
Voting
 
(a)
 
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholders name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date.  Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
(b)
 
Elections of directors shall not be required to be conducted by written ballot.  The vote upon any other question before a meeting need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.13.  At all meetings of stockholders for the election of directors a plurality of the votes cast shall be sufficient to elect such directors.  All other elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
 
Section  2.09
 
.  
Proxies
 
(a)
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.  A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.  A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
 
(b)
 
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission.  If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied.  Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
 
(c)
 
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then
 
3
 
that one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
 
Section  2.10
 
.  
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
 
(a)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
(b)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
(c)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.10, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action.  If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(d)
 
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.10 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  2.11
 
.  
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
 
(a)
 
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of the stockholders may
 
4
 
be taken without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted, and shall be delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
(b)
 
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within 60 days of the earliest dated consent delivered in the manner required by Section 2.11 (a) to the Corporation, written consents signed by a sufficient number of holders to take action are delivered to the Corporation as required by Section 2.11(a).
 
Section  2.12
 
.  The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held.  The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.  Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting.  The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
Stockholder List
 
Section  2.13
 
.  The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
 
(a)
 
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof.  The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act.  If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting.  Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
5
 
(b)
 
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots.  The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
 
(c)
 
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting.  No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
 
(d)
 
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record.  If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
III.
 
.
Board of Directors
 
Section  3.01
 
.  The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.  The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings.  The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting.  Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
General Powers; Organization
 
Section  3.02
 
.  The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than eight (8) nor more than twelve (12).  Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified.  Directors need not be stockholders.
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
 
6
 
Section  3.03
 
.  
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)
 
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Corporation.  Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b)
 
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office, in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
 
Section  3.04
 
.  Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Regular Meetings
 
Section  3.05
 
.  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Special Meetings
 
Section  3.06
 
.  Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
Notice of Special Meetings
 
Section  3.07
 
.  Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given.  Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  3.08
 
.  Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.  If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum
 
Section  3.09
 
.  
Committees of Directors
 
(a)
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of
 
7
 
one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
(b)
 
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
(c)
 
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporations property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
(d)
 
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.  Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business.  In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
 
Section 3.10         The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director.  The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
Lead Director.
 
Section 3.11      .  Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other.  For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.11 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
Conference Communications
 
Section 3.12      .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
Action by Written Consent of Directors
 
8
 
Section 3.13      .  The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
Compensation
 
Section 3.14      .  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section shall be eligible for election as Directors.  Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote for the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section.  Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation.  To be timely, a stockholders notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Company not less than forty-five (45) or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the proceeding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  Such stockholders notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, and (iv) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for election of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (including without limitation such persons written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (b) as to the stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder.  At the request of the Board of Directors any person nominated by the Board of Directors for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in a stockholders notice of nomination which pertains to the nominee.  No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
Nomination Procedures
 
IV.
 
.  
Officers
 
Section  4.01
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members.  The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other
Number
 
9
 
officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate.  Any person may hold two or more offices.
 
Section  4.02
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.  All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.  Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
 
Section  4.03
 
.  The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors.
Compensation
 
Section  4.04
 
.  
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)
 
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation.  Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
 
(b)
 
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors.  Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
 
(c)
 
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  4.05
 
.  The Board of Directors shall designate the Chair or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  If there is no Chair, the President shall be the Chief Executive Officer.  The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.  
Chief Executive Officer
 
Section 4.06       .  The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside.  The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at  meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Chair of the Board
 
Section 4.07       .  The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chair (if the Chair is the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation), shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect.
President
 
10
 
Section 4.08       .  During the absence or disability of the Chair and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 4.09       .  The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose.  The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws.  The Secretary shall duly give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
Secretary
 
Section 4.10       .  The Treasurer shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed.  He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate.  The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation.  The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
Treasurer
 
Section 4.11      .  All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may, without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
Authority and Other Duties
 
V.
 
.
Indemnification
 
Section  5.01
 
.  The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time.  The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the
Indemnification
 
11
 
Corporation.  The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation.  For such purpose, (X) Independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
 
(i)
 
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directorsto fill vacancies on the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
-
 
(ii)
 
Thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
 
(iii)
 
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
 
(iv)
 
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
 
Section  5.02
 
.  The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense.  The Company shall not be obligated
Insurance
 
12
 
under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
 
Section  5.03
 
.  Expenses (including attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
Expenses Payable in Advance
 
VI.
 
.
Stock
 
Section  6.01
 
.  
Certificates for Stock
 
(a)
 
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
 
(b)
 
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her.  The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
 
(c)
 
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
 
(d)
 
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated.  Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
 
Section  6.02
 
.  The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend.  At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of
Issuance of Stock
 
13
 
any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted.  The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted.  Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable.  Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
 
Section  6.03
 
.  The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore.  The total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated.  The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
Partly Paid Stock
 
Section  6.04
 
.  The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders
 
Section  6.05
 
.  Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholders legal representative or the stockholders duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon surrender of the certificate or the certificates for such stock.  Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.  No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
Transfer of Stock
 
Section  6.06
 
.  Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate.  A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
14
 
Section  6.07
 
.  Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Facsimile Signatures
 
VII.
 
.
Miscellaneous
 
Section  7.01
 
.  
Dividends
 
(a)
 
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporations capital stock from the Corporations surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year.  Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.  Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
 
(b)
 
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
 
Section  7.02
 
.  No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or (c) the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders.  Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Interested Directors and Officers
 
15
 
Section  7.03
 
.  Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present.  The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
 
Section  7.04
 
.  
Execution of Instruments
 
(a)
 
All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
(b)
 
If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
 
Section  7.05
 
.  The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.
Advances
 
Section  7.06
 
.  The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of  December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year
 
Section  7.07
 
.  The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal.  The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
Corporate Seal
 
Section  7.08
 
.  Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time.  The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
Form of Records
 
16
 
Section  7.09
 
.  These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.  If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
Power to Amend
 
17


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080515172758.txt.gz
TIME:20080515172758
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va, May 15, 2008
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP) a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the first quarter ended April 19, 2008.  First quarter earnings per diluted share increased 21% to $0.86 versus $0.71 last year.
 
 
 
 
 
First Quarter Highlights
 
Total revenue for the first quarter increased 4.0% to $1.53 billion, compared with revenue of $1.47 billion in the first quarter of fiscal year 2007.  The revenue increase reflected the net addition of 141 new stores in the past 12 months and a comparable store sales increase of 0.6% during the quarter compared to an increase of 0.7% in the first quarter last year.  The comparable store sales gain was comprised of a 10.6% increase in commercial sales offset by a 3.0% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales.  This compares to a 4.2% increase in commercial and a 0.5% decrease in DIY in the first quarter last year.
 
The gross profit rate was 48.7% in the first quarter as compared to 48.3% in the prior year, which reflects a 39 basis point improvement from the prior year.  The 39 basis point improvement is driven by lower supply chain and logistics costs combined with more effective pricing.
 
The Companys first quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 39.3% of sales compared to 39.1% last year. This increase of 11 basis points was driven by de-leverage due to modest comp store sales and increased incentive compensation expenses, which was almost entirely offset by cost reduction initiatives that primarily occurred during the second half of fiscal year 2007.
 
Operating cash flow for the quarter increased 14.3%.  Free cash flow for the quarter increased 43.1% to $150.5 million from $105.1 million in first quarter 2007.  Capital expenditures were $58.9 million for the quarter. This compares to $75.9 million in 2007, which results in a reduction of $17.0 million, driven by a decrease in store development as well as the timing associated with the construction of a new distribution center.
 
As previously disclosed, the Company repurchased approximately 4.6 million shares during the first quarter 2008 at an average price of $34.04 for a total expenditure of $155 million.  The Company repurchased 8.3 million and 3.7 million shares in fiscal 2007 and fiscal 2006, respectively.
 
The dedication and hard work of our Team Members and the actions we took to improve our performance are beginning to show up in our financial results as evidenced by the strong commercial double-digit comparable store sales increase as well as a lower cost structure, said Darren Jackson,
 
2
 
President and Chief Executive Officer.  We are encouraged with our first quarter financial results yet we are realistic that our turnaround is in it formative stages.
 
 
 
The Company continues to focus on four key strategies to turn around the business  DIY Transformation, Commercial Acceleration, Availability Excellence and Superior Experience. The strategies are focused on what matters most to the customer.  The Company made progress on the turnaround
 
3
 
including senior management changes to lead strategy implementation, launching a new brand campaign Keep the wheels turning, and introducing new brands including MOOG, Wagner and Remy to enhance brand quality while improving parts availability.
 
The tangible strategic results are just beginning to emerge, said Jackson.  The first phase of our turnaround is on track.  We made material progress on focusing the organization on the four turnaround strategies.  The Company will continue to educate, engage and enable the team to execute and assess the strategies.  We remain confident that our key financial metrics will improve as our turnaround progresses.
 
Annual Outlook Summary
 
Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer said, We are pleased with our first quarter results and pragmatic about the current economic headwinds and the fact that three quarters remain in our fiscal year.  The Company provides an annual outlook at the beginning of the year only.  We are in a turnaround and our financial results will not be linear. The turnaround approach will entail an in-depth assessment of all parts of the business.  Correspondingly, I expect short-term earnings volatility while we position the Company to increase long-term value.
 
Share Repurchase Authorization
 
The Companys Board of Directors today authorized a $250 million share repurchase program. This new authorization replaces the Companys $500 million share repurchase program authorized in August 2007, which had $105 million remaining.  Under the $500 million share repurchase authorization, the Company repurchased 11.6 million shares at an average price of $34.13 per share.
 
Dividend
 
On May 15, 2008, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on July 3, 2008 to stockholders of record as of June 20, 2008.
 
Annual Meeting Announcements
 
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 15, 2008.  During the meeting, the following individuals were approved to serve on the Companys Board of Directors for the next year:
 
 
4
 
 
The other proposal approved by the stockholders was the ratification of the appointment by the Companys Audit Committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as its independent registered public accounting firm for 2008.
 
Appointment of Board Member
 
The Company is pleased to announce that John F. Bergstrom, Chairman and Chief Executive Officer of Bergstrom Corporation, has been appointed to its Board of Directors.  Mr. Bergstrom has served in his current role for the past five years. Bergstrom Corporation owns and operates 24 automobile dealerships representing 26 different brands.  Mr. Bergstrom serves as a director of Kimberly-Clark Corporation, Wisconsin Energy Corporation, Midwest Airlines, and the Green Bay Packers.  Mr. Bergstrom also serves as President of the Theda Clark Medical Center Foundation.
 
John Bergstroms 30 years of automobile industry experience and his extraordinary track record of customer service excellence will be a great asset to our Board of Directors, stated Jack Brouillard, Chairman of the Board.
 
In Conference Call
vestor
 
The Company will host a conference call on Friday, May 16, 2008 at 8:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys Web site,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(
866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys Web site until May 16, 2009.
 
 
5
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets   As of April 19, 2008, the Company operated 3,291 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and on-line shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys web site at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, CAPEX, comparable-store sales, gross margin,  SG&A, operating income, and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2008.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2007, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080521172505.txt.gz
TIME:20080521172505
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080604172959.txt.gz
TIME:20080604172959
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 10.32
FIRST AMENDMENT, dated as of June 4, 2008 (First Amendment) to the EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, dated as of January 7, 2008, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Darren R. Jackson (the Executive) (the Agreement).
 
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
 
1.           .  Effective upon execution of this First Amendment by the Company and the Executive, Section 4(a) of the Agreement shall be amended to provide, in the event of the Executives death, for the immediate vesting of all shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of the Agreement and the immediate exercisability of all Stock Options and Stock Appreciation Rights granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of the Agreement, and said Section 4(a) is hereby deleted in its entirety and the following is inserted in lieu thereof:
Amendment of Section 4(a) of the Agreement
 
4.           .
Termination of Employment
 
(a)   In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, Executives employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to the Executives annual Base Salary and Target Bonus then in effect, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Executives death, to the Executives designated beneficiary, or to the Executives estate or other legal representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of Executives death.  In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(i) of this Agreement shall vest immediately and the Stock Appreciation Rights granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(ii) of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives death for all of the SARs if not then exercisable in full.  In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, any shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of this Agreement shall vest immediately and all Stock Options or Stock Appreciation Rights granted to Executive after the Commencement Date of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives death for all such Stock Options and Stock Appreciation Rights if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans and programs in which the Executive was participating at the time of his death.  Except in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect (including the 2004 LTIP or any successor plan thereto, as it relates to the equity grants referenced in Section 3(c)
Death
.
 
 
hereof), after the date of Executives death, Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
 
 
2.           .  Effective upon execution of this First Amendment by the Company and the Executive, Section 4(b) of the Agreement shall be amended to provide, in the event of Executives Disability, for the payment of the Executives Target Bonus amount, as that term is defined in the Agreement, for the immediate vesting of all shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of the Agreement, and for the immediate exercisability of all Stock Options and SARs granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of the Agreement, and said Section 4(b) is hereby deleted in its entirety and the following is inserted in lieu thereof:
Amendment of Section 4(b) of the Agreement
 
4.           .
Termination of Employment
 
(b)    In the event of the Executives Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below).  In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executives Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executives separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executives behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B).  The Company shall also pay to the Executive a lump sum amount equivalent to the Executives Target Bonus Amount then in effect, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executives Separation from Service, provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executives behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B).  In the event of the Executives Disability during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(i) of this Agreement shall vest immediately upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service and the Stock Appreciation Rights granted pursuant to Section 3(c)(ii) of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service for all of the SARs if not then exercisable in full.  In the event of the Executives Disability during the Employment Term, any shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive after the Commencement Date of this Agreement shall vest immediately upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service and all Stock Options or Stock Appreciation Rights granted to the Executive
Disability
.
 
 
after the Commencement Date of this Agreement shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service for all such Stock Options and Stock Appreciation Rights if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans in which the Executive participates.  The purpose and intent of the preceding two sentences is to ensure that the Executive receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period.  Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Companys benefit programs and other plans then in effect, Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
 
Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Executives incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing the Executives complete and full-time absence from the Executives duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least 180 days within any 270-day period.  Any determination of the Executives Disability made in good faith by the Company shall be conclusive and binding on the Executive, unless within 10 days after written notice to Executive of such determination, the Executive elects by written notice to the Company to challenge such determination, in which case the determination of Disability shall be made by arbitration pursuant to Paragraph 10 below.  Except as provided in this Subsection 4(b), the Company shall not be required to provide the Executive any compensation or benefits after the determination by the Company unless the arbitration results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled, in which case the Company shall pay to the Executive within 10 days after such arbitration decision all compensation due through the date of such arbitration decision.  The Company shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations related to such compensation and benefits under this Agreement if it makes such payment within 10 days after such arbitration decision.  The Disability Termination Date shall be the date on which the Company makes such determination of the Executives Disability unless the arbitration, if any, results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled.  The Executive shall have a legally binding right to the disability salary continuation benefit as of the Disability Termination Date.
 
3.           Effective upon execution of this First Amendment by the Company and the Executive, Section 4(b) of the Agreement shall be amended by adding a new section 4(f)(v)(F), which shall read its entirety as follows:
Amendment of Section 4(f) of the Agreement
.  
 
(F)  All Gross-Up Payments, including any additional Gross-Up Payments under Section 4(f)(v)(C) and (E), shall be made to the Executive by the end of the calendar year next following the year in which the Executive remits the related taxes to the relevant Taxing Authorities.  Payment pursuant to Section 4(f)(v)(E) of amounts indemnifying the Executive against any loss in connection with, and all costs and expenses which may be incurred as a result of contesting, a claim made against the Executive by a Taxing Authority, shall be made to the Executive by the end of the calendar year following the year in which the taxes which are the subject of the claim are remitted to the relevant Taxing Authority, or where, as a result of the claim, no taxes are remitted, by the end of the calendar year following the year in which there is a final nonappealable settlement or other resolution of the claim.
 
4.           Effective upon execution of this First Amendment by the Company and the Executive, Section 4(b) of the Agreement shall be amended by revising section 18(f) to clarify that the covenants not to compete applies only to businesses or divisions of multi-division business that derives more than 15% of its revenues from the Restricted Activities and which shall now read in its entirety as follows:
Amendment of Section 18(f) of the Agreement
.  
(f)           
Covenants Not to Compete
.
 
(i)
 
.  Executive covenants and agrees that during the period from the date hereof until, two (2) years immediately following the termination, for any reason, of Executives employment with the Company (the Non-Compete Period),  Executive will not, directly or indirectly:
Non-Competition
 
(A)
 
own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 5% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder of any company or business that derives more than 15% of its revenue from the Restricted Activities (as defined below) within the Restricted Area (as defined below), or any company or business controlling, controlled by or under common control with any company or business directly engaged in such Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area (any of the foregoing, a Restricted Company) or
 
(B)
 
engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, executive, partner, independent contractor, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) with any Restricted Company in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
 
 
(ii)
 
  For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Activities means the retail, wholesale or commercial sale of aftermarket auto parts and accessories.  The term Restricted Area means the United States of America, including its territories and possessions.
Restricted Activities/Restricted Area
.
 
(iii)
 
In the event that the Executive intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, executive or director) with any Restricted Company during the Non-Compete Period, the Executive must provide information in writing to the Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by the Executive for such Restricted Company.  All such current associations are set forth on to this Agreement.  In the event that the Company consents in writing to the Executives engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by the Executive shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of this Subsection 18(f).  Such consent is not intended and shall not be deemed to be a waiver or nullification of the covenant of non-competition of the Executive or other similarly bound executives.
Association with Restricted Company
.  
Exhibit B
 
(iv)
 
Nothing in this Subsection 18(f) shall preclude the Executive from accepting employment with a multi-division company so long as (A) the Executives employment is not within a division of the new employer that engages in and derives more than 15% of its revenues from the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area, (B) during the course of such employment, the Executive does not communicate related to Restricted Activities with any division of Executives new employer that is engaged in and derives more than 15% of its revenues from the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area and (C) the Executive does not engage in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
Permitted Employment with Multi-Division Company
.  
 
5.           Effective upon execution of this First Amendment by the Company and the Executive, the Agreement shall be amended by adding a new section 21, which shall read its entirety as follows:
Addition of
 
New Section 21 to the Agreement
.  
 
21.           .  In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Restricted Stock or any Other Stock Unit Awards granted to the Executive shall lapse and such Restricted Stock or Other Stock Unit Awards shall become fully vested and transferable to the full extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred; and any Stock Options or SARs granted to the Executive that are outstanding as of the date of such Change In Control shall become fully exercisable and vested
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
 
 
to the extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred.
 
 
6.           .   Except for those terms and provisions amended herein, all other terms and conditions in the Agreement shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect.
Full Force and Effect
 
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.33
AGREEMENT (the Agreement), dated as of June 4, 2008, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and(the Executive).
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
1.
  
  Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive agrees to serve the Company, as its  (Executives Position). The parties intend that the Executive shall continue to so serve in this capacity throughout the Employment Term (as such term is defined below).
Position; Term of Employment
.
The term of the Executives employment by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall commence on June 4, 2008 (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the first anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date and on each anniversary thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such automatic extension date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end on the day prior to such automatic extension date.
2.
  
  
Duties.
 
(a) The Executive shall have such duties and responsibilities of the Executives Position and such other duties and responsibilities reasonably consistent with the Executives Position as the Company may request from time to time and shall perform such duties and carry out such responsibilities to the best of the Executives ability for the purpose of advancing the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities).  The Executive shall observe and conform to the applicable policies and directives promulgated from time to time by the Company and its Board of Directors or by any superior officer(s) of the Company.  Subject to the provisions of Subsection 2(b) below, the Executive shall devote the Executives full time, skill and attention during normal business hours to the business and affairs of the Company and its Related Entities, except for holidays and vacations consistent with applicable Company policy and except for illness or incapacity.  The services to be performed by the Executive hereunder may be changed from time to time at the discretion of the Company.  The Company shall retain full direction and control of the means and methods by which the Executive performs the Executives services and of the place or places at which such services are to be rendered.
Duties and Responsibilities
.  
(b)   During the Term of this Agreement, it shall not be a violation of this Agreement for the Executive to, and the Executive shall be entitled to (i) serve on corporate, civic, charitable, retail industry association or professional association boards or
Other Activities.
 
 
committees within the limitations of the Companys Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, (ii) deliver lectures, fulfill speaking engagements or teach at educational institutions and (iii) manage personal investments, so long as such activities do not significantly interfere with the performance of the Executives duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement and do not involve a conflict of interest with the Executives duties or responsibilities hereunder.
 
3.
  
  
Compensation.
 
(a)
 
  During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay to the Executive a salary of $ _____ per annum, payable consistent with the Companys standard payroll practices then in effect (Base Salary).  Such Base Salary shall be reviewed by the Compensation Committee of Advances Board of Directors (hereinafter the Compensation Committee) at least annually, with any changes taking into account, among other factors, the Company and individual performance.
Base Salary
.
(b)
 
The Executive shall receive a bonus in such amounts and based upon achievement of such corporate and individual performance and other criteria as shall be approved by the Compensation Committee from time to time, with a target amount, if such performance and other criteria are achieved, of __ percent (__%) of the Base Salary (the Target Bonus Amount), with a maximum payout of  percent __ (__%) of the Base Salary during the initial Term of this Agreement, which bonus shall be paid in a manner consistent with the Companys bonus practices then in effect.  The Target Bonus Amount and the maximum payout for any subsequent renewal Term of the Agreement shall be determined by the Compensation Committee.  To be eligible to receive a bonus, the Executive must be employed by the Company on the date the bonus is paid.  
Bonus
.  
  During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans and programs of the Company that are generally available to senior executives of the Company, including, but not limited to, the Companys Executive Choice Program.  Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans and programs, as the same shall be amended from time to time.  The Executive shall be entitled to __ weeks paid vacation annually.  In addition, during the Employment Term, the Executive shall be provided with a Company-paid annual physical examination.
 
(c)
Benefit Plans
.
 
(d)   During the Employment Term, the Company shall, in accordance with policies then in effect with respect to payments of business expenses, pay or reimburse the Executive for all reasonable out-of-pocket travel and other expenses (other than ordinary commuting expenses) incurred by the Executive in performing services hereunder; provided, however, that, with respect to reimbursements, if any, not otherwise excludible from the Executives gross income, to the extent required to comply with the provisions of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the Code), no reimbursement of expenses incurred by the Executive during any taxable year shall be made after the last day of the following taxable year, and the right to reimbursement of such expenses shall not be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit.  All such expenses shall be accounted for in such reasonable detail as the Company may require.
Business Expenses
.
 
2
 
4.
  
  
Termination of Employment.
 
(a)   In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the Executives employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to the Executives annual Base Salary and Target Bonus then in effect, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Executives death, to the Executives designated beneficiary, or to the Executives estate or other legal representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of the Executives death.  In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive pursuant to the Companys 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2004 LTIP) or any successor plan shall vest immediately and the Stock Options or Stock Appreciation Rights (SARs) granted to the Executive pursuant to the Companys 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives death for all such Stock Options and SARs if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans and programs in which the Executive was participating at the time of his death. Except in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect, after the date of the Executives death, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Death
.
 
(b)   In the event of the Executives Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below).  In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executives Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executives separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executives behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B).  In the event of the Disability of the Executive during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Executive pursuant to the Companys 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall vest immediately upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service and the Stock Options or SARs granted to the Executive pursuant to the Companys 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall become exercisable upon the date of the Executives Separation from Service for all such Stock Options and SARs if not then exercisable in full.  The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Companys benefit plans in which the Executive participates.  The purpose and intent of the preceding two sentences is to ensure that the Executive receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period.  The Company shall also pay to the Executive a lump sum amount equivalent to the Executives Target Bonus Amount then in effect, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executives Separation from Service, provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executives behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B).  Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the
Disability
.
 
3
 
Companys benefit programs and other plans then in effect, the Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Executives incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing the Executives complete and full-time absence from the Executives duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least 180 days within any 270-day period.  Any determination of the Executives Disability made in good faith by the Company shall be conclusive and binding on the Executive, unless within 10 days after written notice to the Executive of such determination, the Executive elects by written notice to the Company to challenge such determination, in which case the determination of Disability shall be made by arbitration pursuant to Paragraph 11 below.  Except as provided in this Subsection 4(b), the Company shall not be required to provide the Executive any compensation or benefits after the determination by the Company unless the arbitration results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled, in which case the Company shall pay to the Executive within 10 days after such arbitration decision all compensation due through the date of such arbitration decision.  The Company shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations related to such compensation and benefits under this Agreement if it makes such payment within 10 days after such arbitration decision.  The Disability Termination Date shall be the date on which the Company makes such determination of the Executives Disability unless the arbitration, if any, results in a determination that the Executive is not disabled.  
The Executive shall have a legally binding right to the disability severance benefit as of the Disability Termination Date.
(c)   Nothing herein shall prevent the Company from terminating the Executives employment at any time for Due Cause (as hereinafter defined).  The Executive shall continue to receive the Base Salary provided for in this Agreement only through the period ending with the date of such termination.  Any rights and benefits the Executive may have under employee benefit plans and programs of the Company shall be determined in accordance with the terms of such plans and programs.  Except as provided in the two immediately preceding sentences, after termination of employment for Due Cause, the Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.  
Termination by the Company for Due Cause
.
For purposes of this Agreement, Due Cause shall mean:
(i) a material breach by the Executive of the Executives duties and obligations under this Agreement or violation in any material respect of any code or standard of conduct generally applicable to the officers of the Company, including, but not limited to, the Companys Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, (1) which is willful and deliberate on the Executives part, (2) which is not due to the Disability of the Executive (within the meaning of Subsection 4(b) but without regard to the requirement that it continue for more than six months or 180 days within a 270-day period), (3) which is committed in bad faith or without reasonable belief that such breach is in the best interests of the Company, and (4) which, if curable, has not been cured by the Executive within 15 business days after the Executives receipt of notice to the Executive specifying the nature of such violations;
 
4
 
(ii) a material violation by the Executive of the Executives Loyalty Obligations as provided in Paragraph 19;
(iii) conviction ofa crime of moral turpitude or a felony involving fraud, breach of trust, or misappropriation;
 
(iv)  the Executives willfully engaging in bad faith conduct that is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Company, monetarily or otherwise; or
 
(v) a determination by the Company that the Executive is in material violation of the Companys Substance Abuse Policy.
(d)   The foregoing notwithstanding, the Company may terminate the Executives employment for any or no reason, as it may deem appropriate in its sole discretion and judgment; , , that in the event such termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall (i) be entitled to a Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and (ii) be sent written notice stating the termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause.  In the event of such termination by the Company, the Executive shall receive certain payments and benefits as set forth in this Subsection 4(d).
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
provided
however
(i) If the Company terminates the Executives employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term, the term Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
Termination Payment
.  
(A) an amount equal to the Executives annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is in connection with an action that would have enabled the Executive to terminate his employment for Good Reason pursuant to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be the Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Termination Salary Payment),
(B) an amount equal to the Executives Target Bonus Amount, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is in connection with an action that would have enabled the Executive to terminate his employment for Good Reason pursuant to Sections 4(e)(i)(A) or (E), in which case, it shall be the Target Bonus in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Target Bonus or termination of the bonus plan, respectively) (the Termination Bonus Payment), and
(C) a lump sum payment equal to the prorated value of the Executives annual coverage under the Companys Executive Choice Program (the Termination ECP Payment).
(ii)   The Company shall make outplacement services available to the Executive, at a cost to the Company not to exceed $12,000,
Outplacement Services
.
 
5
 
for a period of time not to exceed 12 months following the date of termination pursuant to the Companys executive outplacement program with the Companys selected vendor, to include consulting, search support and administrative services.   
(iii) In addition, the Company shall provide the Executive with medical, dental and vision insurance benefits (which may also cover, if applicable, the Executives spouse and eligible dependents) for three hundred sixty-five (365) days from the date of  the Executives termination of employment or until such time as the Executive obtains other group health coverage, whichever occurs first.  In order to trigger the Companys obligation to provide health care continuation benefits, the Executive must elect continuation coverage pursuant to the Consolidation Omnibus Budget Act of 1985, as amended (COBRA), upon such eligibility.  The Companys obligation shall be satisfied solely through the payment of the Executives COBRA premiums during the 365-day period, but only to the extent that such premiums exceed the amount that would otherwise have been payable by the Executive for coverage of the Executive and the Executives eligible dependents that were covered by the Companys medical, dental, and vision insurance programs at the time of the Executives termination of employment had the Executive continued to be employed by the Company.
Medical Coverage
.  
 
(iv) The Termination Salary Payment, Termination Bonus Payment and Termination ECP Payment shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the date of the Executives Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.  
Timing of Payments
.  
(v) Except as provided in Subsection 4(i) of this Agreement, following the Executives termination of employment under this Subsection 4(d), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 17, 19, 20 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 21).  Except for the Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Entire Obligation
.  
(e)  Termination by the Company without Due Cause under Subsection 4(d) shall be deemed to have occurred if the Executive elects to terminate the Executives employment for Good Reason.  
 
Resignation from Employment by the Company for Good Reason
.
 
 For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason shall mean:
(i)
 
Good Reason.
 
6
 
(A) a material diminution in the Executives Total Direct Compensation, which shall mean the value of the total of the Executives Base Salary, Target Bonus opportunity, and annual equity award taken together;
(B) a material diminution in the Executives authority, duties, or responsibilities;
(C) a material diminution in the authority, duties, or responsibilities of the supervisor to whom the Executive is required to report;
(D) the termination of the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Executive Incentive Plan without replacement thereof with a similar plan;
 
(E) a material reduction in aggregate benefits available to the Executive if no similar reduction is made for all other senior executives of the Company;
 
(F) the Companys requiring the Executive to be based more than 60 miles from the Companys office in _______ at which the Executive was principally employed immediately prior to the date of the relocation;
(G) delivery by the Company of a notice discontinuing the automatic extension of the Term of the Executives employment under this Agreement; or
(H) any other action or inaction that constitutes a material breach by the Company of the terms of this Agreement.
(ii)           In order to be considered a resignation for Good Reason for purposes of this Agreement, the Executive must provide the Company with written notice and description of the existence of the Good Reason condition within ninety (90) days of the initial discovery by the Executive of the existence of said Good Reason condition and the Company shall have 15 business days to cure such Good Reason condition.
Nof Good Reason Condition.
otice
 
 
(iii)          The effective date of the Executives resignation for Good Reason must occur no longer than one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above.  If Executive has not resigned for Good Reason effective within one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above the Executive shall be deemed to have waived said Good Reason condition.
Effective Date of Resignation.
 
 
(f)           .  If the Company terminates the Executives employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control (as defined below), or if the Executive elects to terminate the Executives employment for Good Reason prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within
Termination by the Company Other Than For Due Cause, Death or Disability or Resignation from Employment for Good Reason Within Twelve Months After a Change In Control
 
7
 
twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, then (i) the Executive shall be entitled to a Change In Control Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and the Executive shall receive benefits as defined in Subsections 4(d)(ii) and (iii) above, and (ii) either the Company or the Executive, as the case may be, shall provide Notice of Termination pursuant to Subsection 4(j).
 
(i)
 
.  The term Change In Control Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
Change In Control Termination Payment
 
(A)
 
an amount equal to two times the Executives annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be two times the Executives annual Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Change In Control Termination Salary Payment),
 
(B)
 
an amount equal to two times the Executives Target Bonus Amount, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Sections 4(e)(i)(A) or (E), in which case, it shall be two times the Executives Target Bonus in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Target Bonus or termination of the bonus plan, respectively) (the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment), and
 
(C)
 
a lump sum payment equal to the prorated value of the Executives annual coverage under the Companys Executive Choice Program (the Change In Control Termination ECP Payment).
 
(ii)
 
The Change In Control Termination Salary Payment, the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment and the Change In Control Termination ECP Payment shall be paid in lump sum payments within forty-five days following the date of the Executives Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
Timing of Payments
.  
 
(iii) Except as provided in Subsection 4(i) of this Agreement, following the Executives termination of employment under this Subsection 4(f), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 17, 19, 20 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 21).  Except for the Change In Control Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Companys benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause or after termination by the Executive for Good Reason, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Entire Obligation
.  
 
8
(iv) For purposes of this Agreement, Change In Control shall have the same meaning as set forth in the 2004 LTIP, as in existence on the date hereof.
Change In Control
.  
 
(v)
Gross-Up Payment
.
 
(A)
 
Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that any payment or distribution by the Company, any individual or entity whose actions result in a Change in Control, or their respective subsidiaries or affiliates to or for the benefit of the Executive (including any payment or benefits received in connection with a Change in Control or the Executive's termination of employment, whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or any other plan, arrangement or agreement) (all such payments and benefits, excluding the Gross-Up Payment (as defined below), being hereinafter referred to as the "Total Payments") will be subject to any excise tax imposed under Section 4999 of the Code  (such tax, the "Excise Tax"), the Company shall pay to the Executive an additional amount (the "Gross-Up Payment") such that the net amount retained by the Executive, after deduction of any Excise Tax on the Total Payments and any federal, state and local income and employment taxes and Excise Tax upon the Gross-Up Payment, and after taking into account the phase out of itemized deductions and personal exemptions attributable to the Gross-Up Payment, shall be equal to the Total Payments.
 
(B)
 
For purposes of determining whether any of the Total Payments will be subject to the Excise Tax and the amount of such Excise Tax, (i) all of the Total Payments shall be treated as "parachute payments" (within the meaning of section 280G(b)(2) of the Code) unless, in the opinion of tax counsel ("Tax Counsel") reasonably acceptable to the Executive and selected by the accounting firm which was, immediately prior to the Change in Control, the Company's independent auditor (the "Auditor") (which Tax Counsel may be the Company's general counsel), such payments or benefits (in whole or in part) do not constitute parachute payments, including by reason of section 280G(b)(4)(A) of the Code, (ii) all "excess parachute payments" within the meaning of section 280G(b)(l) of the Code shall be treated as subject to the Excise Tax unless, in the opinion of Tax Counsel, such excess parachute payments (in whole or in part) represent reasonable compensation for services actually rendered (within the meaning of section 280G(b)(4)(B) of the Code) in excess of the Base Amount allocable to such reasonable compensation, or are otherwise not subject to the Excise Tax, and (iii) the value of any non-cash benefits or any deferred payment or benefit shall be determined by the Auditor in accordance with the principles of sections 280G(d)(3) and (4) of the Code.  For purposes of determining the amount of the Gross-Up Payment, the Executive shall be deemed to pay federal income tax at the highest marginal rate of federal income taxation in the calendar year in which the Gross-Up Payment is to be made and state and local income taxes at the highest marginal rate of taxation in the state and locality of the Executive's residence on the date of termination of the Executive's employment with the
 
9
 
Company (or if there is no date of termination, then the date on which the Gross-Up Payment is calculated for purposes of this Subsection 4(f)), net of the maximum reduction in federal income taxes which could be obtained from deduction of such state and local taxes.
 
(C)
 
In the event that the Excise Tax is determined by Tax Counsel to be less than the amount taken into account hereunder in calculating the Gross-Up Payment, the Executive shall repay to the Company, within five (5) business days following the time that the amount of such reduction in the Excise Tax is so determined, the portion of the Gross-Up Payment attributable to such reduction (plus that portion of the Gross-Up Payment attributable to the Excise Tax and federal, state and local income and employment taxes imposed on the Gross-Up Payment being repaid by the Executive), to the extent that such repayment results in a reduction in the Excise Tax and a dollar-for-dollar reduction in the Executive's taxable income and wages for purposes of federal, state and local income and employment taxes, plus interest on the amount of such repayment at 120% of the rate provided in section 1274(b)(2)(B) of the Code.  In the event that the Excise Tax is determined by Tax Counsel to exceed the amount taken into account hereunder in calculating the Gross-Up Payment (including by reason of any payment the existence or amount of which cannot be determined at the time of the Gross-Up Payment), the Company shall make an additional Gross-Up Payment in respect of such excess (plus any interest, penalties or additions payable by the Executive with respect to such excess) within five (5) business days following the time that the amount of such excess is determined by Tax Counsel.  The Executive and the Company shall each reasonably cooperate with the other in connection with any administrative or judicial proceedings concerning the existence or amount of liability for Excise Tax with respect to the Total Payments.
 
(D)
 
The determination by Tax Counsel shall be conclusive and binding upon all parties unless the Internal Revenue Service, a court of competent jurisdiction, or such other duly empowered governmental body or agency (a Taxing Authority) determines that the Executive owes a greater or lesser amount of Excise Tax with respect to the Total Payments than the amount determined by Tax Counsel.
 
(E)
 
If a Taxing Authority makes a claim against the Executive, the Company shall be liable for and indemnify the Executive against any loss in connection with, and all costs and expenses, including attorneys fees, which may be incurred as a result of contesting the claim.  Should a Taxing Authority finally determine that an additional Excise Tax is owed, then the Company shall, within five (5) business days of such determination, pay an additional Gross-Up Payment to the Executive with respect to the additional Excise Tax and any assessed interest, fines or penalties.  Should a Taxing Authority finally determine that the Executive owes a lesser amount of Excise Tax, then the Executive shall repay such excess to the Company within five (5) business days of such determination; provided, however, that such repayment shall be reduced by the amount of any
 
10
 
taxes paid by the Executive on such excess which is not offset by the tax benefit attributable to such repayment.
 
(F)
 
All Gross-Up Payments, including any additional Gross-Up Payments under Section 4(f)(v)(C) and (E), shall be made to the Executive by the end of the calendar year next following the year in which the Executive remits the related taxes to the relevant Taxing Authorities.  Payment pursuant to Section 4(f)(v)(E) of amounts indemnifying the Executive against any loss in connection with, and all costs and expenses which may be incurred as a result of contesting, a claim made against the Executive by a Taxing Authority, shall be made to the Executive by the end of the calendar year following the year in which the taxes which are the subject of the claim are remitted to the relevant Taxing Authority, or where, as a result of the claim, no taxes are remitted, by the end of the calendar year following the year in which there is a final nonappealable settlement or other resolution of the claim.
 
(g)   In the event that the Executive terminates the Executives employment at the Executives own volition prior to the expiration of the Employment Term (except as provided in Subsection 4(e) above), such termination shall constitute a Voluntary Termination and in such event the Executive shall be limited to the same rights and benefits as provided in connection with a termination for Due Cause under Subsection 4(c) above.
Voluntary Termination
.
(h) Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be interpreted and operated so that the payment of the benefits set forth herein either shall either be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A of the Code or shall comply with the requirements of such provision; provided however that in no event shall the Company be liable to the Executive for or with respect to any taxes, penalties or interest which may be imposed upon the Executive pursuant to Section 409A.  To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(iii), (e) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Executives Separation from Service, the Executive is a specified employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Executive earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Executives Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death.  The 409A Payments under this Agreement that would otherwise be made during such period shall be aggregated and paid in one lump sum, without interest, on the first business day following the end of the six (6) month period or following the date of the Executives death, whichever is earlier, and the balance of the 409A Payments, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the applicable payment schedule provided in this Section 4.  The Executive hereby acknowledges that he has been advised to seek and has sought the advice of a tax advisor with respect to the tax consequences to the Executive of all payments pursuant to this Agreement, including any adverse tax consequences or penalty taxes under Code Section 409A and applicable State tax law.  The Executive hereby agrees to bear the entire risk of any such adverse federal and State tax consequences and penalty taxes in the event any payment pursuant to this Agreement is deemed to be subject to Code Section 409A, and that no representations have been made to the
Compliance With Code Section 409A
.  
 
11
 
Executive relating to the tax treatment of any payment pursuant to this Agreement under Code Section 409A and the corresponding provisions of any applicable State income tax laws.
 
(i) During the term of the Executives employment by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Executives employment with the Company, the Executive agrees to be reasonably available to assist the Company and its representatives and agents with any business and/or litigation (or potential litigation) matters affecting or involving the Company.   The Company will reimburse the Executive for all associated reasonable costs of travel.
Cooperation
.  
(j)   Any termination under Subsection 4(b) by the Company for Disability or Subsection 4(c) for Due Cause or by the Executive for Good Reason under Subsection 4(e) or by the Company or the Executive within twelve (12) months after a Change in Control under Subsection 4(f) or by the Executive by Voluntary Termination under Subsection 4(g) shall be communicated by Notice of Termination to the other party thereto given in accordance with Paragraph 10.  
Notice of Termination, Resignation and Release
.
(i) For purposes of this Agreement, a Notice of Termination means a written notice which (i) indicates the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, (ii) sets forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Executives employment under the provision so indicated and (iii) if the termination date is other than the date of receipt of such Notice, specifies the termination date (which date shall not be prior to the date of such notice or more than 15 days after the giving of such Notice).
Notice of Termination
.  
 
(ii) Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in order to be eligible to receive any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executives employment, in addition to fulfilling all other conditions precedent to such receipt, the Executive or the Executives legal representative must:
Resignation and Release
.  
 
(A) within 10 days after the termination date, resign as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company, if applicable, and as an officer, director, manager and employee of the Company and its Related Entities, and
(B) within 21 days after presentation of a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel, execute said release, on behalf of the Executive and the Executives estate, heirs and representatives, releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Companys and such Related Entities respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to the Executives employment with the Company; termination of the Executives employment; all matters alleged or which could have been alleged in a charge or complaint against the Company; any and all injuries, losses or damages to Employee, including any claims for attorneys fees; any and all claims
 
12
 
relating to the conduct of any employee, servant, officer, director or agent of the Company; and any and all matters, transactions or things occurring prior to the date of said release, including any and all possible claims, known or unknown, which could have been asserted against the Company or the Companys employees, agents, servants, officers or directors.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the form of release shall except out therefrom, and acknowledge the Executives continuing rights with respect to, the following:  (i) all vested rights that the Executive may have under all welfare, retirement and other plans and programs of the Company in which the Executive was participating at the time of his employment termination, including all equity plans and programs of the Company with respect to which equity awards were made to the Executive, (ii) all continuing rights that the Executive may have under this Agreement, and (iii) all rights that the Executive may have following the termination of his employment under the Companys Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, any applicable Company insurance and any indemnity agreements to which the Executive is a party which provide for indemnification, insurance or other, similar coverage for the Executive with respect to his actions or inactions as an officer, employee and/or member of the Board.  Executive may, within five business days of receipt from the Company of the form of release, provide comments to the Company regarding material provisions of the form of release, which the Company in good faith will consider.  For clarification, unless and until the Executive executes the release, the Company shall have no obligation to make any Termination Payment to the Executive, and, even if the Executive does not execute the release, the Executive shall be bound by the post-termination provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation Section 19.
 
 
(k)   The foregoing notwithstanding, upon the termination of the Executives employment at any time, for any reason, the Executive shall be paid all amounts that had already been earned and accrued as of the time of termination, including but not limited to (i) pay for unused vacation accrued in accordance with the Companys vacation policy; (ii) any bonus that had been earned but not yet paid; and (iii) reimbursement for any business expenses accrued in accordance with Subsection 3(d).
Earned and Accrued Payments
.
 
(l) The Executive hereby agrees that the Company may terminate the Executives employment under this Paragraph 4 without regard to:  (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of the Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to the Executive, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to the Executives relationship with the Company; or (iii) without a determination of Due Cause by the Company.
Employment at Will.
 
5. .  In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Restricted Stock or any Other Stock Unit Awards granted to the Executive shall lapse and such Restricted Stock or Other Stock Unit Awards shall become fully vested and transferable to the full extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred; and any Stock Options or SARs granted to the Executive that are
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
 
13
 
outstanding as of the date of such Change In Control shall become fully exercisable and vested to the extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred.  
 
6.
Successors and Assigns
.
 
(a)
 
  This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company or any corporation or other entity to which the Company may transfer all or substantially all of its assets and business and to which the Company may assign this Agreement, in which case the term Company, as used herein, shall mean such corporation or other entity, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the Company from any obligations hereunder, whether arising prior to or after such assignment.
Assignment by the Company
.
 
(b)
 
  The Executive may not assign this Agreement or any part hereof without the prior written consent of the Company; , , that nothing herein shall preclude the Executive from designating one or more beneficiaries to receive any amount that may be payable following occurrence of the Executives legal incompetency or Death and shall not preclude the legal representative of the Executives estate from assigning any right hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto under the Executives will or, in the case of intestacy, to the person or persons entitled thereto under the laws of intestacy applicable to the Executives estate.  The term beneficiaries, as used in this Agreement, shall mean a beneficiary or beneficiaries so designated to receive any such amount or, if no beneficiary has been so designated, the legal representative of the Executive (in the event of the Executives incompetency) or the Executives estate.
Assignment by the Executive
.
provided
however
 
7.   This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
Governing Law
.
 
8.   This Agreement, which shall include the Exhibits hereto,  contains all of the understandings and representations between the parties hereto pertaining to the matters referred to herein, and supersedes all undertakings and agreements, whether oral or in writing, previously entered into by them with respect thereto, including any previous employment, severance and/or non-competition agreements.  This Agreement may only be modified by an instrument in writing.
Entire Agreement
.
 
9.   The waiver by any party of a breach of any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall not operate or be construed to be a waiver of a similar or dissimilar provision or condition at the same or any prior or subsequent time.
Waiver of Breach
.
 
10.   Any notice to be given hereunder shall be in writing and delivered personally, or sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such other address as such party may subsequently give notice of hereunder in writing:
Notices
.
 
:
If to the Company
 
14
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
 
Roanoke, VA  24012
Attn:  General Counsel
With a copy to:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA  24012
Attn:  Chief Executive Officer
If to the Executive:
 
________________________
 
________________________
 
________________________
 
 
11.   Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or any breach thereof, excepting only the enforcement of any Loyalty Obligations arising under Paragraph 19 of this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association then in effect in the Commonwealth of Virginia and judgment upon such award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof.  The board of arbitrators shall consist of one arbitrator to be appointed by the Company, one by the Executive, and one by the two arbitrators so chosen.  The arbitration shall be held at such place as may be agreed upon at the time by the parties to the arbitration.  The cost of arbitration shall be borne as determined by the arbitrators.
Arbitration
.
 
12.   Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments required to be made by the Company hereunder to the Executive or the Executives estate or beneficiaries shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts relating to taxes as the Company may reasonably determine it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation.  In lieu of withholding such amounts, in whole or in part, the Company may, in its sole discretion, accept other provisions for payment of taxes and withholdings as required by law, provided it is satisfied that all requirements of law affecting its responsibilities to withhold have been satisfied.
Withholding
.
 
13.   In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
Severability
.
 
14.   Titles to the paragraphs and subsections in this Agreement are intended solely for convenience and no provision of this Agreement is to be construed by reference to the title of any paragraph or subsection.
Titles
.
 
15
 
15.   The Company agrees to pay the reasonable fees and expenses of the Executives legal counsel in connection with the negotiation and execution of this Agreement, not to exceed $3,500.
Legal Fees
.
 
16. .  This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
 
17. .  Except as provided in Paragraph 13 above, this Agreement may not be modified or amended except by written instrument signed by all parties hereto.
Amendment
 
18.   This Agreement has been prepared by the Company with the assistance of Bingham McCutchen LLP, as counsel to the Company (Counsel), after full disclosure of its representation of the Company and with the consent and direction of the Company and the Executive.  The Executive has reviewed the contents of this Agreement and fully understands its terms.  The Executive acknowledges that the Executive is fully aware of the Executives right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company, that Counsel has advised him of such right and disclosed to him the risks in not seeking such independent advice, and that the Executive fully understands the potentially adverse interests of the parties with respect to this Agreement.  The Executive further acknowledges that neither the Company nor its Counsel has made representations or given any advice with respect to the tax or other consequences of this Agreement or any transactions contemplated by this Agreement to him, that the Executive has been advised of the importance of seeking independent counsel with respect to such consequences, and that the Executive had obtained independent counsel with respect to such consequences.  By executing this Agreement, the Executive represents that the Executive has, after being advised of the potential conflicts between him and the Company with respect to the future consequences of this Agreement, either consulted independent legal counsel or elected, notwithstanding the advisability of seeking such independent legal counsel, not to consult with such independent legal counsel.
Counsel
.
19.
Loyalty Obligations
.  
The Executive agrees that the following obligations (Loyalty Obligations) shall apply in consideration of the Executives employment by or continued employment with the Company:  
(a) .
Confidential Information
(i) .  The Executive agrees at all times during the term of the Executives employment and thereafter, to hold any Confidential Information of the Company or its Related Entities in strictest confidence, and not to use (except for the benefit of the Company to fulfill the Executives employment obligations) or to disclose to any person, firm or corporation other than the Company or those designated by it said Confidential Information without the prior authorization of the Company, except as may otherwise be required by law or legal process.  The Executive agrees that Confidential Information means any proprietary information prepared or maintained in any format, including technical data, trade secrets or know-how in which the Company or Related Entities have an interest, including, but not limited to, business records, contracts, research, product or service plans, products,
Company Information
 
16
 
services, customer lists and customers (including, but not limited to, vendors to the Company or Related Entities on whom the Executive called, with whom the Executive dealt or with whom the Executive became acquainted during the term of the Executives employment), pricing data, costs, markets, expansion plans, summaries, marketing and other business strategies, software, developments, inventions, processes, formulas, technology, designs, drawings, engineering, hardware configuration or marketing, financial or other business information obtained by the Executive or disclosed to the Executive by the Company or Related Entities or any other person or entity during the term of the Executives employment with the Company either directly or indirectly electronically, in writing, orally, by drawings, by observation of services, systems or other aspects of the business of the Company or Related Entities or otherwise.  whether through press releases, SEC filings or otherwiseotherwise the
Confidential Information does not include information that: (A) was available to the public prior to the time of disclosure,
; or (B)
becomes available to the public through no act or omission of
Executive.
(ii) .  The Executive recognizes that the Company and Related Entities have received and in the future will receive from third parties their confidential or proprietary information subject to a duty on the part of the Company or Related Entities to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to use it only for certain limited purposes.  The Executive agrees at all times during the Executives employment and thereafter to hold all such confidential or proprietary information in the strictest confidence and not to disclose it to any person, firm or corporation or to use it except as necessary in carrying out the Executives work for the Company consistent with the obligations of the Company or Related Entities with such third party.
Third Party Information
(b) .  The Executive agrees that, during the term of the Executives employment with the Company, the Executive will not engage in any other employment, occupation, consulting or other business activity directly related to the business in which the Company or Related Entities are now involved or become involved during the term of the Executives employment.  Nor will the Executive engage in any other activities that conflict with the business of the Company or Related Entities.  Furthermore the Executive agrees to devote such time as may be necessary to fulfill the Executives obligations to the Company.
Conflicting Employment
(c) .  The Executive agrees that any and all devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items developed by the Executive or others pursuant to or during the Executives employment with the Company or otherwise shall be the property of the Company or its Related Entities and their respective successors or assigns.  At the time of leaving the employ of the Company, the Executive will deliver all material Company property to the Company or to the Companys designee and will not keep in the Executives possession, recreate or deliver said property to anyone else.  In the event of the termination of the Executives employment and upon request by the Company, the Executive agrees to sign and deliver the Termination Certification attached hereto as .  
Returning Company Property
Exhibit A
 
17
 
(d) .  In the event that the Executive leaves the employ of the Company, the Executive hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to the Executives new employer (whether the Executive is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, executive or manager) about the Executives obligations under this Agreement.
Notification of New Employer
(e) .  The Executive covenants and agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Executives employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall not, without the prior written approval of the Company, directly or indirectly, either on behalf of the Executive or any other person or entity, Interfere with the Company or any of its Related Entities.
Non-Interference
(i) For purposes of this Agreement, Interfere shall mean, except in the performance of the Executives duties and responsibilities on behalf of and for the benefit of the Company, (A) to solicit, entice, persuade, induce, influence or attempt to influence, directly or indirectly, customers or prospective customers, suppliers or prospective suppliers, employees, agents or independent contractors of the Company or any of its Related Entities to restrict, reduce, sever or otherwise alter their relationship with the Company or any of its Related Entities, or (B) whether as a direct solicitor or provider of such services, or in a direct management or direct supervisory capacity over others who solicit or provide such services, to solicit or provide services that fall within the definition of Restricted Activities as defined in Subsection 19(f)(ii) below to any customer of the Company or its Related Entities.
(ii) After termination of the Executives employment, this provision shall only apply to those employees, independent contractors, customers or suppliers of the Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to the date of such termination.
(f)   
Covenants Not to Compete
(i) .  The Executive covenants and agrees that during the period from the date hereof until, one (1) year immediately following the termination, for any reason, of the Executives employment with the Company (the Non-Compete Period),  the Executive will not, directly or indirectly:
Non-Competition
(A) own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 5% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder of any company or business that derives more than 15% of its revenue from the Restricted Activities (as defined below) within the Restricted Area (as defined below), or any company or business controlling, controlled by or under common control with any company or business
 
18
 
directly engaged in such Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area (any of the foregoing, a Restricted Company) or
 
(B)  engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, executive, partner, independent contractor, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) with any Restricted Company in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
 
and accessories.  The term Restricted Area means the United States of America, including its territories and possessions.
mercial sale of aftermarket auto parts
(ii)    For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Activities means the retail, wholesale or com
Restricted Activities/Restricted Area
.
(iii) In the event that the Executive intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, executive or director) with any Restricted Company during the Non-Compete Period, the Executive must provide information in writing to the Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by the Executive for such Restricted Company.  All such current associations are set forth on to this Agreement.  In the event that the Company consents in writing to the Executives engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by the Executive shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of this Subsection 19(f).  Such consent is not intended and shall not be deemed to be a waiver or nullification of the covenant of non-competition of the Executive or other similarly bound executives.   
Association with Restricted Company
.  
Exhibit B
(iv) Nothing in this Subsection 19(f) shall preclude the Executive from accepting employment with a multi-division company so long as (A) the Executives employment is not within a division of the new employer that engages in and derives more than 15% of its revenues from the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area, (B) during the course of such employment, the Executive does not communicate related to Restricted Activities with any division of the Executives new employer that is engaged in and derives more than 15% of its revenues from the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area and (C) the Executive does not engage in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
Permitted Employment with Multi-Division Company
.  
.  The Executive agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year following the termination of the Executives employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive will not take any action or make any statement which disparages the Company or its practices or which disrupts or impairs its normal operations, such that it causes a material adverse impact to the Company.
(g)
Non-Disparagement
(h) The Executives post-termination of employment obligations under this Paragraph 19 shall cease upon the Companys failure to make any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination
Effect of Non-Payment of Benefits; Clawback
.  
 
19
 
of the Executives employment when due if within 15 days after written notice of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment.  In the event that the Executive materially violates Subsection 19(e), 19(f), or 19(g), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the applicable period under Subsection 19(e), 19(f), or 19(g), and the denominator of which is the total number of days in the applicable period under such Section.  In the event that the Executive materially violates Subsection 19(a) or 19(c), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the one (1) year period immediately following the termination and the denominator of which is 365.  The Executive further agrees that such repayment obligation shall constitute liquidated damages and that the Company shall have no other right to damages under this Agreement or at law with respect to breaches of Subsection 19(a), 19(c), 19(e), 19(f), or 19(g), but the Company shall have the right to seek equitable relief pursuant to Subsection 19(i) hereunder.
(i) .  The Executive acknowledges that the Company and Related Entities, as the case may be, may be irreparably injured if the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(b), 19(c), 19(e), 19(f) and 19(g) hereof are not specifically enforced and the Executive agrees that the terms of such provisions (including without limitation the periods set forth in Subsections 19(e), 19(f) and 19(g)) are reasonable and appropriate.  If the Executive commits, or the Company has evidence based on which it reasonably believes the Executive threatens to commit, a material breach of any of the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(b), 19(c), 19(e), 19(f) or 19(g) hereof, , it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach will cause irreparable injury to the Company and/or Related Entities and that money damages will not provide an adequate remedy therefore.  Such injunction shall be available without the posting of any bond or other security, and the Executive hereby consents to the issuance of such injunction.  
Specific Enforcement; Remedies Cumulative; Attorney Fees
the Company and/or Related Entities, as the case may be, shall have the right and remedy, in addition to and not in limitation of any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, to have the provisions of Subsections 19(a), 19(b), 19(c), 19(e), 19(f) or 19(g) hereof specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction through immediate injunctive and other equitable relief
(j) In the event that a legal or equitable action is commenced with respect to any of the provisions of Subsections 19(e), 19(f) or 19(g) hereof and the Executive has not complied, in all material respects, with the provisions in such subsections with respect to which such action has been commenced, then the one-year period, as described in such subsections not so complied with
Re-Set of Period for Non-Competition and Non-Interference
.
 
20
 
by the Executive, shall be extended from its original expiration date, day-for-day, for each day that the Executive is found to have not complied, in all material respects, with such subsections.
(k) WITH RESPECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY AND ALL LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS ARISING UNDER PARAGRAPH 19, THE SUBSECTIONS 19(k) AND 19(l) OF THIS AGREEMENT SHALL APPLY.  THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY CONSENT TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE FOLLOWING COURTS IN MATTERS RELATED TO THIS PARAGRAPH 19 AND AGREE NOT TO COMMENCE ANY SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING THERETO EXCEPT IN ANY OF SUCH COURTS: THE STATE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE CITY OF ROANOKE, VIRGINIA, OR THE STATE COURTS OR THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN ANY MUNICIPALITY WHEREIN AN OFFICE OF THE COMPANY IS LOCATED, IN WHICH OFFICE THE EXECUTIVE WAS PHYSICALLY PRESENT WHILE RENDERING SERVICES FOR THE COMPANY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING OR IMMEDIATELY  PRECEDING THE TERMINATION OF EXECUTIVES EMPLOYMENT, IF TERMINATED.
Jurisdiction and Venue.
 
(l) EXECUTIVE AGREES TO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BASED UPON, OR RELATED TO, ANY LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS.  THIS WAIVER IS KNOWINGLY, INTENTIONALLY, AND VOLUNTARILY MADE BY EXECUTIVE, AND EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT, EXCEPT FOR THE COMPANYS AGREEMENT TO LIKEWISE WAIVE ITS RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY (WHICH THE COMPANY HEREBY MAKES), THE COMPANY HAS NOT MADE ANY REPRESENTATIONS OF FACTS TO INDUCE THIS WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY OR IN ANY WAY TO MODIFY OR NULLIFY ITS EFFECT.  EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS BEEN REPRESENTED (OR HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO BE REPRESENTED) IN THE SIGNING OF THIS AGREEMENT AND IN THE MAKING OF THIS WAIVER BY INDEPENDENT LEGAL COUNSEL, SELECTED OF EXECUTIVES OWN FREE WILL, AND THAT EXECUTIVE HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS THIS WAIVER WITH COUNSEL.  EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE MEANING AND RAMIFICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER AND AS EVIDENCE OF THIS FACT SIGNS THIS AGREEMENT BELOW.
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
20.   The Executive agrees to adhere diligently to all established Company policies and procedures, including but not limited to the Companys Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and, if applicable, the Code of Ethics for Financial Professionals.  The Executive agrees that if the Executive does not adhere to any of the provisions of such Guidelines and Codes, the Executive will be in breach of the provisions hereof.  
Adherence to Company Policies
.
 
21
21. .  The Executive agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement.  The Executive represents that Executives performance of all the terms of this Agreement will not breach any agreement to keep in confidence proprietary information acquired by the Executive in confidence or in trust prior to the Executives employment by the Company.  The Executive has not entered into, and the Executive agrees the Executive will not enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith and the Executives employment by the Company and the Executives services to the Company will not violate the terms of any oral or written agreement to which the Executive is a party.  
Representations
22. .  The Company and the Executive agree that this Agreement shall not bind or be enforceable by or against either party until this Agreement has been duly executed by both the Executive and the Company.
Binding Effect of Execution
22
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and the Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
23
 
EXHIBIT A
This is to certify that I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return, any material devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items belonging to the Company.
I further certify that I have, to the best of my knowledge, complied in all material respects with all the terms of my Employment Agreement with the Company.
 
 
 
LIST OF ASSOCIATIONS WITH RESTRICTED COMPANIES
____ None
____ Additional Sheets Attached
Signature of the Executive:_________________________________
Print Name of the Executive:________________________________
 
Date: ___________________                                                      
 
 

Exhibit 10.34
The Executive and the Company agree that the following terms of the Companys letter offering employment to the Executive, dated January 14, 2008, and executed by the Executive on January 16, 2008 (Offer Letter), shall continue in effect following the execution of the Agreement:
Assistance with Lease Obligation
The Company agrees to provide the Executive assistance with his current business lease obligation to protect him from any out of pocket costs. This assumes that the Executives lease is not being paid for by the ongoing operation of Executives business.  In addition, this assistance is predicated on the Executive taking the appropriate steps to mitigate his exposure.  For unmitigated out of pocket expenses the Company will provide the Executive with reimbursement up to a maximum of $350,000.  Any such reimbursements will be required to be paid back to the Company if the Executive leaves the company within one year.
Optimal Advantage Contract
To provide the Executive assistant in transitioning his business, the Company agrees to utilize Optimal Advantage for at least three months to work on its supply chain optimization and custom mix projects.
The Executive and the Company agree that, as of the date of this Agreement, the remaining obligations of the Company pursuant to the Offer Letter have been performed by the Company or have been incorporated into the Agreement.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and the Executive have executed this Exhibit as of the effective date of the Agreement.
 
 

Exhibit 10.35
The Executive and the Company agree that the following terms of the Companys letter offering employment to the Executive, dated January 20, 2008, and executed by the Executive on January 30, 2008, shall continue in effect following the execution of the Agreement:
One Time Cash Bonus
The Company agrees to provide the Executive with a one time cash bonus to replace the bonus the Executive lost as a result of leaving his former employer. Payment will based on the Executives actual earned bonus and is expected to be in the range of $150,000 to $180,000 and will be paid on about May 1, 2008.
Annual Executive Physical
The Company agrees that during the Employment Term the employee benefits provided by the Company to the Executive shall include one Company-paid annual executive physical per year at the Mayo Clinic.
The Executive and the Company agree that, as of the date of this Agreement, the remaining obligations of the Company pursuant to the offer letter have been performed by the Company or have been incorporated into the Agreement.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and the Executive have executed this Exhibit as of the effective date of the Agreement.
 

Exhibit 10.36
FIRST ADDENDUM, dated as of, 2008 (First Addendum) to the EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, dated as of, 2008, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Jimmie L. Wade (the Executive) (the Agreement).
 
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
 
1.           .  Effective upon execution of this First Addendum by the Company and the Executive, Section 4(d) of the Agreement shall be modified by adding a new subsection 4(d)(vi) as follows:
Modification of Section 4(d) of the Agreement
 
4.           .
Termination of Employment
 
(d)
 
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
(vi)        .  Any termination of the Executives employment before April 9, 2009, other than termination of employment due to Death or Disability will be deemed a Retirement as that term is used with respect to equity awards granted to the Executive pursuant to the Companys 2004 LTIP or any successor plan.   
Retirement
2. .   Except for those terms and provisions modified herein, all other terms and conditions in the Agreement shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect.
Full Force and Effect
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080806171006.txt.gz
TIME:20080806171006
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ROANOKE, Va, August 6, 2008
Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the second quarter ended July 12, 2008.  Second quarter earnings per diluted share increased 23% to $0.79 versus $0.64 last year.
Advance
 
 
 
 
 
Second Quarter Highlights
 
Total revenue for the second quarter increased 5.6% to $1.24 billion, compared with revenue of $1.17 billion in the second quarter of fiscal year 2007.  The revenue increase reflected the net addition of 138 new stores in the past 12 months and a comparable store sales increase of 2.9% during the quarter compared to an increase of 1.2% in the second quarter last year.  The comparable store sales gain was comprised of a 13.5% increase in commercial sales partially offset by a 0.8% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales.  This compares to a 5.4% increase in commercial and a 0.2% decrease in DIY in the second quarter last year.  Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 1.6% driven by an 11.9% increase in commercial sales partially offset by a 2.0% decrease in DIY.
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 48.6% in the second quarter as compared to 48.1% last year which reflects a 51 basis point improvement from the prior year.  The 51 basis point improvement was primarily due to lower supply chain and logistics costs combined with more effective pricing.
 
The Companys second quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 38.3% of sales compared to 38.0% last year.  This 23 basis point increase was driven by increased incentive compensation, increased spending on strategic initiatives and higher gasoline expenses related to commercial deliveries.  Partially offsetting the SG&A increases were cost savings realized from actions taken last year to reduce SG&A combined with expense leverage as a result of solid Q2 comparable store sales.
 
Net interest expense was $7.3 million in the quarter, compared to $6.9 million last year.  The Companys current borrowing costs remain at approximately 5%.
 
Operating cash flow for the year increased $70.0 million to $350.0 million.  Free cash flow for the year increased 25% to $244.6 million which reflects a $48.7 million improvement as compared to last year.  Capital expenditures were $106.0 million for the year, as compared to $115.7 million last year.  The decrease is primarily due to a reduction in new store development.
 
During the second quarter, the Company opened 36 stores bringing the total for the year to 70, closed two and relocated four stores.  As of July 12, 2008 total store count is 3,325.
 
 
"Our Advance and AI Team Members focus on delivering outstanding customer service continued to drive our financial results during the second quarter. The 22% year-to-date increase in earnings per diluted share reflects our Team Members execution, progress on our four strategies and the benefit of share repurchases, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.
 
parts availability.  The DIY Transformation and Superior Experience strategies are at earlier stages of evolution and had a less material impact on second quarter results.
The Company continues to focus on four key strategies to turn around the business  DIY Transformation, Commercial Acceleration, Availability Excellence and Superior Experience. The strategies are focused on what matters most to the customer.  Each one of our four strategic priorities is at a different stage of evolution. The Commercial Acceleration strategy, which is the furthest along, drove second quarter results with a 13.5% comparable store sales increase and a 17.2% total sales increase.  The Availability Excellence strategy is also beginning to impact results through continuing inventory upgrades and improved
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The Companys turnaround will be measured by four key gauges of success  sales per square foot, SG&A per store, operating income per Team Member and ROIC.   These gauges are intended to provide a transparent view of the four strategies and will serve as a barometer of the Companys progress.  For the year, the Company anticipates seeing modest improvement in the key gauges.
 
"The first half of FY08 is running ahead of our top line and bottom line expectations allowing us to absorb higher fuel costs and accelerate our strategic initiatives, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
 
For fiscal year 2008, the Company now anticipates leveraging SG&A at an increase of approximately 2% comparable store sales versus the 1% comparable store sales increase previously disclosed.  This increase is driven by investments we are making in order to transform our business to an integrated operating model, combined with the impact of rising fuel costs. The increased investments and fuel costs will constrain profit growth for the balance of the year.
 
 We remain balanced in our outlook given the current economic headwinds and the fact that two more quarters remain in our fiscal year, said Norona.
 
Dividend
 
On August 6, 2008, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on October 3, 2008 to stockholders of record as of September 19, 2008.
 
 
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, August 7, 2008 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(
866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until August 7, 2009.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of July 12, 2008, the Company operated 3,325 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and on-line shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2008.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2007, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20080812172802.txt.gz
TIME:20080812172802
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
ii
 
I.
 
.
Offices
 
Section  1.01
 
.  The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Registered Office
 
Section  1.02
 
.  The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
 
II.
 
.
Stockholders
 
Section  2.01
 
.  Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
Place of Meetings
 
Section  2.02
 
.  An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting.  To be properly brought before the meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder.  For business to be properly brought before the annual meeting by a stockholder, written notice of such business must be delivered to, or mailed to and received by, the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than forty-five (45) days or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the preceding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later that the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above.  A stockholders notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of the stockholder proposing such business and the name and address of the beneficial owner, if different than the stockholder of record, on whose behalf the proposal is made, (c) the class and number of shares of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and (d) any material interest of the stockholder or such beneficial owner in such business.  Notwithstanding anything in these By-Laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the
Annual Meetings
 
1
 
procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair or other person presiding at the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
Section  2.03
 
.  A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, or the Board of Directors and may not be called by any other person or persons.  Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting.
Special Meetings
 
Section  2.04
 
.  A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less then 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting.  Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholders mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
Notice of Meetings
 
Section  2.05
 
.  Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice.  Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  2.06
 
.  At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum.  If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
Quorum
 
Section  2.07
 
.  The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place.  The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented.  If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.  Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken.  At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
Adjourned Meetings
 
 
2
 
Section  2.08
 
.  
Voting
 
(a)  
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholders name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date.  Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
(b)  
The vote upon any election or question before a meeting, other than the election of directors, need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.13.    All such elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
 
(c)   Each director to be elected by stockholders shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present, provided that if the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected, the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the shares represented in person or by proxy at such meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.  For purposes of this Section 2.08(c), a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of shares voted for a directors election exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the number of votes cast with respect to that directors election.  For purposes of this Section 2.08(c), votes cast shall include votes to withhold authority in each case and exclude abstentions and broker non-votes.
(d)   If a director has resigned and his or her resignation is accepted by the Board of Directors, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.03 or may decrease the size of the Board of Directors pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.02.
 
Section  2.09
 
.  
Proxies
 
(a)
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.  A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.  A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if,
 
3
 
and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
 
(b)  
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission.  If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied.  Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
 
(c)  
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then hat one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
 
Section  2.10
 
.  
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
 
(a)  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
(b)  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
(c)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect
 
4
 
of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.10, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action.  If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(d)  
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.10 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  2.11
 
.  
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
 
(a)  
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of the stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted, and shall be delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
(b)  
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within 60 days of the earliest dated consent delivered in the manner required by Section 2.11 (a) to the Corporation, written consents signed by a sufficient number of holders to take action are delivered to the Corporation as required by Section 2.11(a).
 
Section  2.12
 
.  The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held.  The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.  Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting.  The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
Stockholder List
 
 
5
 
Section  2.13
 
.  The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
 
(a)  
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof.  The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act.  If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting.  Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
(b)  
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots.  The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
 
(c)
 
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting.  No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
 
(d)
 
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record.  If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
III.
 
.
Board of Directors
 
Section  3.01
 
.  The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by
General Powers; Organization
 
6
 
the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.  The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings.  The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting.  Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Section  3.02
 
.  The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than eight (8) nor more than twelve (12).  Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified.  Directors need not be stockholders.
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
 
Section  3.03
 
.  
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)  
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Secretary of the Corporation, such resignation to specify whether it will be effective at a particular time, upon receipt by the Secretary or at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.  If no such specification is made, it shall be deemed effective at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.    Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b)  
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office (including those who have resigned from the Board effective as of a future date), in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
 
Section  3.04
 
.  Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Regular Meetings
 
Section  3.05
 
.  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Special Meetings
 
Section  3.06
 
.  Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
Notice of Special Meetings
 
7
 
Section  3.07
 
.  Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given.  Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  3.08
 
.  Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.  If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum
 
Section  3.09
 
.  
Committees of Directors
 
(a)  
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
(b)  
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
(c)  
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporations property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
(d)  
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.  Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business.  In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its
 
8
 
business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
 
Section 3.10     The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director.  The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
Lead Director.
 
Section 3.11   .  Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other.  For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.11 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
Conference Communications
 
Section 3.12   .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
Action by Written Consent of Directors
 
Section 3.13   .  The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
Compensation
 
Section 3.14   .  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section shall be eligible for election as Directors.  Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote for the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section.  Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation.  To be timely, a stockholders notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Company not less than forty-five (45) or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the proceeding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  Such stockholders notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, and (iv) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for election of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (including without limitation such persons written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (b) as to the
Nomination Procedures
 
9
 
stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder.  At the request of the Board of Directors any person nominated by the Board of Directors for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in a stockholders notice of nomination which pertains to the nominee.  No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
IV.
 
.  
Officers
 
Section  4.01
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members.  The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate.  Any person may hold two or more offices.
Number
 
Section  4.02
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.  All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.  Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
 
Section  4.03
 
.  The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors.
Compensation
 
Section  4.04
 
.  
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)  
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation.  Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
 
(b)  
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors.  Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
 
(c)  
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  4.05
 
.  The Board of Directors shall designate the Chair or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  If there is
Chief Executive Officer
 
10
 
no Chair, the President shall be the Chief Executive Officer.  The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.  
 
Section 4.06   .  The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside.  The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at  meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Chair of the Board
 
Section 4.07   .  The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chair (if the Chair is the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation), shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect.
President
 
Section 4.08   .  During the absence or disability of the Chair and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 4.09   .  The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose.  The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws.  The Secretary shall duly give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
Secretary
 
Section 4.10   .  The Treasurer shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed.  He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate.  The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation.  The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
Treasurer
 
Section 4.11   .  All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may,
Authority and Other Duties
 
11
 
without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
 
V.
 
.
Indemnification
 
Section  5.01
 
.  The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time.  The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the Corporation.  The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation.  For such purpose, (X) Independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
Indemnification
 
(i)
 
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directorsto fill vacancies on the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
-
 
(ii)
 
Thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
 
(iii)
 
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all
 
12
 
or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
 
(iv)
 
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
 
Section  5.02
 
.  The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense.  The Company shall not be obligated under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
Insurance
 
Section  5.03
 
.  Expenses (including attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
Expenses Payable in Advance
 
VI.
 
.
Stock
 
Section  6.01
 
.  
Certificates for Stock
 
(a)  
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
 
(b)  
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her.  The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
 
(c)
 
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth
 
13
 
upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
 
(d)  
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated.  Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
 
Section  6.02
 
.  The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend.  At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted.  The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted.  Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable.  Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
Issuance of Stock
 
Section  6.03
 
.  The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore.  The total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated.  The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
Partly Paid Stock
 
Section  6.04
 
.  The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders
 
Section  6.05
 
.  Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholders legal representative or the stockholders duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon
Transfer of Stock
 
14
 
surrender of the certificate or the certificates for such stock.  Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.  No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
 
Section  6.06
 
.  Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate.  A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
Section  6.07
 
.  Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Facsimile Signatures
 
VII.
 
.
Miscellaneous
 
Section  7.01
 
.  
Dividends
 
(a)  
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporations capital stock from the Corporations surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year.  Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.  Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
 
(b)  
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
 
15
 
Section  7.02
 
.  No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or (c) the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders.  Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Interested Directors and Officers
 
Section  7.03
 
.  Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present.  The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
 
Section  7.04
 
.  
Execution of Instruments
 
(a)  
All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
(b)  
If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
 
Section  7.05
 
.  The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can
Advances
 
16
 
reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.
 
Section  7.06
 
.  The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of  December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year
 
Section  7.07
 
.  The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal.  The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
Corporate Seal
 
Section  7.08
 
.  Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time.  The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
Form of Records
 
Section  7.09
 
.  These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.  If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
Power to Amend
 
 
17
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20081007115126.txt.gz
TIME:20081007115126
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
2
ROANOKE, Va, October 7, 2008
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced that revenue for its fiscal third quarter ended October 4, 2008 increased approximately 2.6% driven by 124 net new stores and flat comparable store sales.  Fiscal 2008 third quarter comparable store sales results were considerably lower than the second quarter 2008 which increased 2.9%.
 
The Company had expected third quarter sales growth to decelerate versus the second quarter due to the absence of the economic stimulus payments checks issued by the Federal government.  However, the challenging economic environment, volatility in the financial and credit markets and the impact of the hurricanes and related gas shortages in the Southeast further limited sales growth in the third quarter.
 
Commercial comparable store sales increased approximately 10.9% in the third quarter continuing their double-digit comparable store sales growth. The DIY business experienced comparable store sales declines of approximately 4.2% in the third quarter primarily driven by the current economic environment.  The lower than anticipated sales growth will result in the Companys earnings per share to be approximately flat as compared to the fiscal 2007 third quarter reported earnings per share of $0.57.  In addition, the Company believes the third quarter sales trends will continue through the balance of the fiscal year as customers further adjust to the challenging economic environment.
 
 
"We remain committed to investing in our strategic initiatives while prudently making the necessary adjustments to navigate through the current environment," said Darren Jackson, President and CEO. "We also remain confident in our team members' ability to help our customers navigate through these challenging times."
 
The financial results contained in this release are preliminary, and therefore, subject to the Companys completion of its customary quarterly closing and review procedures.  Further details will be released during the Companys previously scheduled earnings release and conference call.
 
Earnings Release and Investor Conference Call
The Company will release its fiscal third quarter 2008 earnings on October 29, 2008 after the market closes and will host a conference call on October 30, 2008 at 10 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(
866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until October 30, 2009.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of October 4, 2008, the Company operated 3,352 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and on-line shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, rising fuel prices, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2007, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20081029163641.txt.gz
TIME:20081029163641
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
Third Quarter Highlights
 
Total revenue for the third quarter increased 2.6% to $1.19 billion, compared with revenue of $1.16 billion in the third quarter of fiscal year 2007.  The revenue increase reflected the net addition of 124 new stores in the past 12 months and a comparable store sales decrease of 0.1% during the quarter compared to an increase of 1.0% in the third quarter last year.  The comparable store sales decrease was comprised of a 10.8% increase in commercial sales partially offset by a 4.1% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales.  This compares to a 7.5% increase in commercial and a 1.2% decrease in DIY in the third quarter last year.  Year-to-date revenue was $3.95 billion.  Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 1.1% driven by an 11.6% increase in commercial sales partially offset by a 2.6% decrease in DIY.
The Companys gross profit rate was 48.6% in the third quarter as compared to 47.9% last year, which reflects a 65 basis point improvement from the prior year.  The 65 basis point improvement was primarily due to more effective pricing, improved shrink rates and higher sales from Autopart International which generated a higher gross profit rate.
The Companys third quarter selling, general and administrative (SG&A) expenses were 40.5% of sales compared to 39.3% last year.  The 124 basis point SG&A increase was primarily driven by higher investments in strategic initiatives, de-leverage of the Companys fixed costs resulting from flat comparable store sales and the inability to quickly adjust variable expenses to match decelerating sales trends from the second quarter.  Partially offsetting these increases were lower medical expenses, reduced advertising and charges incurred during the prior year third quarter related to asset impairments and severance.
Interest expense was $6.7 million in the quarter, compared to $8.0 million last year driven by reduced borrowing costs.  The Companys current borrowing costs are approximately 5%.
Operating cash flow for the year decreased $1.9 million to $375.8 million.  Free cash flow for the year increased 1.8% to $270.2 million which reflects a $4.8 million improvement as compared to last year.  
 
2
 
Capital expenditures were $137.0 million for the year, as compared to $146.5 million last year.  The decrease is primarily due to a reduction in new store development.
 
"Our third quarter financial results were below our expectations.  However, our strategic results exceeded our expectations in the quarter.  Despite the financial outcomes, I am proud of how our Team Members served our customers.  Our market share numbers indicate we were able to significantly grow our commercial share and maintain our DIY share in the quarter, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  We continue to remain committed to our growth strategies.  As a result, we are resolving to move faster on availability excellence, continue with our confidence in commercial and acknowledge the urgency to stabilize DIY through a superior experience."
 
The Company continues to focus on four key strategies to turn around the business  DIY Transformation, Commercial Acceleration, Availability Excellence and Superior Experience. These strategies are focused on what matters most to the customer.  Each one of our four strategic priorities is at a different stage of evolution. The Commercial Acceleration strategy, which is the furthest along, drove third quarter results with a 10.8% comparable store sales increase and a 14.4% total sales increase.  The Availability Excellence strategy is also impacting results through continuing inventory upgrades and improved parts availability.  The DIY Transformation and Superior Experience strategies are at earlier stages of evolution as the Company completed a 100 day assessment during the third quarter and is launching tests to improve results.
 
3
 
Store Information
 
During the third quarter, the Company opened 30 stores, including three Autopart International stores.  The Company also closed three stores and relocated one store.  Year-to-date, the Company has opened 100 stores, including 17 Autopart International stores, closed nine stores and relocated eight stores.  As of October 4, 2008, the Companys total store count is 3,352.
Share Repurchases
 
Under the Companys share repurchase authorization plan, the Company repurchased $53.6 million of stock during the third quarter, which equated to 1.4 million shares at an average price of $39.09.  In 2008, the Company has purchased 6.1 million shares at an average price of $35.28.  The Company currently has $189 million available from the $250 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in May 2008.
4
Dividend
On October 29, 2008, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on January 9, 2009 to stockholders of record as of December 26, 2008.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, October 30, 2008 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(
866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until October 30, 2009.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of October 4, 2008, the Company operated 3,352 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and on-line shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2008.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2007, on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them, as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20081121172615.txt.gz
TIME:20081121172615
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
(e) On November 17, 2008, the Compensation Committee (the "Committee") of the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company"), granted long-term incentive compensation awards in the form of stock appreciation rights ("SARs") and restricted stock for eight executive officers and other Company employees who are eligible to participate in the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan ("2004 Plan") . With respect to each award, 75 percent (75%) of the target award amount will vest in equal annual installments on each November 17 over a consecutive three-year period, with the first installment vesting on November 17, 2009. The remaining 25 percent (25%) will vest on March 1, 2012, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target of the Company during the 2009 through 2011 fiscal years as described below. This award represents a shift of the Company's annual long-term incentive grant cycle from the first quarter to the fourth quarter of the fiscal year, which will enable awards and performance targets to be put in place prior to the commencement of the performance period.
The applicable performance target set by the Committee is based on the level of the Company's net operating profit after taxes ("NOPAT") less a charge for the Company's weighted average cost of capital ("WACC"), in the aggregate for the 2009 through 2011 fiscal years. The objective of the awards is to provide the recipients with additional incentive to help the Company achieve specified profit growth. If the Company's performance target is met for the three-year performance period, the remaining 25 percent (25%) of the base award will vest and become exercisable on March 1, 2012. If the Company's performance meets the minimum specified threshold level but falls below the target level, a portion of the remaining 25 percent (25%) of the performance-based grants of SARs and restricted stock will vest on a pro rata basis. If the Company's performance exceeds the target level, executive officers may receive additional SARs and shares of restricted stock up to a maximum of 150 percent (150%) of the target level award. The Committee established long-term incentive grant levels for each executive level based on market analysis and on the executive's scope of responsibility and potential impact on the Company's future performance.
All awards will expire on November 17, 2015, the seventh anniversary of the date of grant. For executive officers, 75 percent (75%) of the award value was granted in the form of SARs and the remaining 25 percent (25%) was granted in the form of shares of restricted stock. The exercise price for the SARs is $25.81 per share, which was the closing price of shares of the Company's common stock on the date of grant. During the restricted period, award recipients will be entitled to vote and to receive dividends, if any are declared, on the time-vested portion of the shares of restricted stock.
Among the award recipients were Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer, Michael A. Norona, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Secretary, and Kevin P. Freeland, Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Supply Chain and Information Technology. Jimmie L. Wade, Executive Vice President, Customer Development Officer-Commercial, and Elwyn G. Murray, III, Executive Vice President, Customer Development Officer-DIY, who were "named executive officers" for purposes of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2007, also received awards.
The time-vested as well as the target and maximum award amounts that may be earned by each of the named executive officers pursuant to the performance-based criteria are as follows:
 
Except for certain specified circumstances described below, if the executive's employment is terminated prior to March 1, 2012, all rights with respect to the performance-based awards and any unvested portion of the time-vested awards will be immediately and irrevocably forfeited.
If the executive's employment is terminated due to retirement, as defined in the share award agreement, the time-vested restricted stock will vest on the dates prescribed in the award agreement and the time-vested SARs will expire ninety (90) days after the date on which all of the SARs granted to the executive are exercisable as to all of the SARs or, if the SARs granted to the executive are exercisable as of the date of retirement, ninety (90) days after the date the recipient's employment ends on account of retirement. The performance-based portion of the restricted stock and SARs will vest on March 1, 2012 on a pro-rata basis for the time that the executive was employed during the performance period. The pro rata amount of performance-based Restricted Stock and SARs that will vest on March 1, 2012, will be no less than the total shares at target level less the previously vested portion of the time-based share awards. The performance-based SARs will expire ninety (90) days after March 1, 2012.
If the executive's employment is terminated prior to March 1, 2012 due to the executive's Death, the time-based portion of the awards will vest immediately upon the date of the executive's Death and will expire one year later. If the executive's employment is terminated prior to March 1, 2012 on account of Disability, as that term is defined in the executive's employment agreement, the time-based portion of the awards will vest immediately upon the date of termination and will expire ninety (90) days following the date of termination of employment. If the executive's employment is terminated prior to March 1, 2012 due to the Death or Disability of the executive, the performance-based portion of the Restricted Stock and SARs will vest on March 1, 2012, on a pro rata basis for the time that the executive was employed during the performance period. The pro rata amount of performance-based Restricted Stock and SARs that will vest will be no fewer than the total shares at target less the previously vested portion of the time-based share awards. The performance-based SARs will expire ninety (90) days after March 1, 2012.
If the executive's employment is terminated prior to March 1, 2012 by the executive for Good Reason, or by the Company other than for Cause, as those terms are defined in the executive's employment agreement, the executive will be entitled to the time-based portion of the share awards that have vested as of the date of termination and no further vesting will occur. The performance-based portion of the share awards will vest immediately as of the date of termination at the target level and in the same ratio as the time-vested portion of the share award. For example, if the executive has completed two years of employment following the date of grant, two thirds of the executive's time-vested awards would be vested, and two thirds of the executive's performance-based awards at target level will also vest. The executive's SARs will expire ninety (90) days following the date of termination of employment.
Upon Change in Control, as defined in the 2004 Plan, any remaining time-vested SARs will immediately become exercisable and the time-vested restricted stock shall become vested and free from further restriction. The performance-based portion of the SARs and restricted stock will vest immediately on a pro rata basis based on the actual performance of the Company over the completed portion of the performance period prior to the Change in Control event, but the pro rata amount of performance-based restricted stock
and SARs that will vest will be no fewer than the total shares at target level less the previously vested portion of the time-based share awards.
The foregoing is a summary of the equity awards and does not purport to be complete. The foregoing is qualified in its entirety by reference to the form of Restricted Stock and SAR Agreements issued in connection with the awards. A copy of the form equity award agreements are filed as Exhibits 10.38 and 10.39 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01
 
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 

Exhibit 10.38
 
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company") has on the Award Date specified above granted to
("Participant") Stock Appreciation Rights (the "SARs") with respect to the number of shares of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share ("Stock"), indicated above in the box labeled "Number of Shares" (the "Shares"). The initial value of each Share is indicated above in the box labeled "Grant Price." The SARs that this Certificate represents shall vest and become exercisable in accordance with the vesting schedule, all as set forth in Section 2 below, and upon vesting shall be fully exercisable until the Expiration Date. This Award is subject to the terms and conditions set forth below and in the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). A copy of the Plan is available upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
 
 
 
 
 
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Award, as to any SARs which have not then become exercisable, the Company may cancel these SARs at any time and without prior notice, and as to SARs which are then exercisable the Company may cancel these SARs at any time on ninety (90) days prior notice to you, in response to actions taken by you that could be considered detrimental to the Company or any of its Affiliates. Whether any of your actions could be considered detrimental will be determined by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the "Committee") consistent with the definition of Cause as defined in your employment agreement.
 
The Shares shall be divided into two portions for vesting:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In Witness Whereof, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
 
 

Exhibit 10.39
 
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company") has on the Award Date specified above granted to
("Participant") an award (the "Award") of that number of shares (the "Shares") of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share (the "Common Stock"), indicated above in the box labeled "Number of Shares," subject to certain restrictions and on the terms and conditions contained in this Award Statement and the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the "Plan"). A copy of the Plan is available upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
 
 
 
 
The Shares shall be divided into two portions for vesting:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
In Witness Whereof, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090126175534.txt.gz
TIME:20090126175534
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Principal Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Principal Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, today announced the appointment of Jim Wade as President and Kevin Freeland as Chief Operating Officer. Darren Jackson will retain the title of Chief Executive Officer and Mr. Wade and Mr. Freeland will continue to report directly to him, along with Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer and Keith Oreson, Senior Vice President, Human Resources.
ROANOKE, Va., January 26, 2009
 
I am pleased with the progress we are making on our turnaround and transformation of Advance Auto Parts. Jim Wade and Kevin Freeland have been instrumental in developing and leading the transformation.  I am pleased to announce that Jim Wade has been appointed President and Kevin Freeland has been appointed Chief Operating Officer, said Jackson.
 
Jackson also said that in 2009 Advance will continue to focus on its four key strategies  Commercial Acceleration, DIY Transformation, Availability Excellence and Superior Experience. This approach provides a more streamlined structure to help us move strategy-focused initiatives to market faster.
 
In his new role, Mr. Wade will be responsible for all of Advances customer-focused and sales-driving functions and will lead the execution of the Companys Commercial Acceleration and DIY Transformation strategies. These include Commercial Sales, Marketing and Advertising, Field and Store Operations, Autopart International and Real Estate. Mr. Wade joined Advance in February 1994 and has more than 25 years of retail experience with Advance and other companies. Most recently, he served as Advances Executive Vice President, Customer Development Officer  Commercial since February 2008. Under his leadership, the Companys Commercial business has achieved new levels of excellence, including the achievement of three consecutive quarters of double-digit comps through Q3 2008.
 
In his fifteen years with Advance, Mr. Wade has served in multiple other senior leadership roles, including Chief Financial Officer. He has played integral roles in a number of acquisitions that have helped Advance to become a leader in the automotive aftermarket including Western Auto Supply Company/Parts America, Discount Auto Parts and Autopart International.  Wade will continue to be based in Roanoke, VA.
 
Mr. Freeland will now be responsible for the day-to-day management of all of Advances operational functions, including Merchandising, Inventory Management, Supply Chain, Store Operational Support,
 
 
 
 
 
e-commerce, and Information Technology as well as leading the Companys Availability Excellence and Superior Experience strategies. Mr. Freeland joined Advance in February 2008 with more than 25 years of retail experience. Most recently, he served as Advances Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Supply Chain and Information Technology. Under Mr. Freelands leadership, Advance has made significant progress toward Availability Excellence by upgrading inventory selections in more than 1,000 stores; adding trusted brands that professional installers requested, and launching the implementation of a new merchandising and e-commerce systems which will be completed in 2009.
 
Before joining Advance, Mr. Freeland was the President and Founder of Optimal Advantage, a retail consulting firm, serving customers such as Dell and PetSmart. He spent the eight years prior with Best Buy Co., Inc. where he served in roles including Senior Vice President of Inventory and President of the Musicland Division. Mr. Freeland also spent eight years at Payless Shoe Source in a variety of merchandising positions, including Vice President of Merchandise Distribution. Freeland will continue to be based in Minneapolis, MN.
 
Also related to the Companys reorganization, Elwyn Murray, Executive Vice President and Customer Development Officer DIY has announced his resignation and will leave the Company at the end of February to pursue other opportunities.
 
Elwyn made many meaningful contributions to the transformation of our Company, said Jackson. He has played a significant role in leading key areas, revitalizing our values, and shaping the course for our strategic direction.
 
The Company will provide more information related to this reorganization of management responsibilities during its 4 quarter earnings release on February 18, 2009 after market close and conference call on February 19, 2009 at 10 am Eastern Time.
th
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of October 4, 2008, the Company operated 3,352 stores in 40 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and on-line shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys web site at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090218173023.txt.gz
TIME:20090218173023
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
Effective 2/17/09
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
ii
 
I.
 
.
Offices
 
Section  1.01
 
.  The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Registered Office
 
Section  1.02
 
.  The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
 
II.
 
.
Stockholders
 
Section  2.01
 
.  Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
Place of Meetings
 
Section  2.02
 
.  An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting.  To be properly brought before the meeting, business must be (a) specified in the notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (b) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (c) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder.  For business to be properly brought before the annual meeting by a stockholder, written notice of such business must be delivered to, or mailed to and received by, the Secretary of the Corporation at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not less than forty-five (45) days or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the preceding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later that the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  In no event shall the public disclosure of an adjournment of an annual meeting commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above.  A stockholders notice to the Secretary shall set forth as to each matter the stockholder proposes to bring before the annual meeting (a) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the annual meeting and the reasons for conducting such business at the annual meeting, (b) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of the stockholder proposing such business and the name and address of the beneficial owner, if different than the stockholder of record, on whose behalf the proposal is made, (c) the class and number of shares of the Corporation that are beneficially owned by the stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any, and (d) any material interest of the stockholder or such beneficial owner in such business.  Notwithstanding anything in these By-Laws to the contrary, no business shall be conducted at any annual meeting except in accordance with the
Annual Meetings
 
1
 
procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair or other person presiding at the annual meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that business was not properly brought before the meeting in accordance with the provisions of this Section, and if he or she should so determine, he or she shall so declare to the meeting and any such business not properly brought before the meeting shall not be transacted.
 
Section  2.03
 
.  A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, or the Board of Directors and may not be called by any other person or persons.  Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting.
Special Meetings
 
Section  2.04
 
.  A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less then 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting.  Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholders mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
Notice of Meetings
 
Section  2.05
 
.  Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice.  Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  2.06
 
.  At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum.  If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
Quorum
 
Section  2.07
 
.  The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place.  The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented.  If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.  Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken.  At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
Adjourned Meetings
 
 
2
 
Section  2.08
 
.  
Voting
 
(a)  
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholders name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date.  Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
(b)  
The vote upon any election or question before a meeting, other than the election of directors, need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.13.    All such elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
 
(c)   Each director to be elected by stockholders shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present, provided that if the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected, the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the shares represented in person or by proxy at such meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.  For purposes of this Section 2.08(c), a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of shares voted for a directors election exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the number of votes cast with respect to that directors election.  For purposes of this Section 2.08(c), votes cast shall include votes to withhold authority in each case and exclude abstentions and broker non-votes.
(d)   If a director has resigned and his or her resignation is accepted by the Board of Directors, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.03 or may decrease the size of the Board of Directors pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.02.
 
Section  2.09
 
.  
Proxies
 
(a)
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.  A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.  A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if,
 
3
 
and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
 
(b)  
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission.  If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied.  Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
 
(c)  
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then hat one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
 
Section  2.10
 
.  
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
 
(a)  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
(b)  
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
(c)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect
 
4
 
of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.10, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action.  If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(d)  
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.10 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  2.11
 
.  
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
 
(a)  
Unless otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, any action required or permitted to be taken at any annual or special meeting of the stockholders may be taken without a meeting, without prior notice and without a vote, if a consent in writing, setting forth the action so taken, shall be signed by the holders of outstanding stock having not less than the minimum number of votes that would be necessary to authorize or take such action at a meeting at which all shares entitled to vote thereon were present and voted, and shall be delivered to the Corporation by delivery to its registered office in the State of Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  Prompt notice of the taking of the corporate action without a meeting by less than unanimous written consent shall be given to those stockholders who have not consented in writing.
 
(b)  
Every written consent shall bear the date of signature of each stockholder who signs the consent and no written consent shall be effective to take the corporate action referred to therein unless, within 60 days of the earliest dated consent delivered in the manner required by Section 2.11 (a) to the Corporation, written consents signed by a sufficient number of holders to take action are delivered to the Corporation as required by Section 2.11(a).
 
Section  2.12
 
.  The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held.  The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.  Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting.  The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
Stockholder List
 
 
5
 
Section  2.13
 
.  The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
 
(a)  
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof.  The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act.  If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting.  Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
(b)  
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots.  The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
 
(c)
 
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting.  No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
 
(d)
 
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record.  If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
III.
 
.
Board of Directors
 
Section  3.01
 
.  The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by
General Powers; Organization
 
6
 
the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.  The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings.  The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting.  Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Section  3.02
 
.  The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than seven (7) nor more than twelve (12).  Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified.  Directors need not be stockholders.
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
 
Section  3.03
 
.  
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)  
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Secretary of the Corporation, such resignation to specify whether it will be effective at a particular time, upon receipt by the Secretary or at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.  If no such specification is made, it shall be deemed effective at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.    Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b)  
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may be filled by a majority of the directors then in office (including those who have resigned from the Board effective as of a future date), in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
 
Section  3.04
 
.  Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Regular Meetings
 
Section  3.05
 
.  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Special Meetings
 
Section  3.06
 
.  Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
Notice of Special Meetings
 
7
 
Section  3.07
 
.  Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given.  Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  3.08
 
.  Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.  If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum
 
Section  3.09
 
.  
Committees of Directors
 
(a)  
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
(b)  
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
(c)  
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporations property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
(d)  
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.  Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business.  In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its
 
8
 
business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
 
Section 3.10     The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director.  The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
Lead Director.
 
Section 3.11   .  Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other.  For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.11 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
Conference Communications
 
Section 3.12   .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
Action by Written Consent of Directors
 
Section 3.13   .  The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
Compensation
 
Section 3.14   .  Only persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section shall be eligible for election as Directors.  Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors of the Corporation may be made at a meeting of stockholders by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or by any stockholder of the Corporation entitled to vote for the election of Directors at the meeting who complies with the notice procedures set forth in this Section.  Such nominations, other than those made by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, shall be made pursuant to timely notice in writing to the Secretary of the Corporation.  To be timely, a stockholders notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Company not less than forty-five (45) or more than seventy-five (75) days prior to the first anniversary of the date on which the Company first mailed its proxy materials for the proceeding years annual meeting of stockholders; provided, however, that if the date of the annual meeting is advanced more than thirty (30) days prior to or delayed by more than thirty (30) days after the anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not later than the close of business on the later of (i) the 90th day prior to such annual meeting or (ii) the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made.  Such stockholders notice shall set forth (a) as to each person whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or re-election as a Director, (i) the name, age, business address and residence address of such person, (ii) the principal occupation or employment of such person, (iii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such person, and (iv) any other information relating to such person that is required to be disclosed in solicitations of proxies for election of Directors, or is otherwise required, in each case pursuant to Regulation 14A under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (including without limitation such persons written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a Director if elected); and (b) as to the
Nomination Procedures
 
9
 
stockholder giving the notice (i) the name and address, as they appear on the Corporations books, of such stockholder and (ii) the class and number of shares of the Corporation which are beneficially owned by such stockholder.  At the request of the Board of Directors any person nominated by the Board of Directors for election as a Director shall furnish to the Secretary of the Corporation that information required to be set forth in a stockholders notice of nomination which pertains to the nominee.  No person shall be eligible for election as a Director of the Corporation unless nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in this Section.  The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by the By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded.
 
IV.
 
.  
Officers
 
Section  4.01
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a Secretary and a Treasurer, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members.  The Board of Directors may also choose one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate.  Any person may hold two or more offices.
Number
 
Section  4.02
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.  All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.  Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
 
Section  4.03
 
.  The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors.
Compensation
 
Section  4.04
 
.  
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)  
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation.  Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
 
(b)  
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors.  Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
 
(c)  
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  4.05
 
.  The Board of Directors shall designate the Chair or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  If there is
Chief Executive Officer
 
10
 
no Chair, the President shall be the Chief Executive Officer.  The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.  
 
Section 4.06   .  The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside.  The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at  meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Chair of the Board
 
Section 4.07   .  The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chair (if the Chair is the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation), shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect.
President
 
Section 4.08   .  During the absence or disability of the Chair and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 4.09   .  The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose.  The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws.  The Secretary shall duly give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
Secretary
 
Section 4.10   .  The Treasurer shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed.  He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate.  The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation.  The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
Treasurer
 
Section 4.11   .  All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may,
Authority and Other Duties
 
11
 
without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
 
V.
 
.
Indemnification
 
Section  5.01
 
.  The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time.  The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the Corporation.  The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation.  For such purpose, (X) Independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
Indemnification
 
(i)
 
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directorsto fill vacancies on the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
-
 
(ii)
 
Thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
 
(iii)
 
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all
 
12
 
or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
 
(iv)
 
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
 
Section  5.02
 
.  The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense.  The Company shall not be obligated under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
Insurance
 
Section  5.03
 
.  Expenses (including attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
Expenses Payable in Advance
 
VI.
 
.
Stock
 
Section  6.01
 
.  
Certificates for Stock
 
(a)  
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
 
(b)  
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her.  The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
 
(c)
 
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth
 
13
 
upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
 
(d)  
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated.  Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
 
Section  6.02
 
.  The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend.  At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted.  The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted.  Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable.  Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
Issuance of Stock
 
Section  6.03
 
.  The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore.  The total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated.  The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
Partly Paid Stock
 
Section  6.04
 
.  The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders
 
Section  6.05
 
.  Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholders legal representative or the stockholders duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon
Transfer of Stock
 
14
 
surrender of the certificate or the certificates for such stock.  Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.  No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
 
Section  6.06
 
.  Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate.  A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
Section  6.07
 
.  Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Facsimile Signatures
 
VII.
 
.
Miscellaneous
 
Section  7.01
 
.  
Dividends
 
(a)  
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporations capital stock from the Corporations surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year.  Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.  Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
 
(b)  
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
 
15
 
Section  7.02
 
.  No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or (c) the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders.  Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Interested Directors and Officers
 
Section  7.03
 
.  Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present.  The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
 
Section  7.04
 
.  
Execution of Instruments
 
(a)  
All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
(b)  
If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
 
Section  7.05
 
.  The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can
Advances
 
16
 
reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.
 
Section  7.06
 
.  The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of  December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year
 
Section  7.07
 
.  The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal.  The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
Corporate Seal
 
Section  7.08
 
.  Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time.  The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
Form of Records
 
Section  7.09
 
.  These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting.  If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
Power to Amend
 
 
17
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090520164648.txt.gz
TIME:20090520164648
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090526172731.txt.gz
TIME:20090526172731
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090812172531.txt.gz
TIME:20090812172531
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS SECOND QUARTER COMPARABLE
STORE SALES INCREASE 4.8%; HELPS FUEL EPS GROWTH
AND $287 MILLION IN FREE CASH FLOW
ROANOKE, Va, August 12, 2009
  Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the second quarter ended July 18, 2009.  Second quarter earnings per diluted share were $0.83 which included a $0.06 charge related to store divestitures.  Excluding the impact of the store divestitures, diluted earnings per share (EPS) of $0.89 increased 14% on top of a 22% increase in EPS last year.  On a year-to-date basis, EPS of $1.92, excluding the $0.10 impact of store divestitures, increased 17% on top of a 21% increase in EPS last year.
 
 
Our 49,000 Advance Team Members continue to deliver strong top and bottom line performance, market share gains and improvements in our customer satisfaction and Team Member engagement scores, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  Over the last 18 months we have been on a journey to turnaround the Company.  Our focus on our customers, Team Members, growth and profitability is building the foundation to transform our Company into the industry customer experience leader.
 
Second Quarter Highlights
 
Total sales for the second quarter increased 7% to $1.32 billion, compared with total sales of $1.24 billion in the second quarter of fiscal year 2008.  The sales increase
reflected the net addition of 82 new stores in the past 12 months and a comparable store sales increase of 4.8% during the quarter compared to an increase of 2.9% during the second quarter last year.  The comparable store sales gain was comprised of a 14.8% increase in Commercial sales and a 0.7% increase in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales.  This compares to a 13.5% increase in Commercial and a 0.8% decrease in DIY during the second quarter last year.  Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 6.7% driven by a 16.3% increase in Commercial and a 2.7% increase in DIY.
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 49.3% of sales in the second quarter as compared to 47.4% in the prior year, which reflects a 189 basis-point improvement.  The 189 basis-point improvement was primarily due to continued investments in pricing capabilities, merchandising capabilities and parts availability, decreased inventory shrink and better store execution resulting from the impact of previous changes to better align Team Member incentives.
 
The Companys second quarter SG&A rate was 39.1% of sales as compared to 37.1% during the second quarter last year.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures, the SG&A rate increased 136 basis
 
 
2
 
 
 
points.  This increase was driven by higher incentive compensation, continued strategic capability investments to improve the Companys gross profit rate and to accelerate the Commercial business and higher medical expenses.  The SG&A rate increase was partially offset by lower advertising expenses and occupancy expense leverage as a result of the Companys 4.8% comparable store sales increase.
 
Operating cash flow through the second quarter increased 24% to $433.8 million from $350.0 million in the second quarter last year.  Free cash flow through the second quarter was $287.4 million or an 18% increase over second quarter last year.  This increase was primarily driven by an increase in net income, improved working capital management and a decrease in capital expenditures.  As a result of the increased free cash flow, the Company has decreased its total bank debt outstanding by $173 million
over the past year.  Capital expenditures were $90.8 million through the second quarter.  This compares to $106.0 million in 2008, a decrease of $15.2 million primarily due to the timing of new store development partially offset by routine spending on existing stores.
 
We are pleased with our sixth consecutive quarter of double-digit Commercial comparable sales growth, our second consecutive quarter of positive DIY comparable sales in over 3 years, as well as the strong gross profit rate improvement which fueled an increase in our operating income rate of over 50 basis-points before the impact of store divestitures.  We are also pleased with the cash flow we generated and the fact that we continued to strengthen our balance sheet.  Looking ahead, we continue to be optimistic about our growth and profitability potential based on our second quarter results and we remain committed to our strategic objectives and investment profile, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
 
4
 
 
Store Information
 
During the second quarter, the Company opened 23 stores, including 7 Autopart International stores.  The Company also closed 21 stores and relocated 3 stores.  As of July 18, 2009, the Companys total store count was 3,407, including 142 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
Under the Companys share repurchase authorization plan, the Company repurchased 344,530 shares of its common stock during the second quarter at an aggregate cost of $14.4 million, or an average price of $41.71 per share.  At the end of the second quarter, the Company had $174.6 million available from the $250 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in May 2008.
 
2009 Store Divestitures
 
As a result of the previously announced store divestiture initiative, the Company closed 20 stores during the quarter and expects to divest a total of 40 to 55 unprofitable stores in 2009 that are delivering unacceptable strategic or financial results.  During the second quarter, the Company recorded a $0.06 EPS charge primarily due to lease exit costs for the 20 stores that were closed during the quarter.  Year-to-date, the Company has closed 24 stores which resulted in a $0.10 EPS charge.  Currently, the Company estimates that the incremental store divestitures will result in a $0.15 to $0.22 charge to EPS in fiscal 2009.
 
Dividend
 
On August 11, 2009, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of six cents per share to be paid on October 9, 2009 to stockholders of record as of September 25, 2009.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, August 13, 2009 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until August 13, 2010.
 
 
5
 
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of July 18, 2009, the Company operated 3,407 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online lookup for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2009.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2009 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
-Financial Tables to Follow-
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090817165230.txt.gz
TIME:20090817165230
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 3.2
 
AMENDED AND RESTATED
BY-LAWS
OF
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Effective 08/12/09
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
i
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ii
 
I.
 
.
Offices
 
Section  1.01
 
.  The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Registered Office
 
Section  1.02
 
.  The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
Other Offices
 
II.
 
.
Stockholders
 
Section  2.01
 
.  Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
Place of Meetings
 
Section  2.02
 
.  An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting.
Annual Meetings
 
Section  2.03
 
.  A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, or the Board of Directors and may not be called by any other person or persons.  Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting sent by the Corporation subject to the nomination procedures for directors set forth in Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws.
Special Meetings
 
Section  2.04
 
.
Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations
 
(a)           .
Annual Meetings of Shareholders
 
(1)  Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders only (A) pursuant to the Corporations notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (B) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (C) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws and at the time of the annual meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws as to such business or nomination; clause (C) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended (the Exchange Act) and included in the Corporations notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
 
 
1
 
 
(2)     Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(1)(C) of these By-Laws, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and such other business must otherwise be a proper matter for stockholder action.
(A)     To be timely, a stockholders notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day and not later than the close of business on the 120th day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than 30 days before or more than 60 days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day prior to the date of such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the 120th day prior to the date of such annual meeting or, if the first public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is less than 130 days prior to the date of such annual meeting, the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall any adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting or the announcement thereof commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above.
(B)     To be in proper form, a stockholders notice (whether given pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(2) or Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws) to the Secretary must set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made, the following information together with a representation as to the accuracy of the information:
(i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporations books, and of such beneficial owner, if any,
(ii) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and/or of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any,
(iii) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation, whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of capital stock of the Corporation or otherwise (a Derivative Instrument) directly or indirectly owned beneficially
 
 
 
2
 
 
by such stockholder and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation,
(iv) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Company,
(v) a description of any short interest in any security of the Company (for purposes of these By-Laws a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security),
(vi) a description of any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation,
(vii) a description of any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner and
(viii) a description of any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any,
(ix)  a description of any arrangements, rights, or other interests described in Sections 2.04(b)(2)(A)(i)- (viii) of these By-Laws held by members of such stockholders immediate family sharing the same household,  and
(x) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal and/or for the election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
 
 
 
3
 
 
Such information shall be provided as of the date of the notice, and such information, as well as any other information reasonably requested by the Company after the date of the notice, shall be supplemented by such stockholder not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date.
(C)           If the notice relates to any business other than a nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, set forth:
(i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business, and
(ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder;
(D)           Set forth, as to each person, if any, whom the stockholder proposes to nominate for election or reelection to the Board of Directors
(i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (including such persons written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected), and
(ii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three years, and any other material relationships, between or among such  stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the
 
 
 
4
 
 
registrant for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant.
(E)           With respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, such stockholder shall include a completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 2.05 of these By-Laws. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholders understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
(3)            Notwithstanding anything in the second sentence of Section 2.04(a)(2) of these By-Laws to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors is increased and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least 130 days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding years annual meeting, a stockholders notice required by Section 2.04 of these By-Laws shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the 10th day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
(b)
 
.
Special Meetings of Stockholders
 
(1)           Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting pursuant to the Corporations notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporations notice of meeting (A) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (B) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporations notice of meeting, if the stockholders notice required by Section 2.04(a) of this By-Law with respect to any nomination (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 2.05 of these By-Laws) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day prior to the date of such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the 120th day prior to the date of such special meeting or, if the first public announcement of the date of such special meeting is less than 130 days prior to the date of such special meeting, the 10th
 
 
 
5
 
 
day following the day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting. In no event shall any adjournment or postponement of a special meeting or the announcement thereof commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholders notice as described above.
 
(c)  .
General
 
(1) Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the Chair of the meeting shall have the power and duty to determine whether a nomination or any business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in these By-Laws and, if any proposed nomination or business is not in compliance with Section 2.40 of these By-Laws, to declare that such defective nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted.
(2) For purposes of these By-Laws, public announcement shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by a national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
(3) Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of Section 2.04 of these By-Laws, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or the rules promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(1)(C) or Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws. Nothing in these By-Laws shall be deemed to affect any rights (A) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporations proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (B) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
(4) The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination or business proposal was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by these By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted.
 
Section  2.05
 
To be eligible to be a nominee by a stockholder for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods
Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement.  
 
 
6
 
 
prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 2.04 of these By-Laws) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request) that such person:
 
(a)           is not and will not become a party to:
 
(1) any agreement, arrangement or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a Voting Commitment) that has not been disclosed to the Corporation, or
 
(2) any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such persons ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such persons fiduciary duties under applicable law,
 
(b)           is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein, and
 
(c)           in such persons individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
 
Section  2.06
 
.  A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less then 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting.  Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholders mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
Notice of Meetings
 
Section  2.07
 
.  Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice.  Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  2.08
 
.  At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person
Quorum
 
 
 
7
 
 
or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum.  If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
 
Section  2.09
 
.  The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place.  The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented.  If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting.  Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken.  At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
Adjourned Meetings
 
Section  2.10
 
.
Voting
 
(a)
 
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholders name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date.  Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
 
(b)
 The vote upon any election or question before a meeting, other than the election of directors, need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.15.    All such elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
 
(c) Each director to be elected by stockholders shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present, provided that if the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected, the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the shares represented in person or by proxy at such meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors.  For purposes of this Section 2.10(c), a majority of votes cast shall mean that the number of shares voted for a directors election exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the number of votes cast with respect to that directors election.  For purposes of this Section 2.10(c), votes cast shall include votes to withhold authority in each case and exclude abstentions and broker non-votes.
 
 
8
 
 
(d) If a director has resigned and his or her resignation is accepted by the Board of Directors, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.03 or may decrease the size of the Board of Directors pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.02.
 
 
Section  2.11
 
.
Proxies
 
(a)
 
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period.  A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date.  A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
 
(b)
 
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission.  If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied.  Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
 
(c)
 
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then that one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
 
Section  2.12
 
.
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
 
(a)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting.  If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held.  A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
 
(b)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not
 
 
9
 
 
more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporations minutes of stockholders meetings and proceedings.  If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
 
(c)
 
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.12, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action.  If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
 
(d)
 
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.12 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  2.13
 
.  Subject to the rights of the holders of any series of preferred stock with respect to such series of preferred stock, any action required or permitted to be taken by the stockholders of the Corporation must be effected at a duly called annual or special meeting of such stockholders and may not be effected by any consent in writing by such stockholders.
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
 
Section  2.14
 
.  The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder.  Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held.  The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present.  Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting.  The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
Stockholder List
 
 
10
 
 
Section  2.15
 
.  The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
 
(a)
 
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof.  The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act.  If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting.  Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
 
(b)
 
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots.  The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
 
(c)
 
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting.  No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
 
(d)
 
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record.  If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
 
III.
 
.
Board of Directors
 
Section  3.01
 
.  The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by
General Powers; Organization
 
 
11
 
 
the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders.  The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings.  The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting.  Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
 
Section  3.02
 
.  The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than seven (7) nor more than twelve (12).  Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified.  Directors need not be stockholders.
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
 
Section  3.03
 
.
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)
 
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Secretary of the Corporation, such resignation to specify whether it will be effective at a particular time, upon receipt by the Secretary or at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.  If no such specification is made, it shall be deemed effective at the pleasure of the Board of Directors.    Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
(b)
 
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may only be filled by a majority of the directors then in office (including those who have resigned from the Board effective as of a future date), in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
 
Section  3.04
 
.  Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Regular Meetings
 
Section  3.05
 
.  Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Special Meetings
 
Section  3.06
 
.  Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
Notice of Special Meetings
 
 
12
 
 
Section  3.07
 
.  Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given.  Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Waiver of Notice
 
Section  3.08
 
.  Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors.  If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Quorum
 
Section  3.09
 
.
Committees of Directors
 
(a)
 
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee.  In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
 
(b)
 
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
 
(c)
 
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporations property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
 
(d)
 
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required.  Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its
 
 
13
 
 
business.  In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
 
Section 3.10     The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director.  The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
Lead Director.
 
Section 3.11   .  Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other.  For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.11 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
Conference Communications
 
Section 3.12   .  Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing, manually or by electronic transmission, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
Action by Written Consent of Directors
 
Section 3.13   .  The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
Compensation
 
 
IV.
 
.
Officers
 
Section  4.01
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a President and a Secretary, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members.  The Board of Directors may also choose a Treasurer, one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate.  Any person may hold two or more offices.
Number
 
Section  4.02
 
.  The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors.  All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.  Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
 
Section  4.03
 
.  The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or a committee thereof or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
Compensation
 
 
14
 
 
Section  4.04
 
.
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
 
(a)
 
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation.  Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
 
(b)
 
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors.  Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
 
(c)
 
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
 
Section  4.05
 
.  If the Board of Directors has nototherwise designated a Chief Executive Officer, the Board of Directors may designate the Chair, if any, or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation.  The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation.  During the absence or disability of the President, the Chief Executive Officer shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the President.
Chief Executive Officer
 
 
Section 4.06 .  The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside.  The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at  meetings of the stockholders.  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer and the President, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Chair of the Board
 
Section 4.07 .  The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect.  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
President
 
Section 4.08 .  During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
Vice Presidents
 
Section 4.09 .  The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose.  The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws.  The Secretary shall duly
Secretary
 
 
15
 
 
give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
 
Section 4.10 .  The Treasurer, if any, shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed.  He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate.  The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation.  The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
Treasurer
 
Section 4.11 .  All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.  Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may, without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
Authority and Other Duties
 
V.
 
.
Indemnification
 
Section  5.01
 
.  The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time.  The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the Corporation.  The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation.  For such purpose, (X) independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
Indemnification
 
(i)
 
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directorsto fill vacancies on
-
 
 
16
 
 
the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
 
(ii)
 
thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
 
(iii)
 
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
 
(iv)
 
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
 
Section  5.02
 
.  The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense.  The Company shall not be obligated under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
Insurance
 
Section  5.03
 
.  Expenses (including attorneys fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by
Expenses Payable in Advance
 
 
17
 
 
or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
 
VI.
 
.
Stock
 
Section  6.01
 
.
Certificates for Stock
 
(a)
 
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
 
(b)
 
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her.  The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
 
(c)
 
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
 
(d)
 
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated.  Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
 
Section  6.02
 
.  The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors.  No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend.  At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted.  The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted.  Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable.  Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
Issuance of Stock
 
Section  6.03
 
.  The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore.  The total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent
Partly Paid Stock
 
 
18
 
 
any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated.  The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
 
Section  6.04
 
.  The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Registered Stockholders
 
Section  6.05
 
.  Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholders legal representative or the stockholders duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon surrender of the certificate or the certificates for such stock.  Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books.  No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
Transfer of Stock
 
Section  6.06
 
.  Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate.  A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
 
Section  6.07
 
.  Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles.  In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
Facsimile Signatures
 
 
19
 
 
VII.
 
.
Miscellaneous
 
Section  7.01
 
.
Dividends
 
(a)
 
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporations capital stock from the Corporations surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year.  Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.  Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
 
(b)
 
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
 
Section  7.02
 
.  No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or (c) the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders.  Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Interested Directors and Officers
 
Section  7.03
 
.  Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
 
 
20
 
 
advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present.  The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
 
Section  7.04
 
.
Execution of Instruments
 
(a)
 
All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
 
(b)
 
If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
 
Section  7.05
 
.  The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.
Advances
 
Section  7.06
 
.  The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of  December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Fiscal Year
 
Section  7.07
 
.  The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal.  The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
Corporate Seal
 
Section  7.08
 
.  Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time.  The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
Form of Records
 
Section  7.09
 
.  These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special
Power to Amend
 
 
21
 
 
meeting.  If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
 
22


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20090916164512.txt.gz
TIME:20090916164512
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20091112085247.txt.gz
TIME:20091112085247
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the third quarter ended October 10, 2009.  Third quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $0.65 which included a $0.04 charge related to store divestitures.  Excluding the impact of the store divestitures, EPS increased 19% to $0.69.  On a year-to-date basis and excluding the $0.15 impact of store divestitures, EPS increased 17% to $2.61 on top of a 16% increase in EPS last year.
ROANOKE, Va, November 11, 2009
 
 
 
 
I am very proud of our Team Members ability to drive continuous improvements in customer satisfaction and Team Member engagement.  Their ability to revitalize our core values and actions to drive our four strategies resulted in strong top line growth, a 53% increase in free cash flow and a 100 basis-point increase on our return on invested capital, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer. 
 
Third Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
 
Total sales for the third quarter increased 6.3% to $1.26 billion, compared with total sales of $1.19 billion in the third quarter of fiscal year 2008.  The sales increase reflected the net addition of 66 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 4.7% compared to a decrease of 0.1% during the third quarter last year.  Adjusting for the calendar shift due to the 53 week last year, third quarter comparable store sales increased approximately 5.2%.  The 4.7% comparable store sales gain was comprised of an 11.8% increase in Commercial and a 1.7% increase in do-it-yourself (DIY).  This compares to a 10.8% increase in Commercial and a 4.1% decrease in DIY during the third quarter last year.  Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 6.1% driven by a 14.9% increase in Commercial and a 2.4% increase in DIY.
rd
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 49.2% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 47.3% in the prior year, which reflects a 190 basis-point improvement.  The 190 basis-point improvement was primarily due to continued investments in pricing and merchandising capabilities, parts availability, decreased inventory shrink and improved store execution. Year-to-date, the Companys gross profit rate was 49.1%, or 167 basis points favorable to the same period in fiscal 2008.
 
The Companys SG&A rate was 40.9% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 39.3% during the third quarter last year.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures, the Companys SG&A rate increased 110 basis points.  This increase was driven by higher incentive compensation, increased
 
 
2
 
investments in store labor and Commercial Sales force, higher medical expenses and continued investments to improve the Companys gross profit rate and to launch the Companys new E-commerce website.  The SG&A rate increase was partially offset by lower advertising expenses and occupancy expense leverage as a result of the Companys 4.7% comparable store sales increase.  Year-to-date, the Companys SG&A rate was 39.8% versus 38.1% during the same period last year.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures, the year-to-date SG&A rate was 39.3%.
 
Operating cash flow through the third quarter increased 67% to $628.5 million from $375.8 million through the same period last year.  Free cash flow through the third quarter was $414.0 million or a 53% increase through the same period last year.  This increase was primarily driven by an improvement in working capital management, increased deferred taxes and an increase in net income.  The increase in free cash flow, allowed the Company to decrease its total outstanding bank debt by $192 million over the past year.  Capital expenditures were $132.6 million through the third quarter.  This compares to capital expenditures of $137.0 million in 2008, a decrease of $4.4 million primarily due to the timing of new store development, partially offset by routine spending on existing stores and Information Technology investments.
 
Our third quarter marked our seventh consecutive quarter of double-digit Commercial comp sales growth, our third consecutive quarter of positive DIY comps and our fourth consecutive quarter of strong gross profit rate improvements.  These results fueled our third consecutive quarter of double-digit operating income and EPS growth on a comparable basis.
We are pleased with the $414 million year-to-date free cash flow we generated and the fact that we continued to strengthen our balance sheet while making solid progress on our goal to obtain investment grade ratings,
said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
 
 
3
 
 
 
 
4
 
 
Store Information
 
During the third quarter, the Company opened 24 stores, including 9 Autopart International stores.  The Company also closed 13 stores.  As of October 10, 2009, the Companys total store count was 3,418 including 151 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
Under the Companys share repurchase authorization plan, the Company repurchased 879,910 shares of its common stock during the third quarter at an aggregate cost of $35.2 million, or an average price of $40.00 per share.  At the end of the third quarter, the Company had $139.4 million available from the $250 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in May 2008.
 
2009 Store Divestitures
 
As a result of the previously announced store divestiture initiative, the Company closed 12 stores during the quarter and expects to divest a total of 40 to 50 unprofitable stores in 2009 that are delivering unacceptable strategic or financial results.  During the third quarter, the Company recorded a $0.04 EPS charge primarily due to lease exit costs for the 12 stores that were closed during the quarter.  Year-to-date, the Company has closed 36 stores which resulted in a $0.15 EPS charge.  The Company estimates that the incremental store divestitures will result in a $0.15 to $0.22 charge to EPS in fiscal 2009.
 
Dividend
 
On November 10, 2009, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on January 8, 2010 to stockholders of record as of December 24, 2009.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, November 12, 2009 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until November 12, 2010.
 
5
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of October 10, 2009, the Company operated 3,418 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2009.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2009 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
6
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20091214171732.txt.gz
TIME:20091214171732
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100203164118.txt.gz
TIME:20100203164118
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100217170534.txt.gz
TIME:20100217170534
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 

 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and fiscal year ended January 2, 2010.
ROANOKE, Va, February 17, 2010
 
Fourth quarter and fiscal 2009 results include the impact of 45 store closures related to the previously announced store divestiture plan.  Additionally, fourth quarter and fiscal 2008 results included an additional fiscal week of business (53 week) as well as a non-cash inventory adjustment resulting from a change in inventory management approach for slow-moving inventory.  As a result, the Companys fiscal 2009 and fiscal 2008 financial results are not comparable with prior periods.  Thus, the Companys fiscal 2009 and fiscal 2008 financial results have been presented in this press release on both a generally accepted accounting principles (GAAP) basis and on a comparable basis to exclude the impact of store divestitures in fiscal 2009 and the impact of the 53 week and the non-cash inventory adjustment that occurred in the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008.  The Companys comments on its financial and operational performance reflect the results presented on the comparable basis.
rd
rd
 
Fourth quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $0.36 which included a $0.03 charge related to store divestitures. On a comparable basis, EPS decreased 5% to $0.39.  For fiscal 2009, on a comparable basis, EPS increased 14% to $3.00 on top of a 16% increase in EPS last year.
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 
While our fourth quarter financial performance did not meet our expectations, we believe it is a short-term setback versus a long-term trend said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  Our fiscal 2009 results exceeded our expectations strategically and financially.  Overall, our performance, as measured through our customers, Team Members, growth and returns, has reached all-time highs and I am confident we are moving in the right direction.
 
Comparable Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2009 Highlights
 
On a comparable basis, total sales for the fourth quarter increased 3.6% to $1.14 billion, compared with total sales of $1.10 billion in the fourth quarter of fiscal year 2008. The sales increase reflected the net addition of 52 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 2.4% compared to a 3.0% gain during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2008. The 2.4% comparable store sales gain was comprised of a 9.5% increase in Commercial sales, partially offset by a 0.8% decrease in do-it-yourself (DIY) sales.  This compares to a 13.7% increase in Commercial and a 1.1% decrease in DIY during the fourth quarter last year.  After adjusting for the calendar shift due to the 53 week in fiscal 2008, fourth quarter comparable store sales increased approximately 3.1%.  For fiscal 2009, the Companys comparable store sales increased 5.3% versus a 1.5% increase during fiscal 2008.  Comparable store sales increased 1.7% for DIY and 13.7% for Commercial versus a 2.3% decrease and a 12.1% increase in DIY and Commercial last year, respectively.
rd
 
The Companys comparable gross profit rate was 47.9% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 47.2% in the prior year which reflects a 78 basis-point improvement.  The 78 basis-point improvement was primarily due to continued investments in pricing and merchandising capabilities, increased parts availability and improved store execution, partially offset by the impact of the anniversary of shrink benefits reported during the fourth quarter last year.  For fiscal 2009, the Companys gross profit rate was 48.9%, which reflects a 149 basis-point increase from fiscal 2008.
 
 
3
 
The Companys comparable SG&A rate was 42.6% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 40.9% in the prior year, a 165 basis-point increase.  This increase was driven by increased investments in store labor and the Commercial Sales force, higher benefits expense, additional advertising expense and continued investments to improve the Companys gross profit rate and to operate the Companys new E-commerce website.  The increased SG&A rate was partially offset by lower incentive compensation and occupancy expense leverage.  The Companys comparable SG&A rate for fiscal 2009 was 40.0% versus 38.7% for fiscal 2008, a 125 basis-point increase.
 
Operating cash flow for fiscal 2009 increased $221.0 million to $699.7 million from $478.7 million in fiscal 2008.  Free cash flow for fiscal 2009 was a record $410.0 million which represents a 46% increase from fiscal 2008.  This increase was primarily driven by improved working capital, increased deferred taxes and an increase in net income.  The increase in free cash flow enabled the Company to decrease its total outstanding bank debt by $252.0 million over the past year.  Capital expenditures were $192.9 million for fiscal 2009.  This compares to capital expenditures of $185.0 million in 2008, an increase of $7.9 million.
 
Overall our 2009 financial performance reflected improved top line growth, record cash flow and increased return on invested capital despite our soft fourth quarter performance said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  Looking ahead, our 2010 outlook reflects continued confidence in our ability to grow both our top and bottom line while improving productivity and returns.
 
4
 
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
2009 Store Information
 
As a result of the previously announced store divestiture program, the Company divested a total of 9 stores during the quarter and 45 stores during fiscal 2009 that were delivering unacceptable strategic or financial results.  The Company recorded a $0.03 EPS charge for the fourth quarter and a $0.17 EPS charge for fiscal 2009, primarily due to lease exit costs for the stores closed during the quarter and fiscal year, respectively.
 
During the fourth quarter, the Company opened 14 stores, including five Autopart International stores, and the Company also closed 12 stores.  For the year, the Company opened 107 new stores, including 32 Autopart International stores, and closed 55 stores.  The stores closures are inclusive of the divested stores discussed above. As of January 2, 2010, the Companys total store count was 3,420, including 156 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
During the fourth quarter, the Company repurchased approximately 1.2 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $50.0 million, or an average price of $40.24 per share.  The Company repurchased approximately 2.5 million shares of its common stock during fiscal 2009 at an aggregate cost of $99.6 million, at an average price of $40.36 per share. The Company has repurchased 4.0 million shares at an average price of $39.77 per share under the $250 million share repurchase program authorization.
 
 
6
 
Share Repurchase Authorization
 
The Companys Board of Directors today authorized a $500 million share repurchase program. This new authorization replaces the Companys $250 million share repurchase program authorized in May 2008, which had $89.3 million remaining.
 
2010 Annual Financial Outlook
 
The Company has provided the following annual financial outlook and certain key assumptions for fiscal 2010.
 
 
 
In fiscal 2010, the Company anticipates a low to approaching mid single-digit increase in comparable store sales primarily driven by continued strong Commercial sales growth. The Company assumes a more modest increase in gross profit rate primarily due to the investments made over the past two years.
 
While the Company plans to continue investing in key areas such as Commercial, E-commerce and global sourcing, total SG&A dollar growth is expected to decelerate due to a lower growth in its fixed cost structure. The Company estimates an EPS range of approximately $3.20 to $3.40 for fiscal 2010.
 
The annual financial outlook for fiscal 2010 reflects continued focus on top line growth with a more balanced cost structure that will better position the Company to leverage SG&A at lower comp sales levels in 2010, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  The single-digit comp store sales increase, combined with the third consecutive year of gross profit rate improvement should position us to achieve our third consecutive year of double-digit EPS growth.
 
7
 
Dividend
 
On February 16, 2010, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on April 9, 2010 to stockholders of record as of March 26, 2010.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, February 18, 2010 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until February 18, 2011.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of January 2, 2010, the Company operated 3,420 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2010.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 3, 2009 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company
 
8
 
intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
9
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100429162019.txt.gz
TIME:20100429162019
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
On April 26, 2010, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors signatory thereto (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"), Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as representatives of the several underwriters listed in Schedule 1 thereto, and BB&T Capital Markets, a division of Scott and Stringfellow, LLC, as qualified independent underwriter pursuant to which the Company agreed to sell $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 5.750% Notes due May 1, 2020 (the "Notes") to the Underwriters at a public offering price of 99.587% of the principal amount per note. The Underwriting Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and agreements of the Company and customary conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties.
The estimated net proceeds from the offering of the Notes is approximately $294.3 million, after deducting underwriting discounts and commissions and estimated offering expenses payable by the Company. The Company will use the net proceeds from this offering to repay indebtedness outstanding under the Company's $750 million unsecured five-year revolving credit facility and $200 million unsecured four-year term loan (in each case, the Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, is the borrower). As of March 27, 2010, the amount of indebtedness outstanding under the Company's revolving credit facility and term loan was approximately $275 million. Amounts repaid under the Company's revolving credit facility may be reborrowed from time to time for operational purposes, working capital needs, growth capital expenditures and other general corporate purposes. The Company intends to use the remaining net proceeds for general corporate purposes. Certain affiliates of the underwriters are lenders under the revolving credit facility and term loan.
The terms of the Notes are governed by an Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "Base Indenture"), among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented and modified by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, (the "First Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Base Indenture, the "Indenture").
The Notes bear interest at a rate of 5.750% per year payable semi-annually in arrears on May 1 and November 1 of each year, commencing on November 1, 2010. The Company may redeem some or all of the Notes at any time or from time to time, at the redemption price described in the Indenture. In addition, in the event of a Change of Control Triggering Event (as defined in the Indenture), the Company will be required to offer to repurchase the notes at a price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the repurchase date. The Notes initially will be fully and unconditionally guaranteed, jointly and severally, on an unsubordinated and unsecured basis by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors. The Company will be permitted to release guarantees without the consent of holders of the Notes under the circumstances described in the Indenture.
The Indenture contains customary provisions for events of default including for (i) failure to pay principal or interest when due and payable, (ii) failure to comply with covenants or agreements in the Indenture or the Notes and failure to cure or obtain a waiver of such default upon notice, (iii) a default under any debt for money borrowed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries that results in acceleration of the maturity of such debt, or failure to pay any such debt within any applicable grace period after final stated maturity, in an aggregate amount greater than $25.0 million without such debt having been discharged or acceleration having been rescinded or annulled within 10 days after receipt by the Company of notice of the default by the trustee or holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the notes then outstanding, and (iv) events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization affecting the Company and certain of its subsidiaries. In the case of an event of default, the principal amount of the Notes plus accrued and unpaid interest may be accelerated. The Indenture also contains covenants limiting the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to incur debt secured by liens and to enter into sale and lease back transactions.
The offering of the Notes was registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to the Company's shelf registration statement on Form S-3 declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on April 26, 2010 (File No. 333-166291, the "Registration Statement").
The foregoing description of the Underwriting Agreement, Base Indenture, First Supplemental Indenture and Notes are qualified in their entirety by the Underwriting Agreement, Base Indenture, First Supplemental Indenture and form of Note, respectively, which are incorporated herein by reference and are attached hereto as Exhibits 1.1, 4.1, 4.2 and 4.3, respectively.
 
The agreements included as exhibits to this Form 8-K (including the exhibits to such agreements), which are being filed to provide investors with information regarding their terms, contain various representations, warranties and covenants of, among others, the Company. They are not intended to provide any factual information about any of the parties thereto or any subsidiaries of the parties thereto. The representations, warranties and covenants were made for purposes of each of the agreements, solely for the benefit of the parties thereto.
 
The information provided in Item 1.01 with respect to the Company's issuance of the Notes is incorporated by reference herein.
 
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the pricing of the offering of the Notes is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference. A copy of the Company's press release announcing the closing of the offering of the Notes is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.2 and is incorporated herein by reference.
 
(d) Exhibits.
The exhibits listed in the following index relate to an offering under the Registration Statement and each is filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement.
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 

Exhibit 1.1
EXECUTION COPY
April 26, 2010
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell to the several Underwriters listed in Schedule 1 hereto (the "Underwriters"), for whom you are acting as representatives (the "Representatives"), $300,000,000 principal amount of its 5.750% Notes due May 1, 2020 (the "Notes"). The Notes will be guaranteed on an unsecured basis (the "Subsidiary Guarantees", and together with the Notes, the "Securities") by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined below). The Securities will be issued pursuant to an Indenture
 
to be dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "Base Indenture") between the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture (the "Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Base Indenture, the "Indenture").
For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Subsidiary Guarantors shall mean those entities set forth on Schedule 2 hereto; provided, however, that any such Subsidiary Guarantor shall cease to be a Subsidiary Guarantor under this Agreement at such time as such entity ceases to be a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the terms of the Indenture.
The Company hereby confirms its agreement with the several Underwriters concerning the purchase and sale of the Securities, as follows:
1. . The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Securities Act"), an automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-166291), including a prospectus, relating to the Securities. Such registration statement, as of the time it became effective, including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness ("Rule 430 Information"), is referred to herein as the "Registration Statement"; and as used herein, the term "Preliminary Prospectus" means the prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time of its effectiveness that omits Rule 430 Information (the "Base Prospectus") and the preliminary prospectus supplement, dated April 26, 2010 relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act that amends or supplements the Base Prospectus, and the term "Prospectus" means the final prospectus supplement (including the Base Prospectus) in the form first used (or made available upon request of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) in connection with confirmation of sales of the Securities. Any reference in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act, as of the effective date of the Registration Statement or the date of such Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be and any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein. Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
Registration Statement
At or prior to the time when sales of the Securities were first made (the "Time of Sale"), the Company had prepared the following information (collectively, the "Time of Sale Information"): a Preliminary Prospectus dated April 26, 2010, and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (as defined below) listed on Annex B hereto as constituting part of the Time of Sale Information.
 
2. . (a) The Company agrees to issue and sell the Securities to the several Underwriters as provided in this Agreement, and each Underwriter, on the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements set forth herein and subject to the conditions set forth herein, agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the respective principal amount of Securities set forth opposite such Underwriter's name in Schedule 1 hereto at a price equal to 98.337% of the principal amount of the Securities plus accrued interest, if any, from April 29, 2010 to the Closing Date (as defined below). The Company will not be obligated to deliver any of the Securities except upon payment for all the Securities to be purchased as provided herein.
Purchase of the Securities by the Underwriters
(b) The Company understands that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representatives is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities on the terms set forth in the Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters may offer and sell Securities to or through any affiliate of an Underwriter and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Securities purchased by it to or through any Underwriter.
(c) Payment for and delivery of the Securities will be made at the offices of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, 825 8
th
Avenue, New York, NY, at 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on April 29, 2010, or at such other time or place on the same or such other date, not later than the fifth business day thereafter, as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. The time and date of such payment and delivery is referred to herein as the "Closing Date".
(d) Payment for the Securities shall be made by wire transfer in immediately available funds to the account(s) specified by the Company to the Representatives against delivery to the nominee of The Depository Trust Company, for the account of the Underwriters, of one or more global notes representing the Securities (collectively, the "Global Note"), with any transfer taxes payable in connection with the sale of the Securities duly paid by the Company. The Global Note will be made available for inspection by the Representatives not later than 1:00 P.M., New York City time, on the business day prior to the Closing Date.
(e) The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters are acting solely in the capacity of an arm's length contractual counterparty to the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors with respect to the offering of Securities contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to, or an agent of, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or any other person. Additionally, neither the Representatives nor any other Underwriter is advising the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction. The Company and Subsidiary Guarantors shall consult with their own advisors concerning such matters and shall be responsible for making their own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and the Underwriters shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company or any Subsidiary
 
Guarantor with respect thereto. Any review by the Underwriters of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of the Underwriters and shall not be on behalf of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors.
(f) The Company hereby confirms its engagement of BB&T Capital Markets, a division of Scott & Stringfellow, LLC ("BB&TCM") as, and BB&TCM hereby confirms its agreement with the Company to render services as, a "qualified independent underwriter" within the meaning of Rule 2720 of the Conduct Rules of the Financial Industry Regulatory Authority ("FINRA") with respect to the offering and sale of the Securities. BB&TCM, solely in its capacity as qualified independent underwriter and not otherwise, is referred to herein as the "Independent Underwriter."
3. . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to each Underwriter that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors
(a) . No order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus has been issued by the Commission, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, complied in all material respects with the Securities Act and did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Preliminary Prospectus.
Preliminary Prospectus
(b) . The Time of Sale Information, at the Time of Sale did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in such Time of Sale Information. No statement of material fact included in the Prospectus has been omitted from the Time of Sale Information and no statement of material fact included in the Time of Sale Information that is required to be included in the Prospectus has been omitted therefrom.
Time of Sale Information
(c) . The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors (including their agents and representatives, other than the Underwriters in their capacity as such) have not prepared, made, used, authorized, approved or referred to and will not prepare, make, use, authorize, approve or refer to any "written communication" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) that constitutes an offer to sell or solicitation of an offer to buy the Securities (each such communication by the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or their agents and representatives (other than a
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
 
communication referred to in clauses (i) (ii) and (iii) below) an "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus") other than (i) any document not constituting a prospectus pursuant to Section 2(a)(10)(a) of the Securities Act or Rule 134 under the Securities Act, (ii) the Preliminary Prospectus, (iii) the Prospectus, (iv) the documents listed on Annex B hereto and (v) any electronic road show or other written communications, in each case approved in writing in advance by the Representatives. Each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus complied in all material respects with the Securities Act, has been or will be (within the time period specified in Rule 433) filed in accordance with the Securities Act (to the extent required thereby) and, when taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus accompanying, or delivered prior to delivery of, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(d) . The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 of the Securities Act that has been filed with the Commission not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act has been received by the Company. No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued by the Commission and no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act against the Company or related to the offering has been initiated or threatened by the Commission; as of the applicable effective date of the Registration Statement and any amendment thereto, the Registration Statement complied and will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Trust Indenture Act"), and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading; and as of the date of the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto and as of the Closing Date, the Prospectus will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to (i) that part of the Registration Statement that constitutes the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification (Form T-1) of the Trustee under the Trust Indenture Act or (ii) any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto.
Registration Statement and Prospectus
 
(e) . The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and the Time of Sale Information, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and none of such documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or the Time of Sale Information, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Incorporated Documents
(f) . The financial statements and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and present fairly the financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations and the changes in their cash flows for the periods specified; such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby, except as otherwise noted therein, and the supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein; and any other financial information included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus has been derived from the accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries and presents fairly the information shown thereby; and the pro forma financial information, if any, and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus have been prepared in accordance with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the assumptions underlying such pro forma financial information are reasonable and are set forth in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Financial Statements
(g) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, since the date of the most recent financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, (i) there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than activity related to the Company's authorized stock repurchase program) or long-term debt of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, set aside for payment, paid or made by the Company on any class of capital stock, or any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the business, management, financial position, or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; (ii) neither the Company nor any of its
No Material Adverse Change
 
subsidiaries has entered into any transaction or agreement that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or incurred any liability or obligation, direct or contingent, that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and (iii) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has sustained any material loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor disturbance or dispute or any action, order or decree of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except in each case as otherwise disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
(h) . The Company and each of its subsidiaries have been duly organized and are validly existing and in good standing under the laws of their respective jurisdictions of organization, are duly qualified to do business and are in good standing in each jurisdiction in which their respective ownership or lease of property or the conduct of their respective businesses requires such qualification, and have all power and authority necessary to own or hold their respective properties and to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged, except where the failure to be so qualified, in good standing or have such power or authority would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the business, management, financial position or, results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the performance by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors of their respective obligations under this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities (a "Material Adverse Effect"). The subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 2 to this Agreement are the only significant subsidiaries of the Company.
Organization and Good Standing
(i) . The Company has an authorized capitalization as of January 2, 2010 as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus under the heading "Capitalization" and all the outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity interests of each subsidiary of the Company have been duly and validly authorized and issued, are fully paid and non-assessable and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company, free and clear of any lien, charge, encumbrance, security interest, restriction on voting or transfer or any other claim of any third party.
Capitalization
(j) . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors has the full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, the Securities and the Indenture (collectively, the "Transaction Documents") and to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken.
Due Authorization
(k) . The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors and, when duly executed and delivered in accordance with its terms by each of the parties thereto, will have been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act and will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors enforceable against the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors in accordance with its terms, except as
The Indenture
 
enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles relating to enforceability (collectively, the "Enforceability Exceptions").
(l) . The Notes have been duly authorized by the Company and, when duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered as provided in the Indenture and paid for as provided herein, will be duly and validly issued and outstanding and will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to the Enforceability Exceptions, and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture; and the Subsidiary Guarantees have been duly authorized by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors and, when the Securities have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered as provided in the Indenture and paid for as provided herein, will be valid and legally binding obligations of each of the Subsidiary Guarantors, enforceable against each of the Subsidiary Guarantors in accordance with their terms, subject to the Enforceability Exceptions, and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture.
The Notes and the Subsidiary Guarantees
(m) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors.
Underwriting Agreement
(n) . Each Transaction Document conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Descriptions of the Transaction Documents
(o) . Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or by-laws or similar organizational documents; (ii) in default, and no event has occurred that, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default, in the due performance or observance of any term, covenant or condition contained in any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject; or (iii) in violation of any law or statute or any judgment, order, rule or regulation of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, for any such default or violation that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
No Violation or Default
(p) . The execution, delivery and performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of each of the Transaction Documents to which it is a party, the issuance and sale of the Securities and compliance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors with the terms thereof and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach or violation of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries pursuant to, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its
No Conflicts
 
subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws or similar organizational documents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or (iii) result in the violation of any law or statute or any judgment, order, rule or regulation of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except, in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) above, for any such conflict, breach, violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
(q) . No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority is required for the execution, delivery and performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of each of the Transaction Documents, the issuance and sale of the Securities and compliance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors with the terms thereof and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents, except for the registration of the Securities under the Securities Act, the qualification of the Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act, filings in connection with the Company's reporting obligations under the Exchange Act, filings through the FINRA Cobradesk, notice to the New York Stock Exchange and such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders and registrations or qualifications as may be required under applicable state securities laws in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters.
No Consents Required
(r) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no legal, governmental or regulatory investigations, actions, suits or proceedings pending to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may be a party or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may be the subject that, individually or in the aggregate, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; no such investigations, actions, suits or proceedings are threatened or, to the knowledge of the Company, contemplated by any governmental or regulatory authority or threatened by others; and (i) there are no current or pending legal, governmental or regulatory actions, suits or proceedings that are required under the Securities Act to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus that are not so described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus and (ii) there are no statutes, regulations or contracts or other documents that are required under the Securities Act to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement or described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus that are not so filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement or described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Legal Proceedings
(s) . Deloitte & Touche LLP, who has certified certain financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries, is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within the applicable rules and regulations adopted by the Commission and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) and as required by the Securities Act.
Independent Accountants
 
(t) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, the Company and its subsidiaries have good and marketable title in fee simple to, or have valid rights to lease or otherwise use, all items of real and personal property that are material to the respective businesses of the Company and its subsidiaries, in each case free and clear of all liens, encumbrances, claims and defects and imperfections of title except those that (i) do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company and its subsidiaries or (ii) could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Title to Real and Personal Property
(u) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus or except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company and its subsidiaries own or possess adequate rights to use all material patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, trade names, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses and know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures) necessary for the conduct of their respective businesses; and the conduct of their respective businesses does not conflict in any material respect with any such rights of others, and the Company and its subsidiaries have not received any notice of any claim of infringement or conflict with any such rights of others.
Title to Intellectual Property
(v) . No relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Company or any of its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and the directors, officers or stockholders of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, on the other, that is required by the Securities Act to be described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and that is not so described in such documents and in the Time of Sale Information.
No Undisclosed Relationships
(w) . Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiary Guarantors is or, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, will be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, "Investment Company Act").
Investment Company Act
(x) . The Company and its subsidiaries have paid or accrued all material federal, state, local and foreign taxes and filed all material tax returns required to be paid or filed through the date hereof; and except as otherwise disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there is no tax deficiency that has been, or could reasonably be expected to be, asserted against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets.
Taxes
(y) . The Company and its subsidiaries possess all material licenses, certificates, permits and other authorizations issued by, and have made all declarations and filings with, the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign
Licenses and Permits
 
governmental or regulatory authorities that are necessary for the ownership or lease of their respective properties or the conduct of their respective businesses as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, except where the failure to possess or make the same would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received notice of any revocation or modification of any such material license, certificate, permit or authorization or has any reason to believe that any such material license, certificate, permit or authorization will not be renewed in the ordinary course.
(z) . No labor disturbance by or dispute with employees of the Company or any of its subsidiaries exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened and the Company is not aware of any existing or imminent labor disturbance by, or dispute with, the employees of any of its or its subsidiaries' principal suppliers, contractors or customers, except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
No Labor Disputes
(aa) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, (i) the Company and its subsidiaries (x) are, and at all times during the past three years were, in compliance with any and all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, rules, regulations, requirements, binding decisions and orders relating to the protection of human health or safety, the environment, natural resources, hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (collectively, "Environmental Laws"); (y) have received and are in compliance with all permits, licenses, certificates or other authorizations or approvals required of them under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct their respective businesses; and (z) have not received written notice of any actual or potential liability under or relating to any Environmental Laws, including for the investigation or remediation of any disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, and have no actual knowledge of any event or condition that would reasonably be expected to result in any such notice, and (ii) there are no costs or liabilities associated with Environmental Laws of or relating to the Company or its subsidiaries, except in the case of each of (i) and (ii) above, for any such failure to comply, or failure to receive required permits, licenses or approvals, or cost or liability, as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and (iii) (x) there are no proceedings that are pending or threatened against the Company or any of its subsidiaries under any Environmental Laws in which a governmental entity is also a party, other than such proceedings regarding which it is reasonably believed no monetary sanctions of $100,000 or more will be imposed, and (y) the Company and its subsidiaries are not aware of any issues regarding compliance with Environmental Laws, or liabilities or other obligations under Environmental Laws or concerning hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, and none of the Company and its subsidiaries reasonably expects to incur capital expenditures in order to comply with applicable Environmental Laws that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance With Environmental Laws
 
(bb) . (i) Each employee benefit plan, within the meaning of Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"), for which the Company or any member of its "Controlled Group" (defined as any organization which is a member of a controlled group of corporations within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code")) would have any liability (each, a "Plan") has been maintained in material compliance with its terms and the requirements of any applicable statutes, orders, rules and regulations, including but not limited to ERISA and the Code; (ii) no prohibited transaction, within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, has occurred with respect to any Plan excluding transactions effected pursuant to a statutory or administrative exemption; (iii) for each Plan that is subject to the funding rules of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA no failure by the Plan to satisfy the "minimum funding standards" as defined in Section 412 of the Code, whether or not waived, has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur; (iv) the fair market value of the assets of each Plan that is subject to the funding rules of Section 412 or 430 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA (if any) exceeds the present value of all benefits accrued under such Plan (determined based on those assumptions used to fund such Plan); (v) no "reportable event" (within the meaning of Section 4043(c) of ERISA) has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that could reasonably be expected to result in material liability to the Company or its subsidiaries; and (vi) neither the Company nor any member of the Controlled Group has incurred, nor reasonably expects to incur, any liability under Title IV of ERISA (other than contributions to the Plan or premiums to the PBGC, in the ordinary course and without default) in respect of a Plan (including a "multiemployer plan", within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
Compliance With ERISA
(cc) . The Company and its subsidiaries maintain an effective system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and Rule 15(d)-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company and its subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15 and Rule 15(d)-15(f) of the Exchange Act.
Disclosure Controls
(dd) . The Company and its subsidiaries maintain systems of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) and Rule 15(d) -15(f) of the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and have been designed by, or under the supervision of, their respective principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted accounting principles, including, but not limited to internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as
Accounting Controls
 
necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses or significant deficiencies in the Company's internal controls.
(ee) . Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or other person associated with or acting on behalf of the Company or any of its subsidiaries has (i) used any corporate funds for any unlawful contribution, gift, entertainment or other unlawful expense relating to political activity; (ii) made any direct or indirect unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee from corporate funds; (iii) violated or is in violation of any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977; or (iv) made any bribe, rebate, payoff, influence payment, kickback or other unlawful payment.
No Unlawful Payments
(ff) The operations of the Company and its subsidiaries are and have been conducted at all times in compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency or regulatory authority (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws") and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
Compliance with Money Laundering Laws.
(gg) . None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Department of the Treasury ("OFAC"); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering of the Securities hereunder, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
Compliance with OFAC
(hh) . Except for any restrictions of applicable corporate or limited liability company law, no subsidiary of the Company is currently prohibited, directly or indirectly, under any agreement or other instrument to which it is a party or is subject, from paying any dividends to the Company, from making any other distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's properties or assets to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company.
No Restrictions on Subsidiaries
 
(ii) No person has the right to require the Company or any of its subsidiaries to register any securities for sale under the Securities Act by reason of the filing of the Registration Statement with the Commission or the issuance and sale of the Securities.
No Registration Rights.
(jj) . Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiary Guarantors taken, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that could reasonably be expected to cause or result in any stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities.
No Stabilization
(kk) Neither the issuance, sale and delivery of the Securities nor the application of the proceeds thereof by the Company as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus will violate Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or any other regulation of such Board of Governors.
Margin Rules.
(ll) No forward-looking statement (within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act and Section 21E of the Exchange Act) contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus has been made or reaffirmed without a reasonable basis or has been disclosed other than in good faith.
Forward-Looking Statements.
(mm) . Nothing has come to the attention of the Company that has caused the Company to believe that the statistical and market-related data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus is not based on or derived from sources that are reliable and accurate in all material respects.
Statistical and Market Data
(nn) . There is and has been no material failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
(oo) The Company is not an ineligible issuer and is a well-known seasoned issuer, in each case as defined under the Securities Act, in each case at the times specified in the Securities Act in connection with the offering of the Securities.
Status under the Securities Act.
4. . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors covenants and agrees with each Underwriter that:
Further Agreements of the Company
(a) . The Company will file the Prospectus with the Commission within the time periods specified by Rule 424(b) and Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act, as applicable, will file any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (including the Term Sheet in the form of Annex C hereto) to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act, and will file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission
Required Filings
 
pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act during the Prospectus Delivery Period (as defined below); and the Company will furnish copies of the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (to the extent not previously delivered) to the Underwriters in New York City prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the business day next succeeding the date of this Agreement in such quantities as the Representatives may reasonably request. The Company will pay the registration fees for this offering within the time period required by Rule 456(b)(1)(i) under the Securities Act (without giving effect to the proviso therein) and in any event prior to the Closing Date. As used herein, the term "Prospectus Delivery Period" means such period of time after the first date of the public offering of the Securities that a prospectus relating to the Securities is required by law to be delivered (or required to be delivered but for Rule 172 under the Securities Act) in connection with sales of the Securities by any Underwriter or dealer.
(b) . The Company will deliver, without charge, to each Underwriter (i) a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and each amendment thereto, in each case including all exhibits and consents filed therewith and (ii) during the Prospectus Delivery Period, as many copies of the Prospectus (including all amendments and supplements thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein) and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Delivery of Copies
(c) ;. Before making, preparing, using, authorizing, approving, referring to or filing any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, whether before or after the time that the Registration Statement becomes effective, and before filing any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will furnish to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters a copy of the proposed Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, amendment or supplement for review and will not make, prepare, use, authorize, approve, refer to or file any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or file any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Representatives reasonably object.
Amendments or Supplements
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses
(d) . During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will advise the Representatives promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been filed; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event within the Prospectus Delivery Period as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as then
Notice to the Representatives
 
amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Securities and, if any such order is issued, will use its reasonable best efforts to obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(e) If at any time prior to the Closing Date (i) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Time of Sale Information as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances, not misleading or (ii) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Time of Sale Information to comply with law, the Company will as promptly as practicable notify the Underwriters thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to paragraph (c) above, file with the Commission and furnish to the Underwriters and to such dealers as the Representatives may designate, such amendments or supplements to the Time of Sale Information as may be necessary so that the statements in the Time of Sale Information as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances, be misleading or so that the Time of Sale Information will comply with law.
Time of Sale Information.
(f) If during the Prospectus Delivery Period (i) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading or (ii) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus to comply with law, the Company will as promptly as practicable notify the Underwriters thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to paragraph (c) above, file with the Commission and furnish to the Underwriters and to such dealers as the Representatives may designate, such amendments or supplements to the Prospectus as may be necessary so that the statements in the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, be misleading or so that the Prospectus will comply with law.
Ongoing Compliance.
(g) The Company will qualify the Securities for offer and sale under the securities or Blue Sky laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives shall reasonably request and will continue such qualifications in effect so long as required
Blue Sky Compliance.
 
for distribution of the Securities; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall not be required to (i) qualify as a foreign corporation or other entity or as a dealer in securities in any such jurisdiction where it would not otherwise be required to so qualify, (ii) file any general consent to service of process in any such jurisdiction or (iii) subject itself to taxation in any such jurisdiction if it is not otherwise so subject.
(h) . The Company will make generally available to its security holders and the Representatives as soon as practicable an earning statement that satisfies the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and Rule 158 of the Commission promulgated thereunder covering a period of at least twelve months beginning with the first fiscal quarter of the Company occurring after the "effective date" (as defined in Rule 158) of the Registration Statement.
Earning Statement
(i) During the period from the date hereof through and including the business day following the Closing Date (other than as contemplated by the Prospectus under the heading "Use of proceeds"), the Company will not, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, offer, sell, contract to sell or otherwise dispose of any debt securities issued or guaranteed by the Company and having a tenor of more than one year.
Clear Market.
(j) The Company will apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of proceeds."
Use of Proceeds.
(k) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary Guarantor will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that could reasonably be expected to cause or result in any stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities.
No Stabilization.
(l) . The Company will, pursuant to reasonable procedures developed in good faith, retain copies of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 433 under the Securities Act.
Record Retention
(m) If at any time during the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company receives from the Commission a notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or otherwise ceases to be eligible to use the automatic shelf registration statement form, the Company will (i) promptly notify the Representatives, (ii) promptly file a new registration statement or post-effective amendment on the proper form relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives, (iii) use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement or post-effective amendment to be declared effective and (iv) promptly notify the Representatives of such effectiveness. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the registration statement that was the subject of the Rule 401(g)(2) notice or for which the Company has otherwise become ineligible.
Notice of Inability to Use Automatic Shelf Registration Statement Form.
 
5. . Each Underwriter hereby represents and agrees that
Certain Agreements of the Underwriters
(a) It has not and will not use, authorize use of, refer to, or participate in the planning for use of, any "free writing prospectus", as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act (which term includes use of any written information furnished to the Commission by the Company and not incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and any press release issued by the Company) other than (i) a free writing prospectus that, solely as a result of use by such underwriter, would not trigger an obligation to file such free writing prospectus with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433, (ii) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Annex B or prepared pursuant to Section 3(c) or Section 4(c) above (including any electronic road show), or (iii) any free writing prospectus prepared by such underwriter and approved by the Company in advance in writing (each such free writing prospectus referred to in clauses (i) or (iii), an "Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Underwriters may use a term sheet substantially in the form of Annex C hereto without the consent of the Company.
(b) It is not subject to any pending proceeding under Section 8A of the Securities Act with respect to the offering (and will promptly notify the Company if any such proceeding against it is initiated during the Prospectus Delivery Period).
6. . The obligation of each Underwriter to purchase Securities on the Closing Date as provided herein is subject to the performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of their covenants and other obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a) . No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall be in effect, and no proceeding for such purpose, pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or pursuant to Section 8A under the Securities Act shall be pending before or threatened by the Commission; the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act (in the case of a Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act) and in accordance with Section 4(a) hereof; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Representatives.
Registration Compliance; No Stop Order
(b) . The representations and warranties of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors contained herein shall be true and correct on the date hereof and on and as of the Closing Date; and the statements of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and their respective officers made in any certificates delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall be true and correct on and as of the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties
(c) . Subsequent to the earlier of (A) the Time of Sale and (B) the execution and delivery of this Agreement, (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Securities or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized statistical rating organization", as such term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, or has changed its outlook
No Downgrade
 
with respect to, its rating of the Securities or of any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading).
(d) . No event or condition of a type described in Section 3(g) hereof shall have occurred or shall exist, which event or condition is not described in the Time of Sale Information (excluding any amendment or supplement thereto) and the Prospectus (excluding any amendment or supplement thereto) and the effect of which in the judgment of the Representatives makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
No Material Adverse Change
(e) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date certificates of an executive officer of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor who has specific knowledge of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's financial matters and are satisfactory to the Representatives (i) confirming that such officer has carefully reviewed the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (ii) confirming that the representations and warranties of the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor in this Agreement are true and correct and that the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Closing Date and (iii) to the effect set forth in paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) above.
Officer's Certificate
(f) . On the date of this Agreement and on the Closing Date, Deloitte & Touche LLP shall have furnished to the Representatives, at the request of the Company, letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
Comfort Letters
(g) . Bingham McCutchen LLP, counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives, at the request of the Company, their written opinion for the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors and 10b-5 Statement, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect set forth in Annex A-1 hereto.
Opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Counsel for the Company
(h) The Company's general counsel shall have furnished to the Representatives his or her written opinion, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect set forth in Annex A-2 hereto.
Opinion of the Company's General Counsel.
 
(i) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date an opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request, and such counsel shall have received such documents and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters.
Opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Counsel for the Underwriters
(j) . No action shall have been taken and no statute, rule, regulation or order shall have been enacted, adopted or issued by any federal, state or foreign governmental or regulatory authority that would, as of the Closing Date, prevent the issuance or sale of the Securities; and no injunction or order of any federal, state or foreign court shall have been issued that would, as of the Closing Date, prevent the issuance or sale of the Securities.
No Legal Impediment to Issuance
(k) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date satisfactory evidence of the good standing of the Company and Subsidiary Guarantors in their respective jurisdictions of organization, in each case in writing or any standard form of telecommunication from the appropriate governmental authorities of such jurisdictions.
Good Standing
(l) . On or prior to the Closing Date, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall have furnished to the Representatives such further certificates and documents as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Additional Documents
All opinions, letters, certificates and evidence mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters.
7. .
Indemnification and Contribution
(a) The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its affiliates, directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, from and against any and all losses, claims, damages and liabilities (including, without limitation, reasonable legal fees and other reasonable expenses incurred in connection with any suit, action or proceeding or any claim asserted, as such fees and expenses are incurred), joint or several, that arise out of, or are based upon, (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, not misleading, (ii) or any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any Time of Sale Information, or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, in each case except insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities arise
Indemnification of the Underwriters.
 
out of, or are based upon, any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with any information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
(b) . Each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors and their respective directors and officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act to the same extent as the indemnity set forth in paragraph (a) above, but only with respect to any losses, claims, damages or liabilities that arise out of, or are based upon, any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with any information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any Time of Sale Information, it being understood and agreed that the only such information consists of the following: the last paragraph on the cover of the Prospectus; the 5th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus; the 3rd sentence of the 7th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus; and the 8th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus.
Indemnification of the Company
(c) . In addition to and without limitation of the Company's and the Subsidiary Guarantors' obligation to indemnify BB&TCM as an Underwriter, the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agrees to indemnify and hold harmless the Independent Underwriter, its directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls the Independent Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, from and against any and all loss, liability, claim, damage and expense whatsoever, as incurred, incurred as a result of the Independent Underwriter's acting as a "qualified independent underwriter" within the meaning of Rule 2720 of the Conduct Rules of FINRA in connection with the offering of the Securities.
Indemnification of the Independent Underwriter
(d) . If any suit, action, proceeding (including any governmental or regulatory investigation), claim or demand shall be brought or asserted against any person in respect of which indemnification may be sought pursuant to either paragraph (a), (b) or (c) above, such person (the "Indemnified Person") shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnification may be sought (the "Indemnifying Person") in writing; provided that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have under this Section 7 except to the extent that it has been materially prejudiced (through the forfeiture of substantive rights or defenses) by such failure; and provided, further, that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have to an Indemnified Person otherwise than under this Section 7. If any such proceeding shall be brought or asserted against an Indemnified Person and it shall have notified the Indemnifying Person thereof, the Indemnifying Person shall retain counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnified
Notice and Procedures
 
Person (who shall not, without the consent of the Indemnified Person, be counsel to the Indemnifying Person) to represent the Indemnified Person and any others entitled to indemnification pursuant to Section 7 that the Indemnifying Party may designate in such proceeding and shall pay the fees and expenses of such proceeding and shall pay the fees and expenses of counsel related to such proceeding, as incurred. In any such proceeding, any Indemnified Person shall have the right to retain its own counsel, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of such Indemnified Person unless (i) the Indemnifying Person and the Indemnified Person shall have mutually agreed to the contrary; (ii) the Indemnifying Person has failed within a reasonable time to retain counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnified Person; (iii) the Indemnified Person shall have reasonably concluded that there may be legal defenses available to it that are different from or in addition to those available to the Indemnifying Person; or (iv) the named parties in any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the Indemnifying Person and the Indemnified Person and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them. It is understood and agreed that the Indemnifying Person shall not, in connection with any proceeding or related proceeding in the same jurisdiction, be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one separate firm (in addition to any local counsel) for all Indemnified Persons, and that all such fees and expenses shall be reimbursed as they are incurred; , , if indemnity is sought pursuant to Section 7(c) then, in addition to the fees and expenses of such counsel for the Indemnified Persons, the Indemnifying Person shall be liable for the reasonable fees and expenses of not more than one counsel (in addition to any local counsel) separate from its own counsel and that of the other Indemnified Persons for the Independent Underwriter in its capacity as a "qualified independent underwriter" and all persons, if any, who control the Independent Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of Exchange Act in connection with any one action or separate but similar or related actions in the same jurisdiction arising out of the same general allegations or circumstances if, in the reasonable judgment of the Independent Underwriter, there may exist a conflict of interest between the Independent Underwriter and the other Indemnified Persons. Any such separate counsel for the Independent Underwriter and such control persons of the Independent Underwriter shall be designated in writing by the Independent Underwriter. Any such separate firm for any Underwriter (other than the Independent Underwriters as set forth above), its affiliates, directors and officers and any control persons of such Underwriter shall be designated in writing by the Representatives and any such separate firm for the Company, its directors, its officers who signed the Registration Statement and any control persons of the Company shall be designated in writing by the Company. The Indemnifying Person shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the Indemnifying Person agrees to indemnify each Indemnified Person from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an Indemnified Person shall have requested (any such request to be sent in accordance with the notice provisions of Section 15(b) hereof) that an Indemnifying Person reimburse the Indemnified Person for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the Indemnifying Person shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected
provided
that
 
without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by the Indemnifying Person of such request and (ii) the Indemnifying Person shall not have reimbursed the Indemnified Person in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement. No Indemnifying Person shall, without the written consent of the Indemnified Person, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any Indemnified Person is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such Indemnified Person, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such Indemnified Person, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Indemnified Person, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any Indemnified Person.
(e) . If the indemnification provided for in paragraphs (a), (b) or (c) above is unavailable to an Indemnified Person or insufficient in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to therein, then each Indemnifying Person under such paragraph, in lieu of indemnifying such Indemnified Person thereunder, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such Indemnified Person as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) but also the relative fault of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Securities and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Securities. The relative fault of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
Contribution
(f) . The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in paragraph (e) above. The amount paid or payable by an Indemnified Person as a result of the losses, claims, damages and liabilities referred to in paragraph (e) above shall be deemed to include, subject to the
Limitation on Liability
 
limitations set forth above, any legal or other expenses incurred by such Indemnified Person in connection with any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, in no event shall an Underwriter be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by such Underwriter with respect to the offering of the Securities exceeds the amount of any damages that such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to their respective purchase obligations hereunder and not joint.
(g) . The remedies provided for in this Section 7 are not exclusive and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available to any Indemnified Person at law or in equity.
Non-Exclusive Remedies
8. . This Agreement shall become effective upon the execution and delivery hereof by the parties hereto.
Effectiveness of Agreement
9. . This Agreement may be terminated in the absolute discretion of the Representatives, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange or the over-the-counter market; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange or in any over-the-counter market; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared by federal or New York State authorities or there has occurred a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in the judgment of the Representatives, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Termination
10. . (a) If, on the Closing Date, any Underwriter defaults on its obligation to purchase the Securities that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, the non-defaulting Underwriters may in their discretion arrange for the purchase of such Securities by other persons satisfactory to the Company on the terms contained in this Agreement. If, within 36 hours after any such default by any Underwriter, the non-defaulting Underwriters do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of 36 hours within which to procure other persons satisfactory to the non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase such Securities on such terms. If other persons become obligated or agree to purchase the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter, either the non-defaulting Underwriters or the Company may postpone the Closing Date for up to five full business
Defaulting Underwriter
 
days in order to effect any changes that in the opinion of counsel for the Company or counsel for the Underwriters may be necessary in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus or in any other document or arrangement, and the Company agrees to promptly prepare any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus that effects any such changes. As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" includes, for all purposes of this Agreement unless the context otherwise requires, any person not listed in Schedule 1 hereto that, pursuant to this Section 10, purchases Securities that a defaulting Underwriter agreed but failed to purchase.
(b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the non-defaulting Underwriters and the Company as provided in paragraph (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of such Securities that remains unpurchased does not exceed one-eleventh of the aggregate principal amount of all the Securities, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the principal amount of Securities that such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder plus such Underwriter's pro rata share (based on the principal amount of Securities that such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made.
(c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the non-defaulting Underwriters and the Company as provided in paragraph (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of such Securities that remains unpurchased exceeds one-eleventh of the aggregate principal amount of all the Securities, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in paragraph (b) above, then this Agreement shall terminate without liability on the part of the non-defaulting Underwriters. Any termination of this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10 shall be without liability on the part of the Company, except that the Company will continue to be liable for the payment of expenses as set forth in Section 11 hereof and except that the provisions of Section 7 hereof shall not terminate and shall remain in effect.
(d) Nothing contained herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter of any liability it may have to the Company or any non-defaulting Underwriter for damages caused by its default.
11. . (a) Whether or not the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are consummated or this Agreement is terminated, the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to pay or cause to be paid all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder, including without limitation, (i) the costs incident to the authorization, issuance, sale, preparation and delivery of the Securities and any taxes payable in that connection; (ii) the costs incident to the preparation, printing and filing under the Securities Act of the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (including all exhibits, amendments and supplements thereto) and the distribution thereof; (iii) the costs of reproducing and distributing each of the Transaction Documents; (iv) the fees and expenses of the
Payment of Expenses
 
Company's and the Subsidiary Guarantor's counsel and independent accountants; (v) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with the registration or qualification and determination of eligibility for investment of the Securities under the laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives may designate and the preparation, printing and distribution of a Blue Sky Memorandum (including the related fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters not to exceed $15,000; (vi) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Securities; (vii) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including related fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties); (viii) all expenses and application fees incurred in connection with any filing with, and clearance of the offering by, FINRA; (ix) all expenses incurred by the Company in connection with any "road show" presentation to potential investors; and; (x) any expenses and application fees related to the listing of the Securities on any exchange; if applicable, and (xi) all expenses of the Independent Underwriter incurred in its capacity as a "qualified independent underwriter" within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act.
(b) If (i) this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9 (other than the circumstances set forth in Sections 9(i), (iii) and (iv)), (ii) the Company for any reason fails to tender the Securities for delivery to the Underwriters or (iii) the Underwriters decline to purchase the Securities for any reason permitted under this Agreement (other than as a result of the circumstances set forth in Sections 9(i), (iii) and (iv)), the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket costs and expenses (including the fees and expenses of their counsel) reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in connection with this Agreement and the offering contemplated hereby.
12. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and any controlling persons referred to in Section 7, and the affiliates of each Underwriter referred to in Section 7 hereof. Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any other person any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision contained herein. No purchaser of Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor merely by reason of such purchase.
Persons Entitled to Benefit of Agreement
13. . The respective indemnities, rights of contribution, representations, warranties and agreements of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Underwriters contained in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement or any certificate delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the delivery of and payment for the Securities and shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any termination of this Agreement or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or the Underwriters.
Survival
14. . For purposes of this Agreement, (a) except where otherwise expressly provided, the term "affiliate" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act; (b) the term "business day" means any day other than a day on
Certain Defined Terms
 
which banks are permitted or required to be closed in New York City; (c) the term "subsidiary" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act; and (d) the term "significant subsidiary" has the meaning set forth in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X under the Exchange Act.
15. . (a) . Any action by the Underwriters hereunder may be taken by the Representatives on behalf of the Underwriters, and any such action taken by the Representatives shall be binding upon the Underwriters.
Miscellaneous
Authority of the Representatives
(b) . All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted and confirmed by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be given to the Representatives c/o Banc of America Securities LLC, One Bryant Park, NY1-100-18-03, New York, New York 10036 (fax: 646-855-5958); Attention: High Grade Transaction Management/Legal, and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., 383 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10179 (fax: 212-834-6081); Attention: High Grade Syndicate Desk. Notices to the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be given to it at Advance Auto Parts, Inc., 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012 (fax: 540-561-1448); Attention Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer and Sarah Powell, Senior Vice President and General Counsel.
Notices
(c) . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
(d) . This Agreement may be signed in counterparts (which may include counterparts delivered by any standard form of telecommunication or PDF via email), each of which shall be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
(e) . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
(f) . The headings herein are included for convenience of reference only and are not intended to be part of, or to affect the meaning or interpretation of, this Agreement.
Headings
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please indicate your acceptance of this Agreement by signing in the space provided below.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 1
 
Schedule 2
Significant Subsidiaries
Advance Auto Business Support, LLC
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
Autopart International, Inc.
Discount Auto Parts, LLC
Subsidiary Guarantors
Advance Aircraft Company, Inc., a Virginia corporation.
Advance Auto Business Support, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
Advance Auto Innovations, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
Advance Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Advance Patriot, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Advance Trucking Corporation, a Virginia corporation.
Autopart International, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation.
Crossroads Global Trading Corp., a Virginia corporation.
Discount Auto Parts, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
E-Advance, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
TTR, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Western Auto Supply Company, a Delaware corporation.
Annex A-1
Annex A-2
Annex B
Issuer Free-Writing Prospectuses
Pricing Term Sheet dated as of April 26, 2010 substantially in the form of Annex C
 
Annex C
 
1) A securities rating is not a recommendation to buy, sell or hold securities and may be subject to revision or withdrawal at any time.
The issuer has filed a registration statement (including a prospectus) with the SEC for the offering to which this communication relates. Before you invest, you should read the prospectus in that registration statement and other documents the issuer has filed with the SEC for more complete information about the issuer and this offering. You may get these documents for free by visiting EDGAR on the SEC Web site at www.sec.gov. Alternatively, the issuer, any underwriter or any dealer participating in the offering will arrange to send you the prospectus if you request it by calling Banc of America Securities LLC toll-free at 1-800-294-1322 or emailing at dg.prospectus_distribution@bofasecurities.com or J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. collect at 212-834-4533.
 

Exhibit 4.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
INDENTURE dated as of April 29, 2010, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation, THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, a national banking association, as trustee.
Each party hereto agrees as follows for the benefit of the other party and for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders of the securities issued under this Indenture (the "Securities") and the guarantees thereof by the Subsidiary Guarantors:
For all purposes under this Indenture and any supplemental indenture hereto, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the following meanings:
"Affiliate" of any specified Person means any other Person directly or indirectly controlling or controlled by or under direct or indirect common control with such specified Person. For purposes of this definition, "control" (including, with correlative meanings, the terms "controlling," "controlled by" and "under common control with"), when used with respect to any Person, shall mean the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of such Person, directly or indirectly, whether through the ownership of voting securities, by agreement or otherwise.
"Agent" means any Registrar, Paying Agent or co-registrar.
"Attributable Debt" in respect of a Sale and Leaseback Transaction means, at the time of determination, the present value discounted at the rate of interest implicit in the terms of the lease (as determined in good faith by the Company) of the obligations of the lessee under such lease for net rental payments during the remaining term of the lease (including any period for which such lease has been extended or may, at the Company's option, be extended).
"Bankruptcy Law" means Title 11, U.S. Code or any similar federal or state law for the relief of debtors.
"Board of Directors" means the Board of Directors of the Company, or any authorized committee of the Board of Directors.
"Board Resolution" means a copy of a resolution certified by the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary of the Company to have been adopted by the Board of Directors or pursuant to authorization by the Board of Directors and to be in full force and effect on the date of the certificate and delivered to the Trustee.
 
"Business Day" means any day other than a Legal Holiday.
"Capital Markets Debt" means any debt for borrowed money that (i) is in the form of, or represented by, bonds, notes, debentures or other securities (other than promissory notes or similar evidences of debt under a credit agreement) and (ii) has an aggregate principal amount outstanding of at least $25.0 million.
"Clearstream" means Clearstream Banking, socit anonyme, or any successor thereto.
"Company" means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., and any and all successors thereto.
"Company Order" means a written order signed in the name of the Company by two Officers, one of whom must be the Company's principal executive officer, principal financial officer or principal accounting officer.
"Consolidated Net Tangible Assets" means the aggregate amount of the Company's assets (less applicable reserves and other properly deductible items) and the Company's consolidated subsidiaries' assets after deducting therefrom (a) all current liabilities (excluding the sum of any debt for money borrowed having a maturity of less than twelve months from the date of the Company's most recent consolidated balance sheet but which by its terms is renewable or extendable beyond twelve months from such date at the option of the borrower and, without duplication, any current installments thereof payable within such twelve month period) and (b) all goodwill, trade names, patents, unamortized debt discount and expense and other like intangibles, all as set forth on the Company's most recent consolidated balance sheet and computed in accordance with GAAP.
"Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee" shall be the address of the Trustee specified in Section 11.02 hereof or such other address as to which the Trustee may give notice to the Company.
"Credit Facility Debt" means any debt for borrowed money that (i) is incurred pursuant to a credit agreement, including pursuant to the Revolving Credit Facility, or other agreement providing for revolving credit loans, term loans or other debt entered into between Advance Auto Parts or any subsidiary of Advance Auto Parts and any lender or group of lenders and (ii) has an aggregate principal amount outstanding or committed of at least $25.0 million.
"Default" means any event that is, or after notice or passage of time or both would be, an Event of Default.
"Depositary" means, with respect to the Securities issuable or issued in whole or in part in global form, the Person specified in Section 2.15 hereof as the
 
Depositary with respect to the Securities, and any and all successors thereto appointed as depositary hereunder and having become such pursuant to the applicable provision of this Indenture.
"Dollar" means a dollar or other equivalent unit in such coin or currency of the United States as at the time shall be legal tender for the payment of public and private debt.
"Domestic Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary of the Company organized under the laws of any state of the United States of America or the District of Columbia.
"Euroclear" means Euroclear Bank S.A./N.V., as operator of the Euroclear System, or any successor thereto.
"Exchange Act" means the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended.
"Foreign Currency" means any currency or currency unit issued by a government other than the government of The United States of America.
"Foreign Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary of the Company organized under the laws of any jurisdiction other than a state of the United States of America or the District of Columbia.
"Funded Debt" means debt which matures more than one year from the date of creation, or which is extendable or renewable at the sole option of the obligor so that it may become payable more than one year from such date or which is classified, in accordance with United States generally accepted accounting principles, as long-term debt on the consolidated balance sheet for the most-recently ended fiscal quarter (or if incurred subsequent to the date of such balance sheet, would have been so classified) of the person for which the determination is being made. Funded Debt does not include (1) obligations created pursuant to leases, (2) any debt or portion thereof maturing by its terms within one year from the time of any computation of the amount of outstanding Funded Debt unless such debt shall be extendable or renewable at the sole option of the obligor in such manner that it may become payable more than one year from such time, or (3) any debt for which money in the amount necessary for the payment or redemption of such debt is deposited in trust either at or before the maturity date thereof.
"GAAP" means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America as determined by the Public Company Accounting Principles Oversight Board.
"Global Security" when used with respect to any Series of Securities issued hereunder, means a Security which is executed by the Company and authenticated and delivered by the Trustee to the Depositary or pursuant to the Depositary's instruction, all in accordance with this Indenture and an indenture supplemental hereto, if any, or Board Resolution and pursuant to a Company Order, which shall be registered in the name of the Depositary or its nominee and which shall represent, and shall be denominated in an amount equal to the aggregate principal amount of, all the outstanding Securities of such
 
Series or any portion thereof, in either case having the same terms, including, without limitation, the same original issue date, date or dates on which principal is due, and interest rate or method of determining interest and which shall bear the legend as prescribed by Section 2.15(c).
"Global Security Legend" means the legend set forth in Section 2.15(c), which is required to be placed on all Global Securities issued under this Indenture.
"Guarantee" means a guarantee (other than by endorsement of negotiable instruments for collection in the ordinary course of business), direct or indirect, in any manner (including, without limitation, by way of a pledge of assets or through letters of credit or reimbursement agreements in respect thereof), of all or any part of any debt. The term "Guarantor" shall mean any Person Guaranteeing any obligation.
"Holder" means a Person in whose name a Security is registered on the Registrar's books.
"Indenture" means this Indenture, as amended or supplemented from time to time. The term "Indenture" shall also include the terms of a particular Series of Securities established pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.02 hereof
"Interest Payment Date" when used with respect to any Series of Securities, means the date specified in such Securities for the payment of any installment of interest on those Securities.
"Lien" means, with respect to any property or assets, any mortgage or deed of trust, pledge, hypothecation, security interest, lien, encumbrance or other security arrangement of any kind or nature on or with respect to such property or assets.
"Maturity," when used with respect to any Security or installment of principal thereof, means the date on which the principal of such Security or such installment of principal becomes due and payable as therein or herein provided, whether at the Stated Maturity or by declaration of acceleration, call for redemption, notice of option to elect repayment or otherwise.
"Officer" means, with respect to any Person, the Chairman of the Board, the Chief Executive Officer, the President, the Chief Operating Officer, the Chief Financial Officer, the Treasurer, any Assistant Treasurer, the Controller, the Secretary or Clerk, any Assistant Secretary, or any Vice-President of such Person. The term Officer of any Subsidiary Guarantor has a correlative meaning.
"Officers' Certificate" means a certificate signed on behalf of the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor by two Officers of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantor, as applicable, one of whom must be the principal executive officer, the principal financial officer or the principal accounting officer of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantor, as applicable, that meets the requirements of Section 11.04 and 11.05 hereof.
 
"Opinion of Counsel" means an opinion from legal counsel, that meets the requirements of Section 11.04 hereof. The counsel may be an employee of or counsel to the Company, any Subsidiary of the Company or the Trustee.
"Original Issue Discount Security" means any Security that provides for an amount less than the stated principal amount thereof to be due and payable upon declaration of acceleration of the maturity thereof pursuant to Section 6.02.
"Participant" means, with respect to the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, a Person who has an account with the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, respectively (and, with respect to The Depository Trust Company, shall include Euroclear and Clearstream).
"Permitted Liens" means:
(1) Liens (other than Liens created or imposed under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA")), for taxes, assessments or governmental charges or levies not yet subject to penalties for non-timely payment or Liens for taxes being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings for which adequate reserves determined in accordance with GAAP have been established (and as to which the property or assets subject to any such Lien is not yet subject to foreclosure, sale or loss on account thereof;
(2) statutory Liens of landlords and Liens of mechanics, materialmen, warehousemen, carriers and suppliers and other Liens imposed by law or pursuant to customary reservations or retentions of title arising in the ordinary course of business, provided that any such Liens which are material secure only amounts not yet due and payable or, if due and payable, are unfiled and no other action has been taken to enforce the same or are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings for which adequate reserves determined in accordance with GAAP have been established;
(3) Liens (other than Liens created or imposed under ERISA) incurred or deposits made by the Company and Subsidiaries of the Company in the ordinary course of business in connection with workers' compensation, unemployment insurance and other types of social security, laws or regulations, or to secure the performance of tenders, statutory obligations, bids, leases, trade or government contracts, surety, indemnification, appeal, performance and return-of-money bonds, letters of credit, bankers acceptances and other similar obligations (exclusive of obligations for the payment of borrowed money), or as security for customs or import duties and related amounts;
(4) Liens in connection with attachments or judgments (including judgment or appeal bonds), provided that the judgments secured shall, within 30 days after the entry thereof, have been discharged or execution thereof stayed pending appeal, or shall have been discharged within 30 days after the expiration of any such stay;
(5) Liens securing indebtedness (including capital leases) incurred to finance the purchase price or cost of construction of property or assets (or additions, repairs, alterations or improvements thereto), provided that such Liens and the
 
indebtedness secured thereby are incurred within twelve months of the later of acquisition or completion of construction (or addition, repair, alteration or improvement) and full operation thereof;
(6) Liens securing industrial revenue bonds, pollution control bonds or similar types of tax-exempt bonds;
(7) Liens arising from deposits with, or the giving of any form of security to, any governmental agency required as a condition to the transaction of business or exercise of any privilege, franchise or license;
(8) encumbrances, covenants, conditions, restrictions, easements, reservations and rights of way or zoning, building code or other restrictions, (including defects or irregularities in title and similar encumbrances) as to the use of real property, or Liens incidental to conduct of the business or to the ownership of properties of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company not securing debt that do not in the aggregate materially impair the use of said properties in the operation of the business of the Company, including its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
(9) leases, licenses, subleases or sublicenses granted to others not interfering in any material respect with the business of the Company, including its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole;
(10) Liens on property or assets at the time such property or assets is acquired by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company;
(11) Liens on property or assets of any person at the time such person becomes a Subsidiary of the Company;
(12) Liens on receivables from customers sold to third parties pursuant to credit arrangements in the ordinary course of business;
(13) Liens existing on the date of this Indenture, or any extensions, amendments, renewals, refinancings, replacements or other modifications thereto;
(14) Liens on any property or assets created, assumed or otherwise brought into existence in contemplation of the sale or other disposition of the underlying property or assets, whether directly or indirectly, by way of share disposition or otherwise;
(15) Liens securing debt of a Subsidiary of the Company owed to the Company or to another Subsidiary of the Company;
(16) Liens in favor of the United States of America or any State thereof, or any department, agency or instrumentality or political subdivision thereof, to secure partial, progress, advance or other payments;
 
(17) Liens to secure debt of joint ventures in which the Company or any of its Subsidiaries has an interest, to the extent such Liens are on property or assets of, or equity interests in, such joint ventures;
(18) Liens arising solely by virtue of any statutory or common law provisions relating to banker's Liens, rights of set-off or similar rights and remedies as to deposit accounts or other funds maintained with a depositary institution;
(19) Liens arising from financing statement filings regarding operating leases;
(20) Liens in favor of customs and revenue authorities to secure custom duties in connection with the importation of goods;
(21) Liens securing the financing of insurance premiums payable on insurance policies; provided, that, such Liens shall only encumber unearned premiums with respect to such insurance, interests in any state guarantee fund relating to such insurance and subject and subordinate to the rights and interests of any loss payee, loss payments which shall reduce such unearned premiums;
(22) Liens securing cash management obligations (that do not constitute indebtedness) in the ordinary course of business;
(23) Liens on any property or assets of Foreign Subsidiaries securing debt of such Foreign Subsidiaries (but not debt of the Company or any Domestic Subsidiaries); and
(24) other Liens on property or assets of the Company and the property or assets of its Subsidiaries securing debt in an aggregate principal amount (together with the aggregate amount of all Attributable Debt in respect of Sale and Leaseback Transactions entered into in reliance on this clause) not to exceed, as of any date of incurrence of such debt pursuant to this clause and after giving effect to such incurrence and the application of the proceeds therefrom, the greater of (1) $250.0 million and (2) 15% of the Company's Consolidated Net Tangible Assets.
"Person" means any individual, corporation, partnership, joint venture, association, joint-stock company, trust, unincorporated organization, limited liability company or government or other entity.
"Responsible Officer" with respect to the Trustee, means any vice president, assistant vice president, trust officer, assistant trust officer or any other officer of the Trustee assigned by the Trustee to administer its corporate trust matters and who customarily performs functions similar to those performed by such Persons who at the time shall be such officers, respectively, or to whom any corporate trust matter is referred because of such Person's knowledge of and familiarity with the particular subject and who shall have direct responsibility for administration of this Indenture.
"Revolving Credit Facility" means the Credit Agreement dated October 5, 2006, among the Company, the lenders referred to therein and JPMorgan Chase
 
Bank, N.A., as administrative agent, as amended, extended, renewed, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified (in whole or in part, and without limitation as to amount, maturity, terms, conditions, covenants and other provisions) from time to time, and any agreement governing debt incurred to refinance, in whole or in part, the borrowings and commitments then outstanding or permitted to be outstanding under such Credit Agreement or a successor Credit Agreement.
"SEC" means the Securities and Exchange Commission.
"Securities" has the meaning assigned to it in the preamble to this Indenture.
"Securities Act" means the Securities Act of 1933, as amended.
"Senior Funded Debt" means all Funded Debt of the Company or its Subsidiaries (except Funded Debt, the payment of which is subordinated to the payment of the Securities).
"Series" or "Series of Securities" means each series of debentures, notes or other debt instruments of the Company created pursuant to Sections 2.01 and 2.02 hereof.
"Significant Subsidiary" means any Subsidiary that would be a "Significant Subsidiary" of the Company within the meaning of Rule 1-02 under Regulation S-X promulgated by the SEC.
"Stated Maturity," when used with respect to any Security, means the date specified in such Security as the fixed date on which an amount equal to the principal amount of such Security is due and payable.
"Subsidiary" of any Person means any corporation, limited liability company, association, partnership or other business entity of which more than 50% of the total voting power of shares of capital stock or other interests (including partnership interests) entitled (without regard to the occurrence of any contingency) to vote in the election of directors, managers or trustees thereof is at the time owned or controlled, directly or indirectly, by (i) such Person, (ii) such Person and one or more Subsidiaries of such Person or (iii) one or more Subsidiaries of such Person.
"Subsidiary Guarantee" means a Guarantee by a Subsidiary Guarantor of the Company's obligations with respect to the Securities pursuant to the terms set forth in this Indenture.
"Subsidiary Guarantor" means each subsidiary of the Company which is a guarantor under this Indenture; provided, however, that upon the release and discharge of any Person from its Subsidiary Guarantee in accordance with this Indenture, such Person shall cease to be a Subsidiary Guarantor.
"TIA" means the Trust Indenture Act of 1939 (15 U.S.C.  77aaa-77bbbb) and the rules and regulations thereunder as in effect on the date on which this Indenture is qualified under the TIA, except as provided in Section 9.03.
 
"Trustee" means the party named as such above until a successor replaces it in accordance with the applicable provisions of this Indenture and thereafter means the successor serving hereunder.
"U.S. Government Obligations" means direct obligations (or certificates representing an ownership interest in such obligations) of the United States of America (including any agency or instrumentality thereof) for the payment of which the full faith and credit of the United States of America is pledged and which are not callable or redeemable at the issuer's option.
SECTION 1.02.
Other Definitions.
 
SECTION 1.03. This Indenture is subject to the mandatory provisions of the TIA, which are incorporated by reference in and made a part of this Indenture. The following TIA terms used in this Indenture have the following meanings:
Incorporation by Reference of Trust Indenture Act.
"indenture securities" means the Securities;
"indenture security Holder" means a Holder of a Security;
"indenture to be qualified" means this Indenture;
"indenture trustee" or "institutional trustee" means the Trustee; and
"obligor" on the Securities means the Company and any successor obligor upon the Securities.
All other terms used in this Indenture that are defined by the TIA, defined by the TIA's reference to another statute or defined by SEC rule under the TIA have the meanings so assigned to them.
 
SECTION 1.04. Unless the context otherwise requires:
Rules of Construction.
(1) a term has the meaning assigned to it;
(2) an accounting term not otherwise defined has the meaning assigned to it in accordance with GAAP;
(3) "or" is not exclusive;
(4) words in the singular include the plural, and in the plural include the singular;
(5) provisions apply to successive events and transactions; and
(6) references to sections of or rules under the Securities Act shall be deemed to include substitute, replacement or successor sections or rules adopted by the SEC from time to time.
SECTION 2.01. The aggregate principal amount of Securities that may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture is unlimited. The Securities may be issued in one or more Series. All Securities of a Series shall be identical except as may be set forth in a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate detailing the adoption of the terms thereof pursuant to the authority granted under a Board Resolution. In the case of Securities of a Series to be issued from time to time, the Board Resolution, supplemental indenture or Officers' Certificate may provide for the method by which specified terms (such as interest rate, maturity date, record date or date from which interest shall accrue) are to be determined. Securities may differ between Series in respect of any matters.
Issuable in Series.
SECTION 2.02. At or prior to the issuance of any Securities within a Series, the following shall be established (as to the Series generally, in the case of Subsection 2.02(a) and either as to such Securities within the Series or as to the Series generally in the case of Subsections 2.02(b) through 2.02(x)) by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate pursuant to authority granted under a Board Resolution:
Establishment of Terms of Series of Securities.
(a) the title of the Securities of the Series (which shall distinguish the Securities of that particular Series from the Securities of any other Series);
(b) any limit upon the aggregate principal amount of the Securities of the Series which may be authenticated and delivered under this Indenture (except for Securities authenticated and delivered upon registration of transfer of, or in exchange for, or in lieu of, other Securities of the Series);
 
(c) the date or dates on which the principal and premium of the Securities of the Series are payable;
(d) the rate or rates (which may be fixed or variable) at which the Securities of the Series shall bear interest, if any, or the method of determining such rate or rates, the date or dates from which such interest, if any, shall accrue, the Interest Payment Dates on which such interest, if any, shall be payable or the method by which such dates will be determined, the record dates for the determination of Holders thereof to whom such interest is payable (in the case of Securities in registered form), and the basis upon which such interest will be calculated if other than that of a 360-day year of twelve 30-day months;
(e) the currency or currencies, including composite currencies in which Securities of the Series shall be denominated, if other than Dollars, the place or places, if any, in addition to or instead of the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee (in the case of Securities in registered form) or the principal New York office of the Trustee (in the case of Securities in bearer form), where the principal, premium and interest with respect to Securities of such Series shall be payable or the method of such payment, if by wire transfer, mail or other means;
(f) the price or prices at which, the period or periods within which, and the terms and conditions upon which, Securities of the Series may be redeemed, in whole or in part, at the option of the Company or otherwise;
(g) the form of the Securities of the Series and whether Securities of the Series are to be issued in registered form or bearer form or both and, if Securities are to be issued in bearer form, whether coupons will be attached to them, whether Securities of the Series in bearer form may be exchanged for Securities of the Series issued in registered form, and the circumstances under which and the places at which any such exchanges, if permitted, may be made;
(h) if any Securities of the Series are to be issued in bearer form or as one or more Global Securities representing individual Securities of the Series in bearer form, whether certain provisions for the payment of additional interest or tax redemptions shall apply; whether interest with respect to any portion of a temporary Security of the Series in bearer form payable with respect to any Interest Payment Date prior to the exchange of such temporary Security in bearer form for definitive Securities of the Series in bearer form shall be paid to any clearing organization with respect to the portion of such temporary Security in bearer form held for its account and, in such event, the terms and conditions (including any certification requirements) upon which any such interest payment received by a clearing organization will be credited to the Persons entitled to interest payable on such Interest Payment Date; and the terms upon which a temporary Security in bearer form may be exchanged for one or more definitive Securities of the Series in bearer form;
 
(i) the obligation, if any, of the Company to redeem, purchase or repay the Securities of the Series pursuant to any sinking fund or analogous provisions or at the option of a Holder thereof and the price or prices at which, the period or periods within which, and the terms and conditions upon which, Securities of the Series shall be redeemed, purchased or repaid, in whole or in part, pursuant to such obligations;
(j) the terms, if any, upon which the Securities of the Series may be convertible into or exchanged for any of the Company's common stock, preferred stock or other equity interests, other debt securities or warrants for common stock, preferred stock or other securities of any kind, and the terms and conditions upon which such conversion or exchange shall be effected, including the initial conversion or exchange price or rate, the conversion or exchange period and any other additional provisions;
(k) if other than denominations of $1,000 and any integral multiple thereof, the denominations in which the Securities of the Series shall be issuable;
(l) if the amount of principal, premium or interest with respect to the Securities of the Series may be determined with reference to an index or pursuant to a formula, the manner in which such amounts will be determined;
(m) if the principal amount payable at the Stated Maturity of Securities of the Series will not be determinable as of any one or more dates prior to such Stated Maturity, the amount that will be deemed to be such principal amount as of any such date for any purpose, including the principal amount thereof which will be due and payable upon any Maturity other than the Stated Maturity and which will be deemed to be outstanding as of any such date (or, in any such case, the manner in which such deemed principal amount is to be determined), and if necessary, the manner of determining the equivalent thereof in Dollars;
(n) the applicability of or any changes or additions to the defeasance and discharge provisions of Article Eight;
(o) if other than the principal amount thereof, the portion of the principal amount of the Securities of the Series that shall be payable upon declaration of acceleration of the maturity thereof pursuant to Section 6.02;
(p) the terms, if any, of the transfer, mortgage, pledge or assignment as security for the Securities of the Series of any properties, assets, moneys, proceeds, securities or other collateral, including whether certain provisions of the TIA are applicable and any corresponding changes to provisions of this Indenture as then in effect;
(q) any addition to or change in the Events of Default which applies to any Securities of the Series and any change in the right of the Trustee or the requisite Holders of such Series of Securities to declare the principal amount of, premium, if any, and interest on such Series of Securities due and payable pursuant to Section 6.02;
(r) if the Securities of the Series shall be issued in whole or in part in the form of a Global Security, the terms and conditions, if any, upon which such Global
 
Security may be exchanged in whole or in part for other individual Definitive Securities of such Series, the Depositary for such Global Security and the form of any legend or legends to be borne by any such Global Security in addition to or in lieu of the Global Securities Legend;
(s) any Trustee, authenticating agent, Paying Agent, transfer agent, Service Agent or Registrar;
(t) the applicability of, and any addition to, deletion of or change in, the covenants (and the related definitions) set forth in Articles Four or Five which applies to Securities of the Series;
(u) whether the Securities of the Series will be guaranteed as provided in Article Ten, and if so, any addition to, deletion of or change in the provisions (and related definitions) contained in Article Ten that applies to the Securities of the Series;;
(v) with regard to Securities of the Series that do not bear interest, the dates for certain required reports to the Trustee;
(w) the terms applicable to Original Issue Discount Securities, including the rate or rates at which original issue discount will accrue;
(x) any other terms of Securities of the Series (which terms shall not be prohibited by the provisions of this Indenture except as permitted by Section 9.01(k)).
All Securities of any one Series need not be issued at the same time and may be issued from time to time, consistent with the terms of this Indenture, if so provided by or pursuant to the Board Resolution, supplemental indenture or Officers' Certificate referred to above, and the authorized principal amount of any Series may not be increased to provide for issuances of additional Securities of such Series, unless otherwise provided in such Board Resolution, supplemental indenture or Officers' Certificate.
SECTION 2.03. The Securities shall be issuable, except as otherwise provided with respect to any series of Securities pursuant to Section 2.02, as registered Securities in the denominations of one thousand Dollars ($1,000) or any integral multiple thereof, subject to Sections 2.02(e) and 2.02(k). The Securities of any Series shall bear interest payable on the dates and at the rate specified with respect to that Series. Unless otherwise provided as contemplated by Section 2.02 with respect to Securities of any Series, the principal of and the interest on the Securities of any Series, as well as any premium thereon in case of redemption thereof prior to maturity, shall be payable in Dollars. Such payment shall be made at the office or agency of the Company maintained for that purpose in the Borough of Manhattan, the City and State of New York. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication. Unless otherwise provided as contemplated by Section 2.02, interest on the Securities shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year composed of twelve 30-day months.
Denominations; Provisions for Payment.
The interest installment on any Security that is payable, and is punctually paid or duly provided for, on any Interest Payment Date for Securities of that Series shall
 
be paid to the Person in whose name said Security (or one or more predecessor Securities) is registered at the close of business on the regular record date for such interest installment. In the event that any Security of any Series or portion thereof is called for redemption and the redemption date is subsequent to a regular record date with respect to any Interest Payment Date and prior to such Interest Payment Date, interest on such Security will be paid upon presentation and surrender of such Security as provided in Section 3.05 and Section 3.06.
Unless otherwise set forth in a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate establishing the terms of any Series of Securities pursuant to Section 2.02 hereof, the term "regular record date" as used in this Section with respect to Securities of any Series with respect to any Interest Payment Date for such Series shall mean (i) either the fifteenth day of the month immediately preceding the month in which an Interest Payment Date established for such series pursuant to Section 2.02 hereof shall occur, if such Interest Payment Date is the first day of a month or (ii) the first day of the month in which an Interest Payment Date established for such Series pursuant to Section 2.02 hereof shall occur, if such Interest Payment Date is the fifteenth day of a month, whether or not such date is a Business Day.
Subject to the foregoing provisions of this Section, each Security of a Series delivered under this Indenture upon transfer of or in exchange for or in lieu of any other Security of such Series shall carry the rights to interest accrued and unpaid, and to accrue, that were carried by such other Security.
SECTION 2.04. One or more Officers shall sign the Securities for the Company by manual or facsimile signature. If an Officer whose signature is on a Security no longer holds that office at the time the Security is authenticated, the Security shall nevertheless be valid. A Security shall not be valid until authenticated by the manual signature of the Trustee or an authenticating agent. The signature shall be conclusive evidence that the Security has been authenticated under this Indenture. The Securities may contain such notations, legends or endorsements required by law, stock exchange rule or usage.
Execution and Authentication.
The Trustee shall at any time, and from time to time, authenticate Securities for original issue in the principal amount provided in the Board Resolution, supplemental indenture hereto or Officers' Certificate, upon receipt by the Trustee of a Company Order. Such Company Order may authorize authentication and delivery pursuant to oral or electronic instructions from the Company or its duly authorized agent or agents, which oral instructions shall be promptly confirmed in writing. Each Security shall be dated the date of its authentication unless otherwise provided by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture hereto or an Officers' Certificate.
The aggregate principal amount of Securities of any Series outstanding at any time may not exceed any limit upon the maximum principal amount for such Series set forth in the Board Resolution, supplemental indenture hereto or Officers' Certificate delivered pursuant to Section 2.02, except as provided in Section 2.09.
 
Prior to the issuance of Securities of any Series, the Trustee shall have received and (subject to Section 7.02) shall be fully protected in conclusively relying on: (a) the Board Resolution, supplemental indenture hereto or Officers' Certificate establishing the form of the Securities of that Series or of Securities within that Series and the terms of the Securities of that Series or of Securities within that Series, (b) an Officers' Certificate complying with Section 11.04 and 11.05, and (c) an Opinion of Counsel complying with Section 11.04 and 11.05 and which shall additionally state:
(a) that the form of such Securities has been established by a supplemental indenture or by or pursuant to an Officer's Certificate or a resolution of the Board of Directors in conformity with the provisions of this Indenture;
(b) that the terms of such Securities have been established in conformity with the provisions of this Indenture;
(c) that such Securities, when authenticated and delivered by the Trustee and issued by the Company in the manner and subject to any conditions specified in such Opinion of Counsel, will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company, enforceable in accordance with their terms, subject to bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization and other laws of general applicability relating to or affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights and to general equity principles; and
(d) that all laws applicable to the execution and delivery by the Company of such Securities have been complied with; provided that such opinion may specify that it is limited to (1) United States federal law, the Delaware General Corporation Law and the laws of the State of New York and (ii) to such laws as in such Counsel's experience are normally applicable to instruments comparable to the Indenture.
The Trustee shall have the right to decline to authenticate and deliver any Securities of such Series: (a) if the Trustee, being advised by counsel, determines that such action may not lawfully be taken; or (b) if the Trustee in good faith shall determine that such action would expose the Trustee to personal liability to Holders of any then outstanding Series of Securities.
The Trustee may appoint an authenticating agent acceptable to the Company to authenticate Securities. An authenticating agent may authenticate Securities whenever the Trustee may do so. Each reference in this Indenture to authentication by the Trustee includes authentication by such agent. An authenticating agent has the same rights as an Agent to deal with the Company or an Affiliate of the Company.
SECTION 2.05. So long as Securities of any Series remain outstanding, the Company agrees to maintain an office or agency in the Borough of Manhattan, the City and State of New York (or any other place or places specified with respect to such Series pursuant to Section 2.02), where Securities of such Series may be presented or surrendered for payment (""), where Securities of such Series may be presented for registration of transfer or exchange ("") and where notices and demands to or upon the Company in respect of the Securities of such
Registrar and Paying Agent.
Paying Agent
Registrar
 
Series and this Indenture may be served (""). The Registrar shall keep a register with respect to each Series of Securities and to their transfer and exchange. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of the name and address, and any change in the name or address, of each office or agency, Registrar, Paying Agent or Service Agent. If at any time the Company shall fail to maintain any such required office or agency, Registrar, Paying Agent or Service Agent or shall fail to furnish the Trustee with the name and address thereof, such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands may be made or served at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, and the Company hereby appoints the Trustee as its agent to receive all such presentations, surrenders, notices and demands.
Service Agent
The Company may also from time to time designate one or more co-registrars, additional paying agents or additional service agents and may from time to time rescind such designations; , , that no such designation or rescission shall in any manner relieve the Company of its obligations to maintain a Registrar, Paying Agent and Service Agent in each place so specified pursuant to Section 2.02 for Securities of any Series for such purposes. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of any such designation or rescission and of any change in the name or address of any such co-registrar, additional paying agent or additional service agent. The term "Registrar" includes any co-registrar; the term "Paying Agent" includes any additional paying agent; and the term "Service Agent" includes any additional service agent.
provided
however
The Company hereby appoints the Trustee as the initial Registrar, Paying Agent and Service Agent for each Series unless another Registrar, Paying Agent or Service Agent, as the case may be, is appointed prior to the time Securities of that Series are first issued.
SECTION 2.06. The Company shall require each Paying Agent, other than the Trustee, to agree in writing that the Paying Agent will hold in trust, for the benefit of Holders of any Series of Securities, or the Trustee, all money held by the Paying Agent for the payment of principal of or interest on the Series of Securities, and will notify the Trustee of any default by the Company in making any such payment. While any such default continues, the Trustee may require a Paying Agent to pay all money held by it to the Trustee. Notwithstanding anything in this Section to the contrary, (i) the agreement to hold sums in trust as provided in this Section 2.06 is subject to the provisions of Section 8.06, and (ii) the Company may at any time, for the purpose of obtaining the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture or for any other purpose, pay, or direct any Paying Agent to pay, to the Trustee all sums held in trust by the Company or such Paying Agent, such sums to be held by the Trustee upon the same terms and conditions as those upon which such sums were held by the Company or such Paying Agent; and, upon such payment by any Paying Agent to the Trustee, such Paying Agent (if other than the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company) shall be released from all further liability with respect to the money. If the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company acts as Paying Agent, it shall segregate and hold in a separate trust fund for the benefit of Holders of any Series of Securities all money held by it as Paying Agent.
Paying Agent to Hold Money in Trust.
 
SECTION 2.07. (a) The Trustee shall preserve in as current a form as is reasonably practicable the most recent list available to it of the names and addresses of Holders of each Series of Securities and shall otherwise comply with TIA  312(a). If the Trustee is not the Registrar, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee at least ten days before each Interest Payment Date and at such other times as the Trustee may request in writing a list, in such form and as of such date as the Trustee may reasonably require, of the names and addresses of Holders of each Series of Securities.
Holder Lists.
(b) The Trustee may destroy any list furnished to it as provided in Section 2.07(a) upon receipt of a new list so furnished.
SECTION 2.08. When Securities of a Series are presented to the Registrar or a co-registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Securities of the same Series, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange if its requirements for such transactions are met. To permit registrations of transfers and exchanges, the Trustee shall authenticate Securities at the Registrar's request. No service charge shall be made for any registration of transfer or exchange (except as otherwise expressly permitted herein), but the Company may require payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or similar governmental charge payable in connection therewith (other than any such transfer tax or similar governmental charge payable upon exchanges pursuant to Sections 2.12, 3.06 or 9.05).
Transfer and Exchange.
Neither the Company nor the Registrar shall be required (a) to issue, register the transfer of, or exchange Securities of any Series during the period beginning at the opening of business fifteen days immediately preceding the mailing of a notice of redemption of Securities of that Series selected for redemption and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing, or (b) to register the transfer or exchange of Securities of any Series selected, called or being called for redemption as a whole or the portion being redeemed of any such Securities selected, called or being called for redemption in part.
All Securities presented or surrendered for exchange or registration of transfer, as provided in this Section, shall be accompanied (if so required by the Company or the Registrar) by a written instrument or instruments of transfer, in form satisfactory to the Company or the Registrar, duly executed by the Holder or by such Holder's duly authorized attorney in writing.
The provisions of this Section 2.08 are, with respect to any Global Security, subject to Section 2.15 hereof.
SECTION 2.09. If any mutilated Security is surrendered to the Trustee, the Company shall execute and the Trustee shall authenticate and deliver in exchange therefor a new Security of the same Series and of like tenor and principal amount and bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
Mutilated, Destroyed, Lost and Stolen Securities.
If there shall be delivered to the Company and the Trustee (i) evidence to their satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of any Security and (ii) such security or indemnity as may be required by them to save each of them and any agent of either of them
 
harmless, then, in the absence of notice to the Company or the Trustee that such Security has been acquired by a bona fide purchaser, the Company shall execute and upon its request the Trustee shall authenticate and make available for delivery, in lieu of any such destroyed, lost or stolen Security, a new Security of the same Series and of like tenor and principal amount and bearing a number not contemporaneously outstanding.
In case any such mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Security has become or is about to become due and payable, the Company in its discretion may, instead of issuing a new Security, pay such Security (without surrender thereof except in the case of a mutilated Security) if the applicant for such payment shall furnish to the Company and the Trustee such security or indemnity as may be required by them to save each of them and any agent of either of them harmless, and, in case of destruction, loss or theft, evidence to their satisfaction of the destruction, loss or theft of such Security and of the ownership thereof.
Upon the issuance of any new Security under this Section 2.09, the Company may require the payment of a sum sufficient to cover any tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in relation thereto and any other expenses (including the fees and expenses of the Trustee) connected therewith.
Every new Security of any Series issued pursuant to this Section 2.09 in lieu of any destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall constitute an original additional contractual obligation of the Company, whether or not the destroyed, lost or stolen Security shall be at any time enforceable by anyone, and shall be entitled to all the benefits of this Indenture equally and proportionately with any and all other Securities of that Series duly issued hereunder.
The provisions of this Section 2.09 are exclusive and shall preclude (to the extent lawful) any and all other rights and remedies, notwithstanding any law or statute existing or hereafter enacted to the contrary, with respect to the replacement or payment of mutilated, destroyed, lost or stolen Securities, negotiable instruments or other securities.
SECTION 2.10. The Securities outstanding at any time are all the Securities authenticated by the Trustee except for those canceled by it, those delivered to it for cancellation, those paid pursuant to Section 2.09, those reductions in the interest on a Global Security effected by the Trustee in accordance with the provisions hereof and those described in this Section 2.10 as not outstanding.
Outstanding Securities.
If a Security is replaced pursuant to Section 2.09, it ceases to be outstanding until the Trustee receives proof satisfactory to it that the replaced Security is held by a bona fide purchaser.
If the Paying Agent (other than the Company, a Subsidiary of the Company or an Affiliate of any thereof) holds on the Maturity of Securities of a Series money sufficient to pay such Securities payable on that date, then on and after that date such Securities of the Series cease to be outstanding and interest on them ceases to accrue.
 
A Security does not cease to be outstanding because the Company or an Affiliate holds the Security.
In determining whether the Holders of the requisite principal amount of outstanding Securities have given any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent or waiver hereunder, the principal amount of an Original Issue Discount Security that shall be deemed to be outstanding for such purposes shall be the amount of the principal thereof that would be due and payable as of the date of such determination upon a declaration of acceleration of the Maturity thereof pursuant to Section 6.02.
SECTION 2.11. In determining whether the Holders of the required principal amount of Securities of a Series have concurred in any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent or waiver, Securities of a Series owned by the Company or an Affiliate of the Company shall be disregarded and deemed not to be outstanding, except that for the purposes of determining whether the Trustee shall be protected in relying on any such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent or waiver only Securities of a Series that a Responsible Officer of the Trustee actually knows are so owned shall be so disregarded. Subject to the foregoing, only Securities outstanding at the time shall be considered in any such determination.
Treasury Securities.
SECTION 2.12. Until Definitive Securities are ready for delivery, the Company may prepare and the Trustee shall authenticate temporary Securities upon a Company Order. Temporary Securities shall be substantially in the form of Definitive Securities but may have variations that the Company considers appropriate for temporary Securities. Without unreasonable delay, the Company shall prepare and the Trustee upon request shall authenticate Definitive Securities of the same Series and date of maturity in exchange for temporary Securities. Until so exchanged, temporary Securities shall have the same rights under this Indenture as the Definitive Securities.
Temporary Securities.
SECTION 2.13. The Company at any time may deliver Securities to the Trustee for cancellation. The Registrar and the Paying Agent shall forward to the Trustee any Securities surrendered to them for registration of transfer, exchange or payment. The Trustee shall cancel all Securities surrendered for transfer, exchange, payment, replacement or cancellation and shall dispose of such canceled Securities according to its normal operating procedures (subject to the record retention requirement of the Exchange Act). The Company may not issue new Securities to replace Securities that it has paid or delivered to the Trustee for cancellation.
Cancellation.
SECTION 2.14. If the Company defaults in a payment of interest on a Series of Securities, it shall pay the defaulted interest, plus, to the extent permitted by law, any interest payable on the defaulted interest, to the persons who are Holders of the Series on a subsequent special record date. The Company shall fix the record date and payment date. At least 30 days before the record date, the Company shall mail to the Trustee and to each Holder of the Series a notice that states the record date, the payment date and the amount of interest to be paid. The Company may pay defaulted interest in any other lawful manner.
Defaulted Interest.
 
SECTION 2.15.
Global Securities.
(a) A Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture hereto or an Officers' Certificate shall establish whether the Securities of a Series shall be issued in whole or in part in the form of one or more Global Securities and the Depositary for such Global Security or Securities.
Terms of Securities.
(b) Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary contained in Section 2.08 of this Indenture and in addition thereto, any Global Security shall be exchangeable pursuant to Section 2.08 of this Indenture for Securities registered in the names of Holders other than the Depositary for such Security or its nominee only if (i) such Depositary notifies the Company that it is unwilling or unable to continue as Depositary for such Global Security or if at any time such Depositary ceases to be a clearing agency registered under the Exchange Act, and, in either case, the Company fails to appoint a successor Depositary within 90 days of such event, (ii) the Company executes and delivers to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate to the effect that such Global Security shall be so exchangeable or (iii) an Event of Default with respect to the Securities represented by such Global Security shall have occurred and be continuing. Any Global Security that is exchangeable pursuant to the preceding sentence shall be exchangeable for Securities registered in such names as the Depositary shall direct in writing in an aggregate principal amount equal to the principal amount of the Global Security with like tenor and terms.
Transfer and Exchange.
Except as provided in this Section 2.15(b), a Global Security may only be transferred in whole but not in part (i) by the Depositary with respect to such Global Security to a nominee of such Depositary, (ii) by a nominee of such Depositary to such Depositary or another nominee of such Depositary or (iii) by the Depositary or any such nominee to a successor Depositary or a nominee of such a successor Depositary.
(c) Any Global Security issued hereunder shall bear a legend in substantially the following form:
Legend.
"THIS SECURITY IS HELD BY THE DEPOSITARY (AS DEFINED IN THE INDENTURE GOVERNING THIS SECURITY) OR ITS NOMINEE IN CUSTODY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE BENEFICIAL OWNERS HEREOF, AND IS NOT TRANSFERABLE TO ANY PERSON UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES EXCEPT THAT (A) THE TRUSTEE MAY MAKE SUCH NOTATIONS HEREON AS MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.04 OF THE INDENTURE, (B) THIS SECURITY MAY BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE INDENTURE, (C) THIS SECURITY MAY BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE FOR CANCELLATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.13 OF THE INDENTURE AND (D) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE INDENTURE, THIS SECURITY MAY BE TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART, ONLY (X) BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY, (Y) BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR (Z) BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR TO A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY."
 
(d) Notwithstanding the other provisions of this Indenture, unless otherwise specified as contemplated by Section 2.02, payment of the principal of and interest, if any, on any Global Security shall be made to the Holder thereof.
Payments.
(e) Except as provided in Section 2.15(d), the Company, the Trustee and any Agent shall treat a person as the Holder of such principal amount of outstanding Securities of such Series represented by a Global Security as shall be specified in a written statement of the Depositary with respect to such Global Security, for purposes of obtaining any consents, declarations, waivers or directions required to be given by the Holders pursuant to this Indenture.
Consents, Declaration and Directions.
SECTION 2.16. The Company in issuing the Securities may use "CUSIP" numbers (if then generally in use), and, if so, the Trustee shall use "CUSIP" numbers in notices of redemption as a convenience to Holders; that neither the Company nor the Trustee shall have any responsibility for any defect in the "CUSIP" number that appears on any Security, check, advice of payment or redemption notice, that any such notice may state that no representation is made as to the correctness of such numbers either as printed on the Securities or as contained in any notice of a redemption and that reliance may be placed only on the other elements of identification printed on the Securities, and any such redemption shall not be affected by any defect in or omission of such numbers. The Company shall promptly notify the Trustee in writing of any change in CUSIP numbers.
CUSIP Numbers.
provided
SECTION 2.17. Nothing in this Indenture or in the Securities, express or implied, shall give or be construed to give to any Person, other than the parties hereto and the holders of the Securities, any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Indenture, or under any covenant, condition or provision herein contained; all such covenants, conditions and provisions being for the sole benefit of the parties hereto and of the Holders of the Securities.
Benefits of Indenture.
SECTION 3.01. The Company may, with respect to any Series of Securities, reserve the right to redeem and pay the Series of Securities or may covenant to redeem and pay the Series of Securities or any part thereof prior to the Stated Maturity thereof at such time and on such terms as provided for in such Series of Securities. If a Series of Securities is redeemable and the Company wants or is obligated to redeem prior to the Stated Maturity thereof all or part of the Series of Securities pursuant to the terms of such Securities, it shall notify the Trustee of the redemption date and the principal amount of Securities of the Series to be redeemed and the redemption price. The Company shall give such notice to the Trustee at least 45 but no more that 60 days before the redemption date (or such shorter notice as may be acceptable to the Trustee).
Notices to Trustee.
 
SECTION 3.02. Unless otherwise indicated for a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, if less than all of the Securities are to be redeemed or purchased in an offer to purchase at any time, the Trustee shall select the Securities to be redeemed or purchased as follows:
Selection of Securities to be Redeemed.
(1) if the Securities are listed on any national securities exchange, in compliance with the requirements of the principal national securities exchange, if any, on which the Securities are listed; or
(2) if the Securities are not listed on any national securities exchange, on a pro rata basis, by lot or by such other method as the Trustee shall deem fair and appropriate.
Unless otherwise indicated for a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, no Securities of $1,000 of principal amount or less will be redeemed in part. Except as provided in the preceding sentence, provisions of this Indenture that apply to Securities called for redemption also apply to portions of Securities called for redemption. The Trustee shall make the selection at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before the redemption date from outstanding Securities of a Series not previously called for redemption.
If any Security is to be redeemed in part only, the notice of redemption that relates to such Security shall state the portion of the principal amount of that Security to be redeemed. A new Security in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion of the original Security presented for redemption will be issued in the name of the Holder thereof upon cancellation of the original Security. Securities called for redemption become irrevocably due on the date fixed for redemption at the applicable redemption price, plus accrued and unpaid interest to the redemption date. On and after the redemption date, unless the Company defaults in making the applicable redemption payment, interest ceases to accrue or accrete on Securities or portions of them called for redemption.
SECTION 3.03. Unless otherwise provided for a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, at least 30 days but not more than 60 days before a redemption date, the Company shall mail or cause to be mailed, by first class mail, a notice of redemption to each Holder whose Securities are to be redeemed at its registered address.
Notice of Redemption.
The notice shall identify the Securities to be redeemed and shall state:
(1) the redemption date;
(2) the redemption price or the appropriate calculation of the redemption price, which in each case will include interest accrued and unpaid to the date fixed for redemption;
 
(3) if any Security is being redeemed in part, the portion of the principal amount of such Security to be redeemed and that, after the redemption date upon surrender of such Security, a new Security or Securities in principal amount equal to the unredeemed portion shall be issued upon cancellation of the original Security;
(4) the name and address of the Paying Agent;
(5) that Securities called for redemption must be surrendered to the Paying Agent to collect the redemption price;
(6) that, unless the Company defaults in making such redemption payment, interest on Securities (or portion thereof) called for redemption ceases to accrue on and after the redemption date;
(7) the paragraph of the Securities and/or provision of this Indenture or any supplemental indenture pursuant to which the Securities called for redemption are being redeemed;
(8) the CUSIP number, if any, printed on the Securities being redeemed; and
(9) that no representation is made as to the correctness or accuracy of the CUSIP number, if any, listed in such notice or printed on the Securities.
At the Company's written request, the Trustee shall give the notice of redemption in the Company's name and at its expense; , , that the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee, at least 45 days prior to the redemption date (or such shorter notice as may be acceptable to the Trustee), an Officers' Certificate requesting that the Trustee give such notice and setting forth the information to be stated in such notice as required by this Section 3.03.
provided
however
SECTION 3.04. Once notice of redemption is mailed in accordance with Section 3.03 hereof, Securities called for redemption become irrevocably due and payable on the redemption date at the redemption price. A notice of redemption may not be conditional.
Effect of Notice of Redemption.
Failure to give notice or any defect in the notice to any Holder shall not affect the validity of the notice to any other Holder.
SECTION 3.05. Prior to 10:00 a.m. (New York City time) on the redemption date, the Company shall deposit with the Trustee or with the Paying Agent (or, if the Company or a Subsidiary of the Company is the Paying Agent, shall segregate and hold in trust) money sufficient to pay the redemption price of, and accrued interest on, all Securities to be redeemed on that date, other than Securities or portions of Securities called for redemption that have been delivered by the Company to the Trustee for cancellation. The Trustee or the Paying Agent shall as promptly as practicable return to the Company any money deposited with the Trustee or the Paying Agent by the Company in excess of the amounts necessary to pay the redemption price of,
Deposit of Redemption Price.
 
and accrued interest on, all Securities to be redeemed. If such money is then held by the Company in trust and is not required for such purpose it shall be discharged from such trust. In addition, if any money deposited with the Trustee or with the Paying Agent, or held by the Company, in respect of any redemption of Securities remains unclaimed for two years after the applicable redemption date, such money shall be handled in accordance with Section 8.06.
If the Company complies with the provisions of the preceding paragraph, on and after the redemption date, interest shall cease to accrue on the Securities or the portions of Securities called for redemption. If a Security is redeemed on or after an interest record date but on or prior to the related interest payment date, then any accrued and unpaid interest shall be paid to the Person in whose name such Security was registered at the close of business on such record date. If any Security called for redemption shall not be so paid upon surrender for redemption because of the failure of the Company to comply with the preceding paragraph, interest shall be paid on the unpaid principal, from the redemption date until such principal is paid, and, to the extent lawful, on any interest not paid on such unpaid principal, in each case at the rate provided in the Securities.
SECTION 3.06. Upon surrender of a Security that is redeemed in part, the Company shall execute and, upon the Company's written request, the Trustee shall authenticate for the Holder (at the Company's expense) a new Security equal in principal amount to the unredeemed portion of the Security surrendered.
Securities Redeemed in Part.
SECTION 4.01. The Company covenants and agrees for the benefit of the Holders of each Series of Securities that it will duly and punctually make all payments in respect of each Series of Securities on the dates and in the manner provided in such Series of Securities and this Indenture. Such payments shall be considered made on the date due if on such date the Trustee or the Paying Agent holds, in accordance with this Indenture, money sufficient to make all payments with respect to such Securities then due.
Payment of Securities.
SECTION 4.02. Unless otherwise indicated in a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture hereto or an Officers' Certificate, notwithstanding that the Company may not be subject to the reporting requirements of Section 13 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act, so long as any Securities are outstanding, the Company shall file with the SEC and furnish to the Trustee and the Holders copies of such annual reports and such information, documents and other reports as are specified in Sections 13 and 15(d) of the Exchange Act and applicable to a U.S. corporation subject to such Sections, at the times specified for the filing of such information, documents and reports under such Sections, , that the Company will not be so obligated to file such information, documents and reports with the SEC if the SEC does not permit such filings. The Company also shall comply with the other provisions of TIA  314(a).
SEC Reports.
provided, however
 
In addition, whether or not required by the rules and regulations of the SEC, the Company shall file a copy of all such information and reports with the SEC for public availability within the time periods specified in the SEC's rules and regulations (unless the SEC will not accept such a filing) and make such information available to securities analysts and prospective investors upon request. The Company shall at all times comply with TIA  314(a).
Delivery of such reports, information and documents to the Trustee is for informational purposes only and the Trustee's receipt of such shall not constitute constructive notice of any information contained therein or determinable from information contained therein, including the Company's compliance with any of its covenants hereunder (as to which the Trustee is entitled to rely exclusively on Officers' Certificates).
SECTION 4.03. The Company shall deliver to the Trustee within 120 days after the end of each fiscal year of the Company an Officers' Certificate stating that in the course of the performance by the signers of their duties as Officers of the Company they would normally have knowledge of any Default and whether or not the signers know of any Default that occurred during such period. If they do, the certificate shall describe the Default, its status and what action the Company is taking or propose to take with respect thereto. The Company also shall comply with TIA  314(a)(4).
Compliance Certificate.
SECTION 4.04. The Company shall execute and deliver to the Trustee such further instruments and do such further acts as may be reasonably necessary or proper to carry out more effectively the purpose of this Indenture.
Further Instruments and Acts.
SECTION 4.05. Subject to Article Five hereof, the Company shall do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve and keep in full force and effect:
Corporate Existence.
(1) its corporate existence in accordance with its organizational documents (as the same may be amended from time to time) and
(2) the rights (charter and statutory), licenses and franchises of the Company; , , that the Company shall not be required to preserve any such right, license or franchise if the Board of Directors shall determine that the preservation thereof is no longer desirable in the conduct of the business of the Company and its Subsidiaries, taken as a whole, and that the loss thereof is not adverse in any material respect to the Holders of the Securities.
provided
however
SECTION 4.06. The Company shall file with the Trustee promptly at the end of each calendar year (i) a written notice specifying the amount of original issue discount (including daily rates and accrual periods) accrued on outstanding Securities as of the end of such year and (ii) such other specific information relating to such original issue discount as may then be relevant under the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Calculation of Original Issue Discount.
 
SECTION 4.07. Unless otherwise provided for with respect to a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, create, incur, issue, assume or guarantee any debt of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries secured by a Lien (other than Permitted Liens) upon any property or assets (other than deposit accounts, inventory, accounts receivable or the proceeds therefrom), without making effective provision to secure all of the Securities of such Series, equally and ratably with any and all other debt thereby secured, so long as such debt shall be so secured.
Limitations on Liens.
SECTION 4.08. Unless otherwise provided for with respect to a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, the Company shall not, and shall not permit any Subsidiary of the Company to, enter into any arrangement with any Person providing for the leasing by the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company of any property or assets that have been or are to be sold or transferred by the Company or such Subsidiary of the Company to such Person, with the intention of taking back a lease of such property or assets (a "") unless either:
Limitation on Sale and Leaseback Transactions.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
(a) within 12 months after the receipt of the proceeds of the sale or transfer, the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company applies an amount equal to the greater of the net proceeds of the sale or transfer or the fair value of such property or assets (as determined in good faith by our board of directors as of any date within 90 days prior to the date of such sale or transfer) to the prepayment or retirement (other than any mandatory prepayment or retirement) of Senior Funded Debt; or
(b) the Company or such Subsidiary of the Company would be entitled, at the effective date of the sale or transfer, to incur debt secured by a Lien on such property or assets in an amount at least equal to the Attributable Debt in respect of the Sale and Leaseback Transaction, without equally and ratably securing the Securities pursuant to Section 4.07.
The foregoing restriction in the paragraph above shall not apply to any Sale and Leaseback Transaction (i) for a term of not more than three years including renewals; (ii) between the Company and a Subsidiary of the Company or between Subsidiaries, provided that the lessor is the Company or a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company; or (iii) entered into within 270 days after the later of the acquisition or completion of construction of the subject property or assets.
SECTION 4.09. Unless otherwise provided for with respect to a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, if on or after the date of this Indenture, any Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company is or becomes guaranteed by any Domestic Subsidiary of the Company then, if such
Subsidiary Guarantees.
 
Subsidiary of the Company is not already a Guarantor, the Company shall cause such Subsidiary, to (a) execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture in form reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee pursuant to which such Subsidiary shall fully and unconditionally guarantee all of the Company's obligations under this Indenture, including the prompt payment in full when due of the principal of, premium on, if any, interest and, without duplication, defaulted interest, if any, on the Securities and all other amounts payable by the Company thereunder and hereunder, subject to any applicable grace period, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, and interest on any overdue principal and any overdue interest on the Securities and all other obligations of the Company to the Holders or the Trustee hereunder or under the Securities on the terms set forth in Article Ten, and (b) deliver to the Trustee an opinion of counsel to the effect that (i) such supplemental indenture and guarantee of the Securities has been duly executed and authorized and (ii) such supplemental indenture and guarantee of the notes constitutes a valid, binding and enforceable obligation of such Subsidiary of the Company, except insofar as enforcement thereof may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws and except insofar as enforcement thereof is subject to general principles of equity.
SECTION 5.01. Unless otherwise provided with respect to a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, the Company shall not merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other Person (other than a merger of a wholly owned Subsidiary of the Company into the Company) or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of its property in one transaction or series of related transactions unless:
Merger, Consolidation or Sale of Assets of the Company.
(a) the Company shall be the surviving Person (the "") or the Surviving Person (if other than the Company) formed by such merger, consolidation or amalgamation or to which such sale, transfer, assignment, lease, conveyance or disposition is made shall be a corporation organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, any State thereof or the District of Columbia;
Surviving Person
(b) the Surviving Person (if other than the Company) expressly assumes, by supplemental indenture in form satisfactory to the Trustee, executed and delivered to the Trustee by such Surviving Person, the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, all the Securities of all Series outstanding, according to their tenor, and the due and punctual performance and observance of all the covenants and conditions of this Indenture to be performed by the Company;
 
(c) immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such transaction or series of related transactions, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and
(d) the Company shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Trustee, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such transaction and the supplemental indenture, if any, in respect thereto comply with this Section 5.01 and that all conditions precedent herein provided for relating to such transaction have been complied with.
For the purposes of this Section 5.01, the sale, transfer, assignment, lease, conveyance or other disposition of all the property of one or more Subsidiaries of the Company, which property, if held by the Company instead of such Subsidiaries, would constitute all or substantially all the property of the Company on a consolidated basis, shall be deemed to be the transfer of all or substantially all the property of the Company.
SECTION 5.02. Unless the Subsidiary Guarantee of the applicable Subsidiary Guarantor is permitted to be released in connection with such transaction pursuant to Section 10.05, such Subsidiary Guarantor shall not merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other person or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all its property in any one transaction or series of related transactions unless:
Merger Consolidation or Sale of Assets of Subsidiary Guarantors.
(1) such Subsidiary Guarantor shall be the surviving person (the "") or the Surviving Guarantor (if other than such Subsidiary Guarantor) formed by such merger, consolidation or amalgamation or to which such sale, transfer, assignment, lease, conveyance or disposition is made shall be a corporation, limited partnership or limited liability company organized and existing under the laws of the U.S., any State thereof or the District of Columbia;
Surviving Guarantor
(2) the Surviving Guarantor (if other than such Subsidiary Guarantor) expressly assumes, by supplemental indenture in form satisfactory to the trustee, executed and delivered to the trustee by such Surviving Guarantor, such Subsidiary Guarantor's guarantee of the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on, all the Securities of all Series outstanding, according to their tenor, and the due and punctual performance and observance of all the covenants and conditions of this Indenture to be performed by such Subsidiary Guarantor;
(3) immediately before and immediately after giving effect to such transaction or series of related transactions, no Default or Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing; and
(4) the Company shall deliver, or cause to be delivered, to the Trustee, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that such transaction and the supplemental indenture, if any, in respect thereto comply with this Section 5.02 and that all conditions precedent in this Indenture relating to such transaction have been complied with.
 
SECTION 5.03. (a) In case of any such consolidation, amalgamation, merger, sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, lease or other disposition and upon the assumption by the successor entity, by supplemental indenture, executed and delivered to the Trustee and satisfactory in form to the Trustee, of the due and punctual payment of the principal of, premium, if any, and interest on all of the Securities of all Series outstanding and the due and punctual performance of all of the covenants and conditions of this Indenture or established with respect to each Series of the Securities pursuant to Section 2.02 to be performed by the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, with respect to each Series, such successor entity shall succeed to and be substituted for and may exercise every right and power of the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, under this Indenture with the same effect as if it had been named as the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor, as the case may be, herein, and thereupon the predecessor entity shall be relieved of all obligations and covenants under this Indenture and the Securities.
Surviving Person Substituted.
(b) In case of any such consolidation, amalgamation, merger, sale, conveyance, assignment, transfer, lease or other disposition such changes in phraseology and form (but not in substance) may be made in the Securities thereafter to be issued as may be appropriate.
(c) Nothing contained in this Indenture or in any of the Securities shall prevent (i) the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor from merging into itself or acquiring by purchase or otherwise all or any part of the property of any other Person (whether or not affiliated with the Company); or (ii) any Subsidiary Guarantor from merging or consolidating with or into , or selling, transferring, assigning, leasing, conveying or otherwise disposing of all of substantially all of its property to, the Company or another Subsidiary Guarantor.
SECTION 6.01. Unless otherwise provided for a particular Series of Securities by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate, each of the following constitutes an "" with respect to each Series of Securities:
Events of Default.
Event of Default
(1) default in the payment of the principal or redemption price with respect to any Security of such Series when such amount becomes due and payable;
(2) default in the payment of interest when due on the Securities of such Series within 30 days of when such amount becomes due and payable;
 
(3) the Company fails to comply with any of its covenants or agreements in the Securities of such Series or this Indenture (other than a failure that is subject to the foregoing clauses (1) or (2)) and such failure continues for 60 days after the notice specified below;
(4) debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company is not paid within any applicable grace period after final maturity or is accelerated by the holders thereof because of a default and the total amount of such debt unpaid or accelerated exceeds $25.0 million or its Foreign Currency equivalent at the time without such debt having been discharged or acceleration having been rescinded or annulled within 10 days after receipt by the Company of notice of the default by the Trustee or Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of such Series then outstanding;
(5) the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Significant Subsidiary of the Company pursuant to or within the meaning of any Bankruptcy Law:
(A) commences a voluntary case;
(B) consents to the entry of an order for relief against it in an involuntary case;
(C) consents to the appointment of a Custodian of it or for any substantial part of its property; or
(D) makes a general assignment for the benefit of its creditors;
or takes any comparable action under any foreign laws relating to insolvency;
(6) a court of competent jurisdiction enters an order or decree under any Bankruptcy Law that:
(A) is for relief against the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Significant Subsidiary of the Company in an involuntary case;
(B) appoints a Custodian of the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Significant Subsidiary of the Company or for any substantial part of its property; or
(C) orders the winding up or liquidation of the Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor or any Significant Subsidiary of the Company;
or any similar relief is granted under any foreign laws and the order or decree remains unstayed and in effect for 60 days; or
(7) to the extent Article Ten is applicable to a particular Series of Securities, except as permitted pursuant to Section 10.05 any Subsidiary Guarantee shall be held in any judicial proceeding to be unenforceable or invalid or shall cease for any reason to be in full force and effect, or any Subsidiary Guarantor, or any person acting on its behalf, should deny or disaffirm its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee.
 
The foregoing will constitute Events of Default whatever the reason for any such Event of Default and whether it is voluntary or involuntary or is effected by operation of law or pursuant to any judgment, decree or order of any court or any order, rule or regulation of any administrative or governmental body.
The term "" means, for the purposes of this Article Six, any receiver, trustee, assignee, liquidator, custodian or similar official under any Bankruptcy Law.
Custodian
A Default under clause (3) is not an Event of Default until the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities notify the Company of the Default and the Company does not cure such Default within the time specified after receipt of such notice. Such notice must specify the Default, demand that it be remedied and state that such notice is a "."
Notice of Default
The Company shall deliver to the Trustee, within 30 days after the occurrence thereof, written notice in the form of an Officers' Certificate of any Event of Default and any event which with the giving of notice or the lapse of time would become an Event of Default, its status and what action the Company is taking or proposes to take with respect thereto.
SECTION 6.02. (a) If an Event of Default with respect to any Series of Securities at the time outstanding (other than an Event of Default specified in Section 6.01(5) or (6) with respect to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities of that Series by notice to the Company in writing (and to the Trustee, if given by Holders of such Securities of such Series) specifying the Event of Default, may declare the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest to the date of acceleration on all the Securities of that Series to be due and payable. Upon such a declaration, such amounts shall be due and payable immediately. If an Event of Default specified in Section 6.01(5) or (6) with respect to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor occurs, the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on all the Securities of each Series of Security shall become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act on the part of the Trustee or any Holder.
Acceleration.
ipso facto
(b) At any time after the principal of the Securities of any Series of Securities shall have been so declared due and payable (or have become immediately due and payable), and before any judgment or decree for the payment of the moneys due shall have been obtained or entered as hereinafter provided, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of that Series then outstanding hereunder, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences, and waive such Event of Default, if: (i) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay all matured installments of interest upon
 
all the Securities of that Series and the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any and all Securities of that Series that shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest upon such principal and premium, if any, and, to the extent that such payment is enforceable under applicable law, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate per annum expressed in the Securities of that Series to the date of such payment or deposit) and the amount payable to the Trustee under Section 7.07, and (ii) any and all Events of Default under this Indenture with respect to such Series of Securities, other than the nonpayment of principal (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security) on Securities of that Series that shall not have become due by their terms, shall have been remedied or waived as provided in Section 6.04. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereto.
SECTION 6.03. If an Event of Default with respect to any Series of Securities occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may pursue any available remedy to collect the payment of the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on the Securities of that Series or to enforce the performance of any provision of the Securities of that Series or this Indenture.
Other Remedies.
The Trustee may institute and maintain a suit or legal proceeding even if it does not possess any of the Securities of a Series or does not produce any of them in the proceeding. A delay or omission by the Trustee or any Holder in exercising any right or remedy accruing upon an Event of Default with respect to any Series of Securities shall not impair the right or remedy or constitute a waiver of or acquiescence in the Event of Default. No remedy is exclusive of any other remedy. All available remedies are cumulative.
SECTION 6.04. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities of any Series by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default and its consequences except (i) a Default in the payment of the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Security of that Series, or (ii) a Default in respect of a provision that under Section 9.02 cannot be amended without the consent of each Holder of that Series affected. When a Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any consequent right.
Waiver of Past Defaults.
SECTION 6.05. The Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities of any Series may direct the time, method and place of conducting any proceeding for any remedy available to the Trustee or of exercising any trust or power conferred on the Trustee with respect to that Series. However, the Trustee may refuse to follow any direction that conflicts with law or this Indenture or, subject to Section 7.01, that the Trustee determines is unduly prejudicial to the rights of any other Holder of that Series or that would subject the Trustee to personal liability; , , that the Trustee may take any other action deemed proper by
Control by Majority.
provided
however
 
the Trustee that is not inconsistent with such direction. Prior to taking any action hereunder, the Trustee shall be entitled to indemnity satisfactory to it against all losses and expenses caused by taking or not taking such action.
SECTION 6.06. Except to enforce the right to receive payment of the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Security of any Series when due, no Holder of a Security of that Series may pursue any remedy with respect to this Indenture or the Securities of that Series unless:
Limitation on Suits.
(i) the Holder previously gave the Trustee written notice stating that an Event of Default with respect to that Series is continuing;
(ii) the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities of that Series make a written request to the Trustee to pursue the remedy;
(iii) such Holder or Holders of that Series offer to the Trustee indemnity satisfactory to it to the Trustee against any loss, liability or expense;
(iv) the Trustee does not comply with the request within 60 days after receipt of the request and the offer of security or indemnity; and
(v) the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Securities of that Series do not give the Trustee a written direction inconsistent with the request during such 60-day period.
It is understood and intended and expressly covenanted by the taker and holder of every Security, with every other taker and holder with the Trustee that a Holder of Securities of any Series may not use this Indenture to prejudice the rights of another Holder of that Series or to obtain a preference or priority over another Holder of that Series (it being understood that the Trustee does not have an affirmative duty to ascertain whether or not such actions or forbearances are unduly prejudicial to such Holders).
SECTION 6.07. Notwithstanding any other provision of this Indenture, the right of any Holder to receive payment of the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on the Securities held by such Holder, on or after their Maturity, or to bring suit for the enforcement of any such payment on or after their Maturity, shall not be impaired or affected without the consent of such Holder.
Rights of Holders to Receive Payment.
SECTION 6.08. If an Event of Default specified in Section 6.01(1) or (2) occurs and is continuing, the Trustee may recover judgment in its own name and as trustee of an express trust against the Company for the whole amount then due and owing (together with interest on any unpaid interest to the extent lawful) and the amounts provided for in Section 7.07.
Collection Suit by Trustee.
 
SECTION 6.09. The Trustee may file such proofs of claim and other papers or documents as may be necessary or advisable in order to have the claims of the Trustee and the Holders allowed in any judicial proceedings relative to the Company, its creditors or its property and, unless prohibited by law or applicable regulations, may vote on behalf of the Holders in any election of a trustee in bankruptcy or other Person performing similar functions, and any Custodian in any such judicial proceeding is hereby authorized by each Holder to make payments to the Trustee and, in the event that the Trustee shall consent to the making of such payments directly to the Holders, to pay to the Trustee any amount due it for the reasonable compensation, expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee, its agents and its counsel, and any other amounts due the Trustee under Section 7.07.
Trustee May File Proofs of Claim.
SECTION 6.10. If the Trustee collects any money or property pursuant to this Article Six with respect to any Series of Securities, it shall pay out the money or property in the following order:
Priorities.
FIRST: to the Trustee for amounts due under Section 7.07;
SECOND: to Holders for amounts due and unpaid on the Securities of that Series for the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest, ratably, without preference or priority of any kind, according to the amounts due and payable on the Securities of that Series for the principal amount of (or, in the case of Original Issue Discount Securities of that Series, the portion thereby specified in the terms of such Security), premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest, respectively; and
THIRD: to the Company.
The Trustee may fix a record date and payment date for any payment to Holders pursuant to this Section. At least 15 days before such record date, the Trustee shall mail to each Holder and the Company a notice that states the record date, the payment date and amount to be paid.
SECTION 6.11. In any suit for the enforcement of any right or remedy under this Indenture or in any suit against the Trustee for any action taken or omitted by it as Trustee, a court in its discretion may require the filing, by any party litigant in the suit, of an undertaking to pay the costs of the suit, and the court in its discretion may assess reasonable costs, including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses, against any party litigant in the suit, having due regard to the merits and good faith of the claims or defenses made by the party litigant. This Section does not apply to a suit by the Trustee, a suit by a Holder pursuant to Section 6.07 or a suit by Holders of more than 10% in principal amount of the then outstanding Securities of any Series.
Undertaking for Costs.
SECTION 6.12. Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary Guarantor (to the extent the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor
Waiver of Stay or Extension Laws.
 
may lawfully do so) shall at any time insist upon, plead, or in any manner whatsoever claim to take the benefit or advantage of, any stay or extension law, wherever enacted, now or at any time hereafter in force, which may affect the covenants or the performance of this Indenture; and the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor (to the extent that it may lawfully do so) hereby expressly waives all benefit or advantage of any such law, and shall not hinder, delay or impede the execution of any power herein granted to the Trustee, but shall suffer and permit the execution of every such power as though no such law had been enacted.
SECTION 7.01. (a) If an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing with respect to any Series of Securities, the Trustee shall exercise the rights and powers vested in it by this Indenture and use the same degree of care and skill in its exercise thereof as a prudent Person would exercise or use under the circumstances in the conduct of such Person's own affairs.
Duties of Trustee.
(b) Except during the continuance of an Event of Default with respect to any Series of Securities:
(1) the Trustee undertakes to perform such duties and only such duties as are specifically set forth in this Indenture with respect to the Securities of that Series, as modified or supplemented by a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture hereto or an Officers' Certificate and no implied covenants or obligations shall be read into this Indenture against the Trustee; and
(2) in the absence of bad faith on its part, the Trustee may, with respect to Securities of that Series, conclusively rely, as to the truth of the statements and the correctness of the opinions expressed therein, upon certificates or opinions furnished to the Trustee and conforming to the requirements of this Indenture. However, in the case of any such certificates or opinions which by any provision hereof are specifically required to be furnished to the Trustee, the Trustee shall examine the certificates and opinions to determine whether or not they conform to the requirements of this Indenture (but need not confirm or investigate the accuracy of mathematical calculations or other facts stated therein).
(c) The Trustee may not be relieved from liability for its own grossly negligent action, its own negligent failure to act or its own willful misconduct, except that:
(1) this paragraph does not limit the effect of paragraph (b) of this Section;
(2) the Trustee shall not be liable for any error of judgment made in good faith by a Responsible Officer unless it is proved that the Trustee was negligent in ascertaining the pertinent facts; and
 
(3) the Trustee shall not be liable with respect to any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in accordance with a direction received by it pursuant to Section 6.05.
(d) Every provision of this Indenture that in any way relates to the Trustee is subject to paragraphs (a), (b) and (c) of this Section.
(e) The Trustee shall not be liable for interest on any money received by it except as the Trustee may agree in writing with the Company.
(f) Money held in trust by the Trustee need not be segregated from funds except to the extent required by law.
(g) No provision of this Indenture shall require the Trustee to expend or risk its own funds or otherwise incur financial liability in the performance of any of its duties hereunder or in the exercise of any of its rights or powers, if it shall have reasonable grounds to believe that repayment of such funds or adequate indemnity against such risk or liability is not reasonably assured to it.
(h) Every provision of this Indenture relating to the conduct or affecting the liability of or affording protection to the Trustee shall be subject to the provisions of this Section and to the provisions of the TIA.
SECTION 7.02. (a) The Trustee may conclusively rely on any document believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or presented by the proper Person. The Trustee need not investigate any fact or matter stated in the document.
Rights of Trustee.
(b) Before the Trustee acts or refrains from acting, it may require an Officers' Certificate or an Opinion of Counsel. The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith in reliance on the Officers' Certificate or Opinion of Counsel.
(c) The Trustee may act through agents or attorneys and shall not be responsible for the misconduct or negligence of any agent or attorney appointed with due care.
(d) The Trustee shall not be liable for any action it takes or omits to take in good faith which it believes to be authorized or within its rights or powers; , , that the Trustee's conduct does not constitute willful misconduct or gross negligence.
provided
however
(e) The Trustee may consult with counsel of its choice, and the advice or opinion of counsel with respect to legal matters relating to this Indenture and the Securities, shall be full and complete authorization and protection from liability in respect to any action taken, omitted or suffered by it hereunder in good faith and in accordance with the advice or opinion of such counsel.
 
(f) Unless otherwise specifically provided in this Indenture, any demand, request, direction or notice from the Company shall be sufficient if signed by an Officer of the Company.
(g) The Trustee shall not be deemed to have notice of any Default or Event of Default with respect to the Securities of any Series unless a Responsible Officer of the Trustee has actual knowledge thereof or unless written notice of any event which is in fact such a default is received by the Trustee at the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee, and such notice references such Securities and this Indenture.
(h) The rights, privileges, protections, immunities and benefits given to the Trustee, including, without limitation, its right to be indemnified, are extended to and shall be enforceable by, the Trustee in each of its capacities hereunder, and to each agent, custodian and other Person employed to act hereunder.
(i) The Trustee shall be under no obligation to exercise any of the rights or powers vested in it by this Indenture at the request or direction of any of the Holders pursuant to this Indenture, unless such Holders shall have offered to the Trustee security or indemnity reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee against the costs, expenses and liabilities which might be incurred by the Trustee in compliance with such request or direction.
(j) The Trustee shall not be bound to make any investigation into the facts or matters stated in any resolution, certificate, statement, instrument, opinion, report, notice, request, direction, consent, order, bond, debenture, note, other evidence of indebtedness or other paper or document, but the Trustee, in its discretion, may make such further inquiry or investigation into such facts or matters as it may see fit, and, if the Trustee shall determine to make such further inquiry or investigation, it shall be entitled to examine the books, records and premises of the Company, personally or by agent or attorney at the sole cost of the Company and shall incur no liability or additional liability of any kind by reason of such inquiry or investigation.
(k) The Trustee shall not be liable for any action taken, suffered, or omitted to be taken by it in good faith and reasonably believed by it to be authorized or within the discretion or rights or powers conferred upon it by this Indenture.
(l) In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for special, indirect, punitive or consequential loss or damage of any kind whatsoever (including, but not limited to, loss of profit) irrespective of whether the Trustee has been advised of the likelihood of such loss or damage and regardless of the form of action.
(m) The Trustee may request that the Company deliver a certificate setting forth the names of individuals or titles of officers authorized at such time to take specified actions pursuant to this Indenture.
(n) The Trustee shall not be required to give any bond or surety in respect of the performance of its powers and duties hereunder.
 
SECTION 7.03. The Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Securities and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-paying agent may do the same with like rights. However, the Trustee must comply with Sections 7.10 and 7.11.
Individual Rights of Trustee.
SECTION 7.04. The Trustee shall not be responsible for and makes no representation as to the validity or adequacy of this Indenture or the Securities, it shall not be accountable for the Company's use of the proceeds from the Securities, and it shall not be responsible for any statement of the Company in this Indenture, in the Securities, or in any document executed in connection with the sale of the Securities, other than those set forth in the Trustee's certificate of authentication.
Trustee's Disclaimer.
SECTION 7.05. If a Default with respect to Securities of any Series occurs and is continuing and if it is actually known to a Responsible Officer of the Trustee, the Trustee shall mail to each Holder of that Series notice of the Default within 90 days after it occurs. The Trustee may withhold the notice if and so long as a committee of its Responsible Officers in good faith determines that withholding the notice is in the interests of Holders.
Notice of Defaults.
SECTION 7.06. If required by  313(a) of the TIA within 60 days after each April 15 following the date of the initial issuance of Securities hereunder, for so long as Securities remain outstanding, the Trustee shall mail to each Holder a brief report dated as of such reporting date that complies with  313(a) of the TIA. The Trustee shall also comply with  313(b) of the TIA.
Reports by Trustee to Holder.
A copy of each report at the time of its mailing to Holders shall be filed with the SEC and each stock exchange (if any) on which the Securities are listed. The Company agrees to notify promptly the Trustee in writing whenever the Securities become listed on any stock exchange and of any delisting thereof.
SECTION 7.07. The Company shall pay to the Trustee from time to time such compensation for its services as the Company and the Trustee shall from time to time agree in writing. The Trustee's compensation shall not be limited by any law on compensation of a trustee of an express trust. The Company shall reimburse the Trustee upon request for all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred or made by it, including costs of collection, in addition to the compensation for its services. Such expenses shall include the reasonable compensation and expenses, disbursements and advances of the Trustee's agents, counsel, accountants and experts. The Company shall indemnify each of the Trustee and any predecessor Trustee against any and all loss, liability, damage, claim or expense (including reasonable attorneys' fees and expenses) incurred by or in connection with the administration of this trust and the performance of its duties hereunder; provided that the Company need not reimburse any expense or indemnify against any loss, liability, damage, claim or expense incurred by an indemnified party through such party's own gross negligence or willful misconduct. The Trustee shall notify the Company of any claim for which it may seek indemnity promptly upon obtaining actual knowledge thereof; , , that any failure so to notify the Company shall not relieve the Company of its indemnity obligations hereunder.
Compensation and Indemnity.
provided
however
 
To secure the Company's payment obligations in this Section 7.07, the Trustee shall have a lien prior to the Securities on all money or property held or collected by the Trustee other than money or property held in trust to pay the principal of and interest and any additional payments on particular Securities.
When the Trustee incurs expenses after the occurrence of a Default specified in Section 6.01(5) or (6) with respect to the Company, the expenses are intended to constitute expenses of administration under the Bankruptcy Law. The Company's payment obligations pursuant to this Section 7.07 shall survive the satisfaction or discharge of this Indenture or the resignation or removal of the Trustee.
SECTION 7.08. The Trustee may resign at any time with respect to the Securities of any Series by so notifying the Company. The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities of any Series may remove the Trustee and may appoint a successor Trustee with respect to such Series of Securities by so notifying the Trustee and the Company in writing not less than 30 days prior to the effective date of such removal. The Company shall remove the Trustee if:
Replacement of Trustee.
(a) the Trustee fails to comply with Section 7.10;
(b) the Trustee is adjudged bankrupt or insolvent;
(c) a receiver or other public officer takes charge of the Trustee or its property; or
(d) the Trustee otherwise becomes incapable of acting.
If the Trustee resigns, is removed by the Company or by the Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Securities of any Series and such Holders do not reasonably promptly appoint a successor Trustee or if a vacancy exists in the office of Trustee for any reason (the Trustee in such event being referred to herein as the retiring Trustee), the Company shall promptly appoint a successor Trustee.
A successor Trustee shall deliver a written acceptance of its appointment to the retiring Trustee and to the Company. Thereupon the resignation or removal of the retiring Trustee shall become effective, and the successor Trustee shall have all the rights, powers and duties of the Trustee under this Indenture. The successor Trustee shall mail a notice of its succession to Holders of that Series of Securities. The retiring Trustee shall promptly transfer all property held by it as Trustee to the successor Trustee, subject to the lien provided for in Section 7.07.
If a successor Trustee does not take office within 60 days after the retiring Trustee resigns or is removed, the retiring Trustee or the Holders of 10% in principal amount of the Securities of that Series may petition, at the expense of the Company, any court of competent jurisdiction for the appointment of a successor Trustee.
 
If the Trustee fails to comply with Section 7.10, any Holder of that Series of Securities may petition any court of competent jurisdiction for the removal of the Trustee and the appointment of a successor Trustee.
Notwithstanding the replacement of the Trustee pursuant to this Section 7.08, the Company's obligations under Section 7.07 shall continue for the benefit of the retiring Trustee.
SECTION 7.09. If the Trustee consolidates with, merges or converts into, or transfers all or substantially all its corporate trust business or assets to, another corporation or banking association, the resulting, surviving or transferee corporation without any further act shall be the successor Trustee.
Successor Trustee by Merger.
In case at the time such successor or successors by merger, conversion or consolidation to the Trustee shall succeed to the trusts created by this Indenture any of the Securities shall have been authenticated but not delivered, any such successor to the Trustee may adopt the certificate of authentication of any predecessor trustee, and deliver such Securities so authenticated; and if at that time any of the Securities shall not have been authenticated, any such successor to the Trustee may authenticate such Securities either in the name of any predecessor hereunder or in the name of the successor to the Trustee; and in all such cases such certificates shall have the full force which it is anywhere in the Securities or in this Indenture provided that the certificate of the Trustee shall have.
SECTION 7.10. The Trustee shall at all times satisfy the requirements of TIA  310(a). The Trustee shall have a combined capital and surplus of at least $50,000,000 as set forth in its most recent published annual report of condition. The Trustee shall comply with TIA  310(b); , , that there shall be excluded from the operation of TIA  310(b)(1) any indenture or indentures under which other securities or certificates of interest or participation in other securities of the Company are outstanding if the requirements for such exclusion set forth in TIA  310(b)(1) are met.
Eligibility; Disqualification.
provided
however
SECTION 7.11. The Trustee shall comply with TIA  311(a), excluding any creditor relationship listed in TIA  311(b). A Trustee who has resigned or has been removed shall be subject to TIA  311(a) to the extent indicated.
Preferential Collection of Claims Against Company.
SECTION 8.01. The Company may, at the option of its Board of Directors evidenced by a resolution set forth in an Officers' Certificate, at any time, elect to have either Section 8.02 or 8.03 hereof be applied to all outstanding Securities of any Series upon compliance with the conditions set forth below in this Article Eight.
Option to Effect Legal Defeasance or Covenant Defeasance.
 
SECTION 8.02. Upon the Company's exercise under Section 8.01 hereof of the option applicable to this Section 8.02, the Company shall, subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 8.04 hereof, be deemed to have been discharged from its obligations with respect to all outstanding Securities of that Series on the date the conditions set forth below are satisfied (hereinafter, ""). For this purpose, Legal Defeasance means that the Company shall be deemed to have paid and discharged the entire debt represented by the outstanding Securities, which shall thereafter be deemed to be "outstanding" only for the purposes of Section 8.05 hereof and the other Sections of this Indenture referred to in (a) and (b) below, and to have satisfied all its other obligations under such Securities and this Indenture (and the Trustee, on demand of and at the expense of the Company, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging the same), except for the following provisions which shall survive until otherwise terminated or discharged hereunder:
Legal Defeasance and Discharge.
Legal Defeasance
(a) the Company's obligations with respect to such Securities of that Series under Article Two;
(b) the Company's agreements set forth in Section 5.01;
(c) the rights, powers, trusts, duties and immunities of the Trustee hereunder and the Company's obligations in connection therewith under Article Two and Article Seven (including, but not limited to, the rights of the Trustee and the duties of the Company under Section 7.07, which shall survive despite the satisfaction in full of all obligations hereunder); and
(d) this Article Eight.
Subject to compliance with this Article Eight, the Company may exercise its option under this Section 8.02 notwithstanding the prior exercise of its option under Section 8.03 hereof.
SECTION 8.03. Upon the Company's exercise under Section 8.01 hereof of the option applicable to this Section 8.03 with respect to any Series of Securities, the Company shall, subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 8.04 hereof, be released from its obligations under the covenants contained in Section 4.02, Section 4.07 and Section 4.08 of this Indenture (if applicable to such Series of Securities) and any covenants made applicable to the Series of Securities which are subject to defeasance under the terms of a Board Resolution, a supplemental indenture or an Officers' Certificate with respect to the outstanding Securities of that Series on and after the date the conditions set forth in Section 8.04 are satisfied (hereinafter, ""), and the Securities of that Series shall thereafter be deemed not "outstanding" for the purposes of any direction, waiver, consent or declaration or act of Holders (and the consequences of any thereof) in connection with such covenants, but shall continue to be deemed "outstanding" for all other purposes hereunder (it being understood that such
Covenant Defeasance.
Covenant Defeasance
 
Securities shall not be deemed outstanding for accounting purposes). For this purpose, Covenant Defeasance means that, with respect to the outstanding Securities of that Series, the Company may omit to comply with and shall have no liability in respect of any term, condition or limitation set forth in any such covenant, whether directly or indirectly, by reason of any reference elsewhere herein to any such covenant or by reason of any reference in any such covenant to any other provision herein or in any other document and such omission to comply shall not constitute a Default or an Event of Default under Section 6.01 hereof, but, except as specified above, the remainder of this Indenture and such Securities shall be unaffected thereby. In addition, upon the Company's exercise under Section 8.01 hereof of the option applicable to this Section 8.03 hereof with respect to any Series of Securities, subject to the satisfaction of the conditions set forth in Section 8.04 hereof, Section 6.01(3) hereof (solely with respect to the covenants described in Sections 4.02, 4.07 and 4.08) shall not constitute an Event of Default with respect to such Securities.
SECTION 8.04. The following shall be the conditions to the application of either Section 8.02 or 8.03 hereof to the outstanding Securities:
Conditions to Legal or Covenant Defeasance.
In order to exercise either Legal Defeasance or Covenant Defeasance with respect to any Series of Securities:
(1) the Company must irrevocably deposit in trust with the Trustee money or U.S. Government Obligations or a combination thereof for the payment of principal of and interest on the Securities of such Series to the Stated Maturity or redemption, as the case may be;
(2) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee a certificate from a nationally recognized firm of independent registered public accountants expressing their opinion that the payments of principal and interest when due on the deposited U.S. Government Obligations plus any deposited money without investment will provide cash at such times and in such amounts as will be sufficient to pay principal and interest when due on all the Securities of such Series to the Stated Maturity or redemption, as the case may be;
(3) 123 days pass after the deposit is made and during the 123 day period no Default specified in Section 6.01(5) or (6) with respect to the Company or any other Person making such deposit occurs that is continuing at the end of the period;
(4) no Default or Event of Default with respect to that Series of Securities shall have occurred and be continuing on the date of such deposit (other than, if applicable, a Default or Event of Default with respect to that Series of Securities resulting from the borrowing of funds to be applied to such deposit);
(5) such deposit does not constitute a default under any other agreement binding on the Company;
 
(6) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that the trust resulting from the deposit does not require registration under the Investment Company Act of 1940 as amended;
(7) in the case of Legal Defeasance, the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel stating that (i) the Company has received from, or there has been published by, the Internal Revenue Service a ruling, or (ii) since the date of this Indenture there has been a change in the applicable federal income tax law, in either case to the effect that, and based thereon such Opinion of Counsel shall confirm that, the Holders of such Series of Securities will not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such defeasance and will be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such defeasance had not occurred;
(8) in the case of the Covenant Defeasance, the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel to the effect that the Holders of such Series of Securities will not recognize income, gain or loss for federal income tax purposes as a result of such covenant defeasance and will be subject to federal income tax on the same amounts, in the same manner and at the same times as would have been the case if such covenant defeasance had not occurred; and
(9) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel, each stating that all conditions precedent to the defeasance and discharge of the Securities as contemplated by this Article Eight have been complied with.
SECTION 8.05. Subject to Section 8.06 hereof, all money and noncallable U.S. Government Obligations (including the proceeds thereof) deposited with the Trustee (or other qualifying trustee, collectively for purposes of this Section 8.05, the "") pursuant to Section 8.04 hereof in respect of the outstanding Securities of the Series shall be held in trust and applied by the Trustee, in accordance with the provisions of such Securities and this Indenture, to the payment, either directly or through any Paying Agent (including the Company acting as Paying Agent) as the Trustee may determine, to the Holders of such Securities of all sums due and to become due thereon in respect of principal, premium, if any, and interest, but such money need not be segregated from other funds except to the extent required by law.
Deposited Money and U.S. Government Obligations to be Held in Trust; Other Miscellaneous Provisions.
Trustee
The Company shall pay and indemnify the Trustee against any tax, fee or other charge imposed on or assessed against the cash or noncallable U.S. Government Obligations deposited pursuant to Section 8.04 hereof or the principal and interest received in respect thereof other than any such tax, fee or other charge which by law is for the account of the Holders of the outstanding Securities of that Series.
Anything in this Article Eight to the contrary notwithstanding, the Trustee shall deliver or pay to the Company from time to time upon the request of the Company any money or noncallable U.S. Government Obligations held by it as provided in Section 8.04 hereof which, in the opinion of a nationally recognized firm of independent
 
public accountants expressed in a written certification thereof delivered to the Trustee (which may be the opinion delivered under Section 8.04(2) hereof), are in excess of the amount thereof that would then be required to be deposited to effect an equivalent Legal Defeasance or Covenant Defeasance.
SECTION 8.06. Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, and premium, if any, or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on its request or, if then held by the Company, shall be discharged from such trust; and the Holder of such Security shall thereafter look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, shall at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal (national edition), notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification or publication, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
Repayment to Company.
provided
however
SECTION 8.07. If the Trustee or Paying Agent is unable to apply any Dollars or noncallable U.S. Government Obligations in accordance with Section 8.02 or 8.03 hereof, as the case may be, by reason of any order or judgment of any court or governmental authority enjoining, restraining or otherwise prohibiting such application, then the Company's obligations under this Indenture and the Securities shall be revived and reinstated as though no deposit had occurred pursuant to Section 8.02 or 8.03 hereof until such time as the Trustee or Paying Agent is permitted to apply all such money in accordance with Section 8.02 or 8.03 hereof, as the case may be; , , that, if the Company makes any payment of principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Security following the reinstatement of its obligations, the Company shall be subrogated to the rights of the Holders of such Securities to receive such payment from the money held by the Trustee or Paying Agent.
Reinstatement.
provided
however
SECTION 8.08. If at any time: (a) the Company shall have delivered to the Trustee for cancellation all Securities of a Series theretofore authenticated (other than any Securities that shall have been destroyed, lost or stolen and that shall have been replaced or paid as provided in Section 2.09 and Securities for whose payment money and/or U.S. Government Obligations have theretofore been deposited in trust or segregated and held in trust by the Company and thereupon repaid to the Company or discharged from such trust, as provided in Section 8.06); or (b) all such Securities of a particular Series not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation shall have become due and payable, or are by their terms to become due and payable within one year or are to be called for redemption within one year under arrangements satisfactory to the Trustee for the giving of notice of redemption, and the Company irrevocably deposits with the Trustee, in trust, for the benefit of the Holders of that Series of Securities, cash in United States Dollars, noncallable U.S. Government Obligations, or a combination thereof, in such amounts as will be sufficient, in the opinion
Satisfaction and Discharge of Indenture.
 
of a nationally recognized firm of independent public accountants, to pay at maturity or upon redemption all Securities of that Series not theretofore delivered to the Trustee for cancellation, including principal of, premium, if any, and interest due or to become due to such date of maturity or date fixed for redemption, as the case may be, and if the Company shall also pay or cause to be paid all other sums payable hereunder with respect to such Series by the Company, and shall have delivered to the Trustee an Opinion of Counsel and an Officers' Certificate, each stating that all conditions precedent relating to the satisfaction and discharge of this Indenture with respect to such Series have been complied with, then this Indenture shall thereupon cease to be of further effect with respect to such Series except for:
(a) the Company's obligations with respect to such Securities of that Series under Article Two;
(b) the Company's agreements set forth in Section 5.01 and 5.02;
(c) the rights, powers, trusts, duties and immunities of the Trustee hereunder and the Company's obligations in connection therewith (including, but not limited to, the rights of the Trustee and the duties of the Company under Section 7.07, which shall survive despite the satisfaction in full of all obligations hereunder); and
(d) this Article Eight,
each of which shall survive until the Securities of such Series have been paid in full (thereafter, the Company's obligations in Section 7.07 only shall survive).
Upon the Company's exercise of this Section 8.08, the Trustee, on demand of the Company and at the cost and expense of the Company, shall execute proper instruments acknowledging satisfaction of and discharging this Indenture with respect to such Series of Securities.
SECTION 9.01. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend or supplement this Indenture or the Securities without the consent of any Holder:
Without Consent of Holders.
(a) to evidence the succession of another Person to the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to Article Five and the assumption by such successor of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's covenants, agreements and obligations in this Indenture and in the Securities;
(b) to provide for the issuance of additional Securities in accordance with the limitations set forth herein;
 
(c) to surrender any right or power conferred upon the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor by this Indenture, to add to the covenants of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor such further covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions for the protection of the Holders of all or any Series of Securities as the Board of Directors of the Company shall consider to be for the protection of the Holders of such Securities, and to make the occurrence, or the occurrence and continuance, of a default in respect of any such additional covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions a Default or an Event of Default under this Indenture; , , that with respect to any such additional covenant, restriction, condition or provision, such amendment may provide for a period of grace after default, which may be shorter or longer than that allowed in the case of other Defaults, may provide for an immediate enforcement upon such Default, may limit the remedies available to the Trustee upon such Default or may limit the right of Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of any Series to waive such default;
provided
however
(d) to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in this Indenture, in any supplemental indenture or in any Securities that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision contained therein;
(e) to convey, transfer, assign, mortgage or pledge any property to or with the Trustee, or to make such other provisions in regard to matters or questions arising under this Indenture as shall not materially adversely affect the interests of any Holders of Securities of any Series;
(f) to modify or amend this Indenture in such a manner as to permit the qualification of this Indenture or any supplemental indenture hereto under the TIA as then in effect;
(g) to add or to change any of the provisions of this Indenture to provide that Securities in bearer form may be registrable as to principal, to change or eliminate any restrictions on the payment of principal or premium with respect to Securities in registered form or of principal, premium or interest with respect to Securities in bearer form, or to permit Securities in registered form to be exchanged for Securities in bearer form, so as to not adversely affect the interests of the Holders or any coupons of any Series in any material respect or permit or facilitate the issuance of Securities of any Series in uncertificated form;
(h) to secure the Securities;
(i) to add Guarantees with respect to the Securities or release Subsidiary Guarantors from Subsidiary Guarantees as provided by the terms of this Indenture;
(j) to make any change not otherwise specified in this Section 9.01 that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect;
(k) to add to, change, or eliminate any of the provisions of this Indenture with respect to one or more Series of Securities, so long as any such addition,
 
change or elimination not otherwise permitted under this Indenture shall (A) neither apply to any Security of any Series created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture and entitled to the benefit of such provision nor modify the rights of the Holders of any such Security with respect to the benefit of such provision or (B) become effective only when there is no such Security outstanding;
(l) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment by a successor or separate Trustee with respect to the Securities of one or more Series and to add to or change any of the provisions of this Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of this Indenture by more than one Trustee; or
(m) to establish the form or terms of Securities and coupons of any Series pursuant to Article Two.
SECTION 9.02. The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may amend this Indenture or the Securities of any Series without notice to any Holder but with the written consent of the Holders of at least a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Securities of each Series then outstanding (including consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for the Securities) affected by such amendment. However, without the consent of each Holder affected, an amendment may not:
With Consent of Holders.
(1) reduce the principal amount of Securities of a Series whose Holders must consent to an amendment, modification, supplement or waiver;
(2) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Security;
(3) reduce the principal of or change the Stated Maturity of any Security;
(4) reduce the amount payable upon the redemption of any Security or add redemption provisions to any Security;
(5) make any Security payable in money other than that stated in this Indenture or the Security or, other than in accordance with the provisions herein, eliminate any existing Subsidiary Guarantee of the Securities; or
(6) make any change in Section 6.04 or 6.07 hereof or in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions.
It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders under this Section to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof. After an amendment under this Section becomes effective, the Company shall mail to all affected Holders a notice briefly describing such amendment. The failure to give such notice to all such Holders, or any defect therein, shall not impair or affect the validity of an amendment under this Section.
 
SECTION 9.03. Every amendment or supplement to this Indenture or the Securities shall comply with the TIA as then in effect.
Compliance with Trust Indenture Act.
SECTION 9.04. A consent to an amendment or a waiver by a Holder of a Security shall bind the Holder and every subsequent Holder of that Security or portion of the Security that evidences the same debt as the consenting Holder's Security, even if notation of the consent or waiver is not made on the Security. However, any such Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke the consent or waiver as to such Holder's Security or portion of the Security if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment or waiver becomes effective. After an amendment or waiver becomes effective, it shall bind every Holder. An amendment or waiver becomes effective once both (i) the requisite number of consents have been received by the Company or the Trustee and (ii) such amendment or waiver has been executed by the Company and the Trustee.
Revocation and Effect of Consents and Waivers.
The Company may, but shall not be obligated to, fix a record date for the purpose of determining the Holders entitled to give their consent or take any other action described above or required or permitted to be taken pursuant to this Indenture. If a record date is fixed, then notwithstanding the immediately preceding paragraph, those Persons who were Holders at such record date (or their duly designated proxies), and only those Persons, shall be entitled to give such consent or to revoke any consent previously given or to take any such action, whether or not such Persons continue to be Holders after such record date. No such consent shall be valid or effective for more than 120 days after such record date.
SECTION 9.05. If an amendment changes the terms of a Security, the Trustee may require the Holder of the Security to deliver it to the Trustee. The Trustee may place an appropriate notation on the Security regarding the changed terms and return it to the Holder. Alternatively, if the Company or the Trustee so determines, the Company in exchange for the Security shall issue and the Trustee shall authenticate a new Security that reflects the changed terms. Failure to make the appropriate notation or to issue a new Security shall not affect the validity of such amendment.
Notation on or Exchange of Securities.
SECTION 9.06. The Trustee shall sign any amendment authorized pursuant to this Article Nine if the amendment does not adversely affect the rights, duties, liabilities or immunities of the Trustee. If it does, the Trustee may but need not sign it. In signing such amendment the Trustee shall receive indemnity reasonably satisfactory to it and (subject to Section 7.02) shall be fully protected in conclusively relying upon, an Officers' Certificate and an Opinion of Counsel stating that such amendment is authorized or permitted by this Indenture.
Trustee to Sign Amendments.
SECTION 9.07. Neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company shall, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration, whether by way of interest, fee or otherwise, to any Holder for or as an inducement to any consent, waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of this
Payment for Consent.
 
Indenture or the Securities unless such consideration is offered to be paid to all Holders, ratably, that so consent, waive or agree to amend in the time frame set forth in solicitation documents relating to such consent, waiver or agreement.
SECTION 10.01. Subject to the provisions of this Article Ten, each Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the Securities of each Series that is to be guaranteed under the applicable Board Resolution, supplemental indenture or Officers' Certificate hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, on a senior unsecured basis, to each Holder of a Security of such Series authenticated and delivered by the Trustee and to the Trustee and its successors, irrespective of (i) the validity and enforceability of this Indenture, the Securities or the obligations of the Company or any other Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Securities or the Trustee hereunder or thereunder or (ii) the absence of any action to enforce the same or any other circumstance which might otherwise constitute a legal or equitable discharge or default of a Subsidiary Guarantor, that: (a) the principal of, premium, if any, interest and defaulted interest with respect to the Securities of such Series shall be duly and punctually paid in full when due, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, and interest on the overdue principal and (to the extent permitted by law) interest or defaulted interest with respect to the Securities of such Series and all other obligations of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor to the Holders of the Securities of such Series or the Trustee hereunder or thereunder and all other obligations under this Indenture with respect to the Securities of such Series shall be promptly paid in full or performed, all in accordance with the terms of this Indenture and thereof and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Securities of such Series or any of such other obligations, the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise. Failing payment when due of any amount so guaranteed, or failing performance of any other obligation of the Company to the Holders of the Securities of such Series, for whatever reason, each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be obligated to pay, or to perform or cause the performance of, the same immediately. An Event of Default under this Indenture or the Securities of such Series shall constitute an event of default under the Subsidiary Guarantee, and shall entitle the Holders of any Securities of such Series or the Trustee to accelerate the obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors of such Securities hereunder in the same manner and to the same extent as the obligations of the Company.
Guarantee.
Each Subsidiary Guarantor, by execution of the Subsidiary Guarantee, waives the benefit of diligence, presentment, demand for payment, filing of claims with a court in the event of insolvency or bankruptcy of the Company, any right to require a proceeding first against the Company, protest, notice and all demands whatsoever and covenant that such Subsidiary Guarantee shall not be discharged except by complete performance of the obligations contained in this Indenture and such Subsidiary Guarantee.
 
The Subsidiary Guarantee is a guarantee of payment and not of collection. If any Holder or the Trustee is required by any court or otherwise to return to the Company or to any Subsidiary Guarantor, or any custodian, trustee, liquidator or other similar official acting in relation to the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor, any amount paid by the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor to the Trustee or such Holder of the Securities, the Subsidiary Guarantee, to the extent theretofore discharged, shall be reinstated in full force and effect. Each Subsidiary Guarantor further agrees that, as between it, on the one hand, and the Holders of the Securities and the Trustee, on the other hand, (a) subject to this Article Ten, the maturity of the obligations guaranteed hereby may be accelerated as provided in Article Six of this Indenture for the purposes of the Subsidiary Guarantee, notwithstanding any stay, injunction or other prohibition preventing such acceleration in respect of the obligations guaranteed hereby and (b) in the event of any acceleration of such obligations as provided in Article Six of this Indenture, such obligations (whether or not due and payable) shall forthwith become due and payable by the Subsidiary Guarantors for the purpose of such Subsidiary Guarantee.
The Subsidiary Guarantee shall remain in full force and effect and continue to be effective should any petition be filed by or against the Company for liquidation or reorganization, should the Company become insolvent or make an assignment for the benefit of creditors or should a receiver or trustee be appointed for all or any significant part of the Company's assets, and shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment and performance of the Securities are pursuant to applicable law, rescinded or reduced in amount, or must otherwise be restored or returned by any obligee on the Securities, whether as a "voidable preference," "fraudulent transfer" or otherwise, all as though such payment or performance had not been made. In the event that any payment, or any part thereof, is rescinded, reduced, restored or returned, the Securities shall, to the fullest extent permitted by law, be reinstated and deemed reduced only by such amount paid and not so rescinded, reduced, restored or returned.
No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, past, present or future, of any Subsidiary Guarantor, as such, shall have any personal liability under this Subsidiary Guarantee by reason of his, her or its status as such partner, manager, member shareholder, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator.
SECTION 10.02. To further evidence the Subsidiary Guarantee set forth in Section 10.01 of this Indenture, each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby agrees that a notation of such Subsidiary Guarantee, substantially in the form included in to this Indenture, shall be endorsed on each Security of a Series guaranteed under this Article Ten authenticated and delivered by the Trustee after this Article Ten with respect to such Subsidiary Guarantor becomes effective in accordance with Section 10.01 of this Indenture and such Subsidiary Guarantee shall be executed by either manual or facsimile signature of an officer of each Subsidiary Guarantor. The validity and enforceability of any Subsidiary Guarantee shall not be affected by the fact that it is not affixed to any particular Security.
Execution and Delivery of Subsidiary Guarantee.
Exhibit A
 
Each of the Subsidiary Guarantors hereby agrees that its Subsidiary Guarantee set forth in Section 10.01 of this Indenture shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding any failure to endorse on each Security a notation of such Subsidiary Guarantee.
If an officer of a Subsidiary Guarantor whose signature is on this Indenture or a Subsidiary Guarantee no longer holds that office at the time the Trustee authenticates the Security on which such Subsidiary Guarantee is endorsed or at any time thereafter, such Subsidiary Guarantor's Subsidiary Guarantee of such Security shall be valid nevertheless.
The delivery of any Security by the Trustee, after the authentication thereof hereunder, shall constitute due delivery of any Subsidiary Guarantee set forth in this Indenture on behalf of the Subsidiary Guarantor.
SECTION 10.03. The obligations of each Subsidiary Guarantor are limited to the maximum amount as shall, after giving effect to all other contingent and fixed liabilities of such Subsidiary Guarantor and after giving effect to any collections from or payments made by or on behalf of any other Subsidiary Guarantor in respect of the obligations of such other Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or pursuant to its contribution obligations under this Indenture, result in the obligations of such Subsidiary Guarantor under the Subsidiary Guarantee not constituting a fraudulent conveyance or fraudulent transfer under federal or state law. Each Subsidiary Guarantor that makes a payment or distribution under a Subsidiary Guarantee shall be entitled to a contribution from each other Subsidiary Guarantor in a pro rata amount based on the net assets of each Subsidiary Guarantor, determined in accordance with GAAP.
Limitation of Subsidiary Guarantee.
SECTION 10.04. Each Subsidiary Guarantor, by execution of its Subsidiary Guarantee, waives to the extent permitted by law any claim or other rights which it may now or hereafter acquire against the Company that arise from the existence, payment, performance or enforcement of such Subsidiary Guarantor's obligations under such Subsidiary Guarantee and this Indenture, including, without limitation, any right of subrogation, reimbursement, exoneration, indemnification, and any right to participate in any claim or remedy of any Holder of the Securities against the Company, whether or not such claim, remedy or right arises in equity, or under contract, statute or common law, including, without limitation, the right to take or receive from the Company, directly or indirectly, in cash or other property or by set-off or in any other manner, payment on account of such claim or other rights. If any amount shall be paid to any Subsidiary Guarantor in violation of the preceding sentence and the Securities shall not have been paid in full, such amount shall have been deemed to have been paid to such Subsidiary Guarantor for the benefit of, and held in trust for the benefit of, the Holders of the Securities, and shall forthwith be paid to the Trustee for the benefit of such Holders to be credited and applied upon the Securities, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of this Indenture. Each Subsidiary Guarantor, by execution of its Subsidiary Guarantee, shall acknowledge that it shall receive direct and indirect benefits from the financing arrangements contemplated by this Indenture and that the waiver set forth in this Section 10.04 is knowingly made in contemplation of such benefits.
Waiver of Subrogation.
 
SECTION 10.05. Any Subsidiary Guarantee executed pursuant to Section 4.09 of this Indenture (including, without limitation, any Subsidiary Guarantee of the Securities issued as of the Issue Date), shall be automatically and unconditionally released upon the release of the guarantee that resulted in Section 4.09 of this Indenture becoming applicable (other than by reason of payment under such guarantee) so long as such Subsidiary of the Company is not at such time guaranteeing any other Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company and no Default or Event of Default is then continuing. In addition, any Subsidiary Guarantee of this Indenture shall be automatically and unconditionally released upon: (i) upon the sale or other disposition (including by way of consolidation or merger), in one transaction or a series of related transactions, of a majority of the total voting power of the capital stock or other interests of such Subsidiary Guarantor (other than to the Company or any affiliate of the Company); or (ii) upon the sale or disposition of all or substantially all the property of such Subsidiary Guarantor (other than to any affiliate of the Company other than another Subsidiary Guarantor); , that, in each case, after giving effect to such transaction, such Subsidiary Guarantor is no longer liable for any guarantee or other obligations in respect of any Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any of its Subsidiaries. Any Subsidiary Guarantee also will be released if the Company exercises its legal defeasance or its covenant defeasance option as set forth in Article Eight, or if the Company's obligations under this Indenture are discharged as set forth in Section 8.08. The Company will give prompt written notice to the Trustee of the automatic release of any Subsidiary Guarantee pursuant to this Section 10.05. At the Company's request, the Trustee will execute and deliver any documents, instructions or instruments evidencing any such release.
Release of Subsidiary Guarantee.
provided, however
SECTION 11.01. If any provision of this Indenture limits, qualifies or conflicts with another provision which is required to be included in this Indenture by the TIA, the required provision shall control. Each Subsidiary Guarantor in addition to performing its obligations under its Subsidiary Guarantee shall perform such other obligations as may be imposed on it with respect to this Indenture under the TIA.
Trust Indenture Act Controls.
SECTION 11.02. Any notice or communication shall be in writing (including facsimile and PDF transmission) and delivered in person or mailed by first-class mail addressed as follows:
Notices.
If to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road NW
Roanoke, Virginia 24012
Facsimile: (540) 561-1448
Attention: Chief Financial Officer
 
If to the Trustee:
Wells Fargo Bank, National Association
45 Wall St., 14
th
Floor
New York, New York 10006
Facsimile: (212) 515-1589
Attention: Corporate Trust Services
The Company, any Subsidiary Guarantor, or the Trustee by notice to the other may designate additional or different addresses for subsequent notices or communications.
Any notice or communication mailed to a Holder shall be mailed to the Holder at the Holder's address as it appears on the registration books of the Registrar and shall be sufficiently given if so mailed within the time prescribed.
Failure to mail a notice or communication to a Holder or any defect in it shall not affect its sufficiency with respect to other Holders. If a notice or communication is mailed in the manner provided above, it is duly given, whether or not the addressee receives it.
SECTION 11.03. Holders may communicate pursuant to TIA  312(b) with other Holders with respect to their rights under this Indenture or the Securities. The Company, the Trustee, the Registrar and anyone else shall have the protection of TIA  312(c).
Communication by Holders with Other Holders.
SECTION 11.04. Upon any request or application by the Company to the Trustee to take or refrain from taking any action under this Indenture, the Company shall furnish to the Trustee:
Certificate and Opinion as to Conditions Precedent.
(1) an Officers' Certificate in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of the signers, all conditions precedent, if any, provided for in this Indenture relating to the proposed action have been complied with; and
(2) an Opinion of Counsel in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Trustee stating that, in the opinion of such counsel, all such conditions precedent have been complied with.
SECTION 11.05. Each certificate or opinion with respect to compliance with a covenant or condition provided for in this Indenture shall include:
Statements Required in Certificate or Opinion.
(1) a statement that the individual making such certificate or opinion has read such covenant or condition;
 
(2) a brief statement as to the nature and scope of the examination or investigation upon which the statements or opinions contained in such certificate or opinion are based;
(3) a statement that, in the opinion of such individual, he has made such examination or investigation as is necessary to enable him to express an informed opinion as to whether or not such covenant or condition has been complied with; and
(4) a statement as to whether or not, in the opinion of such individual, such covenant or condition has been complied with.
SECTION 11.06. (a) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action provided by this Indenture to be given or taken by Holders may be embodied in and evidenced by one or more instruments of substantially similar tenor signed by such Holders in person or by an agent duly appointed in writing; and, except as herein otherwise expressly provided, such action shall become effective when such instrument or instruments are delivered to the Trustee and, where it is hereby expressly required, to the Company. Such instrument or instruments (and the action embodied therein and evidenced thereby) are herein sometimes referred to as the "Act" of Holders signing such instrument or instruments. Proof of execution of any such instrument or of a writing appointing any such agent shall be sufficient for any purpose of this Indenture and conclusive in favor of the Trustee and the Company, if made in the manner provided in this Section.
Acts of Holders.
(b) The fact and date of the execution by any Person of any such instrument or writing may be proved by the affidavit of a witness of such execution or by a certificate of a notary public or other officer authorized by law to take acknowledgments of deeds, certifying that the individual signing such instrument or writing acknowledged to such officer the execution thereof. Where such execution is by a signer acting in a capacity other than such signer's individual capacity, such certificate or affidavit shall also constitute sufficient proof of such signer's authority. The fact and date of the execution of any such instrument or writing, or the authority of the Person executing the same, may also be proved in any other manner which the Trustee deems sufficient.
(c) The ownership of bearer securities may be proved by the production of such bearer securities or by a certificate executed by any trust company, bank, banker or other depositary, wherever situated, if such certificate shall be deemed by the Trustee to be satisfactory, showing that at the date therein mentioned such Person had on deposit with such depositary, or exhibited to it, the bearer securities therein described; or such facts may be proved by the certificate or affidavit of the Person holding such bearer securities, if such certificate or affidavit is deemed by the Trustee to be satisfactory. The Trustee and the Company may assume that such ownership of any bearer security continues until (i) another such certificate or affidavit bearing a later date issued in respect of the same bearer security is produced, (ii) such bearer security is produced to the Trustee by some other Person, (iii) such bearer security is surrendered in exchange for a registered security or (iv) such bearer security is no longer outstanding. The ownership of bearer securities may also be proved in any other manner which the Trustee deems sufficient.
 
(d) The ownership of registered securities shall be proved by the register maintained by the Registrar.
(e) Any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act of the Holder of any Security shall bind every future Holder of the same Security and the holder of every Security issued upon the registration of transfer thereof or in exchange therefor or in lieu thereof in respect of anything done, omitted or suffered to be done by the Trustee or the Company in reliance thereon, whether or not notation of such action is made upon such Security.
(f) If the Company shall solicit from the Holders any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, the Company may, at its option, by or pursuant to a Board Resolution, fix in advance a record date for the determination of Holders entitled to give such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, but the Company shall have no obligation to do so. If such a record date is fixed, such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act may be given before or after such record date, but only the Holders of record at the close of business on such record date shall be deemed to be Holders for the purposes of determining whether Holders of the requisite proportion of outstanding Securities have authorized or agreed or consented to such request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other Act, and for that purpose the outstanding Securities shall be computed as of such record date; that no such authorization, agreement or consent by the Holders on such record date shall be deemed effective unless it shall become effective pursuant to the provisions of this Indenture not later than six months after the record date.
provided
(g) The Depositary, as a Holder, may appoint agents and otherwise authorize Participants to give or take any request, demand, authorization, direction, notice, consent, waiver or other action which a Holder is entitled to give or take under this Indenture.
SECTION 11.07. The Trustee may make reasonable rules for action by or a meeting of Holders. The Registrar and the Paying Agent may make reasonable rules for their functions.
Rules by Trustee, Paying Agent and Registrar.
SECTION 11.08. A "" is a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which banking institutions in New York State are authorized or required by law to close. If a payment date is a Legal Holiday, payment shall be made on the next succeeding day that is not a Legal Holiday, and no interest shall accrue for the intervening period. If a record date is a Legal Holiday, the record date shall not be affected.
Legal Holidays.
Legal Holiday
SECTION 11.09.
Governing Law; Waiver of Jury Trial; Consent to Jurisdiction and Service.
THIS INDENTURE, THE SECURITIES AND THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTEES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS
 
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any federal or State court located in the Borough of Manhattan in The City of New York, New York in any suit, action or proceeding based on or arising out of or relating to this Indenture or any Securities and irrevocably agree that all claims in respect of such suit or proceeding may be determined in any such court. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably waive, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which they may have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in an inconvenient forum. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor agree that final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding brought in such a court shall be conclusive and binding upon them, and may be enforced in any courts to the jurisdiction of which the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor are subject by a suit upon such judgment, provided, that service of process is effected upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in the manner specified herein or as otherwise permitted by law. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoint National Registered Agents, Inc. (in all jurisdictions except Virginia where the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoint Sarah Powell) (the "Process Agent") as their authorized agent for purposes of this section, it being understood that the designation and appointment of the Process Agent as such authorized agent shall become effective immediately without any further action on the part of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree that service of process upon the Process Agent and written notice of said service to the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, mailed by prepaid registered first class mail or delivered to the Process Agent at its principal office, shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, in any such suit or proceeding. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree to take any and all action, including the execution and filing of any and all such documents and instruments as may be necessary, to continue such designation and appointment of the Process Agent in full force and effect so long as the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, have any outstanding obligations under this Indenture. To the extent the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor has or hereafter may acquire any immunity from jurisdiction of any court or from any legal process (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution, executor or otherwise) with respect to itself or its property, the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably waives such immunity in respect of its obligations under this Indenture to the extent permitted by law.
OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY. EACH OF THE COMPANY, EACH SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES OR THE TRANSACTION CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
SECTION 11.10. No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, as such, of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor, shall have any liability for any obligations of the
No Recourse Against Others.
 
Company under the Securities or this Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Security, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. This waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issuance of the Securities.
SECTION 11.11. All agreements of the Company in this Indenture and the Securities shall bind its successors. All agreements of the Trustee in this Indenture shall bind its successors.
Successors.
SECTION 11.12. The parties may sign any number of copies of this Indenture. Each signed copy shall be an original, but all of them together represent the same agreement. One signed copy of the Indenture is enough to prove this Indenture. The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Multiple Originals.
SECTION 11.13. The table of contents, cross-reference sheet and headings of the Articles and Sections of this Indenture have been inserted for convenience of reference only, are not intended to be considered a part hereof and shall not modify or restrict any of the terms or provisions hereof.
Table of Contents; Headings.
SECTION 11.14. If any provision in this Indenture is deemed unenforceable, it shall not affect the validity or enforceability of any other provision set forth herein, or of the Indenture as a whole.
Severability.
SECTION 11.15. In no event shall the Trustee be responsible or liable for any failure or delay in the performance of its obligations hereunder arising out of or caused by, directly or indirectly, forces beyond its control, including, without limitation, strikes, work stoppages, accidents, acts of war or terrorism, civil or military disturbances, nuclear or natural catastrophes or acts of God, and interruptions, loss or malfunctions of utilities, communications or computer (software and hardware) services; it being understood that the Trustee shall use reasonable efforts which are consistent with accepted practices in the banking industry to resume performance as soon as practicable under the circumstances.
Force Majeure.
SECTION 11.16. The parties hereto acknowledge that in accordance with Section 326 of the U.S.A. Patriot Act, the Trustee, like all financial institutions and in order to help fight the funding of terrorism and money laundering, is required to obtain, verify, and record information that identifies each person or legal entity that establishes a relationship or opens an account with the Trustee. The parties to this Indenture agree that they will provide the Trustee with such information as it may request in order for the Trustee to satisfy the requirements of the U.S.A. Patriot Act.
U.S.A. Patriot Act.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Indenture to be duly executed as of the date first written above.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
Each of the undersigned (the "Subsidiary Guarantors") hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, to the extent set forth in the Indenture (the "Indenture") dated as of April 29, 2010, by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., as issuer, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on the Securities, when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal of, and premium and, to the extent permitted by law, interest, and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders of the Securities or the Trustee, all in accordance with the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Securities or any of such other obligations, that the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise.
The obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Securities and to the Trustee pursuant to this Subsidiary Guarantee and the Indenture are expressly set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for the precise terms and limitations of this Subsidiary Guarantee. As provided in Section 10.1 of the Indenture, this Subsidiary Guarantee shall cover only Securities of a Series that is specified to be guaranteed pursuant to the applicable Board Resolution, supplemental indenture or Officers' Certificate establishing such Series.
This Subsidiary Guarantee has been executed and issued pursuant to the requirements of Section 4.09 of the Indenture. The Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to automatic and unconditional release as set forth in Section 10.05 of the Indenture.
 

Exhibit 4.2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of April 29, 2010 (this ""), to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the ""), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (the "").
First Supplemental Indenture
Original Indenture
Company
Trustee
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered the Original Indenture to provide for the issuance from time to time of Securities (as defined in the Original Indenture) of the Company, to be issued in one or more Series;
WHEREAS, Sections 2.02 and 9.01 of the Original Indenture provide, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of establishing the designation, form, terms and conditions of Securities of any Series as permitted by Sections 2.01 and 9.01 of the Original Indenture;
WHEREAS, the Company (i) desires the issuance of a Series of Securities to be designated as hereinafter provided and (ii) has requested the Trustee to enter into this First Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of establishing the designation, form, terms and conditions of the Securities of such Series;
WHEREAS, the Company has duly authorized the creation of an issue of its 5.750% Notes Due 2020 (as defined in Section 2.01, the ""); and
Notes
WHEREAS, all action on the part of the Company necessary to authorize the issuance of the Notes under the Original Indenture and this First Supplemental Indenture (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by this First Supplemental Indenture, being hereinafter called the "") has been duly taken.
Indenture
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That, in order to establish the designation, form, terms and conditions of, and to authorize the authentication and delivery of, the Notes, and in consideration of the acceptance of the Notes by the Holders thereof and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01.
Definitions.
A. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Original Indenture.
 
B. The rules of interpretation set forth in the Original Indenture shall be applied hereto as if set forth in full herein.
C. For all purposes of this First Supplemental Indenture, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings (such meanings shall apply equally to both the singular and plural forms of the respective terms):
"" means the occurrence of any one of the following:
Change of Control
(1) the direct or indirect sale, lease, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole to any Person (including any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act)) other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries;
(2) the consummation of any transaction (including without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any Person (including any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act)) becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed, measured by voting power rather than number of shares;
(3) the Company consolidates with, or merges with or into, any Person, or any Person consolidates with, or merges with or into, the Company, in any such event pursuant to a transaction in which any of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company (or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed) or such other Person is converted into or exchanged for cash, securities or other property, other than any such transaction where the shares of the Voting Stock of the Company (or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed) outstanding immediately prior to such transaction constitute, or are converted into or exchanged for, a majority of the Voting Stock of the surviving Person immediately after giving effect to such transaction;
(4) the first day on which the majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company cease to be Continuing Directors; or
(5) the adoption of a plan relating to the liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
"" means
Change of Control Triggering Event
(1) if the Notes are not rated Investment Grade by each of the Rating Agencies on the first day of the Trigger Period, the Notes are downgraded by at least one rating category (, from BB+ to BB or Ba1 to Ba2) from the applicable rating of the Notes on the first day of the Trigger Period by each of the Rating Agencies on any date during the Trigger Period, or
e.g.
 
(2) if the Notes are rated Investment Grade by each of the Rating Agencies on the first day of the Trigger Period, the Notes cease to be rated Investment Grade by each of the Rating Agencies on any date during the Trigger Period.
If a Rating Agency is not providing a rating for the Notes at the commencement of any Trigger Period, the Notes will be deemed to have been downgraded by at least one rating category or have ceased to be rated Investment Grade, as applicable, by such Rating Agency during that Trigger Period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Change of Control Triggering Event will be deemed to have occurred in connection with any particular Change of Control unless and until such Change of Control has actually occurred.
"" means the U.S. Treasury security selected by the Company as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of such Notes.
Comparable Treasury Issue
"" means, with respect to any redemption date, (1) the average of five Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for such redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, or (2) if the Company obtains fewer than five such Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all such quotations.
Comparable Treasury Price
"" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors who:
Continuing Director
(1) was a member of such Board of Directors on the date of the indenture; or
(2) was nominated for election or elected to such Board of Directors with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
"" means a Note in definitive registered form without coupons.
Definitive Note
"" means Notes in the form of a Global Security as delivered to the Depositary.
Global Notes
"" means a rating of Baa3 or better by Moody's (or its equivalent under any successor rating category of Moody's, and a rating of BBB- or better by S&P (or its equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P).
Investment Grade
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., a subsidiary of Moody's Corporation, and its successors.
Moody's
 
"" means, with respect to the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, a Person who has an account with the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, respectively (and, with respect to DTC, shall include Euroclear or Clearstream) as indirect participants.
Participant
"" means each of Moody's and S&P; provided, that if either Moody's or S&P ceases to provide rating services to issuers or investors, the Company may appoint a replacement for such Rating Agency.
Rating Agency
"" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Company, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the third Business Day preceding such redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
"" means Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. and their respective successors, and any other primary Treasury dealer the Company may select. If any of the foregoing ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a "Primary Treasury Dealer"), the Company must substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealers
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and its successors.
S&P
"" means, with respect to any redemption date: (a) the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15 (519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded U.S. Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption Treasury Constant Maturities", for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue (if no maturity is within three months before or after the remaining life (as defined below), yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate will be interpolated or extrapolated from such yields on a straight-line basis, rounding to the nearest month), or (b) if such release (or any successor release) is not published during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per annum equal to the semiannual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for such redemption date. The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third business day preceding the date fixed for redemption.
Treasury Rate
"" means the period commencing 60 days prior to the first public announcement by the Company of any Change of Control (or pending Change of Control) and ending 60 days following consummation of such Change of Control (which Trigger Period will be extended following consummation of a Change of Control for so long as either of the Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering a possible ratings change).
Trigger Period
 
"" of any specified Person as of any date means the capital stock of such Person that is at the time entitled to vote generally in the election of the board of directors of such Person.
Voting Stock
Other Definitions:
 
SECTION 2.01. There is hereby created one Series of Securities and designated: 5.750% Notes Due 2020 (the ""). The Notes will initially be guaranteed by the Subsidiary Guarantors on the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Original Indenture.
Title and Aggregate Principal Amount.
Notes
SECTION 2.02. The Notes may forthwith be executed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee for authentication and delivery by the Trustee in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.04 of the Original Indenture. The Subsidiary Guarantee of each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be evidenced by its notation attached to the Notes.
Execution.
SECTION 2.03. The Notes shall have and be subject to such other terms as provided in the Original Indenture and this First Supplemental Indenture and shall be evidenced by one or more Global Notes in the form of hereto. The Notes shall only be issued in denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
Other Terms and Form of the Notes; Denominations.
Exhibit A
SECTION 2.04. The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Original Indenture and this First Supplemental Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
Further Issues.
SECTION 2.05. The Notes will mature on May 1, 2020 and will bear interest at the rate of 5.750% per annum. The Company will pay interest on the Notes on each May 1 and November 1 (each an ""), beginning on November 1, 2010, to the holders of record on the immediately preceding April 15 or October 15 (each a ""), respectively. Interest on the Notes shall accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from the date of issuance. Payments of the principal of and interest on the Notes shall be made in Dollars, and the Notes shall be denominated in Dollars.
Interest and Principal.
Interest Payment Date
Record Date
 
SECTION 2.06. The place of payment where the Notes issued in the form of Definitive Notes may be presented or surrendered for payment, where the principal of and interest and any other payments due on the Notes issued in the form of Definitive Notes are payable, where the Notes may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to and upon the Company in respect of the Notes and the Indenture may be served shall be in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, and the office or agency maintained by the Company for such purpose shall initially be the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee. The Company shall pay principal and interest (i) on any Definitive Note by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as it appears in the Note register (or upon written notice from such Person, given at least 15 days before the payment date, by wire transfer in immediately available funds if such Person is entitled to Interest on an aggregate principal amount of Notes in excess of $2.0 million) or (ii) on any Global Note by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Depositary or its nominee.
Place and Manner of Payment.
SECTION 2.07. Notes shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Notes in definitive, fully registered form without interest coupons with such applicable legends as are provided for in Section 3.01, except as otherwise permitted herein. Such Global Notes shall be registered in the name of the Depositary or its nominee and deposited with the Trustee, at its Corporate Trust Office, as custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company, notated by the Subsidiary Guarantors and authenticated by the Trustee as provided in the Original Indenture. The Global Notes shall constitute Global Securities for purposes of the Original Indenture, and the Company only shall issue Definitive Notes under the circumstances set forth in Section 2.15 of the Original Indenture.
Form of Notes.
SECTION 2.08. . The Company initially appoints The Depository Trust Company ("") to act as Depositary with respect to the Global Notes. The Company initially appoints the Trustee to act as the Registrar and the Paying Agent and designates the Trustee's New York office as the office or agency referred to in Section 2.05 of the Original Indenture.
Depositary; Registrar
DTC
SECTION 2.09. . The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time, at the option of the Company, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
Optional Redemption
(a) 100% of the principal amount of the Note being redeemed, or
(b) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on such Note (not including any portion of such payments of interest accrued to the date of redemption), discounted to the date of redemption on a semiannual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate (as defined below) plus 30 basis points.
In the case of any such redemption, the Company will also pay accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date.
 
SECTION 2.10. . The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
Sinking Fund
SECTION 2.11. .
Change of Control
(a) Upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will make an offer (a "Change of Control Offer") to each Holder to repurchase all or any part (in integral multiples of $1,000) of each Holder's Notes at a purchase price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest on the Notes repurchased, if any, to the date of purchase, subject to the rights of holders of Notes on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant interest payment date (the "Change of Control Payment"). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company shall mail a notice to holders of the Notes describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event, stating:
(i) that the Change of Control Offer is being made pursuant to this Section 2.11 and that all Notes tendered will be accepted for payment;
(ii) the purchase price and the purchase date, which shall be no earlier than 30 days and no later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed (the "");
Change of Control Payment Date
(iii) that any Note not tendered will continue to accrue interest;
(iv) that, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the Change of Control Payment, all Notes accepted for payment pursuant to the Change of Control Offer will cease to accrue interest after the Change of Control Payment Date;
(v) that Holders electing to have any Notes purchased pursuant to a Change of Control Offer will be required to surrender the Notes, with the form entitled "" on the reverse of the Note completed, to the Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice prior to the close of business on the third Business Day preceding the Change of Control Payment Date;
Option of Holder to Elect Purchase
(vi) that Holders will be entitled to withdraw their election if the Paying Agent receives, no later than the close of business on the second Business Day preceding the Change of Control Payment Date, a facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of the Holder, the principal amount of the Notes delivered for purchase, and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have the Notes purchased; and
(vii) that Holders whose Notes are being purchased only in part will be issued new Notes equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered, which unpurchased portion must be equal to $2,000 in principal amount or an integral multiple thereof.
(b) The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a
 
Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the provisions of this Section 2.11, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under this Section 2.11 by virtue of such compliance.
(c) On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful,
(i) accept for payment all Notes or portions thereof properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
(ii) deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Notes or portions of Notes properly tendered; and
(iii) deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Notes properly accepted together with an Officer's Certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Note or portions of Notes being purchased by the Company.
(d) The Paying Agent will promptly mail to each Holder of Notes properly tendered the Change of Control Payment for such Notes, and the Trustee will promptly authenticate and mail (or cause to be transferred by book entry) to each Holder a new Note equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered, if any;that each new Note will be in a principal amount of $2,000 and or any integral multiple of $1,000. The Company will publicly announce the results of the Change of Control Offer on or as soon as practicable after the Change of Control Payment Date. Except as described above with respect to a Change of Control, this Indenture does not contain provisions that permit Holders of the Notes to require the Company to repurchase or redeem the Notes in the event of a takeover, recapitalization or similar transaction.
provided
(e) Notwithstanding anything to this contrary in this Section 2.11, the Company shall not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon a Change of Control Triggering Event if (1) a third party makes the Change of Control Offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Section 2.11 and purchases all Notes validly tendered and not withdrawn under the Change of Control Offer; or (2) notice of redemption has been given pursuant to Section 2.9 hereof, unless and until there is a default in the payment of the applicable redemption price.
(f) The Company shall not repurchase any Note if there has occurred and is continuing on the Change of Control Payment Date an event of default under the Indenture, other than a default in the payment of the Change of Control Payment upon a Change of Control Triggering Event.
 
SECTION 3.01. Article Eight of the Original Indenture shall be applicable to the Notes. For purposes of Article Eight of the Original Indenture, solely for purposes of the Notes, if the Company exercises its right of covenant defeasance pursuant to Sections 8.01 and 8.03 of the Original Indenture, in addition to being released from its obligations under the provisions of the Original Indenture set forth in Section 8.03, the Company also shall be released from its obligations under Section 2.11 of this First Supplemental Indenture.
Defeasance and Covenant Defeasance.
SECTION 4.01. Except as expressly amended hereby, the Original Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect. This First Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Original Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
Ratification of Original Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Original Indenture.
SECTION 4.02. The recitals contained herein and in the Notes, except with respect to the Trustee's certificates of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the same. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this First Supplemental Indenture or of the Notes.
Concerning the Trustee.
SECTION 4.03. This First Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument. The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Counterparts.
SECTION 4.04.
THIS FIRST SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE AND THE NOTES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY. EACH OF THE COMPANY, EACH SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING
GOVERNING LAW; WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; CONSENT TO JURISDICTION AND SERVICES.
 
To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any federal or State court located in the Borough of Manhattan in The City of New York, New York in any suit, action or proceeding based on or arising out of or relating to this Indenture or any Securities and irrevocably agree that all claims in respect of such suit or proceeding may be determined in any such court. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably waive, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which they may have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in an inconvenient forum. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor agree that final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding brought in such a court shall be conclusive and binding upon them, and may be enforced in any courts to the jurisdiction of which the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor are subject by a suit upon such judgment, provided, that service of process is effected upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in the manner specified herein or as otherwise permitted by law. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoint National Registered Agents, Inc. (in all jurisdications except Virginia where the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoints Sarah Powell) (the "Process Agent") as their authorized agent for purposes of this section, it being understood that the designation and appointment of the Process Agent as such authorized agent shall become effective immediately without any further action on the part of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree that service of process upon the Process Agent and written notice of said service to the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, mailed by prepaid registered first class mail or delivered to the Process Agent at its principal office, shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, in any such suit or proceeding. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree to take any and all action, including the execution and filing of any and all such documents and instruments as may be necessary, to continue such designation and appointment of the Process Agent in full force and effect so long as the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, have any outstanding obligations under this Indenture. To the extent the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor has or hereafter may acquire any immunity from jurisdiction of any court or from any legal process (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution, executor or otherwise) with respect to itself or its property, the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably waives such immunity in respect of its obligations under this Indenture to the extent permitted by law.
OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES OR THE TRANSACTION CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this First Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized as of the date first above written.
 
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION, TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL BECAUSE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
THIS SECURITY IS HELD BY THE DEPOSITARY (AS DEFINED IN THE INDENTURE GOVERNING THIS SECURITY) OR ITS NOMINEE IN CUSTODY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE BENEFICIAL OWNERS HEREOF, AND IS NOT TRANSFERABLE TO ANY PERSON UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES EXCEPT THAT (A) THE TRUSTEE MAY MAKE SUCH NOTATIONS HEREON AS MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.04 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (B) THIS SECURITY MAY BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (C) THIS SECURITY MAY BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE FOR CANCELLATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.13 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE AND (D) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, THIS SECURITY MAY BE TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART, ONLY (X) BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY, (Y) BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR (Z) BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR TO A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY.
 
promises to pay to CEDE & CO. or registered assigns, the principal sum: $300,000,000 (THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND NO CENTS), as such amount may be increased or decreased as set forth in the Schedule of Increase or Decrease in Principal Amount of Global Note attached hereto on May 1, 2020.
Interest Payment Dates: May 1 and November 1, commencing on November 1, 2010.
Record Dates: April 15 and October 15.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
 
 
Each of the undersigned (the "Subsidiary Guarantors") hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, to the extent set forth in the Indenture (the "Indenture") dated as of April 29, 2010, by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., as issuer, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes (as defined in the Indenture), when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal of, and premium and, to the extent permitted by law, interest, and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders of the Notes or the Trustee, all in accordance with the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Notes or any of such other obligations, that the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise.
The obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Notes and to the Trustee pursuant to this Subsidiary Guarantee and the Indenture are expressly set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for the precise terms and limitations of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
This Subsidiary Guarantee has been executed and issued to the requirements of Section 4.09 of the Indenture. This Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to automatic and unconditional release as set forth in Section 10.05 of the Indenture.
In WITNESS THEREOF, each Subsidiary Guarantor has caused this Subsidiary Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officer.
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of Securities of the Company, designated as its 5.750% Notes due 2020 (herein called the "Notes," which expression includes any additional notes issued pursuant to Section 2.04 of the First Supplemental Indenture (as hereinafter defined) and forming a single series therewith), issued and to be issued under an indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (herein called the "Original Indenture"), as supplemented by a first supplemental indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "First Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Original Indenture, the "Indenture"), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (such company, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the "Company"), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature pages hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as trustee (the "Trustee"), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto relevant to the Notes reference is hereby made for a complete description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company and the Holders of the Notes. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Note shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Indenture.
The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company and its Subsidiaries to create or incur Liens or engage in Sale and Leaseback Transactions. The Indenture also imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company to merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other person (other than a merger of a wholly owned Subsidiary into the Company) or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property of the Company in any one transaction or series of related transactions.
Each Note is subject to, and qualified by, all such terms as set forth in the Indenture certain of which are summarized herein and each Holder of a Note is referred to the corresponding provisions of the Indenture for a complete statement of such terms. To the extent that there is any inconsistency between the summary provisions set forth in the Notes and the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern.
 
The Company promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Note at the rate per annum shown above. The Company will pay interest semiannually on May 1 and November 1 of each year, commencing November 1, 2010. Interest on the Notes will accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from April 29, 2010. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months.
Initially, the Trustee will act as Paying Agent, registrar and service agent. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, registrar or co-registrar and service agent without notice. The Company or any of its Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, registrar, co-registrar or service agent.
 
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Notes, subject to certain limitations, may declare all the Notes due and payable immediately. In the case of an Event of Default resulting from certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization, the principal (or such specified amount) and premium, if any, of all outstanding Notes will become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act by the Trustee or any Holder of outstanding Notes.
Holders of Notes may not enforce the Indenture or the Notes except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Notes unless it receives reasonable indemnification. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power under the Indenture.
At any time after the principal of the Notes shall have been so declared due and payable (or have become immediately due and payable), and before any judgment or decree for the payment of the moneys due shall have been obtained or entered, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding under the Indenture, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences if (i) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay all matured installments of interest upon all the Notes and the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any and all Notes that shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest upon such principal and premium, if any, and, to the extent that such payment is enforceable under applicable law, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate per annum expressed in the Notes to the date of such payment or deposit) and the amount payable to the Trustee under Section 7.07 of the Original Indenture and (ii) any and all existing Events of Default under the Indenture with respect to the Notes, other than the nonpayment of principal on Notes that shall not have become due by their terms, shall have been remedied or waived as provided in Section 6.04 of the Original Indenture. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereto.
The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default and its consequences except a Default in the payment of the principal amount of premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Note. When a Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any consequent right.
In addition to any supplemental indenture otherwise authorized by the Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may from time to time and at any time enter into supplemental indentures (which shall conform to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect), without the consent of any Holder of Notes, for one or more of the following purposes: (i) to evidence the succession of another person to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's covenants, agreements and obligations; (ii) to surrender any right or power conferred upon the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor by the Indenture, to add to the covenants of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor such further covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions for the protection of the Holders of all or any Notes as the Board of Directors of the Company shall consider to be for the protection of the Holders of such Notes, and to make the occurrence, or the occurrence and continuance, of a default in respect of any such additional covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions a Default or an Event of Default under the Indenture; , that with respect to any such additional covenant, restriction, condition or provision, such amendment may provide for a period of grace after default, which may be shorter or longer than that allowed in the case of other Defaults, may provide for an immediate enforcement upon such Default, may limit the remedies available to the Trustee upon such Default or may limit the right of Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes to waive such default; (iii) to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Indenture, in any supplemental indenture or in any Notes that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision contained therein; (iv) to convey, transfer, assign, mortgage or pledge any property to or with the Trustee, or to make such other provisions in regard to matters or questions arising under the Indenture as shall not adversely affect the interests of any Holders of Notes; (v) to modify or amend the Indenture in such a manner as to permit the qualification of the Indenture or any supplemental indenture thereto under the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect; (vi) to add or to change any of the provisions of the Indenture to provide that Notes in bearer form may be registrable as to principal, to change or eliminate any restrictions on the payment of principal or premium with respect to Notes in registered form or of principal, premium or interest with respect to Notes in bearer form, or to permit Notes in registered form to be exchanged for Notes in bearer form, so as to not adversely affect the interests of the Holders or any coupons in any material respect or permit or facilitate the issuance of Notes in uncertificated form; (vii) to secure the Notes; (viii) to release Subsidiary Guarantors as provided in Article Ten of the Indenture; (ix) to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect; (x) to add to, change, or eliminate any of the provisions of the Indenture with respect to the Notes, so long as any such addition, change or elimination not otherwise permitted under the Indenture shall (A) neither apply to any Note created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture and entitled to the benefit of such provision nor modify the rights of the Holders of any such Note with respect to the benefit of such provision or (B) become effective only when there is no such Note outstanding; and (xi) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment by a successor or separate Trustee with respect to the Notes and to add to or change any of the provisions of the Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the Indenture by more than one Trustee.
provided
however,
With the written consent (as evidenced as provided in Section 9.02 of the Original Indenture) of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding affected by such amendment (including consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for the Notes), the Company the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, may amend the Indenture without notice to any Holder; that no such amendment shall, without the consent of the Holders of each Note then outstanding and affected thereby, (i) reduce the principal amount of Notes whose Holders must consent to an amendment, modification, supplement or waiver; (ii) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Note; (iii) reduce the principal of or change the Stated Maturity of any Note; (iv) reduce the amount payable upon the redemption of any Note or add redemption provisions to any Note; (v) make any Note payable in money other than that stated in the Note or, other than in accordance with the provisions of Article Ten of the Indenture, eliminate any existing Subsidiary Guarantor; or (vi) make any change in the Sections of the Indenture relating to waivers of past defaults and the rights of Holders to receive payments, or in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions. It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof.
provided
Any consent to an amendment or a waiver by the Holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders and owners of this Note and any Notes that may be issued in exchange or substitution hereof, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Notes. Any Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke its consent if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment or waiver becomes effective. Neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company shall, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration, whether by way of interest, fee or otherwise, to any Holder for or as an inducement to any consent, waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of the Indenture or the Notes unless such consideration is offered to be paid to all Holders, ratably, that so consent, waive or agree to amend.
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
 
Upon a Change of Control Triggering Event, any Holder of Notes shall have the right to cause the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such Holder at a repurchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Notes to be repurchased plus accrued interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the related interest payment date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
The Notes shall not be redeemable at the option of any Holder thereof, upon the occurrence of any particular circumstances or otherwise. The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
 
The Notes are issuable in registered form without coupons in minimum denominations of $2,000 principal amount and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. When Notes are presented to the Registrar or a co-registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Notes, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without payment of any service charge but with payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration or exchange of Notes.
The Company and the Registrar shall not be required (a) to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Notes during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before the day of the mailing of a notice of redemption of Notes selected for redemption and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (b) to register the transfer or exchange of Notes selected, called or being called for redemption as a whole or the portion being redeemed of any such Notes selected, called or being called for redemption in part.
 
The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
 
The Notes may be redeemed at the Company's option, upon notice as set forth in the Indenture, in whole at any time or in part from time to time, on the terms set forth in the Indenture.
 
The ownership of Notes shall be proved by the register maintained by the Registrar.
 
No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, as such, of any Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Notes or the Indenture or a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by
reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Note, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. This waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issuance of the Notes.
 
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Notes and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money and/or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
 
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Note and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, and premium, if any, or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on its request or, if then held by the Company, shall be discharged from such trust. Thereafter the Holder of such Note shall look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, shall at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal (national edition), notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification or publication, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
provided
however,
 
Subject to certain limitations imposed by the Trust Indenture Act, the Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-Paying Agent may do the same with like rights.
 
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian), and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
 
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes and has directed the Trustee to use CUSIP numbers in notices of redemption as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice of redemption and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
For value received                      hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto                      (please insert social security or other identifying number of assignee) the within Note, and hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints                      attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
 
Signature(s) must be guaranteed by an eligible Guarantor Institution (banks, stock brokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions) with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program pursuant to Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 17Ad-15.
 
The initial principal amount of this Global Note is $300,000,000. The following increases or decreases in this Global Note have been made:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.3
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION, TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL BECAUSE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
THIS SECURITY IS HELD BY THE DEPOSITARY (AS DEFINED IN THE INDENTURE GOVERNING THIS SECURITY) OR ITS NOMINEE IN CUSTODY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE BENEFICIAL OWNERS HEREOF, AND IS NOT TRANSFERABLE TO ANY PERSON UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES EXCEPT THAT (A) THE TRUSTEE MAY MAKE SUCH NOTATIONS HEREON AS MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.04 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (B) THIS SECURITY MAY BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (C) THIS SECURITY MAY BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE FOR CANCELLATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.13 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE AND (D) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, THIS SECURITY MAY BE TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART, ONLY (X) BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY, (Y) BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR (Z) BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR TO A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY.
 
promises to pay to CEDE & CO. or registered assigns, the principal sum: $300,000,000 (THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND NO CENTS), as such amount may be increased or decreased as set forth in the Schedule of Increase or Decrease in Principal Amount of Global Note attached hereto on May 1, 2020.
Interest Payment Dates: May 1 and November 1, commencing on November 1, 2010.
Record Dates: April 15 and October 15.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF
AUTHENTICATION
 
Each of the undersigned (the "Subsidiary Guarantors") hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, to the extent set forth in the Indenture (the "Indenture") dated as of April 29, 2010, by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., as issuer, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes (as defined in the Indenture), when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal of, and premium and, to the extent permitted by law, interest, and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders of the Notes or the Trustee, all in accordance with the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Notes or any of such other obligations, that the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise.
The obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Notes and to the Trustee pursuant to this Subsidiary Guarantee and the Indenture are expressly set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for the precise terms and limitations of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
This Subsidiary Guarantee has been executed and issued to the requirements of Section 4.09 of the Indenture. This Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to automatic and unconditional release as set forth in Section 10.05 of the Indenture.
In WITNESS THEREOF, each Subsidiary Guarantor has caused this Subsidiary Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officer.
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of Securities of the Company, designated as its 5.750% Notes due 2020 (herein called the "Notes," which expression includes any additional notes issued pursuant to Section 2.04 of the First Supplemental Indenture (as hereinafter defined) and forming a single series therewith), issued and to be issued under an indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (herein called the "Original Indenture"), as supplemented by a first supplemental indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "First Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Original Indenture, the "Indenture"), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (such company, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the "Company"), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature pages hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as trustee (the "Trustee"), to which Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto relevant to the Notes reference is hereby made for a complete description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company and the Holders of the Notes. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Note shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Indenture.
The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company and its Subsidiaries to create or incur Liens or engage in Sale and Leaseback Transactions. The Indenture also imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company to merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other person (other than a merger of a wholly owned Subsidiary into the Company) or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property of the Company in any one transaction or series of related transactions.
Each Note is subject to, and qualified by, all such terms as set forth in the Indenture certain of which are summarized herein and each Holder of a Note is referred to the corresponding provisions of the Indenture for a complete statement of such terms. To the extent that there is any inconsistency between the summary provisions set forth in the Notes and the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern.
 
The Company promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Note at the rate per annum shown above. The Company will pay interest semiannually on May 1 and November 1 of each year, commencing November 1, 2010. Interest on the Notes will accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from April 29, 2010. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months.
Initially, the Trustee will act as Paying Agent, registrar and service agent. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, registrar or co-registrar and service agent without notice. The Company or any of its Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, registrar, co-registrar or service agent.
 
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Notes, subject to certain limitations, may declare all the Notes due and payable immediately. In the case of an Event of Default resulting from certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization, the principal (or such specified amount) and premium, if any, of all outstanding Notes will become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act by the Trustee or any Holder of outstanding Notes.
Holders of Notes may not enforce the Indenture or the Notes except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Notes unless it receives reasonable indemnification. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power under the Indenture.
At any time after the principal of the Notes shall have been so declared due and payable (or have become immediately due and payable), and before any judgment or decree for the payment of the moneys due shall have been obtained or entered, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding under the Indenture, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences if (i) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay all matured installments of interest upon all the Notes and the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any and all Notes that shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest upon such principal and premium, if any, and, to the extent that such payment is enforceable under applicable law, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate per annum expressed in the Notes to the date of such payment or deposit) and the amount payable to the Trustee under Section 7.07 of the Original Indenture and (ii) any and all existing Events of Default under the Indenture with respect to the Notes, other than the nonpayment of principal on Notes that shall not have become due by their terms, shall have been remedied or waived as provided in Section 6.04 of the Original Indenture. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereto.
The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default and its consequences except a Default in the payment of the principal amount of premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Note. When a Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any consequent right.
In addition to any supplemental indenture otherwise authorized by the Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may from time to time and at any time enter into supplemental indentures (which shall conform to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect), without the consent of any Holder of Notes, for one or more of the following purposes: (i) to evidence the succession of another person to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's covenants, agreements and obligations; (ii) to surrender any right or power conferred upon the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor by the Indenture, to add to the covenants of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor such further covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions for the protection of the Holders of all or any Notes as the Board of Directors of the Company shall consider to be for the protection of the Holders of such Notes, and to make the occurrence, or the occurrence and continuance, of a default in respect of any such additional covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions a Default or an Event of Default under the Indenture; , that with respect to any such additional covenant, restriction, condition or provision, such amendment may provide for a period of grace after default, which may be shorter or longer than that allowed in the case of other Defaults, may provide for an immediate enforcement upon such Default, may limit the remedies available to the Trustee upon such Default or may limit the right of Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes to waive such default; (iii) to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Indenture, in any supplemental indenture or in any Notes that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision contained therein; (iv) to convey, transfer, assign, mortgage or pledge any property to or with the Trustee, or to make such other provisions in regard to matters or questions arising under the Indenture as shall not adversely affect the interests of any Holders of Notes; (v) to modify or amend the Indenture in such a manner as to permit the qualification of the Indenture or any supplemental indenture thereto under the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect; (vi) to add or to change any of the provisions of the Indenture to provide that Notes in bearer form may be registrable as to principal, to change or eliminate any restrictions on the payment of principal or premium with respect to Notes in registered form or of principal, premium or interest with respect to Notes in bearer form, or to permit Notes in registered form to be exchanged for Notes in bearer form, so as to not adversely affect the interests of the Holders or any coupons in any material respect or permit or facilitate the issuance of Notes in uncertificated form; (vii) to secure the Notes; (viii) to release Subsidiary Guarantors as provided in Article Ten of the Indenture; (ix) to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect; (x) to add to, change, or eliminate any of the provisions of the Indenture with respect to the Notes, so long as any such addition, change or elimination not otherwise permitted under the Indenture shall (A) neither apply to any Note created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture and entitled to the benefit of such provision nor modify the rights of the Holders of any such Note with respect to the benefit of such provision or (B) become effective only when there is no such Note outstanding; and (xi) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment by a successor or separate Trustee with respect to the Notes and to add to or change any of the provisions of the Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the Indenture by more than one Trustee.
provided
however,
With the written consent (as evidenced as provided in Section 9.02 of the Original Indenture) of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding affected by such amendment (including consents obtained in connection with a
tender offer or exchange offer for the Notes), the Company the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, may amend the Indenture without notice to any Holder; that no such amendment shall, without the consent of the Holders of each Note then outstanding and affected thereby, (i) reduce the principal amount of Notes whose Holders must consent to an amendment, modification, supplement or waiver; (ii) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Note; (iii) reduce the principal of or change the Stated Maturity of any Note; (iv) reduce the amount payable upon the redemption of any Note or add redemption provisions to any Note; (v) make any Note payable in money other than that stated in the Note or, other than in accordance with the provisions of Article Ten of the Indenture, eliminate any existing Subsidiary Guarantor; or (vi) make any change in the Sections of the Indenture relating to waivers of past defaults and the rights of Holders to receive payments, or in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions. It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof.
provided
Any consent to an amendment or a waiver by the Holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders and owners of this Note and any Notes that may be issued in exchange or substitution hereof, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Notes. Any Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke its consent if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment or waiver becomes effective. Neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company shall, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration, whether by way of interest, fee or otherwise, to any Holder for or as an inducement to any consent, waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of the Indenture or the Notes unless such consideration is offered to be paid to all Holders, ratably, that so consent, waive or agree to amend.
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
 
Upon a Change of Control Triggering Event, any Holder of Notes shall have the right to cause the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such Holder at a repurchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Notes to be repurchased plus accrued interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the related interest payment date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
The Notes shall not be redeemable at the option of any Holder thereof, upon the occurrence of any particular circumstances or otherwise. The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
 
The Notes are issuable in registered form without coupons in minimum denominations of $2,000 principal amount and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. When Notes are presented to the Registrar or a co-registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Notes, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without payment of any service charge but with payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration or exchange of Notes.
The Company and the Registrar shall not be required (a) to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Notes during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before the day of the mailing of a notice of redemption of Notes selected for redemption and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (b) to register the transfer or exchange of Notes selected, called or being called for redemption as a whole or the portion being redeemed of any such Notes selected, called or being called for redemption in part.
 
The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
 
The Notes may be redeemed at the Company's option, upon notice as set forth in the Indenture, in whole at any time or in part from time to time, on the terms set forth in the Indenture.
 
The ownership of Notes shall be proved by the register maintained by the Registrar.
 
No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, as such, of any Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Notes or the Indenture or a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Note, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. This waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issuance of the Notes.
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Notes and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money and/or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
 
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Note and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, and premium, if any, or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on its request or, if then held by the Company, shall be discharged from such trust. Thereafter the Holder of such Note shall look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, shall at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal (national edition), notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification or publication, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
provided
however,
 
Subject to certain limitations imposed by the Trust Indenture Act, the Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-Paying Agent may do the same with like rights.
 
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian), and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
 
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes and has directed the Trustee to use CUSIP numbers in notices of redemption as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice of redemption and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
For value received                      hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto                      (please insert social security or other identifying number of assignee) the within Note, and hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints                      attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
 
Signature(s) must be guaranteed by an eligible Guarantor Institution (banks, stock brokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions) with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program pursuant to Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 17Ad-15.
 
The initial principal amount of this Global Note is $300,000,000. The following increases or decreases in this Global Note have been made:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
April 29, 2010
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, Virginia 24012
 
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as special counsel for Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the ""), and its direct and indirect subsidiaries listed on hereto (the "") in connection with the public offering of $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 5.750% Notes due 2020 (the ""), pursuant to a shelf Registration Statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-166291) under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the "") (as amended and supplemented from time to time, the "") and a prospectus supplement dated April 26, 2010 filed by the Company with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 27, 2010 pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act (the "" and, together with the prospectus dated April 26, 2010, the "").
Company
Schedule I
Subsidiary Guarantors
Notes
Act
Registration Statement
Prospectus Supplement
Prospectus
The Notes are being offered and sold by the Company pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement, dated April 26, 2010 among the Company and Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc., as Representatives of the several underwriters named therein (the ""). The Notes will be issued as senior indebtedness of the Company under an indenture between the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (the ""), dated as of April 29, 2010 (the ""), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "" and, together with the Base Indenture, the ""). The Notes are guaranteed on an unsecured basis (the "" and, together with the Notes, the "") by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors. This opinion is being furnished in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K under the Act. No opinion is expressed herein as to any matter pertaining to the contents of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus other than as to the validity of the Securities.
Underwriting Agreement
Trustee
Base Indenture
Supplemental Indenture
Indenture
Subsidiary Guarantees
Securities
In connection with this opinion, we have examined and relied upon the Registration Statement and the Prospectus, and we have reviewed the corporate proceedings of the Company with respect to the authorization of the issuance of the Notes and the corporate or limited liability company proceedings, as applicable, of the Subsidiary Guarantors with respect to the authorization of the issuance of the Subsidiary Guarantees. We have also examined and relied upon originals or copies of such agreements, instruments, corporate or limited liability company records, certificates and other documents as we have deemed necessary or appropriate as a basis for the opinions hereinafter expressed.
For purposes of this opinion, we have made such examination of law as we have deemed necessary. This opinion is limited solely to (i) the internal substantive laws (other than tax, antitrust, usury, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance transfer laws, blue sky and securities laws, as to which we express no opinion) of the State of New York as applied by courts located in New York without regard to choice of law, (ii) the Delaware General Corporation Law ("") and applicable provisions of the Delaware Constitution, as applied by courts located in Delaware (the "") and reported judicial
DGCL
Delaware Law
decisions interpreting the Delaware Law, (iii) the Massachusetts Business Corporations Act ("") and applicable provisions of the Massachusetts Constitution, as applied by courts located in Massachusetts (the "") and the reported judicial decisions interpreting such Massachusetts Laws and (iv) the Virginia Stock Corporation Act (""), the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act ("") and applicable provisions of the Virginia Constitution, in each case as applied by courts located in Virginia (the "") and reported judicial decisions interpreting such Virginia Laws, in each case to the extent the same may apply to or govern the transactions contemplated by the Registration Statement, and we express no opinion as to the laws of any other jurisdiction. We express no opinion whatsoever as to the compliance or noncompliance by any person with any antifraud or information delivery provision of any state or federal laws, rules and regulations, and no inference regarding such compliance or non-compliance may be drawn from any opinion herein.
MBCA
Massachusetts Laws
VSCA
VLLCA
Virginia Laws
We have assumed:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Our opinions set forth below with respect to enforceability of the Notes and the Subsidiary Guarantees are subject to the following general qualifications:
 
 
 
 
 
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, we are of the opinion that (i) the Notes, when authenticated and delivered by the Trustee and executed and issued by the Company, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company, enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms and (ii) the Subsidiary Guarantees, when executed and issued by the Subsidiary Guarantors, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors, enforceable against each such Subsidiary Guarantor in accordance with their terms.
 
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and to the reference to this firm under the heading "Legal Matters" in the Prospectus Supplement included in the Registration Statement. In rendering this opinion and giving this consent, we do not admit that we are an "expert" within the meaning of the Act.
 
 
 

Exhibit 12.1
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
Statement Re Computation of Ratio of Earnings to Fixed Charges
In Thousands, Except Ratio Data
 
 

Exhibit 25.1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1. Furnish the following information as to the trustee:
General Information.
 
Comptroller of the Currency
Treasury Department
Washington, D.C.
Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation
Washington, D.C.
Federal Reserve Bank of San Francisco
San Francisco, California 94120
 
The trustee is authorized to exercise corporate trust powers.
Item 2. If the obligor is an affiliate of the trustee, describe each such affiliation.
Affiliations with Obligor.
None with respect to the trustee.
No responses are included for Items 3-14 of this Form T-1 because the obligor is not in default as provided under Item 13.
Item 15. Not applicable.
Foreign Trustee.
Item 16. List below all exhibits filed as a part of this Statement of Eligibility.
List of Exhibits.
 
 
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, the trustee, Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, a national banking association organized and existing under the laws of the United States of America, has duly caused this statement of eligibility to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned, thereunto duly authorized, all in the City of New York and State of New York on the 23rd day of April, 2010.
 
April 23, 2010
Securities and Exchange Commission
Washington, D.C. 20549
Gentlemen:
In accordance with Section 321(b) of the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, the undersigned hereby consents that reports of examination of the undersigned made by Federal, State, Territorial, or District authorities authorized to make such examination may be furnished by such authorities to the Securities and Exchange Commission upon its request therefor.
 
 
I, Howard I. Atkins, EVP & CFO of the above-named bank do hereby declare that this Report of Condition has been prepared in conformance with the instructions issued by the appropriate Federal regulatory authority and is true to the best of my knowledge and belief.
Howard I. Atkins
EVP & CFO    
We, the undersigned directors, attest to the correctness of this Report of Condition and declare that it has been examined by us and to the best of our knowledge and belief has been prepared in conformance with the instructions issued by the appropriate Federal regulatory authority and is true and correct.
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
ROANOKE, Va., April 26, 2010  Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, announced today it priced $300 million in principal amount of 5.75% Senior Unsecured Notes due 2020 at an issue price of 99.587%. The Company expects to close the offering on April 29, 2010. The proceeds of the offering will be used to pay off and retire the $200 million of outstanding indebtedness under its term loan, reduce $75 million of borrowings under its revolving credit facility, pay transaction fees and expenses and for general corporate purposes.
Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. acted as joint book-running managers of the debt offering. The offering is being made solely by means of a prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus, which has been filed with the SEC. A copy of the prospectus for the offering may be obtained on the SEC's website, . Alternatively, you may request it by contacting Banc of America Securities LLC, Attention: Prospectus Department, 100 West 33
www.sec.gov
rd
Street, 3
rd
Floor, New York, NY 10001 (phone: 800-294-1322 and e-mail: ) or by calling J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. at 212-834-4533.
dg.prospectus_distribution@bofasecurities.com
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities described herein, and shall not constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any state or other jurisdiction in which such an offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of January 2, 2010, the Company operated 3,420 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements
discuss, among other things, the expected closing date, pricing, principal amount and use of proceeds of the Senior Secured Notes offering. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 

Exhibit 99.2
 
ROANOKE, Va., April 29, 2010  Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, announced today the closing of its Senior Unsecured Notes offering. The Company completed the offering of $300 million in principal amount of 5.75% Senior Unsecured Notes due 2020 at an issue price of 99.587%. The company will use the proceeds of the offering to pay off and retire the $200 million of outstanding indebtedness under its term loan, reduce $75 million of borrowings under its revolving credit facility, pay transaction fees and expenses and for general corporate purposes.
"We are very pleased by the strong investor interest in our notes. This transaction secures long-term financing that aligns with the Company's growth strategies while diversifying the Company's debt stakeholders," said Michael A. Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. "We are also proud of our recent upgrade to investment grade status (BBB-) by Standard & Poor's, as we believe it is a positive affirmation of our operational performance, solid operating cash flows, and strong financial metrics."
Banc of America Securities LLC and J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. acted as joint book-running managers of the debt offering. The offering is being made solely by means of a prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus, which has been filed with the SEC. A copy of the prospectus for the offering may be obtained on the SEC's website, . Alternatively, you may request it by contacting Banc of America Securities LLC, Attention: Prospectus Department, 100 West 33
www.sec.gov
rd
Street, 3
rd
Floor, New York, NY 10001 (phone: 800-294-1322 and e-mail: ) or by calling J.P. Morgan Securities Inc. at 212-834-4533.
dg.prospectus_distribution@bofasecurities.com
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities described herein, and shall not constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any state or other jurisdiction in which such an offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts,
 
 
accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of January 2, 2010, the Company operated 3,420 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2010 and use of proceeds of the Senior Secured Notes offering. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100519165328.txt.gz
TIME:20100519165328
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the first quarter ended April 24, 2010.
ROANOKE, Va, May 19, 2010
 
First quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.19 which was a 21% increase over the first quarter last year. Excluding the $0.04 charge related to store divestitures recorded during the first quarter of fiscal 2009, EPS increased 17%.
 
 
 
 
The team has positioned us for another great year of sales and profit growth through an unwavering commitment to provide a superior experience to our customers, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  During the quarter we generated double-digit operating income growth and saw continued improvement in our overall customer satisfaction scores.  Collectively, the strategic and financial progress is evident in our customer experience and financial results.
 
First Quarter Highlights
 
Total sales for the first quarter increased 8.7% to $1.83 billion, compared with total sales of $1.68 billion during the first quarter of fiscal 2009. The sales increase reflected the net addition of 57 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 7.7% compared to an 8.2% comparable store sales gain during the first quarter of fiscal 2009. The Companys gross profit rate was 49.8% of sales during the first quarter as compared to 48.8% during the first quarter last year. The 93 basis-point improvement in the gross profit rate was driven by continued investments in pricing capabilities, parts availability and an increase in direct sourcing.   ;The Companys SG&A rate was 39.8% of sales during the first quarter as compared to 39.5% during the same period last year, a 34 basis-point increase.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures last year, the SG&A rate increased 68 basis points, driven by the annualization of previous customer facing and E-commerce investments, partially offset by leverage on occupancy expenses as a result of the Company's 7.7% comparable store sales increase.  The Companys operating income during the first quarter of $182.2 million increased 15.6% or 59 basis points to 10.0% of total sales as compared to the first quarter of fiscal 2009.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures, the Companys operating income rate increased 25 basis points.
 
Operating cash flow for the quarter increased 15.5% to $338.0 million from $292.7 million in the first quarter of 2009.  Free cash flow for the quarter increased 30.5% to $262.9 million from $201.4 million in the first quarter 2009.  Capital expenditures were $60.7 million for the quarter as compared to $50.2 million during the first quarter of 2009.
 
We are very pleased with our strong start to 2010 and the broad-based improvements in our business.  During our fourth quarter fiscal 2009 earnings release, we provided an annual outlook which included an estimated 2010 operating EPS range of $3.20 to $3.40 per share. This annual outlook was based on operating performance only and did not include share repurchases or the impact of the recent
 
 
 
2
 
 
notes offering.  The favorable impact of our share repurchases, partially offset by the recent notes offering, will add a net incremental benefit of approximately $0.14 to our full year EPS of which we realized $0.04 in our first quarter results, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  In April, we were upgraded to investment grade status by Standard & Poors. This was an important milestone for our Company as this upgrade is an independent assessment validating our strong operational and financial performance, solid operating cash flows, and strong financial metrics.
 
 
 
Store Information
 
During the first quarter, the Company opened 43 stores, including 11 Autopart International stores, and closed one store.  As of April 24, 2010, the Companys total store count was 3,462 including 167 Autopart International stores.
 
 
3
 
Share Repurchases
 
The Company purchased 6,911,628 shares during the first quarter at an aggregate cost of $287.7 million, or an average price of $41.62 per share.  At the end of the first quarter, the Company had $212.3 million remaining under the $500.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in February 2010.
 
Dividend
 
On May 18, 2010, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on July 9, 2010 to stockholders of record as of June 25, 2010.
 
Annual Stockholders Meeting Announcements
 
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 19, 2010.  During the meeting, the following individuals were elected to serve on the Companys Board of Directors for the next year: John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Frances X. Frei, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray, Carlos A. Saladrigas and Francesca M. Spinelli.
 
The other proposal approved by the stockholders was the ratification of the appointment by the Companys Audit Committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as its independent registered public accounting firm for 2010.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, May 20, 2010 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until May 20, 2011.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of April 24, 2010, the Company operated 3,462 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment
 
 
 
4
 
 
opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2010.  These forward-looking statements are subj ect to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
5
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100524171222.txt.gz
TIME:20100524171222
EVENTS:	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100528154956.txt.gz
TIME:20100528154956
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20100811165919.txt.gz
TIME:20100811165919
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER FISCAL 2010
COMPARABLE STORE SALES INCREASE OF 5.8%; OPERATING INCOME RATE
EXPANDS TO 12.1%; DILUTED EPS INCREASES 40% TO $1.16
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the second quarter ended July 17, 2010.
ROANOKE, Va, August 11, 2010
 
Second quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.16 which was a 40% increase over the second quarter last year. Excluding the $0.06 charge related to store divestitures recorded during the second quarter of fiscal 2009, EPS increased 30%.
 
 
 
 
 
I would like to thank our 51,000 Team Members for delivering a record performance in our second quarter of 2010. The team continues to position us for another great year through their focus on execution and an unwavering commitment to serving our customers, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer. We remain confident in our Team Members and strategies as they fueled our 6.9% increase in year-to-date comp stores sales and continue to drive the resurgence of our DIY business while extending our string of double-digit comparable store sales gains in our Commercial business.  We are encouraged by our good start to the third quarter and are upbeat as we look to the second half of 2010.
 
Second Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
 
Total sales for the second quarter increased 7.2% to $1.42 billion, compared with total sales of $1.32 billion during the second quarter of fiscal 2009. The sales increase reflected the net addition of 90 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 5.8% compared to a 4.8% comparable store sales gain during the second quarter of fiscal 2009. Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 6.9% which was on top of a 6.7% increase over the same period in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 50.4% of sales during the second quarter as compared to 49.3% during the second quarter last year. The 111 basis-point improvement in the gross profit rate was driven by improved merchandising and pricing capabilities, increased inventory levels and resulting supply chain efficiencies and improved parts availability.  Year-to-date, the Companys gross profit rate was 50.1%, or 101 basis points favorable to the same period in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys SG&A rate was 38.3% of sales during the second quarter as compared to 39.1% during the same period last year, an 81 basis-point decrease.  Excluding the impact of store divestitures last year, the SG&A rate decreased 10 basis points, primarily due to strong comparable store sales which drove leverage in occupancy costs, and an expected decelerated pace of incremental spending on the Companys strategic capabilities. Year-to-date, the Companys SG&A rate was 39.2% versus 39.3% during the same period last year, or 38.8% when excluding the impact of store divestitures in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys operating income during the second quarter of $171.6 million increased 27.3%, or 191 basis points, to 12.1% of total sales as compared to the second quarter of fiscal 2009.  Excluding the
 
 
 
2
 
 
impact of store divestitures, the Companys operating income increased 19.1% and its operating income rate increased 121 basis points.
 
Operating cash flow through the second quarter increased 14.2% to $495.5 million from $433.8 million last year.  Free cash flow through the second quarter increased 41.8% to $407.6 million from $287.4 million last year.  Capital expenditures were $99.3 million through the second quarter as compared to $90.8 million through the second quarter of fiscal 2009.
 
 We are pleased with our strong second quarter financial performance that was driven by our previous strategic investments, fantastic team member execution and positive industry dynamics.  These factors contributed to us delivering strong top line and bottom line growth, along with record free cash flow and returns as measured by return on invested capital, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  As a result of our first half performance which exceeded our internal expectations, combined with our significant share repurchase activity which was not included in our original annual EPS outlook, we believe it is prudent to reflect these material changes and update our previously communicated annual EPS outlook.  We now estimate our fiscal 2010 annual EPS outlook to be in the range of $3.70  $3.80 per share.
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
Store Information
 
During the second quarter, the Company opened 36 stores, including 14 Autopart International stores, and closed 1 store.  As of July 17, 2010, the Companys total store count was 3,497 including 181 Autopart International stores.  Additionally, during the first week of the fiscal third quarter, the Company opened its 3,500 store in Westerly, Rhode Island, marking another significant milestone in the Companys growth story.
th
 
Share Repurchases
 
During the second quarter, the Company repurchased approximately 3.4 million shares of itscommon stock at an aggregate cost of $167.8 million, or an average price of $49.83 per share. Through the second quarter the Company has repurchased approximately 10.3 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $455.5 million, or an average price of $44.31 per share.
 
 
Share Repurchase Authorization
 
The Companys Board of Directors today authorized a $300 million share repurchase program.
This new authorization replaces the Companys $500 million share repurchase program authorized in February 2010, which had $44.5 million remaining.
 
Dividend
 
On August 10, 2010, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on October 8, 2010 to stockholders of record as of September 24, 2010.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, August 12, 2010 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until August 12, 2011.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of July 17, 2010, the Company operated 3,497 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2010.  These forward-looking statements are subj ect to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20101110162141.txt.gz
TIME:20101110162141
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
ROANOKE, Va, November 10, 2010
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the third quarter ended October 9, 2010.
 
Third quarter comparable earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.03 which was a 49.3% increase over the third quarter last year. Including the $0.04 charge related to store divestitures recorded during the third quarter of fiscal 2009, EPS increased 58.5%.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
I would like to thank our 51,000 Team Members for delivering another record performance in our third quarter of 2010.  Our passion for serving our customers and growing our business has enabled us to accelerate growth and capitalize on strong industry fundamentals and consumer demand for auto parts, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  Through the strength of our Team and the focus on our strategies, we have produced comparable store sales and bottom-line results that exceeded our expectations.  We will continue to focus on consistency and providing a differentiated experience by leading in service and ensuring superior parts availability.
 
Third Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
 
Total sales for the third quarter increased 11.4% to $1.41 billion, compared with total sales of $1.26 billion during the third quarter of fiscal 2009.  The sales increase reflected the net addition of 122 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 9.9% compared to a 4.7% comparable store sales gain during the third quarter of fiscal 2009.  Year-to-date comparable store sales increased 7.8% which was on top of a 6.1% increase over the same period in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 50.3% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 49.2% during the third quarter last year.  The 110 basis-point improvement in the gross profit rate was driven by improved merchandising and pricing capabilities, improved parts availability and supply chain efficiencies. Year-to-date, the Companys gross profit rate was 50.1%, or 104 basis points favorable to the same period in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys SG&A rate was 39.9% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 40.4% during the same period last year, excluding the impact of store divestitures last year.  This 50 basis point decrease was driven by strong comparable store sales which resulted in the leverage of fixed costs and a decelerated pace of net incremental spending on the Companys strategic capabilities, partially offset by incremental advertising and increased incentive compensation. Including the impact of store divestitures last year, the SG&A rate decreased 106 basis points.  Year-to-date, the Companys SG&A rate was 39.4% versus 39.3% during the sa me period last year, or 39.8% when including the impact of store divestitures in fiscal 2009.
 
 
2
 
 
The Companys operating income increased 31.5% during the third quarter to $147.2 million as compared to the third quarter of fiscal 2009.   The Companys operating income rate increased 160 basis points to 10.5% of total sales. Including the impact of store divestitures, the Companys operating income increased 40.4% and its operating income rate increased 216 basis points.
 
Operating cash flow through the third quarter of $596.5 million decreased 5.1% from $628.5 million last year.  Free cash flow through the third quarter increased 13.0% to $467.8 million from $414.0 million last year driven by strong growth in net income.  Capital expenditures were $147.2 million through the third quarter as compared to $132.6 million through the third quarter of fiscal 2009.
 
< /div>
We are very pleased with our strong third quarter results as we continue to reach new heights and achieve new milestones in our Companys history, including our record return on invested capital and recent upgrade in our credit rating to full investment grade status, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  During our third quarter we continued to benefit from favorable industry dynamics, previous strategic investments and strong Team Member execution.  Given our strong third quarter performance, we are adjusting our fiscal 2010 annual EPS outlook to be in the range of $3.80 to $3.90.
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
Store Information
 
During the third quarter, the Company opened 43 stores, including 10 Autopart International stores.  As of October 9, 2010, the Companys total store count was 3,540 including 191 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
During the third quarter, the Company repurchased approximately 381,000 shares of itscommon stock at an aggregate cost of $20.7 million, or an average price of $54.18 per share.  At the end of the third quarter, the Company had $279.3 million remaining under the $300.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in August 2010.  Through the third quarter, the Company has repurchased approximately 10,660,000 shares of itscommon stock at an aggregate cost of $476.1 m illion, or an average price of $44.66 per share.
 
 
Dividend
 
On November 9, 2010, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on January 7, 2011 to stockholders of record as of December 24, 2010.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, November 11, 2010 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial
(866) 908-1AAP
.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until November 11, 2011.
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-
 
 
4
 
 
 
yourself and professional installer markets.  As of October 9, 2010, the Company operated 3,540 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2010.  These forward-looking statements are subj ect to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
 
5
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110209171228.txt.gz
TIME:20110209171228
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter ended January 1, 2011.
ROANOKE, Va, February 9, 2011
 
Fourth quarter comparable earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $0.57 which was a 46% increase over the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.  Including the $0.03 charge related to store divestitures recorded during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009, EPS increased 58%.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
I would like to thank our 51,000 Team Members for their hard work during the fourth quarter and the 2010 fiscal year, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  Our team reached many record strategic and financial milestones this year.  The revitalizing of our core values to Inspire, Serve and Grow have enabled us to develop stronger relationships with our customers, increase the overall engagement of our Team Members and drive strong financial outcomes. The strong financial outcomes include three consecutive years of double-digit Commercial comp store sales growth, which has led to industry leading sales per store, and three consecutive years of double-digit EPS increases.   In 2011, our brand promise of Service is our best part will be how we differentiate and provide our customers the reason to choose Advance for every job every time.
 
Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2010 Highlights
 
Total sales for the fourth quarter increased 11.1% to $1.27 billion, compared with total sales of $1.14 billion during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.  The sales increase reflects the net addition of 143 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 8.9% compared to a 2.4% comparable store sales gain during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.  Fiscal 2010 comparable store sales increased 8.0% on top of a 5.3% increase in fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys gross profit rate was 49.4% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 47.9% during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.  The 147 basis-point improvement in the gross profit rate was driven by improved merchandising and pricing capabilities, improved parts availability and supply chain efficiencies. For fiscal 2010, the Companys gross profit rate was 50.0%, or 113 basis points favorable to fiscal 2009.
 
The Companys SG&A rate was 42.8% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 42.6% during the same period in fiscal 2009, excluding the impact of store divestitures.  This 20 basis-point  increase was driven by increased incentive compensation, partially offset by fixed cost leverage due to strong comparable store sales and a decelerated pace of net incremental spending on the Companys strategic capabilities. Including the impact of store divestitures in fiscal 2009, the SG&A rate decreased 14 basis points.  For fiscal 2010, the Companys SG&A rate was 40.1% versus 40.0% in fiscal 2009, or 40.5% when including the impact of store divestitures.
 
 
2
 
 
in fiscal 2009, the Companys operating income increased 47% and operating income rate increased 161 basis points.
$83.9 million as compared to the fourth quarter of fiscal 2009.   The Companys operating income rate increased 127 basis points to 6.6% of sales.  Including the impact of store divestitures
The Companys operating income increased 38% during the fourth quarter to
 
During fiscal 2010, the Company generated $666.2 million in operating cash flow and a record $466.4 million of free cash flow.  Free cash flow increased 13.8% from $409.9 million last year primarily due to strong growth in net income.  Capital expenditures were $199.6 million for fiscal 2010 as compared to $192.9 million in fiscal 2009.
 
Overall, 2010 marked our third consecutive year of improved financial and operational performance.  While our performance in 2010 was fueled by strong industry dynamics and favorable weather patterns, the strategic choices we have made through our investments and the superior execution of our team played a significant role and enabled us to gain market share and position our Company for long-term growth and success, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
 
Store Information
 
During the fourth quarter, the Company opened 26 stores, including three Autopart International stores, and closed three stores.  For fiscal 2010, the Company opened 148 stores, including 38 Autopart International stores, and closed five stores.  As of January 1, 2011, the Companys total store count was 3,563 including 194 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
During the fourth quarter, the Company repurchased approximately 2.4 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $157.8 million or an average price of $66.71.  In fiscal 2010, the Company repurchased approximately 13.0 million shares of itscommon stock at an aggregate cost of $633.9 million, or an average price of $48.67 per share.  Subsequent to the end of fiscal 2010 and up to the date of this release, the Company has repurchased an additional 1.9 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $121.6 million, or an average price of $62.72 per share.
 
 
Share Repurchase Authorization
 
As a result of the share repurchases made subsequent to the end of fiscal 2010, the Company has completed the $300.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in August 2010.  On February 8, 2011, the Companys Board of Directors authorized a new $500 million share repurchase program.
 
2011 Annual Financial Outlook
 
The Company has provided the following annual financial outlook and certain key assumptions for fiscal 2011.
 
 
 
4
 
 
 
 
In fiscal 2011, the Company anticipates a low to mid single-digit increase in comparable store sales driven by continued strong Commercial sales growth. The Company expects a more modest increase in gross profit rate primarily due to benefits from its merchandising capabilities, supply chain efficiencies and global sourcing, partially offset by supply chain investments.
 
The Company expects its total SG&A dollar growth to continue to decelerate due to lower growth in its fixed cost structure and improved flexibility of its variable expenses. The Company estimates an EPS range of approximately $4.60 to $4.80 for fiscal 2011, which assumes an average diluted share count of approximately 82 million shares.
 
Our focus on Service Leadership and Superior Availability will position our Company to grow our comp store sales in the low to mid-single digits and our EPS double digits for the fourth consecutive year.  We expect our gross profit rate to continue to expand; however, at a much more moderate pace, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  The pursuit of differentiation will require continued investments in the areas of Service Leadership and Superior Availability; however, we expect SG&A dollar growth per store to continue to decelerate in 2011 from 2010 driven by cost savings in the areas of labor management, operation al efficiencies and variability in store performance.  These savings will somewhat offset our 2011 investment spend and result in our SG&A leveraging at a lower level of comp sales.  We have shown over the past three years that investing in the right areas of our business can deliver solid growth and returns.
 
 
5
 
 
Dividend
 
On February 8, 2011, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on April 8, 2011 to stockholders of record as of March 25, 2011.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, February 10, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website, , or dial (866) 908-1AAP.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until February 10, 2012.
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
About Advance Auto Parts
 
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of January 1, 2011, the Company operated 3,563 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions includin g, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 2, 2010 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
6
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110518163140.txt.gz
TIME:20110518163140
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the first fiscal quarter ended April 23, 2011.  First quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.35 which was a 13.4% increase over the first quarter last year.
ROANOKE, Va, May 18, 2011
 
 
 
 
 
I would like to thank our 52,000 Team Members for their hard work and dedication to serving our customers and for navigating through a challenging first quarter.  We entered this year with considerable momentum and expected that our first quarter would be a continuation of a very strong 2010, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  While this quarters financial performance was below our expectations, we are committed to delivering on our full year earnings per share outlook.  A combination of our record customer satisfaction trends and our growth plans through our Service Leadership and Superior Availability strategies position us for another strong 2011.
 
First Quarter Highlights
 
Total sales for the first quarter increased 3.7% to $1.90 billion, compared with total sales of $1.83 billion during the first quarter of fiscal 2010. The sales increase reflected the net addition of 138 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 1.4% compared to a 7.7% comparable store sales gain during the first quarter of fiscal 2010. The Companys gross profit rate was 50.5% of sales during the first quarter as compared to 49.8% during the first quarter last year. The 73 basis-point improvement in gross profit rate was driven by improved merchandising and pricing capabilities and parts availability,partially offset by increased supply chain costs.  The Companys SG&A rate was 40.7% of sales during the first quarter as compared to 39.8% during the same period last year, an 88 basis-point increase.  The SG&A rate increase was driven by increased advertising spend, store labor and fixed cost deleverage due to the modest comparable store sales increase, partially offset by lower incentive compensation compared to last year.
 
 
The Companys operating income during the first quarter of $186.0 million increased 2.1% versus the first quarter of fiscal 2010.  On a rate basis, operating income was 9.8% of total sales as compared to 10.0% during the first quarter of fiscal 2010.
 
Operating cash flow for the quarter decreased 19.4% to $272.5 million from $338.0 million in the first quarter of 2010.  Free cash flow for the quarter was $152.9 million versus $262.9 million during the first quarter of fiscal 2010.  Capital expenditures were $88.9 million for the quarter as compared to $60.7 million during the first quarter of 2010.
 
 
2
 
 
With our soft start to the year we are now expecting our comp stores sales to grow in the low single digits for the year, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  We have adjusted our cost structure and pace of our strategic initiatives based on our first quarter performance which will position our Company to leverage our SG&A at lower comparable store sales levels, while delivering on our customer promise - service is our best part.  With these adjustments, we still expect to deliver on our previously communicated annual EPS outlook of $4.60 to $4.80.
 
 
Store Information
 
During the first quarter, the Company opened 37 stores, including nine Autopart International stores.  As of April 23, 2011, the Companys total store count was 3,600 including 203 Autopart International stores.
 
Share Repurchases
 
The Company purchased 4.2 million shares during the first quarter at an aggregate cost of $270.0 million, or an average price of $63.72 per share.  The Companys earnings release for the fourth quarter of
 
 
 
3
 
 
fiscal 2010 reported 1.9 million of these shares that had been purchased between January 2, 2011 and their earnings release on February 9,2011.At the end of the first quarter, the Company had $351.6 million remaining under the $500.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in February 2011.
 
 
 
Dividend
 
On May 16, 2011, the Companys Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on July 8, 2011 to stockholders of record as of June 24, 2011.
 
Annual Stockholders Meeting Announcements
 
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 17, 2011.  During the meeting, the following individuals were elected to serve on the Companys Board of Directors for the next year: John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Frances X. Frei, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray and Carlos A. Saladrigas.
 
On two advisory proposals, the Companys stockholders voted to approve the compensation of the Companys named executive officers listed in the proxy statement and an annual advisory vote on the compensation of the Companys named executive officers.  The stockholders also ratified the appointment by the Companys Audit Committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as its independent registered public accounting firm for 2011.
 
Investor Conference Call
 
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, May 19, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results.  To listen to the live call, please log on to the Companys website, , or dial (866) 908-1AAP.  The call will be archived on the Companys website until May 19, 2012.
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of April 23, 2011, the Company operated 3,600 stores in 39
 
 
 
4
 
 
states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Companys website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
 
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995.  Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate.  These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011.  These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Companys products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions,acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Companys 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission.  Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements.  The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 
 
5
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110520163928.txt.gz
TIME:20110520163928
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110603164634.txt.gz
TIME:20110603164634
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Termination of a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
 
 
 
 
 

79
Exhibit 10.43
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
i
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
ii
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
:
SCHEDULES
 
Schedule 2.01                                                      Revolving Commitments
Schedule 3.06                                                      Disclosed Matters
Schedule 3.12                                                      Subsidiaries
Schedule 3.13                                                      Insurance
Schedule 6.01                                                      Existing Indebtedness
Schedule 6.02                                                      Existing Liens
Schedule 6.04                                                      Existing Investments
Schedule 6.06                                                      Existing Restrictions
 
:
EXHIBITS
 
Exhibit A                                 Form of Assignment and Assumption
Exhibit B                                  Form of Guarantee Agreement
Exhibit C                                  Form of Opinion of Counsel for the Loan Parties
 
 
 
 
iii
 
 
CREDIT AGREEMENT dated as of May 27, 2011, among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, the LENDERS party hereto, and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent.
 
The parties hereto agree as follows:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
 
  As used in this Agreement, the following terms have the meanings specified below:
Defined Terms.
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Alternate Base Rate.
ABR
 
 means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, that, without duplication, (a) there shall be excluded (i) the income of any Person in which any other Person (other than the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or any director holding qualifying shares in compliance with applicable law) has a joint interest, except such income shall be included to the extent of the amount of dividends or other distributions actually paid to the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries by such Person during such period, (ii) the income (or loss) of any Person accrued prior to the date it becomes a Subsidiary or is merged into or consolidated with the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries or the date that Persons assets are acquired by the Borrower or any of the Subsidiaries and (iii) gains and losses from, or incurred in connection with, the sale, liquidation or other disposition of assets outside the ordinary course of business and (b) for purposes of calculating the Leverage Ratio, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income shall be determined on a pro forma basis to give effect to any Permitted Acquisitions and any divestitures by the Borrower or any Subsidiary of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division or line of business of a Person occurring during such period as if such transactions had occurred on the first day of such period.
Adjusted Consolidated Net Income
provided
 
 means an interest rate per annum (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/16 of 1%) equal to, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, (i) the LIBO Rate for such Interest Period multiplied by (ii) the Statutory Reserve Rate.
Adjusted LIBO Rate
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as administrative agent for the Lenders hereunder.
Administrative Agent
 
 means an Administrative Questionnaire in a form supplied by the Administrative Agent.
Administrative Questionnaire
 
 
 
 
 
 
2
 
 means, with respect to a specified Person, another Person that directly, or indirectly through one or more intermediaries, Controls or is Controlled by or is under common Control with the Person specified.
Affiliate
 
  means, for any day, a rate per annum equal to the greatest of (a) the Prime Rate in effect on such day, (b) the Federal Funds Effective Rate in effect on such day plus  of 1% and (c) the Adjusted LIBO Rate on such day (or if such day is not a Business Day, the immediately preceding Business Day) for a deposit in dollars with a maturity of one month plus 1%.  For purposes of clause (c) above, the Adjusted LIBO Rate on any day shall be based on the rate per annum appearing on the Reuters LIBOR01 screen displaying British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rates (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to such day for deposits in dollars with a maturity of one month.  Any change in the Alternate Base Rate due to a change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be effective from and including the effective date of such change in the Prime Rate, the Federal Funds Effective Rate or the Adjusted LIBO Rate, respectively.
Alternate Base Rate
 
 means, at any time, with respect to any Lender, the percentage of the total Revolving Commitments represented by such Lenders Revolving Commitment at such time; that for purposes of Section 2.20, if any Defaulting Lender exists at such time, the Applicable Percentages shall be calculated disregarding such Defaulting Lenders Revolving Commitment.  If the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, the Applicable Percentages shall be determined based upon the Revolving Commitments most recently in effect, giving effect to any assignments and to any Revolving Lenders status as a Defaulting Lender at the time of determination.
Applicable Percentage
provided
 
 means, for any day, with respect to any ABR Loan or Eurodollar Loan or with respect to facility fees in respect of Revolving Commitments payable under Section 2.11(a), as the case may be, the applicable rate per annum set forth below under the caption ABR Spread, Eurodollar Spread or Facility Fee Rate, as the case may be, based upon the Ratings by S&P and Moodys, respectively, applicable on such date:
Applicable Rate
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
3
 
 
For purposes of the foregoing, (a) if either Moodys or S&P shall not have in effect a Rating (other than by reason of the circumstances referred to in the last sentence of this paragraph), then such rating agency shall be deemed to have established a Rating in Category 5; (b) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P for the Index Debt shall fall within different Categories, the Applicable Rate shall be based on the higher of the two Ratings unless one of the two Ratings is two or more Categories lower than the other, in which case the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Category next below that of the higher of the two Ratings; and (c) if the Ratings established or deemed to have been established by Moodys and S&P shall be changed (other than as a result of a change in the rating system of Moodys or S&P), such change shall be effective as of the date on which it is first announced by the applicable rating agency, irrespective of when notice of such change shall have been furnished by the Borrower to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders pursuant to Section 5.01 or otherwise.  Each change in the Applicable Rate apply during the period commencing on the effective date of such change and ending on the date immediately preceding the effective date of the next such change.  If the rating system of Moodys or S&P shall change, or if either such rating agency shall cease to be in the business of rating corporate debt obligations, the Borrower and the Lenders shall negotiate in good faith to amend this definition to reflect such changed rating system or the unavailability of Ratings from such rating agency and, pending the effectiveness of any such amendment, the Applicable Rate shall be determined by reference to the Rating most recently in effect prior to such change or cessation.
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(b).
Approved Fund
 
 means J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, each in its capacity as joint lead arranger in respect of the credit facility established hereunder.
Arrangers
 
 means, for any day, the annual assessment rate in effect on such day that is payable by a member of the Bank Insurance Fund classified as well-capitalized and within supervisory subgroup B (or a comparable successor risk classification) within the meaning of 12 C.F.R. Part 327 (or any successor provision) to the Federal Deposit Insurance Corporation for insurance by such Corporation of time deposits made in dollars at the offices of such member in the United States; that if, as a result of any change in any law, rule or regulation, it is no longer possible to determine the Assessment Rate as aforesaid, then the Assessment Rate shall be such annual rate as shall be determined by the Administrative Agent to be representative of the cost of such insurance to the Lenders.
Assessment Rate
provided
 
 
 
 
4
 
 means an assignment and assumption entered into by a Lender and an assignee (with the consent of any party whose consent is required by Section 9.04), and accepted by the Administrative Agent, in the form of Exhibit A or any other form approved by the Administrative Agent.
Assignment and Assumption
 
 means, with respect to any Person, such Person becomes the subject of a bankruptcy or insolvency proceeding, or has had a receiver, conservator, trustee, administrator, custodian, assignee for the benefit of creditors or similar Person charged with the reorganization or liquidation of its business appointed for it; that a Bankruptcy Event shall not result solely by virtue of any ownership interest, or the acquisition of any ownership interest, in such Person by a Governmental Authority or instrumentality thereof; , , that such ownership interest does not result in or provide such Person with immunity from the jurisdiction of courts within the United States or from the enforcement of judgments or writs of attachment on its assets or permit such Person (or such Governmental Authority or instrumentality) to reject, repudiate, disavow or disaffirm any contracts or agreements made by such Person.
Bankruptcy Event
provided
provided
further
 
 means the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System of the United States of America.
Board
 
 means Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Borrower
 
 means (a) Revolving Loans of the same Type, made, converted or continued on the same date and, in the case of Eurodollar Loans, as to which a single Interest Period is in effect, or (b) a Swingline Loan.
Borrowing
 
 means a request by the Borrower for a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.03.
Borrowing Request
 
 means any day that is not a Saturday, Sunday or other day on which commercial banks in New York City are authorized or required by law to remain closed; that, when used in connection with a Eurodollar Loan, the term Business Day shall also exclude any day on which banks are not open for dealings in dollar deposits in the London interbank market.
Business Day
provided
 
  of any Person means the obligations of such Person to pay rent or other amounts under any lease of (or other arrangement conveying the right to use) real or personal property, or a combination thereof, which obligations are required to be classified and accounted for as capital leases on a balance sheet of such Person under GAAP, and the amount of such obligations shall be the capitalized amount thereof determined in accordance with GAAP.
Capital Lease Obligations
 
  means at any time, (a) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person other than Holdings of any shares of capital stock of the Borrower; (b) the acquisition of ownership, directly or indirectly, beneficially or of record, by any Person or group (within the meaning of Rule 13d-5 under the United States Securities and Exchange Act of 1934 in effect on the
Change in Control
 
 
 
 
 
 
5
date hereof), of shares representing more than 25% of the aggregate ordinary voting power represented by the issued and outstanding capital stock of Holdings; or (c) occupation of a majority of the seats (other than vacant seats) on the board of directors of Holdings by Persons who were not Continuing Directors.
 
 means the occurrence, after the date of this Agreement (or with respect to any Lender, if later, the date on which such Lender becomes a Lender), of any of the following: (a) the adoption of any law, rule, regulation or treaty, (b) any change in any law, rule, regulation or treaty or in the administration, interpretation or application thereof by any Governmental Authority, or (c) the making or issuance of any request, guideline or directive (whether or not having the force of law) by any Governmental Authority; , that notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, (i) the Dodd-Frank Wall Street Reform and Consumer Protection Act and all requests, rules, guidelines or directives thereunder or issued in connection therewith and (ii) all requests, rules, guidelines or directives promulgated by the Bank for International Settlements, the Basel Committee on Banking Supervision (or any successor or similar authority) or the United States regulatory authorities, in each case pursuant to Basel III, shall in each case be deemed to be a Change in Law, regardless of the date enacted, adopted, promulgated or issued.
Change in Law
provided
however
 
 means the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended from time to time.
Code
 
 means a Revolving Commitment, an Incremental Revolving Commitment, or any combination thereof (as the context requires).
Commitment
 
 means, for any period, the ratio of (a) Consolidated EBITDAR for such period to (b) the sum of Consolidated Interest Expense plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
Consolidated Coverage Ratio
 
 means, for any period, Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, plus, without duplication and to the extent deducted from revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income, the sum of (a) consolidated interest expense for such period, (b) the aggregate amount of letter of credit fees accrued during such period, (c) the aggregate amount of income tax expense for such period, (d) all depreciation and amortization expense for such period and (e) other non-cash charges for such period (excluding any non-cash charges that constitute an accrual of or reserve for future cash payments), and minus, without duplication and to the extent added to revenues in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, all non-cash gains during such period, all as determined on a consolidated basis with respect to Holdings and the Subsidiaries in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated EBITDA
 
 means, for any period, the sum of Consolidated EBITDA for such period plus Consolidated Rent Expense for such period.
Consolidated EBITDAR
 
 means, on any date, the sum of (a) Total Debt as of such date and (b) the product of (i) Consolidated Rent Expense for the
Consolidated Adjusted Funded Debt
 
 
 
 
 
6
 
period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date) multiplied by (ii) 6.00.
 
 means, for any period, the interest expense of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period (including commissions, discounts, yield and other fees and charges incurred in connection with Securitization Transactions which are payable to any Person other than a Loan Party, and any other amounts comparable to or in the nature of interest under any Securitization Transaction, including losses on the sale of assets relating to any receivables securitization transaction accounted for as a true sale), determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP, less, to the extent included in interest expense, the amortization during such period of debt issuance and deferred financing costs, commissions and fees; , , that the aggregate amount of such amortization that may be excluded in calculating Consolidated Interest Expense in respect of any financing transaction shall not exceed 3.5% of the aggregate amount of such financing.
Consolidated Interest Expense
provided
however
 
  means, for any period, net income or loss of Holdings and its Subsidiaries for such period determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Net Income
 
 means, for any period, the rental expense attributable to leases of real property that is deducted in determining Adjusted Consolidated Net Income for such period, determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Consolidated Rent Expense
 
 means the directors of Holdings on the Effective Date and each other director, if, in each case, such other directors nomination for election or appointment to the board of directors of Holdings is approved by a majority of the then Continuing Directors.
Continuing Directors
 
 means the possession, directly or indirectly, of the power to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a Person, whether through the ability to exercise voting power, by contract or otherwise.   and  have meanings correlative thereto.
Control
Controlling
Controlled
 
 means the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank, the Swingline Lender and each other Lender.
Credit Party
 
  means any event or condition which constitutes an Event of Default or which upon notice, lapse of time or both would, unless cured or waived, become an Event of Default.
Default
 
 means any Lender that (a) has failed, within two Business Days of the date required to be funded or paid, to (i) fund any portion of its Loans, (ii) fund any portion of its participations in Letters of Credit or Swingline Loans or (iii) pay over to any Credit Party any other amount required to be paid by it hereunder, unless, in the case of clause (i) above, such Lender notifies the Administrative Agent in
Defaulting Lender
 
 
 
 
 
7
 
writing that such failure is the result of such Lenders good faith determination that a condition precedent to funding (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any) has not been satisfied, (b) has notified the Borrower or any Credit Party in writing, or has made a public statement to the effect, that it does not intend or expect to comply with any of its funding obligations under this Agreement (unless such writing or public statement indicates that such position is based on such Lenders good faith determination that a condition precedent (specifically identified and including the particular default, if any) to funding a loan under this Agreement cannot be satisfied) or generally under other agreements in which it commits to extend credit, (c) has failed, within three Business Days after request by a Credit Party, acting in good faith, to provide a certification in writing from an authorized officer of such Lender that it will comply with its obligations (and is financially able to meet such obligations) to fund prospective Loans and participations in then outstanding Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans under this Agreement, provided that such Lender shall cease to be a Defaulting Lender pursuant to this clause (c) upon such Credit Partys receipt of such certification in form and substance satisfactory to it and the Administrative Agent, or (d) has become the subject of a Bankruptcy Event.
 
 means a non-qualified deferred compensation plan that allows executives of the Borrower and the Subsidiaries to defer receipt of specified portions of base and bonus earnings each calendar year.  Deferrals are maintained as a liability, along with assets owned by the Borrower, in a trust owned by the Borrower.
Deferred Compensation Obligations
 
 means the actions, suits and proceedings and the environmental matters disclosed in Schedule 3.06.
Disclosed Matters
 
 means any Subsidiary incorporated or organized under the laws of the United States of America, any State thereof or the District of Columbia (other than such a Subsidiary wholly-owned by a Foreign Subsidiary that would be a controlled foreign corporation within the meaning of Section 957 of the Code).
Domestic Subsidiary
 
 or  refers to lawful money of the United States of America.
dollars
$
 
 means the date on which the conditions specified in Section 4.01 are satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02).
Effective Date
 
 means all laws, rules, regulations, codes, ordinances, orders, decrees, judgments, injunctions, notices or binding agreements issued, promulgated or entered into by or with any Governmental Authority, relating in any way to the environment, preservation or reclamation of natural resources, the management, release or threatened release of any Hazardous Material or to health and safety matters.
Environmental Laws
 
 means any liability, contingent or otherwise (including any liability for damages, costs of environmental remediation, fines, penalties or indemnities), of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary directly or indirectly
Environmental Liability
 
 
 
 
 
8
 
resulting from or based upon (a) violation of any Environmental Law, (b) the generation, use, handling, transportation, storage, treatment or disposal of any Hazardous Materials, (c) exposure to any Hazardous Materials, (d) the release or threatened release of any Hazardous Materials into the environment or (e) any contract, agreement or other consensual arrangement pursuant to which liability is assumed or imposed with respect to any of the foregoing.
 
 means shares of capital stock, partnership interests, membership interests in a limited liability company, beneficial interests in a trust or other equity ownership interests in a Person or any warrants, options or other rights to acquire such interests.
Equity Interests
 
 means the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended from time to time.
ERISA
 
 means any trade or business (whether or not incorporated) that, together with the Borrower, is treated as a single employer under Section 414(b) or (c) of the Code or, solely for purposes of Section 302 of ERISA and Section 412 of the Code, is treated as a single employer under Section 414 of the Code.
ERISA Affiliate
 
 means (a) any reportable event, as defined in Section 4043 of ERISA or the regulations issued thereunder with respect to a Plan (other than an event for which the 30-day notice period is waived); (b) a failure by any Plan to meet the minimum funding standards within the meaning of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA applicable to such Plan, in each case whether or not waived, (c) the filing pursuant to Section 412(c) of the Code or Section 302(c) of ERISA of an application for a waiver of the minimum funding standard with respect to any Plan, (d) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability under Title IV of ERISA with respect to the termination of any Plan; (e) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate from the PBGC or a plan administrator of any notice relating to an intention to terminate any Plan or Plans or to appoint a trustee to administer any Plan; (f) the incurrence by the Borrower or any of its ERISA Affiliates of any liability with respect to the withdrawal or partial withdrawal from any Plan or Multiemployer Plan; or (g) the receipt by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, or the receipt by any Multiemployer Plan from the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate of any notice, concerning the imposition of Withdrawal Liability or a determination that a Multiemployer Plan is, or is expected to be, insolvent or in reorganization, within the meaning of Title IV of ERISA.
ERISA Event
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether such Loan, or the Loans comprising such Borrowing, are bearing interest at a rate determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate.
Eurodollar
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Article VII.
Event of Default
 
 
 
 
9
 
 means any shares of capital stock of Holdings that constitute margin stock within the meaning of Regulation U of the Board and are held as treasury stock by Holdings.
Excluded Margin Stock
 
 means, with respect to the Administrative Agent, any Lender, the Issuing Bank or any other recipient of any payment to be made by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder, (a) income or franchise taxes imposed on (or measured by) its net income by the United States of America, or by the jurisdiction under the laws of which such recipient is organized or in which its principal office is located or, in the case of any Lender, in which its applicable lending office is located, (b) any branch profits taxes imposed by the United States of America or any similar tax imposed by any other jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located and (c) in the case of a Foreign Lender (other than an assignee pursuant to a request by the Borrower under Section 2.18(b)), any withholding tax (including a withholding tax under FATCA) that is imposed on amounts payable to such Foreign Lender at the time such Foreign Lender becomes a party to this Agreement (or designates a new lending office) or is attributable to such Foreign Lenders failure to comply with Section 2.16(f), except to the extent that such Foreign Lender (or its assignor, if any) was entitled, at the time of designation of a new lending office (or assignment), to receive additional amounts from the Borrower with respect to such withholding tax pursuant to Section 2.16(a).
Excluded Taxes
 
 means the Amended and Restated Credit Agreement dated as of October 5, 2006, as amended, among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders party thereto, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent.
Existing Credit Agreement
 
 means all letters of credit outstanding under the Existing Credit Agreement as of the Effective Date.
Existing Letters of Credit
 
 means Sections 1471 through 1474 of the Code, as of the date of this Agreement and any current or future regulations or official interpretations thereof.
FATCA
 
  means, for any day, the weighted average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the rates on overnight Federal funds transactions with members of the Federal Reserve System arranged by Federal funds brokers, as published on the next succeeding Business Day by the Federal Reserve Bank of New York, or, if such rate is not so published for any day that is a Business Day, the average (rounded upwards, if necessary, to the next 1/100 of 1%) of the quotations for such day for such transactions received by the Administrative Agent from three Federal funds brokers of recognized standing selected by it.
Federal Funds Effective Rate
 
 means the chief financial officer, vice president of finance, principal accounting officer, treasurer or controller of Holdings or the Borrower, as applicable.
Financial Officer
 
 means any Lender that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than that in which the Borrower is located.  For purposes of this
Foreign Lender
 
 
 
 
 
10
 
 
definition, the United States of America, each State thereof and the District of Columbia shall be deemed to constitute a single jurisdiction.
 
 means any Subsidiary that is organized under the laws of a jurisdiction other than the United States of America or any State thereof or the District of Columbia.
Foreign Subsidiary
 
 means generally accepted accounting principles in the United States of America.
GAAP
 
 means the government of the United States of America, any other nation or any political subdivision thereof, whether state or local, and any agency, authority, instrumentality, regulatory body, court, central bank or other entity exercising executive, legislative, judicial, taxing, regulatory or administrative powers or functions of or pertaining to government.
Governmental Authority
 
 of or by any Person (the ) means any obligation, contingent or otherwise, of the guarantor guaranteeing or having the economic effect of guaranteeing any Indebtedness or other obligation of any other Person (the ) in any manner, whether directly or indirectly, and including any obligation of the guarantor, direct or indirect, (a) to purchase or pay (or advance or supply funds for the purchase or payment of) such Indebtedness or other obligation or to purchase (or to advance or supply funds for the purchase of) any security for the payment thereof, (b) to purchase or lease property, securities or services for the purpose of assuring the owner of such Indebtedness or other obligation of the payment thereof, (c) to maintain working capital, equity capital or any other financial statement condition or liquidity of the primary obligor so as to enable the primary obligor to pay such Indebtedness or other obligation or (d) as an account party in respect of any letter of credit or letter of guaranty issued to support such Indebtedness or obligation; , that the term Guarantee shall not include endorsements for collection or deposit in the ordinary course of business.
Guarantee
guarantor
primary obligor
provided
 
 means the Guarantee Agreement, substantially in the form of Exhibit B, made by Holdings and the Subsidiaries parties thereto in favor of the Administrative Agent for the benefit of the Lenders.
Guarantee Agreement
 
 means, at any time, the requirement that (a) the Guarantee Agreement (or a supplement thereto) shall have been executed by Holdings and each Material Subsidiary (other than a SPE Subsidiary), shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent and shall be in full force and effect and (b) as to each Material Subsidiary (other than a SPE Subsidiary) that shall become a party to the Guarantee Agreement after the Effective Date, the Administrative Agent shall have received documents comparable to those delivered under paragraphs (b) and (c) of Section 4.01 with respect to Subsidiaries party to such Guarantee Agreement on the Effective Date.
Guarantee Requirement
 
  means all explosive or radioactive substances or wastes, all hazardous or toxic substances, wastes or other pollutants, including petroleum
Hazardous Materials
 
 
 
 
 
11
 
or petroleum distillates, asbestos or asbestos containing materials, polychlorinated biphenyls, radon gas, infectious or medical wastes and all other substances or wastes of any nature regulated pursuant to any Environmental Law.
 
 means Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Holdings
 
 means unsecured debt securities issued by Holdings in the capital markets.
Holdings Debt Securities
 
 of any Person means, without duplication, (a) all obligations of such Person for borrowed money or with respect to deposits or advances of any kind, (b) all obligations of such Person evidenced by bonds, debentures, notes or similar instruments, (c) all obligations of such Person under conditional sale or other title retention agreements relating to property acquired by such Person, (d) all obligations of such Person in respect of the deferred purchase price of property or services (excluding (i) accounts payable incurred in the ordinary course of business that are not overdue by more than 90 days and (ii) Deferred Compensation Obligations), (e) all Indebtedness of others secured by (or for which the holder of such Indebtedness has an existing right, contingent or otherwise, to be secured by) any Lien on property owned or acquired by such Person, whether or not the Indebtedness secured thereby has been assumed, (f) all Guarantees by such Person of Indebtedness of others, (g) all Capital Lease Obligations of such Person, (h) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person as an account party in respect of letters of credit and letters of guaranty, (i) all obligations, contingent or otherwise, of such Person in respect of bankers acceptances; and (j) the principal amount in respect of any Securitization Transactions.  The Indebtedness of any Person shall include the Indebtedness of any other entity (including any partnership in which such Person is a general partner) to the extent such Person is liable therefor as a result of such Persons ownership interest in or other relationship with such entity, except to the extent the terms of such Indebtedness provide that such Person is not liable therefor.  The amount of any Indebtedness described in clause (f) above shall be limited to the maximum amount payable under the applicable Guarantee of such Person if such Guarantee contains limitations on the amount payable thereunder.
Indebtedness
 
 means Taxes other than Excluded Taxes.
Indemnified Taxes
 
 means senior, unsecured, long-term indebtedness for borrowed money of Holdings that is not guaranteed by any other Person or subject to any other credit enhancement.
Index Debt
 
 means the Confidential Information Memorandum dated May 2011 relating to the Borrower and the Transactions.
Information Memorandum
 
 means, as of any day, Subsidiaries (a) the combined total assets of which are less than 5% of the consolidated total assets of Holdings as of the last day of the most recent fiscal quarter of Holdings in respect of which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01, (b) the combined net income of which is less than 5% of the consolidated net income of
Insignificant Subsidiaries
 
 
 
 
12
 
Holdings for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings ended on or prior to such date in respect of which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01 and (c) the combined revenues of which are less than 5% of the consolidated revenues of Holdings for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings ended on or prior to such date in respect of which financial statements have been delivered pursuant to Section 5.01.
 
 means a request by the Borrower to convert or continue a Borrowing in accordance with Section 2.07.
Interest Election Request
 
 means (a) with respect to any ABR Loan (other than a Swingline Loan), the last day of each March, June, September and December, (b) with respect to any Eurodollar Loan, the last day of the Interest Period applicable to the Borrowing of which such Loan is a part and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing with an Interest Period of more than three months duration, each day prior to the last day of such Interest Period that occurs at intervals of three months duration after the first day of such Interest Period, and (c) with respect to any Swingline Loan, the day that such Loan is required to be repaid.
Interest Payment Date
 
 means with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing, the period commencing on the date of such Borrowing and ending on the numerically corresponding day in the calendar month that is one, two, three or six months (or, to the extent made available by all Lenders, nine or twelve months or a day that is less than one month) thereafter, as the Borrower may elect; , that (i) if any Interest Period would end on a day other than a Business Day, such Interest Period shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day unless such next succeeding Business Day would fall in the next calendar month, in which case such Interest Period shall end on the next preceding Business Day and (ii) any Interest Period (other than an Interest Period of less than one month) that commences on the last Business Day of a calendar month (or on a day for which there is no numerically corresponding day in the last calendar month of such Interest Period) shall end on the last Business Day of the last calendar month of such Interest Period.  For purposes hereof, the date of a Borrowing initially shall be the date on which such Borrowing is made and thereafter shall be the effective date of the most recent conversion or continuation of such Borrowing.
Interest Period
provided
 
 means at any time one or more of (a) JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., (b) Bank of America, N.A., (c) Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., (d) solely in respect of any Existing Letters of Credit, the Person that is the issuer thereof or (e) any other Lender that agrees with the Administrative Agent and the Borrower to become an issuer of Letters of Credit hereunder.  An Issuing Bank may, in its discretion, arrange for one or more Letters of Credit to be issued by Affiliates of such Issuing Bank, in which case the term Issuing Bank shall include any such Affiliate with respect to Letters of Credit issued by such Affiliate
Issuing Bank
 
 means a payment made by an Issuing Bank pursuant to a Letter of Credit.
LC Disbursement
 
 
 
 
13
 
 means, at any time, the sum of (a) the aggregate undrawn amount of all outstanding Letters of Credit at such time plus (b) the aggregate amount of all LC Disbursements that have not yet been reimbursed by or on behalf of the Borrower at such time.  The LC Exposure of any Revolving Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total LC Exposure at such time.
LC Exposure
 
 means the Persons listed on Schedule 2.01 and any other Person that shall have become a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption or an agreement executed and delivered in accordance with Section 2.19, other than any such Person that ceases to be a party hereto pursuant to an Assignment and Assumption.  Unless the context otherwise requires, the term Lenders includes the Swingline Lender.
Lenders
 
 means any letter of credit issued pursuant to this Agreement.  Each Existing Letter of Credit will be deemed to constitute a Letter of Credit for all purposes under the Loan Documents as though each Existing Letter of Credit had been issued hereunder on the Effective Date.
Letter of Credit
 
 means, on any date, the ratio of (a) Consolidated Adjusted Funded Debt as of such date to (b) Consolidated EBITDAR for the period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings most recently ended as of such date (or, if such date is not the last day of a fiscal quarter, then most recently ended prior to such date), all determined on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP.
Leverage Ratio
 
 means, with respect to any Eurodollar Borrowing for any Interest Period, the rate appearing on Reuters LIBOR01 screen displaying British Bankers Association Interest Settlement Rates (or on any successor or substitute screen provided by Reuters, or any successor to or substitute for such service, providing rate quotations comparable to those currently provided on such screen, as determined by the Administrative Agent from time to time for purposes of providing quotations of interest rates applicable to dollar deposits in the London interbank market) at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period, as the rate for dollar deposits with a maturity comparable to such Interest Period.  In the event that such rate is not available at such time for any reason, then the LIBO Rate with respect to such Eurodollar Borrowing for such Interest Period shall be the rate at which dollar deposits of $5,000,000 and for a maturity comparable to such Interest Period are offered by the principal London office of the Administrative Agent in immediately available funds in the London interbank market at approximately 11:00 a.m., London time, two Business Days prior to the commencement of such Interest Period.
LIBO Rate
 
 means, with respect to any asset, (a) any mortgage, deed of trust, lien, pledge, hypothecation, encumbrance, charge or security interest in, on or of such asset, (b) the interest of a vendor or a lessor under any conditional sale agreement, capital lease or title retention agreement (or any financing lease having substantially the same economic effect as any of the foregoing) relating to such asset and (c) in the case of securities, any purchase option, call or similar right of a third party with respect to such securities.
Lien
 
 means this Agreement, the promissory notes, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.09(e), the documents, if any, executed and delivered pursuant to Section 2.19 and the Guarantee Agreement.
Loan Documents
 
 
 
 
14
 
 means Holdings, the Borrower, and any Subsidiary that Guarantees the Obligations.
Loan Parties
 
 means the loans made by the Lenders to the Borrower pursuant to  this Agreement.
Loans
 
 means a material adverse effect on (a) the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and the Subsidiaries taken as a whole, (b) the ability of any Loan Party to perform any of its obligations under any Loan Document or (c) the rights of or benefits available to the Lenders under any Loan Document.
Material Adverse Effect
 
 means Indebtedness (other than the Loans and Letters of Credit), or obligations in respect of one or more Swap Agreements, of any one or more of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate principal amount exceeding $25,000,000.  For purposes of determining Material Indebtedness, the principal amount of the obligations of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in respect of any Swap Agreement at any time shall be the maximum aggregate amount (giving effect to any netting agreements) that Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary would be required to pay if such Swap Agreement were terminated at such time.
Material Indebtedness
 
 means, as of any day, any Domestic Subsidiary (a) the total assets of which equal 5% or more of the consolidated total assets of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries as of the last day of the most recent fiscal quarter of Holdings in respect of which financial statements have been delivered under Section 5.01, (b) the net income of which equals 5% or more of the consolidated net income of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings ended on or prior to such date in respect of which financial statements have been delivered under Section 5.01 or (c) the revenues of which equal 5% or more of the consolidated revenues of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries for the most recent period of four consecutive fiscal quarters of Holdings ended on or prior to such date in respect of which financial statements have been delivered under Section 5.01; that if the combined total assets, combined net income or combined revenues of all Domestic Subsidiaries that under clauses (a), (b) and (c) above would not constitute Material Subsidiaries and which are not Guarantors shall exceed 10% of the consolidated total assets of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries, 10% of the consolidated net income of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries or 10% of the consolidated revenues of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries, as applicable, then one or more of such excluded Domestic Subsidiaries as designated by Holdings in a writing delivered to the Administrative Agent no more than 30 days after the date of determination pursuant to this definition that additional Subsidiaries must become Guarantors shall for all purposes of this Agreement be deemed to be Material Subsidiaries, until such excess shall have been eliminated.  For purposes of this
Material Subsidiary
provided
 
 
 
 
 
15
 
definition, (i) the total assets, net income and revenues of a Domestic Subsidiary shall be determined on an unconsolidated basis and (ii) the consolidated total assets, consolidated net income and consolidated revenues of Holdings and its Domestic Subsidiaries shall be determined without consolidating Foreign Subsidiaries.
 
 means Moodys Investors Service, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
Moodys
 
 means a multiemployer plan as defined in Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA.
Multiemployer Plan
 
 means, at any time, any Lender that is not a Defaulting Lender at such time.
Non-Defaulting Lender
 
 means the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the United States Department of the Treasury.
OFAC
 
 has the meaning set forth in the Guarantee Agreement.
Obligations
 
 means any and all current or future stamp or documentary taxes or any other excise or property taxes, charges or similar levies arising from any payment made under any Loan Document or from the execution, delivery or enforcement of, or otherwise with respect to, any Loan Document.
Other Taxes
 
 means, with respect to any Lender, any Person as to which such Lender is, directly or indirectly, a subsidiary.
Parent
 
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(c).
Participant
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 9.04(c).
Participant Register
 
 means the Pension Benefit Guaranty Corporation referred to and defined in ERISA and any successor entity performing similar functions.
PBGC
 
 means any acquisition by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower of all or substantially all the assets of, or all the Equity Interests in, a Person or division, line of business or business unit of a Person if, immediately after giving effect thereto, (a) no Default has occurred and is continuing or would result therefrom, (b) all transactions related thereto are consummated in accordance with applicable laws, (c) at least 50.1% of the Equity Interests of any Subsidiary formed for the purpose of or resulting from such acquisition shall be owned directly by the Borrower or a Subsidiary of the Borrower, (d) the Borrower and its Subsidiaries are in compliance, on a pro forma basis after giving effect to such acquisition, with the covenants contained in Sections 6.08 and 6.09 recomputed as of the last day of the most recently ended fiscal quarter of the Borrower for which financial statements are available, as if such acquisition (and any related incurrence or repayment of Indebtedness, with any new Indebtedness being deemed to be amortized over the
Permitted Acquisition
 
 
 
 
16
 
applicable testing period in accordance with its terms, and assuming that any Revolving Loans borrowed in connection with such acquisition are repaid with excess cash balances when available) had occurred on the first day of each relevant period for testing such compliance and (e) the Borrower has delivered to the Administrative Agent an officers certificate to the effect set forth in clauses (a), (b), (c) and (d) above, together with all relevant financial information for the Person or assets to be acquired.
 
 means:
Permitted Encumbrances
 
Liens imposed by law for taxes or government assessments that are not yet due or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(a)
 
carriers, warehousemens, mechanics, materialmens, repairmens and other like Liens imposed by law, arising in the ordinary course of business and securing obligations that are not overdue by more than 60 days or are being contested in compliance with Section 5.04;
(b)
 
pledges and deposits made in the ordinary course of business in compliance with workers compensation, unemployment insurance and other social security laws or regulations;
(c)
 
deposits (and, to the extent securing a trade contract or indemnity bond, Liens on assets to which such contract or bond relates) to secure the performance of bids, trade contracts, leases, statutory obligations, surety, indemnity and appeal bonds, performance bonds and other obligations of a like nature, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
(d)
 
judgment liens in respect of judgments that do not constitute an Event of Default under clause (k) of Article VII;
(e)
 
easements, zoning restrictions, rights-of-way and similar encumbrances on real property imposed by law or arising in the ordinary course of business that do not secure any monetary obligations and do not interfere with the ordinary conduct of business of Holdings or any Subsidiary;
(f)
 
any interest or title of a lessor under any lease that is limited to the property subject to such lease; and
(g)
 
unperfected Liens of any vendor on inventory sold by such vendor securing the unpaid purchase price of such inventory, to the extent such Liens are stated to be reserved in such vendors sale documents (and not granted by separate agreement of the Borrower or any Subsidiary);
(h)
 
that the term Permitted Encumbrances shall not include any Lien securing Indebtedness.
provided
 
 means:
Permitted Investments
 
 
 
 
 
17
 
direct obligations of, or obligations the principal of and interest on which are unconditionally guaranteed by, the United States of America (or by any agency thereof to the extent such obligations are backed by the full faith and credit of the United States of America), in each case maturing within one year from the date of acquisition thereof;
(a)
 
investments in commercial paper maturing within 270 days from the date of acquisition thereof and having, at such date of acquisition, a credit rating  from S&P of A1 or higher or from Moodys of P1 or higher;
(b)
 
investments in certificates of deposit, bankers acceptances and time deposits maturing within 180 days from the date of acquisition thereof issued or guaranteed by or placed with, and money market deposit accounts issued or offered by, any domestic office of any commercial bank organized under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof which has a combined capital and surplus and undivided profits of not less than $500,000,000;
(c)
 
fully collateralized repurchase agreements with a term of not more than 30 days for securities described in clause (a) above and entered into with a financial institution satisfying the criteria described in clause (c) above;
(d)
 
investments in money market or mutual funds substantially all the assets of which are comprised of securities of the types described in any of clauses (a) through (d) above; and
(e)
 
(f) corporate notes and corporate bonds or municipal securities which includes variable rate demand notes and auction rate municipals, assigned a credit rating from S&P of A2 or higher or from Moodys of A or higher.
 
 means any natural person, corporation, limited liability company, trust, joint venture, association, company, partnership, Governmental Authority or other entity.
Person
 
 means any employee pension benefit plan (other than a Multiemployer Plan) subject to the provisions of Title IV of ERISA or Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA, sponsored, maintained or contributed to by the Borrower or any ERISA Affiliate.
Plan
 
 means the rate of interest per annum publicly announced from time to time by JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as its prime rate in effect at its principal office in New York City; each change in the Prime Rate shall be effective from and including the date such change is publicly announced as being effective.
Prime Rate
 
 means (a) the rating by the applicable rating agency of the Index Debt or (b) in the absence of Index Debt, the corporate rating or corporate family rating or the equivalent applicable to Holdings by the applicable rating agency.
Rating
 
 has the meaning set forth in Section 9.04.
Register
 
 
 
 
18
 
 means, with respect to any specified Person, such Persons Affiliates and the respective directors, officers, employees, agents and advisors of such Person and such Persons Affiliates.
Related Parties
 
 means, at any time, Lenders having Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments representing more than 50% of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments at such time.
Required Lenders
 
 means the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments.
Revolving Availability Period
 
 means, with respect to each Lender, the commitment, if any, of such Lender to make Revolving Loans and to acquire participations in Letters of Credit and Swingline Loans hereunder, expressed as an amount representing the maximum aggregate amount of such Lenders Revolving Exposure hereunder, as such commitment may be (a) reduced from time to time pursuant to Section 2.08, (b) increased from time to time pursuant to Section 2.19 and (c) reduced or increased from time to time pursuant to assignments by or to such Lender pursuant to Section 9.04.  The initial amount of each Lenders Revolving Commitment is set forth on Schedule 2.01 or in the Assignment and Assumption or agreement executed in accordance with Section 2.19 pursuant to which such Lender shall have assumed its Revolving Commitment, as applicable.  The initial aggregate amount of the Lenders Revolving Commitments is $750,000,000.
Revolving Commitment
 
 means, with respect to any Lender at any time, the sum of the outstanding principal amount of such Lenders Revolving Loans and its LC Exposure and Swingline Exposure at such time.
Revolving Exposure
 
 means a Lender with a Revolving Commitment or, if the Revolving Commitments have terminated or expired, a Lender with Revolving Exposure.
Revolving Lender
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.01.
Revolving Loan
 
 means May 27, 2016.
Revolving Maturity Date
 
 means Standard & Poors Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and any successor to its rating agency business.
S&P
 
 has the meaning assigned to such term in Section 6.07.
Sale and Leaseback
 
 means any arrangement under which the Borrower or any other Subsidiary transfers, once or on a revolving basis, without recourse (except for indemnities and representations customary for securitization transactions and except for the retention of risk in an amount and form required by applicable laws and regulations or as is customary for a similar type of transaction)
Securitization Transaction
 
 
 
 
19
 
involving one or more true sale transactions, accounts receivable or interests therein and related assets customarily transferred in connection with securitization transactions (a) to a trust, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity, which transfer is funded in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by the incurrence or issuance by the transferee or successor transferee of Indebtedness or other securities that are to receive payments from, or that represent interests in, the cash flow derived from such accounts receivable or interests therein, or (b) directly to one or more investors or other purchasers.  The amount or principal amount of any Securitization Transaction shall be deemed at any time to be the aggregate principal or stated amount of the Indebtedness or other securities referred to in the first sentence of this definition or, if there shall be no such principal or stated amount, the uncollected amount of the accounts receivable or interests therein transferred pursuant to such Securitization Transaction, net of any such accounts receivable or interests therein that have been written off as uncollectible.
 
 means any Subsidiary formed solely for the purpose of, and that engages only in, one or more Securitization Transactions.
SPE Subsidiary
 
 means a fraction (expressed as a decimal), the numerator of which is the number one and the denominator of which is the number one minus the aggregate of the maximum reserve percentages (including any marginal, special, emergency or supplemental reserves) expressed as a decimal established by the Board to which the Administrative Agent is subject for eurocurrency funding (currently referred to as Eurocurrency Liabilities in Regulation D of the Board).  Such reserve percentages shall include those imposed pursuant to such Regulation D.  Eurodollar Loans shall be deemed to constitute eurocurrency funding and to be subject to such reserve requirements without benefit of or credit for proration, exemptions or offsets that may be available from time to time to any Lender under such Regulation D or any comparable regulation.  The Statutory Reserve Rate shall be adjusted automatically on and as of the effective date of any change in any reserve percentage.
Statutory Reserve Rate
 
 means, with respect to any Person (the ) at any date, any corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity the accounts of which would be consolidated with those of the parent in the parents consolidated financial statements if such financial statements were prepared in accordance with GAAP as of such date, as well as any other corporation, limited liability company, partnership, association or other entity (a) of which securities or other ownership interests representing more than 50% of the equity or more than 50% of the ordinary voting power or, in the case of a partnership, more than 50% of the general partnership interests are, as of such date, owned, controlled or held, or (b) that is, as of such date, otherwise Controlled, by the parent or one or more subsidiaries of the parent or by the parent and one or more subsidiaries of the parent.
subsidiary
parent
 
 means any subsidiary of Holdings or the Borrower, as the context requires.
Subsidiary
 
 means any agreement with respect to any swap, forward, future or derivative transaction or option or similar agreement involving, or
Swap Agreement
 
 
 
 
 
20
 
settled by reference to, one or more rates, currencies, commodities, equity or debt instruments or securities, or economic, financial or pricing indices or measures of economic, financial or pricing risk or value or any similar transaction or any combination of these transactions; that no phantom stock or similar plan providing for payments only on account of services provided by current or former directors, officers, employees or consultants of Holdings, the Borrower or the Subsidiaries shall be a Swap Agreement.
provided
 
 means, at any time, the aggregate principal amount of all Swingline Loans outstanding at such time.  The Swingline Exposure of any Lender at any time shall be its Applicable Percentage of the total Swingline Exposure at such time.
Swingline Exposure
 
 means JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., in its capacity as lender of Swingline Loans hereunder or any successor in such capacity pursuant to Section 2.04(d).
Swingline Lender
 
 means a Loan made pursuant to Section 2.04.
Swingline Loan
 
 means any and all present or future taxes, levies, imposts, duties, deductions, charges or withholdings imposed by any Governmental Authority.
Taxes
 
 means, as of the date of determination, an amount equal to all Indebtedness of Holdings and its Subsidiaries outstanding on such date, excluding Indebtedness described in clauses (e), (f) and (h) of the definition of Indebtedness; that any letters of credit and letters of guaranty referred to in clause (h) of the definition Indebtedness shall not be excluded from Total Debt to the extent issued to support any other obligations constituting Indebtedness.
Total Debt
provided
 
 means the execution and delivery by each Loan Party of each Loan Document to which it is a party, the borrowing of Loans, the use of the proceeds thereof and the issuance of Letters of Credit hereunder.
Transactions
 
, when used in reference to any Loan or Borrowing, refers to whether the rate of interest on such Loan, or on the Loans constituting such Borrowing, is determined by reference to the Adjusted LIBO Rate or the Alternate Base Rate.
Type
 
 means the Uniting and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism Act of 2001.
USA
PATRIOT
Act
 
 means liability to a Multiemployer Plan as a result of a complete or partial withdrawal from such Multiemployer Plan, as such terms are defined in Part I of Subtitle E of Title IV of ERISA.
Withdrawal Liability
 
 means any Loan Party and the Administrative Agent.
Withholding Agent
 
 
 
 
21
 
SECTION 1.02.
 
  For purposes of this Agreement, Loans may be classified and referred to by Type (, a Eurodollar Loan).  Borrowings also may be classified and referred to by Type (, a Eurodollar Borrowing).
Classification of Loans and Borrowings.
e.g.
e.g.
 
SECTION 1.03.
 
  The definitions of terms herein shall apply equally to the singular and plural forms of the terms defined.  Whenever the context may require, any pronoun shall include the corresponding masculine, feminine and neuter forms.  The words include, includes and including shall be deemed to be followed by the phrase without limitation.  The word will shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect as the word shall.  Unless the context requires otherwise (a) any definition of or reference to any agreement, instrument or other document herein shall be construed as referring to such agreement, instrument or other document as from time to time amended, supplemented or otherwise modified (subject to any restrictions on such amendments, supplements or modifications set forth herein), (b) any reference herein to any Person shall be construed to include such Persons successors and assigns, (c) the words herein, hereof and hereunder, and words of similar import, shall be construed to refer to this Agreement in its entirety and not to any particular provision hereof, (d) all references herein to Articles, Sections, Exhibits and Schedules shall be construed to refer to Articles and Sections of, and Exhibits and Schedules to, this Agreement and (e) the words asset and property shall be construed to have the same meaning and effect and to refer to any and all tangible and intangible assets and properties, including cash, securities, accounts and contract rights.
Terms Generally.
 
SECTION 1.04.
 
  Except as otherwise expressly provided herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature shall be construed in accordance with GAAP, as in effect from time to time; that (a) for purposes of determining compliance with any provision of this Agreement, the determination of whether a lease is to be treated as an operating lease or capital lease shall be made without giving effect to any change in accounting for leases pursuant to GAAP resulting from the implementation of proposed Accounting Standards Update (ASU) Leases (Topic 840) issued August 17, 2010, or any successor proposal, (b) if the Borrower notifies the Administrative Agent that the Borrower requests an amendment to any provision hereof to eliminate the effect of any change occurring after the date hereof in GAAP or in the application thereof on the operation of such provision (or if the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower that the Required Lenders request an amendment to any provision hereof for such purpose), regardless of whether any such notice is given before or after such change in GAAP or in the application thereof, then such provision shall be interpreted on the basis of GAAP as in effect and applied immediately before such change shall have become effective until such notice shall have been withdrawn or such provision amended in accordance herewith and (c) notwithstanding any other provision contained herein, all terms of an accounting or financial nature used herein shall be construed, and all computations of amounts and ratios referred to herein shall be made, without giving effect to any election under Statement of Financial Accounting Standards 159, The Fair Value Option for Financial Assets and Financial Liabilities, or any successor thereto (including pursuant to the Accounting Standards Codification), to value any Indebtedness of Holdings or any Subsidiary at fair
Accounting Terms; GAAP; Fiscal Month.
provided
 
 
 
 
22
 
value, as defined therein.  Except as otherwise provided herein, all references to a fiscal month shall mean any period of four or five calendar weeks used by the Borrower for recording or reporting its interim financial information.
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
 
  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, each Lender agrees to make Revolving Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period in an aggregate principal amount that will not result in such Lenders Revolving Exposure exceeding such Lenders Revolving Commitment.  Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Revolving Loans.
Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.02.
 
  (a)  Each  Revolving Loan shall be made as part of a Borrowing consisting of Revolving Loans of the same Type made by the Lenders ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.  The failure of any Lender to make any Revolving Loan required to be made by it shall not relieve any other Lender of its obligations hereunder; that the Revolving Commitments of the Lenders are several and no Lender shall be responsible for any other Lenders failure to make Revolving Loans as required.
Loans and Borrowings.
provided
 
(b)
 
Subject to Section 2.13, each Revolving Borrowing shall be comprised entirely of ABR Loans or Eurodollar Loans as the Borrower may request in accordance herewith.  Each Swingline Loan shall be an ABR Loan.  Each Lender at its option may make any Eurodollar Loan by causing any domestic or foreign branch or Affiliate of such Lender to make such Loan; that any exercise of such option shall not affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay such Loan in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
provided
 
(c)
 
At the commencement of each Interest Period for any Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000.  At the time that each ABR Revolving Borrowing is made, such Borrowing shall be in an aggregate amount that is an integral multiple of $500,000 and not less than $5,000,000; that (i) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the entire unused balance of the total Revolving Commitments and (ii) an ABR Revolving Borrowing may be in an aggregate amount that is equal to the amount that is required to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e).  Each Swingline Loan shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $100,000 and not less than $200,000.  Borrowings of more than one Type may be outstanding at the same time; that there shall not at any time be more than a total of 8 Eurodollar Borrowings outstanding.
provided
provided
 
(d)
 
Notwithstanding any other provision of this Agreement, the Borrower shall not be entitled to request, or to elect to convert or continue, any Borrowing if the
 
 
 
 
23
 
Interest Period requested with respect thereto would end after the Revolving Maturity Date.
 
SECTION 2.03.
 
   To request a Revolving Borrowing, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (a) in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of the proposed Borrowing or (b) in the case of an ABR Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of the proposed Borrowing; that any such notice of an ABR Revolving Borrowing to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as contemplated by Section 2.05(e) may be given not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the date of the proposed Borrowing.  Each such telephonic Borrowing Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Borrowing Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.  Each such telephonic and written Borrowing Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
Requests for Borrowings.
provided
 
(i)
 
the aggregate amount of such Borrowing;
 
(ii)
 
the date of such Borrowing, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
 
whether such Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing;
 
(iv)
 
in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, the initial Interest Period to be applicable thereto, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period; and
 
(v)
 
the location and number of the Borrowers account to which funds are to be disbursed, which shall comply with the requirements of Section 2.06.
 
If no election as to the Type of Borrowing is specified, then the requested Borrowing shall be an ABR Borrowing.  If no Interest Period is specified with respect to any requested Eurodollar Borrowing, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.  Promptly following receipt of a  Borrowing Request in accordance with this Section, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of the amount of such Lenders Loan to be made as part of the requested Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.04.
 
  (a)  Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Swingline Lender agrees to make Swingline Loans to the Borrower from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period, in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding that will not result in (i) the aggregate principal amount of outstanding Swingline Loans exceeding $50,000,000 or (ii) the sum of the total Revolving Exposures exceeding the total Revolving Commitments; that the Swingline Lender shall not be required to make a Swingline Loan to refinance an outstanding
Swingline Loans.
provided
 
 
 
 
24
 
Swingline Loan.  Within the foregoing limits and subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may borrow, prepay and reborrow Swingline Loans.
 
(b)
 
To request a Swingline Loan, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such request by telephone (confirmed by telecopy), not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the day of a proposed Swingline Loan.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the requested date (which shall be a Business Day) and amount of the requested Swingline Loan.  The Administrative Agent will promptly advise the Swingline Lender of any such notice received from the Borrower.  The Swingline Lender shall make each Swingline Loan available to the Borrower by means of a credit to the general deposit account of the Borrower with the Swingline Lender (or, in the case of a Swingline Loan made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e), by remittance to the applicable Issuing Bank) by 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on the requested date of such Swingline Loan.
 
(c)
 
The Swingline Lender may by written notice given to the Administrative Agent not later than 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on any Business Day require the Revolving Lenders to acquire participations on such Business Day in all or a portion of the Swingline Loans outstanding.  Such notice shall specify the aggregate amount of Swingline Loans in which Revolving Lenders will participate.  Promptly upon receipt of such notice, the Administrative Agent will give notice thereof to each Lender, specifying in such notice such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans.  Each Revolving Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees, upon receipt of notice as provided above, to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of the Swingline Lender, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of such Swingline Loan or Loans.  Each Revolving Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations in Swingline Loans pursuant to this paragraph is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Revolving Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.  Each Lender shall comply with its obligation under this paragraph by wire transfer of immediately available funds, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the Swingline Lender the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower of any participations in any Swingline Loan acquired pursuant to this paragraph, and thereafter payments in respect of such Swingline Loan shall be made to the Administrative Agent and not to the Swingline Lender.  Any amounts received by the Swingline Lender from the Borrower (or other party on behalf of the Borrower) in respect of a Swingline Loan after receipt by the Swingline Lender of the proceeds of a sale of participations therein shall be promptly remitted to the Administrative Agent; any such amounts received by the Administrative Agent shall be promptly remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Lenders that shall have made their payments pursuant to this paragraph and to the Swingline Lender, as their interests may appear.  The purchase of
 
 
 
 
25
 
participations in a Swingline Loan pursuant to this paragraph shall not relieve the Borrower of any default in the payment thereof.
 
(d)
 
  A Swingline Lender may be replaced by any other Lender at any time that there are no outstanding Swingline Loans by a written agreement among the Administrative Agent, the Borrower and successor Swingline Lender.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of the Swingline Lender.  From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Swingline Lender shall have all the rights and obligations of the Swingline Lender under this Agreement and (ii) references herein to the term Swingline Lender shall be deemed to refer to such successor Swingline Lender.  After the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), the replaced Swingline Lender shall not be required to make any Swingline Loans.  Notwithstanding any provisions to the contrary in Section 9.04, at no time following the replacement of the Swingline Lender pursuant to this clause (d), may the Swingline Lender as of such time make an assignment or assignments the effect of which would be to reduce its Revolving Commitment to zero.
Replacement of Swingline Lender.
 
SECTION 2.05.
 
  (a)    Subject to the terms and conditions set forth herein, the Borrower may request the issuance of Letters of Credit for its own account, in a form reasonably acceptable to the Administrative Agent and the applicable Issuing Bank, at any time and from time to time during the Revolving Availability Period.  In the event of any inconsistency between the terms and conditions of this Agreement and the terms and conditions of any form of letter of credit application or other agreement submitted by the Borrower to, or entered into by the Borrower with, an Issuing Bank relating to any Letter of Credit, the terms and conditions of this Agreement shall control.
Letters of Credit.
General.
 
(b)
 
  To request the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or the amendment, renewal or extension of an outstanding Letter of Credit), the Borrower shall hand deliver or telecopy (or transmit by electronic communication, if arrangements for doing so have been approved by the applicable Issuing Bank) to the applicable Issuing Bank and the Administrative Agent (reasonably in advance of the requested date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension) a notice requesting the issuance of a Letter of Credit, or identifying the Letter of Credit to be amended, renewed or extended, and specifying the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (which shall be a Business Day), the date on which such Letter of Credit is to expire (which shall comply with paragraph (c) of this Section), the amount of such Letter of Credit, the name and address of the beneficiary thereof and such other information as shall be necessary to prepare, amend, renew or extend such Letter of Credit.  If there is more than one Issuing Bank, the Borrower may select among the Issuing Banks in connection with the issuance of any Letter of Credit.  If requested by the Issuing Bank, the Borrower also shall submit a letter of credit application on the Issuing Banks standard form in connection with any request for a Letter of Credit.  A Letter of Credit shall be issued, amended, renewed or extended only if (and upon issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of each Letter of Credit the Borrower shall be deemed to represent and warrant that), after giving effect to such
Notice of Issuance, Amendment, Renewal, Extension; Certain Conditions.
 
 
 
 
26
 
issuance, amendment, renewal or extension (i) the LC Exposure shall not exceed $300,000,000 and (ii) the total Revolving Exposures shall not exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
 
(c)
 
  Each Letter of Credit shall expire at or prior to the close of business on the earlier of (i) the date one year after the date of the issuance of such Letter of Credit (or, in the case of any renewal or extension thereof, one year after such renewal or extension) and (ii) the date that is five Business Days prior to the Revolving Maturity Date; , , that a Letter of Credit may, if requested by the Borrower, provide by its terms for renewal for successive periods of up to one year each (but not beyond the date set forth in clause (ii) above) unless and until the applicable Issuing Bank shall have delivered a notice of nonrenewal, in accordance with such Letter of Credit, prior to the then expiry thereof to the beneficiary of such Letter of Credit.
Expiration Date.
provided
however
 
(d)
 
  By the issuance of a Letter of Credit (or an amendment to a Letter of Credit increasing the amount thereof) and without any further action on the part of the applicable Issuing Bank or the Lenders, the Issuing Bank that is the issuer thereof hereby grants to each Lender, and each Lender hereby acquires from such Issuing Bank, a participation in such Letter of Credit equal to such Lenders Applicable Percentage of the aggregate amount available to be drawn under such Letter of Credit.  In consideration and in furtherance of the foregoing, each Lender hereby absolutely and unconditionally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for the account of such Issuing Bank, such Lenders Applicable Percentage of each LC Disbursement made by such Issuing Bank and not reimbursed by the Borrower on the date due as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section, or of any reimbursement payment required to be refunded to the Borrower for any reason.  Each Lender acknowledges and agrees that its obligation to acquire participations pursuant to this paragraph in respect of Letters of Credit is absolute and unconditional and shall not be affected by any circumstance whatsoever, including any amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or the occurrence and continuance of a Default or reduction or termination of the Commitments, and that each such payment shall be made without any offset, abatement, withholding or reduction whatsoever.
Participations.
 
(e)
 
  If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement in respect of a Letter of Credit, the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement by paying to the Administrative Agent an amount equal to such LC Disbursement not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date that such LC Disbursement is made, if the Borrower shall have received notice of such LC Disbursement prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on such date, or, if such notice has not been received by the Borrower prior to such time on such date, then not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on (i) the Business Day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is received prior to 10:00 a.m., New York City time, on the day of the receipt, or (ii) the Business Day immediately following the day that the Borrower receives such notice, if such notice is not received prior to such time on the day of receipt; that, if such LC Disbursement is not less than $100,000, the Borrower may, subject to the conditions to borrowing set forth herein, request in accordance with Section 2.03 or 2.04 that such payment be financed with an ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan in an
Reimbursement.
provided
 
 
 
 
27
 
equivalent amount and, to the extent so financed, the Borrowers obligation to make such payment shall be discharged and replaced by the resulting ABR Revolving Borrowing or Swingline Loan.  If the Borrower fails to make such payment when due, the Administrative Agent shall notify each Lender of the applicable LC Disbursement, the payment then due from the Borrower in respect thereof and such Lenders Applicable Percentage thereof.  Promptly following receipt of such notice, each Lender shall pay to the Administrative Agent its Applicable Percentage of the payment then due from the Borrower, in the same manner as provided in Section 2.06 with respect to Revolving Loans made by such Lender (and Section 2.06 shall apply, , to the payment obligations of the Lenders), and the Administrative Agent shall promptly pay to the applicable Issuing Bank the amounts so received by it from the Lenders.  Promptly following receipt by the Administrative Agent of any payment from the Borrower pursuant to this paragraph, the Administrative Agent shall distribute such payment to the applicable Issuing Bank or, to the extent that Lenders have made payments pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse such Issuing Bank, then to such Lenders and such Issuing Bank as their interests may appear.  Any payment made by a Lender pursuant to this paragraph to reimburse an Issuing Bank for an LC Disbursement (other than the funding of ABR Revolving Loans or a Swingline Loan as contemplated above) shall not constitute a Loan and shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse such LC Disbursement.
mutatis
mutandis
 
(f)
 
  The Borrowers obligation to reimburse LC Disbursements as provided in paragraph (e) of this Section shall be absolute, unconditional and irrevocable, and shall be performed strictly in accordance with the terms of this Agreement under any and all circumstances whatsoever and irrespective of (i) any lack of validity or enforceability of any Letter of Credit or this Agreement, or any term or provision herein or therein, (ii) any draft or other document presented under a Letter of Credit proving to be forged, fraudulent or invalid in any respect or any statement therein being untrue or inaccurate in any respect, (iii) payment by an Issuing Bank under a Letter of Credit against presentation of a draft or other document that does not comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit or (iv) any other event or circumstance whatsoever, whether or not similar to any of the foregoing, that might, but for the provisions of this Section, constitute a legal or equitable discharge of, or provide a right of setoff against, the Borrowers obligations hereunder.  None of the Administrative Agent, the Lenders nor the Issuing Banks, nor any of their Related Parties, shall have any liability or responsibility by reason of or in connection with the issuance or transfer of any Letter of Credit or any payment or failure to make any payment thereunder (irrespective of any of the circumstances referred to in the preceding sentence), or any error, omission, interruption, loss or delay in transmission or delivery of any draft, notice or other communication under or relating to any Letter of Credit (including any document required to make a drawing thereunder), any error in interpretation of technical terms or any consequence arising from causes beyond the control of any Issuing Bank; that the foregoing shall not be construed to excuse any Issuing Bank from liability to the Borrower to the extent of any direct damages (as opposed to consequential damages, claims in respect of which are hereby waived by the Borrower to the extent permitted by applicable law) suffered by the Borrower that are caused by such Issuing Banks failure to exercise care when determining whether drafts and other documents presented under a
Obligations Absolute.
provided
 
 
 
 
28
 
Letter of Credit comply with the terms thereof.  The parties hereto expressly agree that, in the absence of gross negligence or wilful misconduct on the part of an Issuing Bank (as finally determined by a court of competent jurisdiction), such Issuing Bank shall be deemed to have exercised care in each such determination.  In furtherance of the foregoing and without limiting the generality thereof, the parties agree that, with respect to documents presented which appear on their face to be in substantial compliance with the terms of a Letter of Credit, an Issuing Bank may, in its sole discretion, either accept and make payment upon such documents without responsibility for further investigation, regardless of any notice or information to the contrary, or refuse to accept and make payment upon such documents if such documents are not in strict compliance with the terms of such Letter of Credit.
 
(g)
 
  The applicable Issuing Bank shall, promptly following its receipt thereof, examine all documents purporting to represent a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit.  The applicable Issuing Bank shall promptly notify the Administrative Agent and the Borrower by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of such demand for payment and whether such Issuing Bank has made or will make an LC Disbursement thereunder; that any failure to give or delay in giving such notice shall not relieve the Borrower of its obligation to reimburse the Issuing Bank and the  Lenders with respect to any such LC Disbursement.
Disbursement Procedures.
provided
 
(h)
 
  If an Issuing Bank shall make any LC Disbursement, then, unless the Borrower shall reimburse such LC Disbursement in full on the date such LC Disbursement is made, the unpaid amount thereof shall bear interest, for each day from and including the date such LC Disbursement is made to but excluding the date that the Borrower reimburses such LC Disbursement, at the rate per annum then applicable to ABR Revolving Loans; that, if the Borrower fails to reimburse such LC Disbursement when due pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section, then Section 2.12(c) shall apply.  Interest accrued pursuant to this paragraph shall be for the account of the applicable Issuing Bank, except that interest accrued on and after the date of payment by any Lender pursuant to paragraph (e) of this Section to reimburse such Issuing Bank shall be for the account of such Lender to the extent of such payment.
Interim Interest.
provided
 
(i)
 
  An Issuing Bank may be replaced at any time by written agreement among the Borrower, the Administrative Agent and the successor to such Issuing Bank.  The Administrative Agent shall notify the Lenders of any such replacement of an Issuing Bank.  At the time any such replacement shall become effective, the Borrower shall pay all unpaid fees accrued for the account of the replaced Issuing Bank pursuant to Section 2.11(c).  From and after the effective date of any such replacement, (i) the successor Issuing Bank shall have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement with respect to Letters of Credit to be issued by it thereafter and (ii) references herein to the term Issuing Bank shall be deemed to refer to such successor or to any previous Issuing Bank, or to such successor and all previous Issuing Banks, as the context shall require.  After the replacement of an Issuing Bank hereunder, the replaced Issuing Bank shall remain a party hereto and shall continue to have all the rights and obligations of an Issuing Bank under this Agreement
Replacement or Additions of Issuing Banks.
 
 
 
 
29
 
with respect to Letters of Credit issued by it prior to such replacement, but shall not be required to issue additional Letters of Credit.
 
(j)
 
  If any Event of Default shall occur and be continuing, on the Business Day that the Borrower receives notice from the Administrative Agent or the Required Lenders demanding the deposit of cash collateral pursuant to this paragraph, the Borrower shall deposit in an account with the Administrative Agent, in the name of the Administrative Agent and for the benefit of the Lenders, an amount in cash equal to 105% of the LC Exposure as of such date plus any accrued and unpaid interest thereon; that the obligation to deposit such cash collateral shall become effective immediately, and such deposit shall become immediately due and payable, without demand or other notice of any kind, upon the occurrence of any Event of Default with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of Article VII.  Each such deposit shall be held by the Administrative Agent as collateral for the payment and performance of the obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement.  The Administrative Agent shall have exclusive dominion and control, including the exclusive right of withdrawal, over such account.  Other than any interest earned on the investment of such deposits, which investments shall be made at the option and sole discretion of the Administrative Agent and at the Borrowers risk and expense, such deposits shall not bear interest.  Interest or profits, if any, on such investments shall accumulate in such account.  Moneys in such account shall be applied by the Administrative Agent to reimburse the Issuing Banks for LC Disbursements for which they have not been reimbursed and, to the extent not so applied, shall be held for the satisfaction of the reimbursement obligations of the Borrower for the LC Exposure at such time or, if the maturity of the Loans has been accelerated (but subject to the consent of the Required Lenders), be applied to satisfy other obligations of the Borrower under this Agreement.  If the Borrower is required to provide an amount of cash collateral hereunder as a result of the occurrence of an Event of Default, such amount (to the extent not applied as aforesaid) shall be returned to the Borrower within three Business Days after all Events of Default have been cured or waived.
Cash Collateralization.
provided
 
(k)
 
The applicable Issuing Bank shall deliver to the Administrative Agent, on or prior to the Effective Date, a schedule identifying all Existing Letters of Credit issued by it.  The applicable Issuing Bank also shall notify the Administrative Agent of any LC Disbursement or any expiration, termination or renewal of any Existing Letters of Credit issued by it.
 
SECTION 2.06.
 
  (a)  Each Lender shall make each Loan to be made by it hereunder on the proposed date thereof by wire transfer of immediately available funds by 12:00 noon, New York City time, to the account of the Administrative Agent most recently designated by it for such purpose by notice to the Lenders; that Swingline Loans shall be made as provided in Section 2.04.  The Administrative Agent will make such Loans available to the Borrower by promptly crediting the amounts so received, in like funds, to an account of the Borrower designated by the Borrower in the applicable Borrowing Request; that ABR Revolving Loans made to finance the reimbursement of an LC Disbursement as provided in Section 2.05(e) shall be remitted by the Administrative Agent to the Issuing Bank.
Funding of Borrowings.
provided
provided
 
 
 
 
30
 
(b)
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from a Lender prior to the proposed date of any Borrowing that such Lender will not make available to the Administrative Agent such Lenders share of such Borrowing, the Administrative Agent may assume that such Lender has made such share available on such date in accordance with paragraph (a) of this Section and may, in reliance upon such assumption, make available to the Borrower a corresponding amount.  In such event, if a Lender has not in fact made its share of the applicable Borrowing available to the Administrative Agent, then the applicable Lender and the Borrower severally agree to pay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand such corresponding amount with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is made available to the Borrower to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at (i) in the case of such Lender, the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation or (ii) in the case of the Borrower, the interest rate applicable to ABR Loans.  If such Lender pays such amount to the Administrative Agent, then such amount shall constitute such Lenders Loan included in such Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.07.
 
  (a)  Each Revolving Borrowing initially shall be of the Type specified in the applicable Borrowing Request and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, shall have an initial Interest Period as specified in such Borrowing Request.  Thereafter, the Borrower may elect to convert such Borrowing to a different Type or to continue such Borrowing and, in the case of a Eurodollar Borrowing, may elect Interest Periods therefor, all as provided in this Section.  The Borrower may elect different options with respect to different portions of the affected Borrowing, in which case each such portion shall be allocated ratably among the Lenders holding the Loans comprising such Borrowing, and the Loans comprising each such portion shall be considered a separate Borrowing.  This Section shall not apply to Swingline Borrowings, which may not be converted or continued.
Interest Elections.
 
(b)
 
To make an election pursuant to this Section, the Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of such election by telephone by the time that a Borrowing Request would be required under Section 2.03 if the Borrower were requesting a Revolving Borrowing of the Type resulting from such election to be made on the effective date of such election.  Each such telephonic Interest Election Request shall be irrevocable and shall be confirmed promptly by hand delivery or telecopy to the Administrative Agent of a written Interest Election Request in a form approved by the Administrative Agent and signed by the Borrower.
 
(c)
 
Each telephonic and written Interest Election Request shall specify the following information in compliance with Section 2.02:
 
(i)
 
the Borrowing to which such Interest Election Request applies and, if different options are being elected with respect to different portions thereof, the portions thereof to be allocated to each resulting Borrowing (in which case the information to be specified pursuant to clauses (iii) and (iv) below shall be specified for each resulting Borrowing);
 
 
 
 
31
 
(ii)
 
the effective date of the election made pursuant to such Interest Election Request, which shall be a Business Day;
 
(iii)
 
whether the resulting Borrowing is to be an ABR Borrowing or a Eurodollar Borrowing; and
 
(iv)
 
if the resulting Borrowing is a Eurodollar Borrowing, the Interest Period to be applicable thereto after giving effect to such election, which shall be a period contemplated by the definition of the term Interest Period.
 
If any such Interest Election Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing but does not specify an Interest Period, then the Borrower shall be deemed to have selected an Interest Period of one months duration.
 
(d)
 
Promptly following receipt of an Interest Election Request, the Administrative Agent shall advise each Lender of the details thereof and of such Lenders portion of each resulting Borrowing.
 
(e)
 
If the Borrower fails to deliver a timely Interest Election Request with respect to a Eurodollar Borrowing prior to the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto, then, unless such Borrowing is repaid as provided herein, at the end of such Interest Period such Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing.  Notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing and the Administrative Agent, at the request of the Required Lenders, so notifies the Borrower, then, so long as an Event of Default is continuing (i) no outstanding Borrowing may be converted to or continued as a Eurodollar Borrowing and (ii) unless repaid, each Eurodollar Borrowing shall be converted to an ABR Borrowing at the end of the Interest Period applicable thereto.
 
SECTION 2.08.
 
  (a)  Unless previously terminated, the Revolving Commitments shall terminate on the Revolving Maturity Date.
Termination and Reduction of Commitments.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower may at any time terminate, or from time to time reduce, the Revolving Commitments; that (i) each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be in an amount that is an integral multiple of $1,000,000 and not less than $5,000,000 and (ii) the Borrower shall not terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments if, after giving effect to any concurrent prepayment of the Revolving Loans in accordance with Section 2.10, the sum of the Revolving Exposures would exceed the total Revolving Commitments.
provided
 
(c)
 
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative Agent of any election to terminate or reduce the Revolving Commitments under paragraph (b) of this Section at least three Business Days prior to the effective date of such termination or reduction, specifying such election and the effective date thereof.  Promptly following receipt of any such notice, the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to this Section shall be irrevocable; that a notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments delivered by the
provided
 
 
 
 
32
 
Borrower may state that such notice is conditioned upon the effectiveness of other credit facilities, in which case such notice may be revoked by the Borrower (by notice to the Administrative Agent on or prior to the specified effective date) if such condition is not satisfied.  Any termination or reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be permanent.  Each reduction of the Revolving Commitments shall be made ratably among the Lenders in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments.
 
SECTION 2.09.
 
  (a)  The Borrower hereby unconditionally promises to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Revolving Loan of such Lender on the Revolving Maturity Date and (ii)  to the Swingline Lender the then unpaid principal amount of each Swingline Loan on the earlier of the Revolving Maturity Date and the first date after such Swingline Loan is made that is the 15th or last day of a calendar month and is at least two Business Days after such Swingline Loan is made; that on each date that a Revolving Borrowing is made, the Borrower shall repay all Swingline Loans then outstanding.
Repayment of Loans; Evidence of Debt.
provided
 
(b)
 
Each Lender shall maintain in accordance with its usual practice an account or accounts evidencing the indebtedness of the Borrower to such Lender resulting from each Loan made by such Lender, including the amounts of principal and interest payable and paid to such Lender from time to time hereunder.
 
(c)
 
The Administrative Agent shall maintain accounts in which it shall record (i) the amount of each Loan made hereunder, the Type thereof and the Interest Period applicable thereto, (ii) the amount of any principal or interest due and payable or to become due and payable from the Borrower to each Lender hereunder and (iii) the amount of any sum received by the Administrative Agent hereunder for the account of the Lenders and each Lenders share thereof.
 
(d)
 
The entries made in the accounts maintained pursuant to paragraph (b) or (c) of this Section shall be evidence of the existence and amounts of the obligations recorded therein; that the failure of any Lender or the Administrative Agent to maintain such accounts or any error therein shall not in any manner affect the obligation of the Borrower to repay the Loans in accordance with the terms of this Agreement.
prima
facie
provided
 
(e)
 
Any Lender may request that Loans made by it be evidenced by a promissory note.  In such event, the Borrower shall prepare, execute and deliver to such Lender a promissory note payable to the order of such Lender (or, if requested by such Lender, to such Lender and its registered assigns) and in a form approved by the Administrative Agent.  Thereafter, the Loans evidenced by such promissory note and interest thereon shall at all times (including after assignment pursuant to Section 9.04) be represented by one or more promissory notes in such form payable to the order of the payee named therein (or, if such promissory note is a registered note, to such payee and its registered assigns).
 
 
 
 
33
 
SECTION 2.10.
 
  (a)  The Borrower shall have the right at any time and from time to time to prepay any Borrowing in whole or in part, subject to the requirements of this Section.
Prepayment of Loans.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower shall notify the Administrative  Agent (and, in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, the Swingline Lender) by telephone (confirmed by telecopy) of any prepayment hereunder (i) in the case of prepayment of a Eurodollar Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, three Business Days before the date of prepayment, (ii) in the case of prepayment of an ABR Revolving Borrowing, not later than 11:00 a.m., New York City time, one Business Day before the date of prepayment or (iii) in the case of prepayment of a Swingline Loan, not later than 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date of prepayment.  Each such notice shall be irrevocable and shall specify the prepayment date and the principal amount of each Borrowing or portion thereof to be prepaid; that, if a notice of prepayment is given in connection with a conditional notice of termination of the Revolving Commitments as contemplated by Section 2.08, then such notice of prepayment may be revoked if such notice of termination is revoked in accordance with Section 2.08.  Promptly following receipt of any such notice (other than a notice relating solely to Swingline Loans), the Administrative Agent shall advise the Lenders of the contents thereof.  Each partial prepayment of any Borrowing shall be in an amount that would be permitted in the case of an advance of a Borrowing of the same Type as provided in Section 2.02.  Each prepayment of a Borrowing shall be applied ratably to the Loans included in the prepaid Borrowing.  Prepayments shall be accompanied by accrued interest to the extent required by Section 2.12.
provided
 
SECTION 2.11.
 
  (a)  The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a facility fee, which shall accrue at the Applicable Rate on the amount of the Revolving Commitment of such Lender during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate; that, if such Lender continues to have any Revolving Exposure after its Commitment terminates, then such facility fee shall continue to accrue on the daily amount of such Lenders Revolving Exposure from and including the date on which its Commitment terminates to but excluding the date on which such Lender ceases to have any Revolving Exposure.  Accrued facility fees shall be payable in arrears on the last day of March, June, September and December of each year and on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date.  All facility fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
Fees.
provided
 
(b)
 
The Borrower agrees to pay (i) to the Administrative Agent for the account of each Lender a participation fee with respect to its participations in Letters of Credit, which shall accrue at the same Applicable Rate as interest on Eurodollar Revolving Loans on the average daily amount of such Lenders LC Exposure (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date on which such Lenders Revolving Commitment terminates and the date on which such Lender ceases to
 
 
 
 
34
 
have any LC Exposure, and (ii) to each Issuing Bank a fronting fee, which shall accrue at the rate of 0.20% per annum on the average daily amount of the LC Exposure attributable to Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank (excluding any portion thereof attributable to unreimbursed LC Disbursements) during the period from and including the Effective Date to but excluding the later of the date of termination of the Revolving Commitments and the date on which there ceases to be any such LC Exposure, as well as such Issuing Banks standard fees with respect to the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or processing of drawings thereunder.  Participation fees and fronting fees accrued through and including the last day of March, June, September and December of each year shall be payable on the third Business Day following such last day, commencing on the first such date to occur after the Effective Date; that all such fees shall be payable on the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate and any such fees accruing after the date on which the Revolving Commitments terminate shall be payable on demand.  Any other fees payable to an Issuing Bank pursuant to this paragraph shall be payable within 10 days after demand.  All participation fees and fronting fees shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days and shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).
provided
 
(c)
 
The Borrower agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, for its own account, fees payable in the amounts and at the times separately agreed upon between the Borrower and the Administrative Agent.
 
(d)
 
All fees payable hereunder shall be paid on the dates due, in immediately available funds, to the Administrative Agent (or to the applicable Issuing Bank, in the case of fees payable to it) for distribution, in the case of commitment fees and participation fees, to the Lenders entitled thereto.  Fees paid shall not be refundable under any circumstances.
 
SECTION 2.12.
 
  (a)  The Loans comprising each ABR Borrowing (including each Swingline Loan) shall bear interest at the Alternate Base Rate plus the Applicable Rate.
Interest.
 
(b)
 
The Loans comprising each Eurodollar Borrowing shall bear interest at the Adjusted LIBO Rate for the Interest Period in effect for such Borrowing plus the Applicable Rate.
 
(c)
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, if any principal of or interest on any Loan or any fee or other amount payable by the Borrower hereunder is not paid when due, whether at stated maturity, upon acceleration or otherwise, such overdue amount shall bear interest, after as well as before judgment, at a rate per annum equal to (i) in the case of overdue principal of any Loan, 2% plus the rate otherwise applicable to such Loan as provided in the preceding paragraphs of this Section or (ii) in the case of any other amount, 2% plus the rate applicable to ABR Loans as provided in paragraph (a) of this Section.
 
 
 
 
35
 
(d)
 
Accrued interest on each Loan shall be payable in arrears on each Interest Payment Date for such Loan and upon termination of the Revolving Commitments; that (i) interest accrued pursuant to paragraph (c) of this Section shall be payable on demand, (ii) in the event of any repayment or prepayment of any Loan (other than a prepayment of an ABR Revolving Loan prior to the end of the Revolving Availability Period), accrued interest on the principal amount repaid or prepaid shall be payable on the date of such repayment or prepayment and (iii) in the event of any conversion of any Eurodollar Loan prior to the end of the current Interest Period therefor, accrued interest on such Loan shall be payable on the effective date of such conversion.
provided
 
(e)
 
All interest hereunder shall be computed on the basis of a year of 360 days, except that interest computed by reference to the Alternate Base Rate at times when the Alternate Base Rate is based on the Prime Rate shall be computed on the basis of a year of 365 days (or 366 days in a leap year), and in each case shall be payable for the actual number of days elapsed (including the first day but excluding the last day).  The applicable Alternate Base Rate or Adjusted LIBO Rate shall be determined by the Administrative Agent, and such determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
SECTION 2.13.
 
  If prior to the commencement of any Interest Period for a Eurodollar Borrowing:
Alternate Rate of Interest.
 
(a)
 
the Administrative Agent determines (which determination shall be conclusive absent manifest error) that adequate and reasonable means do not exist for ascertaining the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period; or
 
(b)
 
the Administrative Agent is advised by the Required Lenders that the Adjusted LIBO Rate for such Interest Period will not adequately and fairly reflect the cost to such Lenders of making or maintaining their Loans included in such Borrowing for such Interest Period;
 
then the Administrative Agent shall give notice thereof to the Borrower and the Lenders by telephone or telecopy as promptly as practicable thereafter and, until the Administrative Agent notifies the Borrower and the Lenders that the circumstances giving rise to such notice no longer exist, (i) any Interest Election Request that requests the conversion of any Borrowing to, or continuation of any Borrowing as, a Eurodollar Borrowing shall be ineffective and (ii) if any Borrowing Request requests a Eurodollar Borrowing, such Borrowing shall be made as an ABR Borrowing.
 
SECTION 2.14.
 
  (a)  Other than in respect of Taxes governed by Section 2.16, if any Change in Law shall:
Increased Costs.
 
(i)
 
impose, modify or deem applicable any reserve, special deposit or similar requirement against assets of, deposits with or for the account of, or credit extended by, any Lender (except any such reserve requirement reflected in the Adjusted LIBO Rate) or any Issuing Bank; or
 
 
 
 
36
 
(ii)
 
impose on any Lender or any Issuing Bank or the London interbank market any other condition affecting this Agreement or Eurodollar Loans made by such Lender or any Letter of Credit or participation therein;
 
and the result of any of the foregoing shall be to increase the cost to such Lender of making or maintaining any Eurodollar Loan (or of maintaining its obligation to make any such Loan) or to increase the cost to such Lender or Issuing Bank of participating in, issuing or maintaining any Letter of Credit or to reduce the amount of any sum received or receivable by such Lender or Issuing Bank hereunder (whether of principal, interest or otherwise), then the Borrower will pay to such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, for such additional costs incurred or reduction suffered.
 
(b)
 
If any Lender or any Issuing Bank determines that any Change in Law regarding capital requirements has or would have the effect of reducing the rate of return on such Lenders or any Issuing Banks capital or on the capital of such Lenders or any Issuing Banks holding company, if any, as a consequence of this Agreement or the Loans made by, or participations in Letters of Credit held by, such Lender, or the Letters of Credit issued by such Issuing Bank, to a level below that which such Lender or  Issuing Bank or such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company could have achieved but for such Change in Law (taking into consideration such Lenders or Issuing Banks policies and the policies of such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company with respect to capital adequacy), then from time to time the Borrower will pay to such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, such additional amount or amounts as will compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank or such Lenders or Issuing Banks holding company for any such reduction suffered.
 
(c)
 
A certificate of a Lender or an Issuing Bank setting forth the amount or amounts necessary to compensate such Lender or Issuing Bank or its holding company, as the case may be, as specified in paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender or Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
 
(d)
 
Failure or delay on the part of any Lender or any Issuing Bank to demand compensation pursuant to this Section shall not constitute a waiver of such Lenders or Issuing Banks right to demand such compensation; that the Borrower shall not be required to compensate a Lender or an Issuing Bank pursuant to this Section for any increased costs or reductions incurred more than 270 days prior to the date that such Lender or an Issuing Bank, as the case may be, notifies the Borrower of the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions and of such Lenders or an Issuing Banks intention to claim compensation therefor; that, if the Change in Law giving rise to such increased costs or reductions is retroactive, then the 270-day period referred to above shall be extended to include the period of retroactive effect thereof.
provided
provided
further
 
 
 
 
37
 
SECTION 2.15.
 
  In the event of (a) the payment of any principal of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of an Interest Period applicable thereto (including as a result of an Event of Default), (b) the conversion of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto, (c) the failure to borrow, convert, continue or prepay any Revolving Loan on the date specified in any notice delivered pursuant hereto (regardless of whether such notice may be revoked under Section 2.10(b) and is revoked in accordance therewith), or (d) the assignment of any Eurodollar Loan other than on the last day of the Interest Period applicable thereto as a result of a request by the Borrower pursuant to Section 2.18, then, in any such event, the Borrower shall compensate each Lender for the loss, cost and expense attributable to such event.  In the case of a Eurodollar Loan, such loss, cost or expense to any Lender shall be deemed to include an amount determined by such Lender to be the excess, if any, of (i) the amount of interest which would have accrued on the principal amount of such Loan had such event not occurred, at the Adjusted LIBO Rate that would have been applicable to such Loan, for the period from the date of such event to the last day of the then current Interest Period therefor (or, in the case of a failure to borrow, convert or continue, for the period that would have been the Interest Period for such Loan), over (ii) the amount of interest which would accrue on such principal amount for such period at the interest rate which such Lender would bid were it to bid, at the commencement of such period, for dollar deposits of a comparable amount and period from other banks in the Eurodollar market.  A certificate of any Lender setting forth any amount or amounts that such Lender is entitled to receive pursuant to this Section, and, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, shall be delivered to the Borrower and shall be conclusive absent manifest error.  The Borrower shall pay such Lender the amount shown as due on any such certificate within 10 days after receipt thereof.
Break Funding Payments.
 
SECTION 2.16.
 
  (a)  Any and all payments by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall be made free and clear of and without deduction for any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes; that if the Borrower shall be required to deduct any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes from such payments, then (i) the sum payable shall be increased as necessary so that after making all required deductions (including deductions applicable to additional sums payable under this Section) the Administrative Agent, Lender or Issuing Bank (as the case may be) receives an amount equal to the sum it would have received had no such deductions been made, (ii) the Borrower shall make such deductions and (iii) the Borrower shall pay the full amount deducted to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
Taxes.
provided
 
(b)
 
In addition, the Borrower shall pay any Other Taxes to the relevant Governmental Authority in accordance with applicable law.
 
(c)
 
The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Lender and each Issuing Bank, within 10 days after written demand therefor, for the full amount of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes paid by the Administrative Agent, such Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, on or with respect to any payment by or on account of any obligation of the Borrower hereunder or under any other Loan Document (including Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes imposed or asserted on or attributable to
 
 
 
 
38
 
amounts payable under this Section) and any penalties, interest and reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  A certificate as to the amount of such payment or liability, and setting forth, in reasonable detail, the basis therefor, delivered to the Borrower by a Lender or an Issuing Bank, or by the Administrative Agent on its own behalf or on behalf of a Lender or an Issuing Bank, shall be conclusive absent manifest error.
 
(d)
 
As soon as practicable after any payment of Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes by the Borrower to a Governmental Authority, the Borrower shall deliver to the Administrative Agent the original or a certified copy of a receipt issued by such Governmental Authority evidencing such payment, a copy of the return reporting such payment or other evidence of such payment reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent.
 
(e)
 
Each Lender shall severally indemnify the Administrative Agent for any Taxes (but, in the case of any Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes, only to the extent that any Loan Party has not already indemnified the Administrative Agent for such Indemnified Taxes or Other Taxes and without limiting the obligation of the Loan Parties to do so) attributable to such Lender that are paid or payable by the Administrative Agent in connection with any Loan Document and any reasonable expenses arising therefrom or with respect thereto, whether or not such Taxes were correctly or legally imposed or asserted by the relevant Governmental Authority.  The indemnity under this Section 2.16(e) shall be paid within 10 days after the Administrative Agent delivers to the applicable Lender a certificate stating the amount of Taxes so paid or payable by the Administrative Agent.  Such certificate shall be conclusive of the amount so paid or payable absent manifest error.
 
(f)
 
(i)  Any Foreign Lender that is entitled to an exemption from or reduction of withholding tax under the Code, the law of the jurisdiction in which the Borrower is located, or any treaty to which such jurisdiction is a party, with respect to payments under this Agreement shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy to the Administrative Agent), at the time or times prescribed by applicable law, such properly completed and executed documentation prescribed by applicable law or reasonably requested by the Borrower as will permit such payments to be made without withholding or at a reduced rate.  Any Foreign Lender which is not a bank within the meaning of Section 881(c)(3)(A) of the Code and intends to claim exemption from U.S. Federal withholding tax under Section 871(h) or 881(c) of the Code with respect to payments of portfolio interest shall deliver to the Borrower (with a copy for the Administrative Agent) a Form W-8BEN, or any subsequent versions thereof or successors thereto (and, if such Foreign Lender delivers a Form W-8BEN, a certificate representing that such Foreign Lender is not a bank for purposes of Section 881(c) of the Code, is not a ten-percent shareholder (within the meaning of Section 871(h)(3)(B) of the Code) of the Borrower and is not a controlled foreign corporation related to the Borrower (within the meaning of Section 864(d)(4) of the Code)), properly completed and duly executed by such Foreign Lender claiming complete exemption from, or a reduced rate of, U.S.
 
 
 
 
39
 
Federal withholding tax on payments of interest by the Borrower under this Agreement and the other Loan Documents.
 
(ii)
 
If a payment made to a Lender under any Loan Document would be subject to U.S. Federal withholding Tax imposed by FATCA if such Lender were to fail to comply with the applicable reporting requirements of FATCA (including those contained in Section 1471(b) or 1472(b) of the Code, as applicable), such Lender shall deliver to the Withholding Agent, at the time or times prescribed by law and at such time or times reasonably requested by the Withholding Agent, such documentation prescribed by applicable law (including as prescribed by Section 1471(b)(3)(C)(i) of the Code) and such additional documentation reasonably requested by the Withholding Agent as may be necessary for the Withholding Agent to comply with its obligations under FATCA, to determine that such Lender has or has not complied with such Lenders obligations under FATCA and, as necessary, to determine the amount to deduct and withhold from such payment.  Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in the preceding sentence, the completion, execution and submission of such documentation shall not be required if in the Lenders reasonable judgment such completion, execution or submission would subject such Lender to any material unreimbursed cost or expense or would materially prejudice the legal or commercial position of such Lender.  Solely for purposes of this Section 2.16(f)(ii), FATCA shall include any amendments made to FATCA after the date of this Agreement.
 
(g)
 
If the Administrative Agent or a Lender determines, in its sole discretion, that it has received a refund of any Taxes or Other Taxes as to which it has been indemnified by the Borrower or with respect to which the Borrower has paid additional amounts pursuant to this Section 2.16, it shall pay over such refund to the Borrower (but only to the extent of indemnity payments made, or additional amounts paid, by the Borrower under this Section 2.16 with respect to the Taxes or Other Taxes giving rise to such refund), net of all out-of-pocket expenses of the Administrative Agent or such Lender and without interest (other than any interest paid by the relevant Governmental Authority with respect to such refund); that the Borrower, upon the request of the Administrative Agent or such Lender, agrees to repay the amount paid over to the Borrower (plus any penalties, interest or other charges imposed by the relevant Governmental Authority) to the Administrative Agent or such Lender in the event the Administrative Agent or such Lender is required to repay such refund to such Governmental Authority.  Nothing contained in this Section  2.16(g) shall require the Administrative Agent or any Lender to make available its tax returns (or any other information relating to its taxes which it deems confidential) to the Borrower or any other Person.
provided
 
SECTION 2.17.
 
  (a)  The Borrower shall make each payment required to be made by it hereunder or under any other Loan Document (whether of principal, interest, fees or reimbursement of LC Disbursements, or of amounts payable under Section 2.14, 2.15, 2.16, or otherwise) prior to 12:00 noon, New York City time, on the date when due, in immediately available funds, without set-off or counterclaim.  Any amounts received after such time on any date
Payments Generally; Pro Rata Treatment; Sharing of Set-offs.
 
 
 
 
40
 
may, in the discretion of the Administrative Agent, be deemed to have been received on the next succeeding Business Day for purposes of calculating interest thereon.  All such payments shall be made to such account as may be specified by the Administrative Agent, except payments to be made directly to an Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender as expressly provided herein and except that payments pursuant to Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03 shall be made directly to the Persons entitled thereto and payments pursuant to other Loan Documents shall be made to the Persons specified therein.  The Administrative Agent shall distribute any such payment received by it for the account of any other Person to the appropriate recipient promptly following receipt thereof.  If any payment under any Loan Document shall be due on a day that is not a Business Day, the date for payment shall be extended to the next succeeding Business Day, and, in the case of any payment accruing interest, interest thereon shall be payable for the period of such extension.  All payments under each Loan Document shall be made in dollars.
 
(b)
 
If at any time insufficient funds are received by and available to the Administrative Agent to pay fully all amounts of principal, unreimbursed LC Disbursements, interest and fees then due hereunder, such funds shall be applied (i) first, towards payment of interest and fees then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of interest and fees then due to such parties, and (ii) second, towards payment of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due hereunder, ratably among the parties entitled thereto in accordance with the amounts of principal and unreimbursed LC Disbursements then due to such parties.
 
(c)
 
If any Lender shall, by exercising any right of set-off or counterclaim or otherwise, obtain payment in respect of any principal of or interest on any of its Revolving Loans or participations in LC Disbursements or Swingline Loans resulting in such Lender receiving payment of a greater proportion of the aggregate amount of its Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans and accrued interest thereon than the proportion received by any other Lender, then the Lender receiving such greater proportion shall purchase (for cash at face value) participations in the Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans of other Lenders to the extent necessary so that the benefit of all such payments shall be shared by the Lenders ratably in accordance with the aggregate amount of principal of and accrued interest on their respective Revolving Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans; that (i) if any such participations are purchased and all or any portion of the payment giving rise thereto is recovered, such participations shall be rescinded and the purchase price restored to the extent of such recovery, without interest, and (ii) the provisions of this paragraph shall not be construed to apply to any payment made by the Borrower pursuant to and in accordance with the express terms of this Agreement or any payment obtained by a Lender as consideration for the assignment of or sale of a participation in any of its Loans or participations in LC Disbursements to any assignee or participant, other than to the Borrower or any Subsidiary or Affiliate thereof (as to which the provisions of this paragraph shall apply).  The Borrower consents to the foregoing and agrees, to the extent it may effectively do so under applicable law, that any Lender acquiring a participation pursuant to the foregoing arrangements may exercise against the Borrower rights of set-
provided
 
 
 
 
41
 
off and counterclaim with respect to such participation as fully as if such Lender were a direct creditor of the Borrower in the amount of such participation.
 
(d)
 
Unless the Administrative Agent shall have received notice from the Borrower prior to the date on which any payment is due to the Administrative Agent for the account of the Lenders or an Issuing Bank hereunder that the Borrower will not make such payment, the Administrative Agent may assume that the Borrower has made such payment on such date in accordance herewith and may, in reliance upon such assumption, distribute to the Lenders or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, the amount due.  In such event, if the Borrower has not in fact made such payment, then each of the Lenders or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, severally agrees to repay to the Administrative Agent forthwith on demand the amount so distributed to such Lender or Issuing Bank with interest thereon, for each day from and including the date such amount is distributed to it to but excluding the date of payment to the Administrative Agent, at the greater of the Federal Funds Effective Rate and a rate determined by the Administrative Agent in accordance with banking industry rules on interbank compensation.
 
(e)
 
If any Lender shall fail to make any payment required to be made by it pursuant to Section 2.04(c), 2.05(d) or (e), 2.06(b), 2.17(d) or 9.03(c), then the Administrative Agent may, in its discretion and notwithstanding any contrary provision hereof, (i) apply any amounts thereafter received by the Administrative Agent for the account of such Lender for the benefit of the Administrative Agent, the Swingline Lender or the Issuing Bank to satisfy such Lenders obligations to it under such Section until all such unsatisfied obligations are fully paid, and/or (ii) hold any such amounts in a segregated account as cash collateral for, and application to, any future funding obligations of such Lender under any such Section, in the case of each of clauses (i) and (ii) above, in any order as determined by the Administrative Agent in its discretion.
 
SECTION 2.18.
 
  (a)  If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.14, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.16, then such Lender shall use reasonable efforts to designate a different lending office for funding or booking its Loans hereunder or to assign its rights and obligations hereunder to another of its offices, branches or affiliates, if, such designation or assignment (i) would eliminate or reduce amounts payable pursuant to Section 2.14 or 2.16, as the case may be, in the future and (ii) in the reasonable judgment of such Lender, would not subject such Lender to any unreimbursed cost or expense and would not otherwise be disadvantageous to such Lender.  The Borrower hereby agrees to pay all reasonable costs and expenses incurred by any Lender in connection with any such designation or assignment.
Mitigation Obligations; Replacement of Lenders.
 
(b)
 
If any Lender requests compensation under Section 2.14, or if the Borrower is required to pay any additional amount to any Lender or any Governmental Authority for the account of any Lender pursuant to Section 2.16, or if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the Borrower may, at its sole expense and effort, upon notice to such Lender and the Administrative Agent, require such Lender to assign and
 
 
 
 
42
 
delegate, without recourse (in accordance with and subject to the restrictions contained in Section 9.04), all its interests, rights and obligations under this Agreement to an assignee that shall assume such obligations (which assignee may be another Lender, if a Lender accepts such assignment); that (i) the Borrower shall have received the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent (and if a Revolving Commitment is being assigned, the Issuing Banks and Swingline Lender), which consent shall not unreasonably be withheld, (ii) such Lender shall have received payment of an amount equal to the outstanding principal of its Loans and participations in LC Disbursements and Swingline Loans, accrued interest thereon, accrued fees and all other amounts payable to it hereunder, from the assignee (to the extent of such outstanding principal and accrued interest and fees) or the Borrower (in the case of all other amounts) and (iii) in the case of any such assignment resulting from a claim for compensation under Section 2.14 or payments required to be made pursuant to Section 2.16, such assignment will result in a reduction in such compensation or payments.  A Lender shall not be required to make any such assignment and delegation if, prior thereto, as a result of a waiver by such Lender or otherwise, the circumstances entitling the Borrower to require such assignment and delegation cease to apply.
provided
 
SECTION 2.19.
 
  (a)  The Borrower may, by written notice to the Administrative Agent (which shall promptly deliver a copy to each of the Lenders), request that the total Revolving Commitments be increased; that the total Revolving Commitments shall not be increased by more than $250,000,000 during the term of this Agreement pursuant to this Section.  Such notice shall set forth the amount of the requested increase in the total Revolving Commitments and the date on which such increase is requested to become effective (which shall be not less than 10 Business Days or more than 60 days after the date of such notice), and shall offer each Lender the opportunity to increase its Revolving Commitment by its Applicable Percentage of the proposed increased amount.  Each Lender shall, by notice to the Borrower and the Administrative Agent given not more than 10 days after the date of the Borrowers notice, either agree to increase its Revolving Commitment by all or a portion of the offered amount (each Lender so agreeing being an ) or decline to increase its Revolving Commitment (and any Lender that does not deliver such a notice within such period of 10 days shall be deemed to have declined to increase its Revolving Commitment).  In the event that, on the 10th day after the Borrower shall have delivered a notice pursuant to the first sentence of this paragraph, the Lenders shall have agreed pursuant to the preceding sentence to increase their Commitments by an aggregate amount less than the increase in the total Revolving Commitments requested by the Borrower, the Borrower may arrange for one or more banks or other financial institutions (any such bank or other financial institution being called an ), which may include any Lender, to extend Revolving Commitments or increase their existing Revolving Commitments in an aggregate amount equal to the unsubscribed amount; provided that each Augmenting Lender, if not already a Lender hereunder, shall be subject to the approval of the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and the Swingline Lender (such approvals not to be unreasonably withheld), and the Borrower and each Augmenting Lender shall execute all such documentation as the Administrative Agent shall reasonably specify to evidence its Revolving Commitment and/or its status as a Lender hereunder.  Any increase in the total Revolving Commitments may be made in an amount which is
Increase in Revolving Commitments.
provided
Increasing Lender
Augmenting Lender
 
 
 
 
43
 
less than the increase requested by the Borrower if the Borrower is unable to arrange for, or chooses not to arrange for, Augmenting Lenders.
 
(b)
 
On the effective date (the ) of any increase in the total Revolving Commitments pursuant to this Section 2.20 (the ), if any Revolving Loans are outstanding, then (unless the Commitment Increase is being effected by an increase in each Lenders Revolving Commitment ratably in accordance with their Applicable Percentage) the Borrower (i) shall prepay all Revolving Loans then outstanding (including all accrued but unpaid interest thereon) and (ii) may, at its option, fund such prepayment by simultaneously borrowing Revolving Loans of the Types and for the Interest Periods specified in a Borrowing Request delivered pursuant to Section 2.03, which Revolving Loans shall be made by the Lenders (including the Increasing Lenders and the Augmenting Lenders, if any) ratably in accordance with their respective Revolving Commitments (calculated after giving effect to the Commitment Increase).  The payments made pursuant to clause (i) above in respect of each Eurodollar Loan shall be subject to Section 2.15.
Increase Effective Date
Commitment Increase
 
(c)
 
Increases and new Commitments created pursuant to this Section 2.19 shall become effective on the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of paragraph (a) above; that the Borrower may, with the consent of the Administrative Agent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld), extend such date by up to 30 days by delivering written notice to the Administrative Agent no less than two Business Days prior to the date specified in the notice delivered by the Borrower pursuant to the first sentence of paragraph (a) above.
provided
 
(d)
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, no increase in the total Revolving Commitments (or in the Revolving Commitment of any Lender) or addition of an Augmenting Lender shall become effective under this Section unless (i) on the date of such increase, the conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to that effect dated such date and executed by a Financial Officer of the Borrower and (ii) the Administrative Agent shall have received (with sufficient copies for each of the Lenders) documents consistent with those delivered on the Effective Date under clauses (b) and (c) of Section 4.01.
 
SECTION 2.20.
 
.  Notwithstanding any provision of this Agreement to the contrary, if any Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender, then the following provisions shall apply for so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender:
Defaulting Lenders
 
(a)  fees shall cease to accrue on the Commitment of such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.11(a);
 
(b)  the Commitment and Revolving Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall not be included in determining whether the Required Lenders have taken or may take any action hereunder (including any consent to any amendment, waiver or other modification pursuant to Section 9.02); , that this clause (b) shall not apply to the vote of a Defaulting Lender in the case of an amendment, waiver
provided
 
 
 
 
44
 
or other modification as described in clauses (i), (ii), (iii) and (iv) of Section 9.02(b);
 
(c)  if any Swingline Exposure or LC Exposure exists at the time such Lender becomes a Defaulting Lender then:
 
(i)  all or any part of the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of such Defaulting Lender shall be reallocated among the non-Defaulting Lenders in accordance with their respective Applicable Percentages but only to the extent that (x) the sum of all non-Defaulting Lenders Revolving Exposures plus such Defaulting Lenders Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure does not exceed the total of all non-Defaulting Lenders Commitments and (y) the conditions set forth in Section 4.02 are satisfied at such time;
 
(ii)  if the reallocation described in clause (i) above cannot, or can only partially, be effected, the Borrower shall within one Business Day following notice by the Administrative Agent (x) first, prepay such Swingline Exposure and (y) second, cash collateralize for the benefit of the Issuing Banks only the Borrowers obligations corresponding to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure (after giving effect to any partial reallocation pursuant to clause (i) above) in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.05(j) for so long as such LC Exposure is outstanding;
 
(iii)  if the Borrower cash collateralizes any portion of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure pursuant to clause (ii) above, the Borrower shall not be required to pay any fees to such Defaulting Lender pursuant to Section 2.11(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure during the period such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is cash collateralized;
 
(iv)  if the LC Exposure of the Defaulting Lenders is reallocated pursuant to clause (i) above, then the fees payable to the Lenders pursuant to Section 2.11(a) and Section 2.11(b) shall be adjusted in accordance with such non-Defaulting Lenders Applicable Percentages; and
 
(v)  if all or any portion of such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure is neither reallocated nor cash collateralized pursuant to clause (i) or (ii) above, then, without prejudice to any rights or remedies of the Issuing Bank or any other Lender hereunder, all facility fees that otherwise would have been payable to such Defaulting Lender (solely with respect to the portion of such Defaulting Lenders Commitment that was utilized by such LC Exposure) and letter of credit fees payable under Section 2.11(b) with respect to such Defaulting Lenders LC Exposure shall be payable to the Issuing Bank until and to the extent that such LC Exposure is reallocated and/or cash collateralized; and
 
 
 
 
45
 
(d)  so long as such Lender is a Defaulting Lender, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and an Issuing Bank shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless it is satisfied that the related exposure and the Defaulting Lenders then outstanding LC Exposure will be 100% covered by the Commitments of the non-Defaulting Lenders  and/or cash collateral will be provided by the Borrower in accordance with Section 2.20(c), and participating interests in any newly made Swingline Loan or any newly issued or increased Letter of Credit shall be allocated among non-Defaulting Lenders in a manner consistent with Section 2.20(c)(i) (and such Defaulting Lender shall not participate therein).
 
If (i) a Bankruptcy Event with respect to a Parent of any Lender shall occur following the date hereof and for so long as such event shall continue or (ii) the Swingline Lender or an Issuing Bank has actual knowledge that any Lender has defaulted in fulfilling its obligations under one or more other agreements in which such Lender commits to extend credit, the Swingline Lender shall not be required to fund any Swingline Loan and the Issuing Banks shall not be required to issue, amend or increase any Letter of Credit, unless the Swingline Lender or the applicable Issuing Bank, as the case may be, shall have entered into arrangements with the Borrower or such Lender, satisfactory to the Swingline Lender or such Issuing Bank, as the case may be, to defease any risk to it in respect of such Lender hereunder.
 
In the event that the Administrative Agent, the Borrower, the Swingline Lender and the Issuing Banks each agrees that a Defaulting Lender has adequately remedied all matters that caused such Lender to be a Defaulting Lender, then the Swingline Exposure and LC Exposure of the Lenders shall be readjusted to reflect the inclusion of such Lenders Commitment and on such date such Lender shall purchase at par such of the Loans of the other Lenders (other than Swingline Loans) as the Administrative Agent shall determine may be necessary in order for such Lender to hold such Loans in accordance with its Applicable Percentage.
 
 
 
Representations and Warranties
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower represents and warrants to the Lenders on the Effective Date and on each date thereafter as required hereunder that:
 
SECTION 3.01.
 
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is duly organized, validly existing and in good standing under the laws of the jurisdiction of its organization, has all requisite power and authority to carry on its business as now conducted and, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, is qualified to do business in, and is in good standing in, every jurisdiction where such qualification is required.
Organization; Powers.
 
 
 
 
46
 
SECTION 3.02.
 
  The Transactions to be entered into by each Loan Party are within such Loan Partys corporate powers and have been duly authorized by all necessary corporate and, if required, stockholder action.  This Agreement has been duly executed and delivered by each of Holdings and the Borrower and constitutes, and each other Loan Document to which any Loan Party is to be a party, when executed and delivered by such Loan Party, will constitute, a legal, valid and binding obligation of Holdings, the Borrower or such Loan Party (as the case may be), enforceable in accordance with its terms, subject to applicable bankruptcy, insolvency, reorganization, moratorium or other laws affecting creditors rights generally and subject to general principles of equity, regardless of whether considered in a proceeding in equity or at law.
Authorization; Enforceability.
 
SECTION 3.03.
 
  The Transactions (a) do not require any consent or approval of, registration or filing with, or any other action by, any Governmental Authority, except (i) such as have been obtained or made and are in full force and effect or (ii) where the failure to obtain such consent or approval or make such registration or filing, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, (b) will not violate any applicable law or regulation or the charter, by-laws or other organizational documents of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or any order of any Governmental Authority, (c) will not violate or result in a default under any material indenture, agreement or other instrument binding upon Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries or their assets, or give rise to a right thereunder to require any payment to be made by Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (other than under the Existing Credit Agreement), and (d) will not result in the creation or imposition of any Lien on any asset of Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries.
Governmental Approvals; No Conflicts.
 
SECTION 3.04.
 
   (a)   Holdings has heretofore furnished to the Lenders its consolidated balance sheet and statements of income, stockholders equity and cash flows (i) as of and for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011, reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP, independent public accountants, and (ii) as of and for the fiscal quarter and the portion of the fiscal year ended April 23, 2011, certified by one of its Financial Officers.  Such financial statements present fairly, in all material respects, the financial position and results of operations and cash flows of Holdings and its consolidated subsidiaries as of such dates and for such periods in accordance with GAAP, subject to customary year end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes in the case of the statements referred to in clause (ii) above.
Financial Condition; No Material Adverse Change.
 
(b)
 
Except as disclosed in the financial statements referred to above or the notes thereto and except for the Disclosed Matters, after giving effect to the Transactions, none of Holdings, the Borrower or their Subsidiaries has, as of the Effective Date, any material contingent liabilities.
 
(c)
 
Since January 1, 2011, there has been no material adverse change in the business, assets, operations, prospects or condition, financial or otherwise, of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries, taken as a whole.
 
 
 
 
47
 
SECTION 3.05.
 
  (a)  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has good title to, or valid leasehold interests in, all its real and personal property material to its business, except for minor defects in title that do not interfere with its ability to conduct its business as currently conducted or to utilize such properties for their intended purposes.
Properties.
 
(b)
 
Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries owns, or is licensed to use, all trademarks, trade names, copyrights, patents and other intellectual property material to its business, and the use thereof by Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries does not infringe upon the rights of any other Person, except for any such infringements that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.06.
 
  (a)  There are no actions, suits or proceedings by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority pending against or, to the knowledge of Holdings or the Borrower, threatened against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries (i) as to which there is a reasonable possibility of an adverse determination and that, if adversely determined, would reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to result in a Material Adverse Effect (other than the Disclosed Matters) or (ii) that involve any of the Loan Documents or the Transactions.
Litigation and Environmental Matters.
 
(b)
 
Except for the Disclosed Matters and any other matters that, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect, neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries (i) has failed to comply with any Environmental Law or to obtain, maintain or comply with any permit, license or other approval required under any Environmental Law, (ii) has become subject to any Environmental Liability, (iii) has received notice of any claim with respect to any Environmental Liability or (iv) knows of any basis for any Environmental Liability.
 
(c)
 
Since January 1, 2011, there has been no change in the status of the Disclosed Matters that, individually or in the aggregate, has resulted in, or materially increased the likelihood of, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.07.
 
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries is in compliance with all laws, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property and all indentures, agreements and other instruments binding upon it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  No Default has occurred and is continuing.
Compliance with Laws and Agreements.
 
SECTION 3.08.
 
  Neither Holdings, the Borrower nor any of their Subsidiaries is an investment company as defined in, or subject to regulation under, the Investment Company Act of 1940.
Investment Company Status.
 
SECTION 3.09.
 
  Each of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries has timely filed or caused to be filed all Tax returns and reports required to
Taxes.
 
 
 
 
48
 
have been filed and has paid or caused to be paid all Taxes required to have been paid by it, except (a) Taxes that are being contested in good faith by appropriate proceedings and for which Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary, as applicable, has set aside on its books adequate reserves or (b) to the extent that the failure to do so would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
 
SECTION 3.10.
 
  No ERISA Event has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that, when taken together with all other such ERISA Events for which liability is reasonably expected to occur, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  The present value of all accumulated benefit obligations under each Plan (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of such Plan, and the present value of all accumulated benefit obligations of all underfunded Plans (based on the assumptions used for purposes of Accounting Standards Codification Topic 715) did not, as of the date of the most recent financial statements reflecting such amounts, exceed by more than $1,000,000 the fair market value of the assets of all such underfunded Plans.
ERISA.
 
SECTION 3.11.
 
  Holdings and the Borrower have disclosed to the Lenders all agreements, instruments and corporate or other restrictions to which Holdings, the Borrower or any of their Subsidiaries is subject, and all other matters known to any of them, that, individually or in the aggregate, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.  Neither the Information Memorandum nor any of the other reports, financial statements, certificates or other information furnished by or on behalf of either Loan Party to the Administrative Agent or any Lender in connection with the negotiation of this Agreement or any other Loan Document or delivered hereunder or thereunder (as modified or supplemented by other information so furnished) contains any material misstatement of fact or omits to state any material fact necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; that, with respect to projected financial information, Holdings and the Borrower represent only that such information was prepared in good faith based upon assumptions believed to be reasonable at the time.
Disclosure.
provided
 
SECTION 3.12.
 
  Holdings does not have any Subsidiaries other than the Borrower and the Borrowers Subsidiaries.  Schedule 3.12 sets forth the name of, and the ownership interest of the Borrower in, and identifies each Subsidiary of the Borrower that is a Material Subsidiary as of the Effective Date.
Subsidiaries.
 
SECTION 3.13.
 
  Schedule 3.13 sets forth a description of all insurance maintained by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries as of the Effective Date.  As of the Effective Date, all premiums in respect of such insurance have been paid.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 3.14.
 
  Immediately after the consummation of the Transactions to occur on the Effective Date and immediately following the making of each Loan made on the Effective Date, (a) the fair value of the assets of each Loan Party, at a
Solvency.
 
 
 
 
49
 
fair valuation, will exceed its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise; (b) the present fair saleable value of the property of each Loan Party will be greater than the amount that will be required to pay the probable liability of its debts and other liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and other liabilities become absolute and matured; (c) each Loan Party will be able to pay its debts and liabilities, subordinated, contingent or otherwise, as such debts and liabilities become absolute and matured; and (d) each Loan Party will not have unreasonably small capital with which to conduct the business in which it is engaged as such business is now conducted and is proposed to be conducted following the Effective Date.
 
SECTION 3.15.
 
  No Loan Party, nor any (a) director or officer thereof or (b) to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, any agent, employee or Affiliate thereof, is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered or enforced by OFAC, and the Borrower will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds from the Loans or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any Subsidiary, joint venture partner or other Person, for the purpose of financing activities of or with any Person or any country or territory that, at the time of such financing, is the subject of any OFAC sanctions.
OFAC.
 
SECTION 3.16.
 
  No Loan Party, nor any (a) director or officer thereof or (b) to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, any agent, employee or Affiliate thereof, is a Person described or designated in the Specifically Designated Nationals and Blocked Persons List of the Office of Foreign Assets Control or in Section 1 of the Anti-Terrorism Order or engages in any dealings or transactions with any such Person.  Each Loan Party, any director or officer thereof and to the knowledge of the Loan Parties, any agent, employee or Affiliate thereof, is in compliance, in all material respects, with the USA PATRIOT Act.
PATRIOT ACT.
 
 
 
 
SECTION 4.01.
 
  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective until the date on which each of the following conditions is satisfied (or waived in accordance with Section 9.02):
Effective Date.
 
(a)
 
The Administrative Agent (or its counsel) shall have received (i) from each party hereto either a counterpart of this Agreement signed on behalf of such party or written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy or electronic transmission of a signed signature page of this Agreement) that such party has signed a counterpart of this Agreement and (ii) from Holdings and the Domestic Subsidiaries identified on Schedule 3.12 as Material Subsidiaries a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement signed on behalf of Holdings and such Material Subsidiaries or written evidence satisfactory to the Administrative Agent (which may include telecopy or electronic transmission of a signed signature page of the Guarantee Agreement) that
 
 
 
 
50
 
Holdings and such Material Subsidiaries have signed a counterpart of the Guarantee Agreement.
 
(b)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received favorable written opinions (addressed to the Administrative Agent and the Lenders and dated the Effective Date) of Bingham McCutchen LLP, counsel for the Loan Parties, substantially in the form of Exhibit C-1 and covering such other matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions as the Required Lenders shall reasonably request.  Holdings and the Borrower hereby request such counsel to deliver such opinions.
 
(c)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and certificates as the Administrative Agent or its counsel may reasonably request relating to the organization, existence and good standing of the Loan Parties, the authorization of the Transactions and any other legal matters relating to the Loan Parties, the Loan Documents or the Transactions, all in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Administrative Agent and its counsel.
 
(d)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it that, prior to or on the Effective Date, all commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement shall be terminated and all loans and other amounts accrued and owing thereunder shall be paid.
 
(e)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received such documents and other information as the Administrative Agent and the Lenders may reasonably request to satisfy the requirements of bank regulatory authorities under applicable know your customer and anti-money laundering rules and regulations, including the USA PATRIOT Act.
 
(f)
 
The conditions set forth in paragraphs (a) and (b) of Section 4.02 shall be satisfied and the Administrative Agent shall have received a certificate to such effect, dated the Effective Date and signed by the President, a Vice President or a Financial Officer of the Borrower.
 
(g)
 
The Administrative Agent and each Lender shall have received all fees and other amounts due and payable by the Borrower on or prior to the Effective Date, including, to the extent invoiced, reimbursement or payment of all out-of-pocket expenses required to be reimbursed or paid by the Borrower hereunder.
 
(h)
 
The Administrative Agent shall have received evidence reasonably satisfactory to it that the insurance required by Section 5.06 is in effect.
 
The Administrative Agent shall notify the Borrower and the Lenders of the Effective Date, and such notice shall be conclusive and binding.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit hereunder shall not become effective unless each of the foregoing conditions is satisfied (or waived pursuant to Section 9.02) at or prior to 3:00 p.m., New York City time, on June 3, 2011 (and, in the event such conditions are not so satisfied or waived, the Revolving Commitments shall terminate at such time).
 
 
 
 
51
 
SECTION 4.02.
 
  The obligation of each Lender to make a Loan on the occasion of any Borrowing, and of each Issuing Bank to issue, amend, renew or extend any Letter of Credit, is subject to the satisfaction of the following conditions:
Each Credit Event.
 
(a)
 
The representations and warranties of each Loan Party set forth in the Loan Documents shall be true and correct on and as of the date of such Borrowing or the date of issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, except for representations and warranties expressly made as of an earlier date, which shall be true and correct as of such earlier date.
 
(b)
 
At the time of and immediately after giving effect to such Borrowing or the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of such Letter of Credit, as applicable, no Default shall have occurred and be continuing.
 
Each Borrowing and each issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of a Letter of Credit shall be deemed to constitute a representation and warranty by Holdings and the Borrower on the date thereof as to the matters specified in paragraphs (a) and (b) of this Section.
 
ARTICLE V
 
Affirmative Covenants
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or been terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder shall have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit shall have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 5.01.
 
 Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender:
Financial Statements and Other Information.
 
(a)
 
within 90 days after the end of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings audited consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for such year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the previous fiscal year, all reported on by Deloitte & Touche LLP or other independent public accountants of recognized national standing (without a going concern or like qualification or exception and without any qualification or exception as to the scope of such audit or other material qualification or exception) to the effect that such consolidated financial statements present fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied;
 
(b)
 
within 45 days after the end of each of the first three fiscal quarters of each fiscal year of Holdings, Holdings consolidated balance sheets and related statements of operations, stockholders equity and cash flows as of the end of and for
 
 
 
 
52
 
such fiscal quarter and the then elapsed portion of the fiscal year, setting forth in each case in comparative form the figures for the corresponding period or periods of (or, in the case of the balance sheet, as of the end of) the previous fiscal year, all certified by one of its Financial Officers as presenting fairly in all material respects the financial condition and results of operations of Holdings and its consolidated Subsidiaries on a consolidated basis in accordance with GAAP consistently applied, subject to normal year-end audit adjustments and the absence of footnotes;
 
(c)
 
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) or (b) above, a certificate of a Financial Officer of the Borrower (i) certifying as to whether a Default has occurred and, if a Default has occurred, specifying the details thereof and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto, (ii) setting forth reasonably detailed calculations demonstrating compliance with Sections 6.08 and 6.09 as of the end of the period covered by such financial statements, (iii) stating whether any change in GAAP or in the application thereof has occurred since the date of Holdings audited financial statements referred to in Section 3.04 and, if any such change has occurred, specifying the effect of such change on the financial statements accompanying such certificate and (iv) identifying any Material Subsidiary, or any Subsidiary which the Company has elected to be deemed as a Material Subsidiary, that has not satisfied the Guarantee Requirement;
 
(d)
 
concurrently with any delivery of financial statements (or within three Business Days after any deemed delivery) under clause (a) above, a certificate of the accounting firm that reported on such financial statements stating whether they obtained knowledge during the course of their examination of such financial statements of any Default (which certificate may be limited to the extent required by accounting rules or guidelines);
 
(e)
 
as soon as the same are complete, but in no event more that 60 days after the commencement of each fiscal year of Holdings, a detailed consolidated budget presented on a quarterly basis for such fiscal year (including a projected consolidated balance sheet and related statements of projected operations and cash flow as of the end of and for such fiscal year) and, promptly when available, any significant revisions of such budget;
 
(f)
 
promptly after the same become publicly available, copies of all periodic and other reports, proxy statements and other materials filed by Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary with the Securities and Exchange Commission, or any Governmental Authority succeeding to any or all of the functions of said Commission, or with any national securities exchange, or distributed by Holdings to its shareholders generally, as the case may be;
 
(g)
 
promptly following any request therefor, such other information regarding the operations, business affairs and financial condition of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary, or compliance with the terms of any Loan Document, as the Administrative Agent or any Lender may reasonably request;
 
(h)
 
promptly upon the occurrence of any change of Rating by Moodys or S&P, a certificate of a Financial Officer setting forth the new Rating, the effective date thereof and, if applicable, notice of any change in the Applicable Rate as a result thereof; and
 
 
 
 
53
 
(i)
 
promptly after the same are furnished to the Borrower, copies of any Management Letter delivered to Holdings and the Borrower by their independent certified public accountants in connection with the delivery of financial statements contemplated by Section 5.01(a) if such Letter discloses any material weaknesses in internal financial controls or other material concerns relating to the financial statements identified by such accountants.
 
Notwithstanding the foregoing, any financial statements or other reports or filings required to be furnished by Holdings and the Borrower pursuant to clause (a), (b) or (f) of this Section 5.01 shall be deemed to have been furnished if Holdings or the Borrower has (i) filed the same with the Securities and Exchange Commission via the EDGAR filing system and the same are publicly available and (ii) delivered notice thereof to the Administrative Agent.
 
SECTION 5.02.
 
  Upon Holdings or the Borrower obtaining knowledge thereof, Holdings and the Borrower will furnish to the Administrative Agent and each Lender prompt written notice of the following:
Notices of Material Events.
 
(a)
 
the occurrence of any Default;
 
(b)
 
the filing or commencement of any action, suit or proceeding by or before any arbitrator or Governmental Authority against or affecting Holdings, the Borrower or any Affiliate thereof that, if adversely determined, could reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect;
 
(c)
 
the occurrence of any ERISA Event that, alone or together with any other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of Holdings, the Borrower and their Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding $1,000,000; and
 
(d)
 
any other development that results in, or could reasonably be expected to result in, a Material Adverse Effect.
 
Each notice delivered under this Section shall be accompanied by a statement of a Financial Officer or other executive officer of Holdings or the Borrower setting forth the details of the event or development requiring such notice and any action taken or proposed to be taken with respect thereto.
 
SECTION 5.03.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, do or cause to be done all things necessary to preserve, renew and keep in full force and effect its legal existence and the rights, licenses, permits, privileges, franchises, patents, copyrights, trademarks and trade names material to the conduct of its business; that the foregoing shall not
Existence; Conduct of Business.
provided
 
 
 
 
54
 
prohibit any merger, consolidation, liquidation or dissolution permitted under Section 6.03.
 
SECTION 5.04.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of their Subsidiaries to, pay its Indebtedness and other obligations, including Tax liabilities, that, if not paid, would reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect before the same shall become delinquent or in default, except where (a) the validity or amount thereof is being contested in good faith (in the case of Tax liabilities or obligations to Government Authorities by appropriate proceedings), (b) Holdings, the Borrower or such Subsidiary has set aside on its books adequate reserves with respect thereto in accordance with GAAP, (c) such contest effectively suspends collection of the contested obligation and the enforcement of any Lien securing such obligation and (d) the failure to make payment pending such contest would not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Payment of Obligations.
 
SECTION 5.05.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep and maintain all property material to the conduct of its business in good working order and condition, ordinary wear and tear excepted.
Maintenance of Properties.
 
SECTION 5.06.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, maintain, with financially sound and reputable insurance companies adequate insurance for its insurable properties, all to such extent and against such risks, including fire, casualty and other risks insured against by extended coverage, as is customary with companies in the same or similar businesses operating in the same or similar locations.
Insurance.
 
SECTION 5.07.
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, keep proper books of record and account in which full, true and correct entries are made of all dealings and transactions in relation to its business and activities.  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, permit any representatives designated by the Administrative Agent or any Lender, upon reasonable prior notice, to visit and inspect its properties, to examine and make extracts from its books and records, and to discuss its affairs, finances and condition with its officers and independent accountants, all at such reasonable times and as often as reasonably requested; that the Borrower shall be given the opportunity to be present at any discussion with its independent accountants.
Books and Records; Inspection and Audit Rights.  
provided
 
SECTION 5.08.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will, and will cause each of its Subsidiaries to, comply with all laws, rules, regulations and orders of any Governmental Authority applicable to it or its property, except where the failure to do so, individually or in the aggregate, could not reasonably be expected to result in a Material Adverse Effect.
Compliance with Laws.
 
SECTION 5.09.
 
  The proceeds of the Loans will be used for general corporate purposes, including to prepay all loans under
Use of Proceeds and Letters of Credit.
 
 
 
 
55
 
the Existing Credit Agreement outstanding on the Effective Date.  No part of the proceeds of any Loan will be used, whether directly or indirectly, for any purpose that entails a violation of any of the Regulations of the Board, including Regulations U and X.  Letters of Credit will be issued only for general corporate purposes.
 
SECTION 5.10.
 
  Each of Holdings and the Borrower will cause each Domestic Subsidiary that is or becomes a Material Subsidiary to satisfy the Guarantee Requirement no more than 30 days after the date of the determination, pursuant to the definition thereof, that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary.
Guarantee Requirement.
 
 
 
 
Until the Revolving Commitments have expired or terminated and the principal of and interest on each Loan and all fees payable hereunder have been paid in full and all Letters of Credit have expired or terminated and all LC Disbursements shall have been reimbursed, each of Holdings and the Borrower covenants and agrees with the Lenders that:
 
SECTION 6.01.
 
  The Borrower will not permit any Subsidiary of the Borrower to create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Indebtedness (including pursuant to any Guarantee of Indebtedness of Holdings, the Borrower or any other Subsidiary), except:
Subsidiary Indebtedness.
 
(a)
 
Indebtedness existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.01, but not any extensions, renewals or replacements of any such Indebtedness;
 
(b)
 
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower owing to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(c)
 
Guarantees by any Subsidiary of the Borrower of Indebtedness of any other Subsidiary of the Borrower; that the Indebtedness so Guaranteed is permitted by this Section;
provided
 
(d)
 
Indebtedness of any Subsidiary of the Borrower incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of any fixed or capital assets after the Effective Date, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereof; that (i) such Indebtedness is incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement and (ii) the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted
provided
 
 
 
 
56
 
by this clause (d) (and that is not listed in Schedule 6.01) and clause (e) below shall not exceed $100,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(e)
 
Indebtedness of (i) any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition to the extent that such Indebtedness exists at the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such Person becoming a Subsidiary and (ii) a Subsidiary to the extent that such Indebtedness is assumed in connection with a Permitted Acquisition made by such Subsidiary and is not created in contemplation of such Permitted Acquisition that the aggregate principal amount of Indebtedness permitted by this clause (e) and clause (d) above shall be subject to the limitations set forth in clause (ii) of the proviso at the end of clause (d)above;
provided
 
 
(f)
 
other Indebtedness of Subsidiaries of the Borrower in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not exceeding $100,000,000;
 
(g)
 
Guarantees by any Subsidiary of the Obligations;
 
(h)
 
Guarantees by any Subsidiary of obligations in respect of Holdings Debt Securities; that such Subsidiary shall have also Guaranteed the Obligations pursuant to the Guarantee Agreement; and
provided
 
(i)
 
Indebtedness in respect of Securitization Transactions in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not exceeding $150,000,000.
 
SECTION 6.02.
 
  (a)  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any Subsidiary to, create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it, or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect of any thereof, except:
Liens.
 
(i)
 
Liens created under the Loan Documents;
 
(ii)
 
Permitted Encumbrances;
 
(iii)
 
any Lien on any property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary existing on the Effective Date and set forth in Schedule 6.02; that (i) such Lien shall not apply to any other property or asset of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (ii) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date hereof and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
provided
 
(iv)
 
any Lien existing on any property or asset prior to the acquisition thereof by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date or existing on any property or asset of any Person that becomes a Subsidiary after the Effective Date prior to the time such Person becomes a Subsidiary; that (A) such Lien is not created in contemplation of or in connection with such acquisition or such Person becoming a Subsidiary, as the case may be, (B) such Lien shall not
provided
 
 
 
 
57
 
apply to any other property or assets of the Borrower or any Subsidiary and (C) such Lien shall secure only those obligations which it secures on the date of such acquisition or the date such Person becomes a Subsidiary, as the case may be, and extensions, renewals and replacements thereof that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof;
 
(v)
 
Liens on fixed or capital assets acquired, constructed or improved by the Borrower or any Subsidiary after the Effective Date; that (A) such security interests secure Indebtedness incurred to finance the acquisition, construction or improvement of such fixed or capital assets, including Capital Lease Obligations and any Indebtedness assumed in connection with the acquisition of any such assets or secured by a Lien on any such assets prior to the acquisition thereof, and extensions, renewals and replacements of any such Indebtedness that do not increase the outstanding principal amount thereof or result in an earlier maturity date or decreased weighted average life thereto (and, in the case of any such Indebtedness of a Subsidiary of the Borrower, is Indebtedness permitted by Section 6.01), (B) such security interests and the Indebtedness secured thereby are incurred prior to or within 270 days after such acquisition or the completion of such construction or improvement, (C) the Indebtedness secured thereby does not exceed the cost (including design, engineering, sales taxes, delivery, installation and other similar costs) of acquiring, constructing or improving such fixed or capital assets and (D) such security interests shall not apply to any other property or assets (other than proceeds of the property and assets originally encumbered by such security interests) of the Borrower or any Subsidiary;
provided
 
(vi)
 
Liens on Equity Interests of a SPE Subsidiary or accounts receivable and related assets arising in connection with any Securitization Transaction permitted by clause (i) of Section 6.01; and
 
(vii)
 
other Liens securing Indebtedness or other monetary obligations of the Borrower or any Subsidiary (other than Liens on inventory); that the sum of all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations at any time outstanding secured by Liens permitted by this clause (vii), plus the fair market value of all assets sold after the Effective Date pursuant to Sale and Leaseback Transactions in reliance on clause (b) of Section 6.07, shall not at any time exceed $125,000,000.
provided
 
(b)
 
Holdings will not create, incur, assume or permit to exist any Lien on any property or asset now owned or hereafter acquired by it (other than Excluded Margin Stock), or assign or sell any income or revenues (including accounts receivable) or rights in respect thereof, except Permitted Encumbrances.
 
SECTION 6.03.
 
  (a)  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, merge into or consolidate with any other Person, or permit any other Person to merge into or consolidate with it, or liquidate or dissolve, except that, if at the time thereof and immediately after giving effect thereto
Fundamental Changes.
 
 
 
 
58
 
no Default shall have occurred and be continuing (i) any Subsidiary may merge into the Borrower in a transaction in which the Borrower is the surviving corporation, (ii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) may merge into any other Subsidiary (other than the Borrower) in a transaction in which the surviving entity is a Subsidiary, (iii) any Subsidiary (other than the Borrower ) may liquidate or dissolve if the Borrower determines in good faith that such liquidation or dissolution is in the best interests of the Borrower and is not materially disadvantageous to the Lenders, (vi) any Subsidiary may merge with another entity to implement a Permitted Acquisition and (v) any Subsidiary of the Borrower may merge with another entity to implement a sale or other disposition of such Subsidiary otherwise permitted by this Agreement, provided that, after giving effect thereto, such Subsidiary shall no longer be a Subsidiary; that any such merger involving a Person that is not a wholly owned Subsidiary immediately prior to such merger shall not be permitted unless also permitted by Section 6.04.
provided
 
(b)
 
The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, engage to any material extent in any business other than businesses of the type conducted by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries on the Effective Date and businesses reasonably related thereto; that the Borrower, directly or indirectly through a SPE Subsidiary, may engage in Securitization Transactions permitted by clause (i) of Section 6.01.
provided
 
(c)
 
Holdings will not engage in any business or activity other than the ownership of all the outstanding shares of capital stock of the Borrower and activities incidental thereto, including the conduct of stock repurchase programs, administering payrolls for executive officers and other activities incidental to its existence as a publicly-owned holding company.  Holdings will not own or acquire any assets (other than shares of capital stock of the Borrower, cash, promissory notes held pursuant to clause (g) of Section 6.04 and Permitted Investments) or incur any liabilities (other than liabilities under the Loan Documents, liabilities in respect of Holdings Debt Securities, liabilities imposed by law, including tax liabilities, and other liabilities incidental to its existence and permitted business and activities).  Holdings will not have any Subsidiaries, other than the Borrower and its Subsidiaries (including SPE Subsidiaries).
 
SECTION 6.04.
 
  The Borrower will not, and will not permit any of its Subsidiaries to, purchase, hold or acquire (including pursuant to any merger with any Person that was not a wholly owned Subsidiary prior to such merger) any Equity Interests, evidences of indebtedness or other securities (including any option, warrant or other right to acquire any of the foregoing) of, make or permit to exist any loans or advances to, Guarantee any obligations of, or make or permit to exist any investment or any other interest in, any other Person, or purchase or otherwise acquire (in one transaction or a series of transactions) any assets of any other Person constituting a business unit, except:
Investments, Loans, Advances, Guarantees and Acquisitions.
 
(a)
 
Permitted Investments;
 
 
 
 
59
 
(b)
 
investments existing on the Effective Date and set forth on Schedule 6.04, to the extent such investments would not be permitted under any other clause of this Section;
 
(c)
 
investments in the Equity Interests of their respective Subsidiaries;
 
(d)
 
loans or advances made by the Borrower to any Subsidiary of the Borrower (or to Holdings) and made by any Subsidiary of the Borrower to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary of the Borrower;
 
(e)
 
Guarantees by the Borrower and its Subsidiaries of obligations of the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries; that any such Guarantees by Subsidiaries of the Borrower of obligations of the Borrower shall be limited to Guarantees of Indebtedness that are permitted by Section 6.01;
provided
 
(f)
 
investments received in connection with the bankruptcy or reorganization of, or settlement of delinquent accounts and disputes with, customers and suppliers, in each case in the ordinary course of business;
 
(g)
 
promissory notes received from employees of Holdings and its Subsidiaries evidencing loans made for the purpose of permitting such employees to purchase capital stock of Holdings in an aggregate principal amount not exceeding $5,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
(h)
 
Permitted Acquisitions;
 
(i)
 
loans or advances to employees in the ordinary course of business; that the aggregate amount of all loans and advances permitted by this clause (i) shall not exceed $750,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(j)
 
obligations of management to the Borrower in connection with split dollar life insurance policies; that the aggregate amount of all obligations permitted by this clause (j) shall not exceed $2,000,000 at any time outstanding;
provided
 
(k)
 
investments incurred in connection with Deferred Compensation Obligations;
 
(l)
 
Guarantees by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries of obligations in respect of Holdings Debt Securities; that any such Subsidiary shall have also Guaranteed the Obligations pursuant to the Guarantee Agreement and the Administrative Agent shall have received such evidence of authority and legal opinions in connection with such Guarantee of the Obligations as it shall reasonably request;
provided
 
(m)
 
investments by the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries consisting of Equity Interests in less than 50% owned Persons or in joint ventures (that are not Subsidiaries) in an aggregate amount not exceeding $50,000,000 at any time outstanding;
 
 
 
 
60
 
(n)
 
Securitization Transactions permitted by clause (i) of Section 6.01, including investments in any SPE Subsidiary, or issuances of evidences of Indebtedness or securities by any SPE Subsidiary, in connection with any such Securitization Transaction; and
 
(o)
 
other investments in an aggregate amount not exceeding $100,000,000 at any time outstanding.
 
SECTION 6.05.
 
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any Swap Agreement, except (a) Swap Agreements entered into to hedge or mitigate risks to which Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary has actual exposure (other than those in respect of Equity Interests of Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries), and (b) Swap Agreements entered into in order to effectively cap, collar or exchange interest rates (from fixed to floating rates, from one floating rate to another floating rate or otherwise) with respect to any interest-bearing liability or investment of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary.
Swap Agreements.
 
SECTION 6.06.
 
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any  Subsidiary to, directly or indirectly, enter into, incur or permit to exist any agreement or other arrangement that prohibits, restricts or imposes any condition upon (a) the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon any of its property or assets, or (b) the ability of any Subsidiary to pay dividends or other distributions with respect to any of its Equity Interests or to make or repay loans or advances to the Borrower or any other Subsidiary or to Guarantee Indebtedness of the Borrower or any other Subsidiary; that (i) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by law or by any Loan Document, (ii) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions existing on the Effective Date identified on Schedule 6.06 (but shall apply to any extension or renewal of, or any amendment or modification expanding the scope of, any such restriction or condition), (iii) the foregoing shall not apply to customary restrictions and conditions contained in agreements relating to the sale of a Subsidiary or any asset or property pending such sale, provided such restrictions and conditions apply only to the Subsidiary, asset or property that is to be sold and such sale is permitted hereunder, (iv) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions or conditions imposed by any agreement relating to secured Indebtedness permitted by this Agreement if such restrictions or conditions apply only to the property or assets securing such Indebtedness, (v) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not apply to customary provisions in leases, licenses, or other contracts restricting the assignment thereof, (vi) the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions in agreements pursuant to Securitization Transactions permitted by clause (i) of Section 6.01; that such restrictions and conditions apply solely to the applicable accounts receivable and related assets and any applicable SPE Subsidiary, (vii) clause (a) of the foregoing shall not prohibit customary negative pledge covenants in indentures or other agreements governing Holdings Debt Securities that allow the incurrence of Liens so long as such Liens equally and ratably secure such debt securities, that, without limiting any other exceptions to such covenant, any such covenant shall not prohibit, restrict or impose any condition (including any condition that such debt securities be equally and ratably secured) upon the ability of Holdings, the Borrower or
Restrictive Agreements.
provided
provided
provided
 
 
 
 
61
 
any Subsidiary, other than a SPE Subsidiary, to create, incur or permit to exist any Lien upon inventory, accounts receivable or the proceeds therefrom and (viii) clause (b) of the foregoing shall not apply to restrictions and conditions imposed by any agreement relating to Indebtedness of Foreign Subsidiaries permitted by this Agreement to the extent such restrictions and conditions imposed by such agreement relate to Indebtedness of the applicable Foreign Subsidiary and apply only to such Foreign Subsidiary.
 
SECTION 6.07.
 
  Neither Holdings nor the Borrower will, nor will they permit any Subsidiary to, enter into any arrangement, directly or indirectly, with any Person whereby it shall sell or transfer any property, real or personal, used or useful in its business, whether now owned or hereafter acquired, and thereafter rent or lease such property or other property which it intends to use for substantially the same purpose or purposes as the property being sold or transferred (a ), except for (a) any such Sale and Leaseback Transaction involving the sale of fixed or capital assets (other than those acquired pursuant to a Permitted Acquisition), at a price not less than the cost thereof, that is consummated within 360 days after the date that such assets are acquired and (b) other Sale and Leaseback Transactions consummated after the Effective Date, subject to the limitations set forth in clause (vii) of Section 6.02(a).
Sale and Lease-Back Transactions.
Sale and Leaseback Transaction
 
SECTION 6.08.
 
  The Borrower will not permit the Leverage Ratio as of any date to be in excess of 3.00 to 1.00.
Leverage Ratio.
 
SECTION 6.09.
 
  The Borrower will not permit the Consolidated Coverage Ratio for any period of four consecutive fiscal quarters (commencing with the period ending on the last day of the first fiscal quarter ended after the Effective Date) to be less than 2.25 to 1.00.
Consolidated Coverage Ratio.
 
ARTICLE VII
 
 
Events of Default
 
If any of the following events () shall occur:
Events of Default
 
(a)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay any principal of any Loan or any reimbursement obligation in respect of any LC Disbursement when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at the due date thereof or at a date fixed for prepayment thereof or otherwise;
 
(b)
 
the Borrower shall fail to pay any interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount (other than an amount referred to in clause (a) of this Article) payable under this Agreement or any other Loan Document, when and as the same shall become due and payable, and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of three Business Days;
 
(c)
 
any representation or warranty made or deemed made by or on behalf of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary in or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, or in any
 
 
 
 
62
 
report, certificate, financial statement or other document furnished pursuant to or in connection with any Loan Document or any amendment or modification thereof or waiver thereunder, shall prove to have been incorrect in any material respect when made or deemed made;
 
(d)
 
Holdings or the Borrower shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in Section 5.02, 5.03 (with respect to the  existence of Holdings or the Borrower) or 5.09 or in Article VI;
 
(e)
 
any Loan Party shall fail to observe or perform any covenant, condition or agreement contained in any Loan Document (other than those specified in clause (a), (b) or (d) of this Article), and such failure shall continue unremedied for a period of 30 days after notice thereof from the Administrative Agent to the Borrower (which notice will be given at the request of any Lender);
 
(f)
 
Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall fail to make any payment (whether of principal or interest and regardless of amount) in respect of any Material Indebtedness, when and as the same shall become due and payable;
 
(g)
 
any event or condition occurs that results in any Material Indebtedness becoming due prior to its scheduled maturity or that enables or permits (with or without the giving of notice, the lapse of time or both) the holder or holders of any Material Indebtedness or any trustee or agent on its or their behalf to cause any Material Indebtedness to become due, or to require the prepayment, repurchase, redemption or defeasance thereof, prior to its scheduled maturity; that this clause (g) shall not apply to secured Indebtedness that becomes due as a result of the voluntary sale or transfer of the property or assets securing such Indebtedness;
provided
 
(h)
 
subject to the last sentence of this Article VII, an involuntary proceeding shall be commenced or an involuntary petition shall be filed seeking (i) liquidation, reorganization or other relief in respect of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or its debts, or of a substantial part of its assets, under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect or (ii) the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, and, in any such case, such proceeding or petition shall continue undismissed for 60 days or an order or decree approving or ordering any of the foregoing shall be entered;
 
(i)
 
subject to the last sentence of this Article VII, Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall (i) voluntarily commence any proceeding or file any petition seeking liquidation, reorganization or other relief under any Federal, state or foreign bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or similar law now or hereafter in effect, (ii) consent to the institution of, or fail to contest in a timely and appropriate manner, any proceeding or petition described in clause (h) of this Article, (iii) apply for or consent to the appointment of a receiver, trustee, custodian, sequestrator, conservator or similar official for Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or for a substantial part of its assets, (iv) file an answer admitting the material allegations of a petition filed against it in any
 
 
 
 
63
 
such proceeding, (v) make a general assignment for the benefit of creditors or (vi) take any action for the purpose of effecting any of the foregoing;
 
(j)
 
subject to the last sentence of this Article VII, Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary shall become unable, admit in writing its inability or fail generally to pay its debts as they become due;
 
(k)
 
one or more judgments for the payment of money in an aggregate amount in excess of $25,000,000 shall be rendered against Holdings, the Borrower, any Subsidiary or any combination thereof and the same shall remain undischarged for a period of 30 consecutive days during which execution shall not be effectively stayed, or any action shall be legally taken by a judgment creditor (and such action is not effectively stayed) to attach or levy upon any assets of Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary to enforce any such judgment;
 
(l)
 
an ERISA Event shall have occurred that, in the opinion of the Required Lenders, when taken together with all other ERISA Events that have occurred, could reasonably be expected to result in liability of the Borrower and its Subsidiaries in an aggregate amount exceeding (i) $3,000,000 in any year or (ii) $5,000,000 for all periods; or
 
(m)
 
a Change in Control shall occur;
 
then, and in every such event (other than an event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article), and at any time thereafter during the continuance of such event, the Administrative Agent may, and at the request of the Required Lenders shall, by notice to the Borrower, take either or both of the following actions, at the same or different times:  (i) terminate the Revolving Commitments, and thereupon the Revolving Commitments shall terminate immediately, and (ii) declare the Loans then outstanding to be due and payable in whole (or in part, in which case any principal not so declared to be due and payable may thereafter be declared to be due and payable), and thereupon the principal of the Loans so declared to be due and payable, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall become due and payable immediately, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower; and in case of any event with respect to the Borrower described in clause (h) or (i) of this Article, the Revolving Commitments shall automatically terminate and the principal of the Loans then outstanding, together with accrued interest thereon and all fees and other obligations of the Borrower accrued hereunder, shall automatically become due and payable, without presentment, demand, protest or other notice of any kind, all of which are hereby waived by the Borrower.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, the occurrence of an event described in clauses (h), (i) or (j) above affecting any Subsidiary or Subsidiaries shall not constitute an Event of Default if all Subsidiaries affected thereby are Insignificant Subsidiaries.
 
 
 
 
64
 
 
 
 
Each of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks hereby irrevocably appoints the Administrative Agent as its agent and authorizes the Administrative Agent to take such actions on its behalf and to exercise such powers as are delegated to the Administrative Agent by the terms of the Loan Documents, together with such actions and powers as are reasonably incidental thereto.
 
The bank serving as the Administrative Agent hereunder shall have the same rights and powers in its capacity as a Lender as any other Lender and may exercise the same as though it were not the Administrative Agent, and such bank and its Affiliates may accept deposits from, lend money to and generally engage in any kind of business with Holdings, the Borrower or any Subsidiary or other Affiliate thereof as if it were not the Administrative Agent hereunder.
 
The Administrative Agent shall not have any duties or obligations except those expressly set forth in the Loan Documents.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, (a) the Administrative Agent shall not be subject to any fiduciary or other implied duties, regardless of whether a Default has occurred and is continuing, (b) the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to take any discretionary action or exercise any discretionary powers, except discretionary rights and powers expressly contemplated by the Loan Documents that the Administrative Agent is required to exercise in writing by the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02), and (c) except as expressly set forth in the Loan Documents, the Administrative Agent shall not have any duty to disclose, and shall not be liable for the failure to disclose, any information relating to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries that is communicated to or obtained by the bank serving as Administrative Agent or any of its Affiliates in any capacity.  The Administrative Agent shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it with the consent or at the request of the Required Lenders (or such other number or percentage of the Lenders as shall be necessary under the circumstances as provided in Section 9.02) or in the absence of its own gross negligence or wilful misconduct.  The Administrative Agent shall not be deemed not to have knowledge of any Default unless and until written notice thereof is given to the Administrative Agent by Holdings, the Borrower or a Lender, and the Administrative Agent shall not be responsible for or have any duty to ascertain or inquire into (i) any statement, warranty or representation made in or in connection with any Loan Document, (ii) the contents of any certificate, report or other document delivered thereunder or in connection therewith, (iii) the performance or observance of any of the covenants, agreements or other terms or conditions set forth in any Loan Document, (iv) the validity, enforceability, effectiveness or genuineness of any Loan Document or any other agreement, instrument or document, or (v) the satisfaction of any condition set forth in Article IV or elsewhere in any Loan Document, other than to confirm receipt of items expressly required to be delivered to the Administrative Agent.
 
 
 
 
65
 
The Administrative Agent shall be entitled to rely upon, and shall not incur any liability for relying upon, any notice, request, certificate, consent, statement, instrument, document or other writing believed by it to be genuine and to have been signed or sent by the proper Person.  The Administrative Agent also may rely upon any statement made to it orally or by telephone and believed by it to be made by the proper Person, and shall not incur any liability for relying thereon.  The Administrative Agent may consult with legal counsel (who may be counsel for the Borrower), independent accountants and other experts selected by it, and shall not be liable for any action taken or not taken by it in accordance with the advice of any such counsel, accountants or experts.
 
The Administrative Agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers by or through any one or more sub-agents appointed by the Administrative Agent.  The Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent may perform any and all its duties and exercise its rights and powers through their respective Related Parties.  The exculpatory provisions of the preceding paragraphs shall apply to any such sub-agent and to the Related Parties of each Administrative Agent and any such sub-agent, and shall apply to their respective activities in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein as well as activities as Administrative Agent.
 
Subject to the appointment and acceptance of a successor as provided in this paragraph, the Administrative Agent may resign at any time by notifying the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and the Borrower.  Upon any such resignation, the Required Lenders shall have the right, in consultation with the Borrower (except that no consultation is required during an Event of Default), to appoint a successor.  If no successor shall have been so appointed by the Required Lenders and shall have accepted such appointment within 30 days after the retiring Administrative Agent gives notice of its resignation, then the retiring Administrative Agent may, on behalf of the Lenders and the Issuing Banks, appoint a successor Administrative Agent which shall be a bank with an office in New York, New York, or an Affiliate of any such bank.  Upon the acceptance of its appointment as Administrative Agent hereunder by a successor, such successor shall succeed to and become vested with all the rights, powers, privileges and duties of the retiring Administrative Agent, and the retiring Administrative Agent shall be discharged from its duties and obligations hereunder.  The fees payable by the Borrower to a successor Administrative Agent shall be the same as those payable to its predecessor unless otherwise agreed between the Borrower and such successor.  After the Administrative Agents resignation hereunder, the provisions of this Article and Section 9.03 shall continue in effect for the benefit of such retiring Administrative Agent, its sub-agents and their respective Related Parties in respect of any actions taken or omitted to be taken by any of them while it was acting as Administrative Agent.
 
Each Lender acknowledges that it has, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it has deemed appropriate, made its own credit analysis and decision to enter into this Agreement.  Each Lender also acknowledges that it will, independently and without reliance upon the Administrative Agent or any other Lender and based on such documents and information as it shall from time to time deem appropriate, continue to make its own decisions in taking or not taking action under or based upon this
 
 
 
 
66
 
Agreement, any other Loan Document or related agreement or any document furnished hereunder or thereunder.
 
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, none of the Arrangers or any Person named on the cover page of this Agreement as a Syndication Agent or a Documentation Agent shall have any duties or obligations under any of the Loan Documents (except in its capacity, as applicable, as a Lender or an Issuing Bank) and will not be subject to liability thereunder to any of the Loan Parties for any reason.
 
 
 
 
SECTION 9.01.
 
  (a)  Except in the case of notices and other communications expressly permitted to be given by telephone (and subject to paragraph (b) below), all notices and other communications provided for herein shall be in writing and shall be delivered by hand or overnight courier service, mailed by certified or registered mail or sent by telecopy, as follows:
Notices.
 
(i)
 
if to Holdings or the Borrower, to Advance Stores Company, Incorporated at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia 24012, Attention of Office of the General Counsel (Telecopy No. (540) 561-1448);
 
(ii)
 
if to the Administrative Agent, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Thai Pham (Telephone No. (713) 750-2884; Telecopy No. (713) 750-2956), with a copy to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., 383 Madison Avenue, 24th Floor, New York 10017, Attention of Sarah Freedman (Telephone No. (212) 622-6603; Telecopy No. (917) 456-3358);
 
(iii)
 
if to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Issuing Bank, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Thai Pham (Telephone No. (713) 750-2884; Telecopy No. (713) 750-2956);
 
(iv)
 
if to the Swingline Lender, to JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., Loan and Agency Services Group, 1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor, Houston, Texas 77002, Attention of Thai Pham (Telephone No. (713) 750-2884; Telecopy No. (713) 750-2956); and
 
(v)
 
if to any other Lender or Issuing Bank, to it at its address (or telecopy number) set forth in its Administrative Questionnaire.
 
(b)
 
Notices and other communications to the Lenders hereunder may be delivered or furnished by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by the Administrative Agent; that the foregoing shall not apply to notices pursuant to Article II unless otherwise agreed by the Administrative Agent and the applicable Lender.  The Administrative Agent or the Borrower may, in its discretion, agree to accept
provided
 
 
 
 
67
 
notices and other communications to it hereunder by electronic communications pursuant to procedures approved by it; that approval of such procedures may be limited to particular notices or communications.
provided
 
(c)
 
Any party hereto may change its address or telecopy number for notices and other communications hereunder by notice to the other parties hereto.  All notices and other communications given to any party hereto in accordance with the provisions of this Agreement shall be deemed to have been given on the date of receipt.
 
SECTION 9.02.
 
  (a)  No failure or delay by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender in exercising any right or power hereunder or under any other Loan Document shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders hereunder and under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of any Loan Document or consent to any departure by any Loan Party therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) of this Section, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the making of a Loan or issuance of a Letter of Credit shall not be construed as a waiver of any Default, regardless of whether the Administrative Agent, any Lender or any Issuing Bank may have had notice or knowledge of such Default at the time.
Waivers; Amendments.
 
(b)
 
Except as necessary in order to effect an increase in the Revolving Commitments in accordance with Section 2.19, neither this Agreement nor any other Loan Document nor any provision hereof or thereof may be waived, amended or modified except, in the case of this Agreement, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower and the Required Lenders or, in the case of any other Loan Document, pursuant to an agreement or agreements in writing entered into by the Administrative Agent and the Loan Party or Loan Parties that are parties thereto, in each case with the consent of the Required Lenders; that no such agreement shall (i) increase the Revolving Commitment of any Lender without the written consent of such Lender, (ii) reduce the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement or reduce the rate of interest thereon (other than a waiver of post-default additional interest as specified in Section 2.12(c)), or reduce any fees payable hereunder, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iii) postpone the scheduled date of payment of the principal amount of any Loan or LC Disbursement, or any interest thereon, or any fees payable hereunder, or reduce the amount of, waive or excuse any such payment, or postpone the scheduled date of expiration of any Revolving Commitment, without the written consent of each Lender affected thereby, (iv) change Section 2.17(b) or (c) in a manner that would alter the pro rata sharing of payments required thereby, without the written consent of each Lender, (v) change any of the provisions of this Section or the definition of Required Lenders or any other provision of any Loan Document specifying the number or percentage of Lenders required to
provided
 
 
 
 
68
 
waive, amend or modify any rights thereunder or make any determination or grant any consent thereunder, without the written consent of each Lender, or (vi) release Holdings from its Guarantee under the Guarantee Agreement, or limit its liability in respect of such Guarantee, without the written consent of each Lender; that no such agreement shall amend, modify or otherwise affect the rights or duties of the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender without the prior written consent of the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be.  Notwithstanding the foregoing, any provision of this Agreement may be amended by an agreement in writing entered into by Holdings, the Borrower, the Required Lenders and the Administrative Agent (and, if their rights or obligations are affected thereby, the Issuing Banks and the Swingline Lender) if (i) by the terms of such agreement the Revolving Commitment of each Lender not consenting to the amendment provided for therein shall terminate upon the effectiveness of such amendment and (ii) at the time such amendment becomes effective, each Lender not consenting thereto receives payment in full of the principal of and interest accrued on each Loan made by it and all other amounts owing to it or accrued for its account under this Agreement.
provided
further
 
SECTION 9.03.
 
  (a)  The Borrower shall pay (i) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent and its Affiliates, including the reasonable fees, charges and disbursements of counsel for the Administrative Agent, in connection with the syndication of the credit facilities provided for herein, the preparation and administration of the Loan Documents or any amendments, modifications or waivers of the provisions thereof (whether or not the transactions contemplated hereby or thereby shall be consummated), (ii) all reasonable out-of-pocket expenses incurred by any Issuing Bank in connection with the issuance, amendment, renewal or extension of any Letter of Credit or any demand for payment thereunder and (iii) all out-of-pocket expenses incurred by the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender, in connection with the enforcement or protection of its rights in connection with the Loan Documents, including its rights under this Section, or in connection with the Loans made or Letters of Credit issued hereunder, including all such out-of-pocket expenses incurred during any workout, restructuring or negotiations in respect of such Loans or Letters of Credit.
Expenses; Indemnity; Damage Waiver.
 
(b)
 
The Borrower shall indemnify the Administrative Agent, each Issuing Bank and each Lender, and each Related Party of any of the foregoing Persons (each such Person being called an ) against, and hold each Indemnitee harmless from, any and all losses, claims, damages, liabilities and related expenses, including the fees, charges and disbursements of any counsel for any Indemnitee, incurred by or asserted against any Indemnitee arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of (i) the execution or delivery of any Loan Document or any other agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the performance by the parties to the Loan Documents of their respective obligations thereunder or the consummation of the Transactions or any other transactions contemplated hereby, (ii) any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds therefrom (including any refusal by an Issuing Bank to honor a demand for payment under a Letter of Credit if the documents presented in connection with such demand do not strictly comply with the terms of such Letter of Credit), (iii) any actual or
Indemnitee
 
 
 
 
69
 
alleged presence or release of Hazardous Materials on or from any property currently or formerly owned or operated by Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or any Environmental Liability related in any way to Holdings, the Borrower or any of its Subsidiaries, or (iv) any actual or prospective claim, litigation, investigation or proceeding relating to any of the foregoing, whether based on contract, tort or any other theory and regardless of whether any Indemnitee is a party thereto; that such indemnity shall not, as to any Indemnitee, be available to the extent that such losses, claims, damages, liabilities or related expenses resulted from the gross negligence or wilful misconduct of such Indemnitee.
provided
 
(c)
 
To the extent that the Borrower fails to pay any amount required to be paid by it to the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender under paragraph (a) or (b) of this Section, each Lender severally agrees to pay to the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, as the case may be, such Lenders pro rata share (determined as of the time that the applicable unreimbursed expense or indemnity payment is sought) of such unpaid amount; that the unreimbursed expense or indemnified loss, claim, damage, liability or related expense, as the case may be, was incurred by or asserted against the Administrative Agent, such Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender in its capacity as such.  For purposes hereof, a Lenders pro rata share shall be determined based upon its share of the sum of the total Revolving Exposures and unused Revolving Commitments at the time.
provided
 
(d)
 
To the extent permitted by applicable law, neither Holdings nor the Borrower shall assert, and each hereby waives, any claim against any Indemnitee, on any theory of liability, for special, indirect, consequential or punitive damages (as opposed to direct or actual damages) arising out of, in connection with, or as a result of, this Agreement or any agreement or instrument contemplated hereby, the Transactions, any Loan or Letter of Credit or the use of the proceeds thereof.
 
(e)
 
All amounts due under this Section shall be payable promptly after written demand therefor.
 
SECTION 9.04.
 
  (a)  The provisions of this Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), except that (i) the Borrower may not assign or otherwise transfer any of its rights or obligations hereunder without the prior written consent of each Lender (and any attempted assignment or transfer by the Borrower without such consent shall be null and void) and (ii) no Lender may assign or otherwise transfer its rights or obligations hereunder except in accordance with this Section.  Nothing in this Agreement, expressed or implied, shall be construed to confer upon any Person (other than the parties hereto, their respective successors and assigns permitted hereby (including any Affiliate of an Issuing Bank that issues any Letter of Credit), Participants (to the extent provided in paragraph (c) of this Section) and, to the extent expressly contemplated hereby, the Related Parties of each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders) any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or by reason of this Agreement.
Successors and Assigns.
 
 
 
 
70
 
(b)
 
(i)  Subject to the conditions set forth in paragraph (b)(ii) below, any Lender may assign to one or more assignees all or a portion of its rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans at the time owing to it) with the prior written consent (such consent not to be unreasonably withheld) of:
 
(A)
 
the Borrower, that no consent of the Borrower shall be required for an assignment to a Lender, an Affiliate of a Lender, an Approved Fund or, if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing, any other assignee, other than in each case, a Defaulting Lender or an Affiliate of a Defaulting Lender;
provided
 
(B)
 
the Administrative Agent; and
 
(C)
 
each Issuing Bank.
 
(ii)
 
Assignments shall be subject to the following additional conditions:
 
(A)
 
except in the case of an assignment to a Lender or an Affiliate or Approved Fund of a Lender or an assignment of the entire remaining amount of the assigning Lenders Revolving Commitment, the amount of the Revolving Commitment of the assigning Lender subject to each such assignment (determined as of the date the Assignment and Assumption with respect to such assignment is delivered to the Administrative Agent) shall not be less than $5,000,000 unless each of the Borrower and the Administrative Agent otherwise consent, that no such consent of the Borrower shall be required if an Event of Default has occurred and is continuing;
provided
 
(B)
 
each partial assignment shall be made as an assignment of a proportionate part of all the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement.
 
(C)
 
the parties to each assignment shall execute and deliver to the Administrative Agent an Assignment and Assumption, together with a processing and recordation fee of $3,500; and
 
(D)
 
the assignee, if it shall not be a Lender, shall deliver to the Administrative Agent an Administrative Questionnaire in which the assignee designates one or more Credit Contacts to whom all syndicate-level information (which may contain material non-public information about the Borrower, the Loan Parties and their Related Parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the assignees compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws
 
For the purposes of this Section 9.04(b), the term Approved Fund has the following meaning:
 
 
 
 
71
 
 means any Person (other than a natural person) that is engaged in making, purchasing, holding or investing in bank loans and similar extensions of credit in the ordinary course of its business and that is administered or managed by (a) a Lender, (b) an Affiliate of a Lender or (c) an entity or an Affiliate of an entity that administers or manages a Lender.
Approved Fund
 
(iii)
 
Subject to acceptance and recording thereof pursuant to paragraph (b)(iv) of this Section, from and after the effective date specified in each Assignment and Assumption the assignee thereunder shall be a party hereto and, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, have the rights and obligations of a Lender under this Agreement, and the assigning Lender thereunder shall, to the extent of the interest assigned by such Assignment and Assumption, be released from its obligations under this Agreement (and, in the case of an Assignment and Assumption covering all of the assigning Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement, such Lender shall cease to be a party hereto but shall continue to be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03).  Any assignment or transfer by a Lender of rights or obligations under this Agreement that does not comply with this Section 9.04 shall be treated for purposes of this Agreement as a sale by such Lender of a participation in such rights and obligations in accordance with paragraph (c) of this Section.
 
(iv)
 
The Administrative Agent, acting for this purpose as an agent of the Borrower, shall maintain at one of its offices in the City of New York a copy of each Assignment and Assumption delivered to it and a register for the recordation of the names and addresses of the Lenders, and the Revolving Commitment of, and principal amount of the Loans and LC Disbursements owing to, each Lender pursuant to the terms hereof from time to time (the ).  The entries in the Register shall be conclusive, and the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the Lenders may treat each Person whose name is recorded in the Register pursuant to the terms hereof as a Lender hereunder for all purposes of this Agreement, notwithstanding notice to the contrary.  The Register shall be available for inspection by the Borrower, any Issuing Bank and any Lender, at any reasonable time and from time to time upon reasonable prior notice.
Register
 
(v)
 
Upon its receipt of a duly completed Assignment and Assumption executed by an assigning Lender and an assignee, the assignees completed Administrative Questionnaire (unless the assignee shall already be a Lender hereunder), the processing and recordation fee referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section and any written consent to such assignment required by paragraph (b) of this Section, the Administrative Agent shall accept such Assignment and Assumption and record the information contained therein in the Register.  No assignment shall be effective for purposes of this Agreement unless it has been recorded in the Register as provided in this paragraph.
 
(c)
 
(i)  Any Lender may, without the consent of the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or the Swingline Lender, sell participations to
 
 
 
 
72
 
one or more banks or other entities (a ) in all or a portion of such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement (including all or a portion of its Revolving Commitment and the Loans owing to it); that (A) such Lenders obligations under this Agreement shall remain unchanged, (B) such Lender shall remain solely responsible to the other parties hereto for the performance of such obligations and (C) the Borrower, the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Banks and the other Lenders shall continue to deal solely and directly with such Lender in connection with such Lenders rights and obligations under this Agreement.  Any agreement or instrument pursuant to which a Lender sells such a participation shall provide that such Lender shall retain the sole right to enforce the Loan Documents and to approve any amendment, modification or waiver of any provision of the Loan Documents; that such agreement or instrument may provide that such Lender will not, without the consent of the Participant, agree to any amendment, modification or waiver described in the first proviso to Section 9.02(b) that affects such Participant.  Subject to paragraph (c)(ii) of this Section, the Borrower agrees that each Participant shall be entitled to the benefits of Sections 2.14, 2.15 and 2.16 to the same extent as if it were a Lender and had acquired its interest by assignment pursuant to paragraph (b) of this Section.  To the extent permitted by law, each Participant also shall be entitled to the benefits of Section 9.08 as though it were a Lender, provided such Participant agrees to be subject to Section 2.17(c) as though it were a Lender.  Each Lender that sells a participation shall, acting solely for this purpose as a non-fiduciary agent of the Borrower, maintain a register on which it enters the name and address of each Participant and the principal amounts (and stated interest) of each Participants interest in the Loans or other obligations under this Agreement (the ); provided that no Lender shall have any obligation to disclose all or any portion of the Participant Register to any Person (including the identity of any Participant or any information relating to a Participants interest in any Commitments, Loans, Letters of Credit or its other obligations under any Loan Document) except to the extent that such disclosure is necessary to establish that such Commitment, Loan, Letter of Credit or other obligation is in registered form under Section 5f.103-1(c) of the United States Treasury Regulations.  The entries in the Participant Register shall be conclusive absent manifest error, and such Lender shall treat each person whose name is recorded in the Participant Register as the owner of such participation for all purposes of this Agreement notwithstanding any notice to the contrary.
Participant
provided
provided
Participant Register
 
(ii)
 
A Participant shall not be entitled to receive any greater payment under Section 2.14 or 2.16 than the applicable Lender would have been entitled to receive with respect to the participation sold to such Participant, unless the sale of the participation to such Participant is made with the Borrowers prior written consent.  A Participant that would be a Foreign Lender if it were a Lender shall not be entitled to the benefits of Section 2.16 unless the Borrower is notified of the participation sold to such Participant and such Participant agrees, for the benefit of the Borrower, to comply with Section 2.16(f) as though it were a Lender.
 
(d)
 
Any Lender may at any time pledge or assign a security interest in all or any portion of its rights under this Agreement to secure obligations of such Lender, including without limitation any pledge or assignment to secure obligations to a Federal
 
 
 
 
73
 
Reserve Bank, and this Section shall not apply to any such pledge or assignment of a security interest; that no such pledge or assignment of a security interest shall release a Lender from any of its obligations hereunder or substitute any such pledgee or assignee for such Lender as a party hereto.
provided
 
(e)
 
Notwithstanding anything to the contrary contained herein, any Lender (a ) may grant to a special purpose funding vehicle (an ), identified as such in writing from time to time by the Granting Lender to the Administrative Agent and the Borrower, the option to provide to the Borrower all or any part of any Loan that such Granting Lender would otherwise be obligated to make to the Borrower pursuant to this Agreement, that (i) nothing herein shall constitute a commitment by any SPV to make any Loan and (ii) if an SPV elects not to exercise such option or otherwise fails to provide all or any part of such Loan, the Granting Lender shall be obligated to make such Loan pursuant to the terms hereof.  The making of a Loan by an SPV hereunder shall utilize the Revolving Commitment of the Granting Lender to the same extent, and as if, such Loan were made by such Granting Lender.  Each party hereto hereby agrees that no SPV shall be liable for any indemnity or similar payment obligation under this Agreement (all liability for which shall remain with the Granting Lender).  In furtherance of the foregoing, each party hereto hereby agrees (which agreement shall survive the termination of this Agreement) that, prior to the date that is one year and one day after the payment in full of all outstanding commercial paper or other senior indebtedness of any SPV, it will not institute against, or join any other person in instituting against, such SPV any bankruptcy, reorganization, arrangement, insolvency or liquidation proceedings under the laws of the United States of America or any State thereof.  In addition, notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 9.04, any SPV may (i) with notice to, but without the prior written consent of, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent and without paying any processing fee therefor, assign all or a portion of its interests in any Loans to the Granting Lender or to any financial institutions (consented to by the Borrower and the Administrative Agent) providing liquidity and/or credit support to or for the account of such SPV to support the funding or maintenance of Loans and (ii) disclose on a confidential basis any non-public information relating to its Loans to any rating agency, commercial paper dealer or provider of any surety, guarantee or credit or liquidity enhancement to such SPV.  As this Section 9.04(e) applies to any particular SPV, this Section may not be amended without the written consent of such SPV.
Granting Lender
SPV
provided
 
SECTION 9.05.
 
  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Loan Parties in the Loan Documents and in the certificates or other instruments delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the other parties hereto and shall survive the execution and delivery of the Loan Documents and the making of any Loans and issuance of any Letters of Credit, regardless of any investigation made by any such other party or on its behalf and notwithstanding that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may have had notice or knowledge of any Default or incorrect representation or warranty at the time any credit is extended hereunder, and shall continue in full force and effect as long as the principal of or any accrued interest on any Loan or any fee or any other amount payable under this Agreement is outstanding and
Survival.
 
 
 
 
74
 
unpaid or any Letter of Credit is outstanding and so long as the Revolving Commitments have not expired or terminated.  The provisions of Sections 2.14, 2.15, 2.16 and 9.03 and Article VIII shall survive and remain in full force and effect regardless of the consummation of the transactions contemplated hereby, the repayment of the Loans, the expiration or termination of the Letters of Credit and the Revolving Commitments or the termination of this Agreement or any provision hereof.
 
SECTION 9.06.
 
  This Agreement may be executed in counterparts (and by different parties hereto on different counterparts), each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Agreement, the other Loan Documents and any separate letter agreements with respect to fees payable to the Administrative Agent constitute the entire contract among the parties relating to the subject matter hereof and supersede any and all previous agreements and understandings, oral or written, relating to the subject matter hereof.  Except as provided in Section 4.01, this Agreement shall become effective when it shall have been executed by the Administrative Agent and when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts hereof which, when taken together, bear the signatures of each of the other parties hereto, and thereafter shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the parties hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  Delivery of an executed counterpart of a signature page of this Agreement by telecopy shall be effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Agreement.
Counterparts; Integration; Effectiveness.
 
SECTION 9.07.
 
  Any provision of this Agreement held to be invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any jurisdiction shall, as to such jurisdiction, be ineffective to the extent of such invalidity, illegality or unenforceability without affecting the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions hereof; and the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not invalidate such provision in any other jurisdiction.
Severability.
 
SECTION 9.08.
 
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender and each of its Affiliates is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other obligations at any time owing by such Lender or Affiliate to or for the credit or the account of the Borrower against any of and all the obligations of the Borrower now or hereafter existing under this Agreement held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Agreement and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
 
SECTION 9.09.
 
  (a)  This Agreement shall be construed in accordance with and governed by the law of the State of New York.
Governing Law; Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the exclusive jurisdiction of the
 
 
 
 
75
 
Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to any Loan Document, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding shall be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any Issuing Bank or any Lender may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document against Holdings, the Borrower or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
 
(c)
 
Each of Holdings and the Borrower hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection which it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Agreement or any other Loan Document in any court referred to in paragraph (b) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(d)
 
Each party to this Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 9.01.  Nothing in this Agreement or any other Loan Document will affect the right of any party to this Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 9.10.
 
  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN  ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS AGREEMENT, ANY OTHER LOAN DOCUMENT OR THE TRANSACTIONS CONTEMPLATED HEREBY (WHETHER BASED ON CONTRACT, TORT OR ANY OTHER THEORY).  EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS AGREEMENT BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION.
WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL.
 
SECTION 9.11.
 
  Article and Section headings and the Table of Contents used herein are for convenience of reference only, are not part of this Agreement and shall not affect the construction of, or be taken into consideration in interpreting, this Agreement.
Headings.
 
 
 
 
76
 
SECTION 9.12.
 
  Each of the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank and the Lenders agrees to maintain the confidentiality of the Information (as defined below), except that Information may be disclosed (a) to its and its Affiliates' directors, officers, employees and agents, including accountants, legal counsel and other advisors (it being understood that the Persons to whom such disclosure is made will be informed of the confidential nature of such Information and instructed to keep such Information confidential), (b) to the extent requested by any regulatory authority, (c) to the extent required by applicable laws or regulations or by any subpoena or similar legal process, (d) to any other party to this Agreement, (e) in connection with the exercise of any remedies hereunder or any suit, action or proceeding relating to this Agreement or the enforcement of rights hereunder, (f) subject to an agreement containing provisions substantially the same as those of this Section, to (i) any assignee of or Participant in, or any prospective assignee of or Participant in, any of its rights or obligations under this Agreement or (ii) any actual or prospective counterparty (or its advisors) to any swap or derivative transaction relating to the Borrower and its obligations, (g) with the consent of the Borrower or (h) to the extent such Information (i) becomes publicly available other than as a result of a breach of this Section or (ii) becomes available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis from a source other than the Borrower.
Confidentiality.
 
For the purposes of this Section, Information means all information received from the Borrower relating to the Borrower or its business, other than any such information that is available to the Administrative Agent, the Issuing Bank or any Lender on a non-confidential basis prior to disclosure by the Borrower; provided that, in the case of information received from the Borrower after the date hereof, such information is clearly identified at the time of delivery as confidential.  Any Person required to maintain the confidentiality of Information as provided in this Section shall be considered to have complied with its obligation to do so if such Person has exercised the same degree of care to maintain the confidentiality of such Information as such Person would accord to its own confidential information.
 
EACH LENDER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT INFORMATION AS DEFINED IN SECTION 9.12 FURNISHED TO IT PURSUANT TO THIS AGREEMENT MAY INCLUDE MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION CONCERNING THE BORROWER AND ITS RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE SECURITIES, AND CONFIRMS THAT IT HAS DEVELOPED COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES REGARDING THE USE OF MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION AND THAT IT WILL HANDLE SUCH MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH THOSE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
ALL INFORMATION, INCLUDING REQUESTS FOR WAIVERS AND AMENDMENTS, FURNISHED BY THE BORROWER OR THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT PURSUANT TO, OR IN THE COURSE OF ADMINISTERING, THIS AGREEMENT WILL BE SYNDICATE-LEVEL INFORMATION, WHICH MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION ABOUT THE BORROWER, THE LOAN PARTIES AND THEIR RELATED PARTIES OR THEIR RESPECTIVE
 
 
 
 
77
 
SECURITIES.  ACCORDINGLY, EACH LENDER REPRESENTS TO THE BORROWER AND THE ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT THAT IT HAS IDENTIFIED IN ITS ADMINISTRATIVE QUESTIONNAIRE A CREDIT CONTACT WHO MAY RECEIVE INFORMATION THAT MAY CONTAIN MATERIAL NON-PUBLIC INFORMATION IN ACCORDANCE WITH ITS COMPLIANCE PROCEDURES AND APPLICABLE LAW, INCLUDING FEDERAL AND STATE SECURITIES LAWS.
 
SECTION 9.13.
 
  Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, if at any time the interest rate applicable to any Loan, together with all fees, charges and other amounts which are treated as interest on such Loan under applicable law (collectively, the ), shall exceed the maximum lawful rate (the ) which may be contracted for, charged, taken, received or reserved by the Lender holding such Loan in accordance with applicable law, the rate of interest payable in respect of such Loan hereunder, together with all Charges payable in respect thereof, shall be limited to the Maximum Rate and, to the extent lawful, the interest and Charges that would have been payable in respect of such Loan but were not payable as a result of the operation of this Section shall be cumulated and the interest and Charges payable to such Lender in respect of other Loans or periods shall be increased (but not above the Maximum Rate therefor) until such cumulated amount, together with interest thereon at the Federal Funds Effective Rate to the date of repayment, shall have been received by such Lender.
Interest Rate Limitation.
Charges
Maximum Rate
 
SECTION 9.14.
 
.  Each Lender hereby notifies each Loan Party that pursuant to the requirements of the USA PATRIOT Act it is required to obtain, verify and record information that identifies such Loan Party, which information includes the name and address of such Loan Party and other information that will allow such Lender to identify such Loan Party in accordance with the USA PATRIOT Act.
USA PATRIOT Act
 
SECTION 9.15.
 
Each Lender party hereto, that is also a party to the Existing Credit Agreement, hereby consents and agrees that no prior notice shall be required under the Existing Credit Agreement with respect to the termination of commitments under the Existing Credit Agreement or prepayment of loans thereunder; that notice thereof is given on the Effective Date.
provided
 
SECTION 9.16.
 
.  Each of Holdings and the Borrower, on behalf of itself and its Subsidiaries, agrees that in connection with all aspects of the transactions contemplated hereby and any communications in connection therewith, Holdings, the Borrower, the other Subsidiaries and their Affiliates, on the one hand, and the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks and their Affiliates, on the other hand, will have a business relationship that does not create, by implication or otherwise, any fiduciary duty on the part of the Administrative Agent, the Arrangers, the Lenders, the Issuing Banks or their Affiliates, and no such duty will be deemed to have arisen in connection with any such transactions or communications.
No Fiduciary Relationship
 
 
 
 
78
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have caused this Agreement to be duly executed by their respective authorized officers as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
SIGNATURE PAGE TO THE CREDIT AGREEMENT DATED AS OF MAY 27, 2011, AMONG ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, THE LENDERS PARTY HERETO AND JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., AS ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
           Schedule 2.01
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 3.06
 
 
 
I.           Environmental
 
A.           Environmental Permits
 
None.
 
B.           Environmental Claims
 
None.
II.           Other
automobile manufacturers, automotive parts manufacturers and other retailers in lawsuits alleging injury as a result of exposure to asbestos-containing products.  The plaintiffs have alleged that these products were manufactured, distributed and/or sold by the various defendants.  To date, these products have primarily included brake parts.  The damages claimed againstthe defendants in some of these proceedings are substantial.  Additionally, some of the automotive parts manufacturers that are named as defendants in these lawsuits have declared bankruptcy, which will limit plaintiffs ability to recover monetary damages from those defendants.  Borrower diligently defends against these claims, but it may enter into discussions regarding settlement of these and other lawsuits, and may enter into settlement agreements, if Borrower believes settlement is in the best interest of Borrower and its shareholders.   Borrower also believes that many of these claims are at least partially covered by insurance.  Based on discovery to date, Borrower does not believe the cases currently pending will have a material adverse effect on Borrower.  However, if Borrower were to incur an adverse verdict in one or more of these claims and were ordered to pay damages that were not covered by insurance, these claims could have a material adverse effect on Borrowers operating results, financial position and liquidity.
Borrower and its subsidiaries (including but not limited to, Western Auto Supply Company and Discount) have been named as defendants along with other
 
 
 
 
 
           Schedule 3.12
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 3.13
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 6.01
 
 
Indebtedness pursuant to Loan Agreement by and between Advance Stores Company, Incorporated and The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, acting by and through the Department of Community and Economic Development dated December 13, 2005.
 
Puerto Rico Excise Tax Bond
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 6.02
 
 
General
 
Program Agreement between Borrower and Household Corporation dated as of January 25, 2005
 
Merchant Services Bankcard Agreement dated June 25, 2001 by and between Sun Trust Bank, successor in interest to The Northern Trust Company, SunTrust Merchant Services, LLC, a First Data Alliance, successor in interest to Unified Merchant Services, and Borrower
 
Agreement for American Express Card Acceptance between Borrower and American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc. effective January 12, 1996
 
Merchant Services Agreement by and between Discover Financial Services LLC and Borrower, effective October 1, 2006
 
Loan Agreement by and between Borrower and The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, acting by and through the Department of Community and Economic Development, dated December 13, 2005.
 
 
 
 
 
           Schedule 6.04
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
           Schedule 6.06
 
 
Program Agreement between Borrower and Household Corporation dated as of January 25, 2005
 
Merchant Services Bankcard Agreement dated June 25, 2001 by and between Sun Trust Bank, successor in interest to The Northern Trust Company, SunTrust Merchant Services, LLC, a First Data Alliance, successor in interest to Unified Merchant Services, and Borrower
 
Agreement for American Express Card Acceptance between Borrower and American Express Travel Related Services Company, Inc., effective January 12, 1996
 
Merchant Services Agreement by and between Discover Financial Services LLC and Borrower, effective October 1, 2006
 
Loan Agreement by and between Borrower and The Commonwealth of Pennsylvania, acting by and through the Department of Community and Economic Development, dated December 13, 2005.
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT A
 
This Assignment and Assumption (the ) is dated as of the Effective Date set forth below and is entered into by and between [] (the ) and [] (the ).  Capitalized terms used but not defined herein shall have the meanings given to them in the Credit Agreement identified below  (as amended, the ), receipt of a copy of which is hereby acknowledged by the Assignee.  The Standard Terms and Conditions set forth in Annex 1 attached hereto are hereby agreed to and incorporated herein by reference and made a part of this Assignment and Assumption as if set forth herein in full.
Assignment and Assumption
Insert name of Assignor
Assignor
Insert name of Assignee
Assignee
Credit Agreement
For an agreed consideration, the Assignor hereby irrevocably sells and assigns to the Assignee, and the Assignee hereby irrevocably purchases and assumes from the Assignor, subject to and in accordance with the Standard Terms and Conditions and the Credit Agreement, as of the Effective Date inserted by the Administrative Agent as contemplated below (i) all of the Assignors rights and obligations in its capacity as a Lender under the Credit Agreement and any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto to the extent related to the amount and percentage interest identified below of all of such outstanding rights and obligations of the Assignor under the respective facilities identified below (including any letters of credit, guarantees, and swingline loans included in such facilities) and (ii) to the extent permitted to be assigned under applicable law, all claims, suits, causes of action and any other right of the Assignor (in its capacity as a Lender) against any Person, whether known or unknown, arising under or in connection with the Credit Agreement, any other documents or instruments delivered pursuant thereto or the loan transactions governed thereby or in any way based on or related to any of the foregoing, including contract claims, tort claims, malpractice claims, statutory claims and all other claims at law or in equity related to the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clause (i) above (the rights and obligations sold and assigned pursuant to clauses (i) and (ii) above being referred to herein collectively as the ).  Such sale and assignment is without recourse to the Assignor and, except as expressly provided in this Assignment and Assumption, without representation or warranty by the Assignor.
Assigned Interest
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Set forth, to at least 9 decimals, as a percentage of the Commitment/Loans of all Lenders thereunder.
1
 
 
 
 
 
Effective Date:   _____________ ___, 20___ [TO BE INSERTED BY ADMINISTRATIVE AGENT AND WHICH SHALL BE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF RECORDATION OF TRANSFER IN THE REGISTER THEREFOR.]
The Assignee agrees to deliver to the Administrative Agent a completed Administrative Questionnaire in which the Assignee designates one or more Credit Contacts to whom all syndicate-level information  (which may contain material non-public information about the Borrower, the Loan Parties and their related parties or their respective securities) will be made available and who may receive such information in accordance with the Assignees compliance procedures and applicable laws, including Federal and state securities laws.
The terms set forth in this Assignment and Assumption are hereby agreed to:
 
 
 
 
Consented to and Accepted:
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as
  Administrative Agent
By_________________________________
  Title:
[Consented to:]
2
ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED
By________________________________
  Title:
 
To be added only if the consent of the Borrower is required by the terms of the Credit Agreement.
2
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT B
 
[FORM OF]
 
GUARANTEE AGREEMENT (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, this ) dated as of [            ] among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the ), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party hereto (the  and, together with Holdings, the ) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
Guarantee Agreement
Holdings
Borrower
Subsidiary Guarantors
Guarantors
JPMCB
 
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011  (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the ) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the t) for the Lenders.  Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agen
 
The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Banks have agreed to issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subject to the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement.  The Borrower has elected that the Guarantors guarantee the Obligations (as defined below) by entering into this Guarantee Agreement.  The Guarantors acknowledge that they will derive substantial benefit from the making of the Loans by the Lenders and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Banks.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit are conditioned on, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Guarantors of a Guarantee Agreement in the form hereof.  As consideration therefor and in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit, the Guarantors are willing to execute this Guarantee Agreement.
 
Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
 
  Each Guarantor unconditionally guarantees, as a primary obligor and not merely as a surety, (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements made by the Issuing Banks with respect
Guarantee.
 
 
 
 
2
 
thereto, interest thereon and obligations to provide, under certain circumstances, cash collateral in connection therewith, and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Lenders under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents (all the monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) and (b) being collectively called the ).  Each Guarantor further agrees that the Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice to or further assent from it, and that the security interest granted hereunder and the obligations of such Guarantor will survive any extension or renewal of any Obligation.
Obligations
 
SECTION 2.
 
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives presentment to, demand of payment from and protest to the Borrower of any of the Obligations, and also waives notice of acceptance of its guarantee and notice of protest for nonpayment.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be affected by (a) the failure of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to assert any claim or demand or to enforce or exercise any right or remedy against the Borrower or the Guarantors under the provisions of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or otherwise or (b) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of, or any release from, any of the terms or provisions of this Guarantee Agreement, any other Loan Document, any Guarantee or any other agreement.
Obligations Not Waived.
 
SECTION 3.
 
  Each Guarantor further agrees that its guarantee constitutes a guarantee of payment when due and not of collection, and waives any right to require that any resort be had by the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to any of the security held for payment of the Obligations or to any balance of any deposit account or credit on the books of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank in favor of the Borrower or any other Person.
Guarantee of Payment.
 
SECTION 4.
 
  The obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise of any of the Obligations, and shall not be subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Obligations or otherwise.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by the failure of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy under the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, by any waiver or modification of any provision of any thereof, by any default, failure or delay, wilful or otherwise, in the
No Discharge or Diminishment of Guarantee.
 
 
 
 
3
 
performance of the Obligations, or by any other act or omission that may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of such Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of such Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of all the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations).
 
SECTION 5.
 
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of the Borrower or any other Guarantor or the unenforceability of the Obligations or any part thereof from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of the Borrower or any other Guarantor, other than the final and indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations.  The Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks may, at their election, compromise or adjust any part of the Obligations, make any other accommodation with the Borrower or any other guarantor or exercise any other right or remedy available to them against the Borrower or any other guarantor, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of any Guarantor hereunder except to the extent the Obligations have been fully, finally and indefeasibly paid in cash.  Pursuant to applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though such election operates, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or to extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of such Guarantor against the Borrower or any other Guarantor.
Defenses of Borrower Waived.
 
SECTION 6.
 
  (a)  In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right that the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank has at law or in equity against any Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Borrower or any other Guarantor to pay any Obligation when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, after notice of prepayment or otherwise, each Guarantor hereby promises to and will forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, to or as directed by the Administrative Agent in cash the amount of such unpaid Obligation.  Upon payment by any Guarantor of any sums to the Administrative Agent as provided above, all rights of such Guarantor against the Borrower or any other Loan Party arising as a result thereof by way of right of subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or otherwise shall in all respects be subject to Sections 6(b), (c) and (d) below.
Agreement to Pay; Subordination.
 
(b)
 
In addition to all such rights of indemnity and subrogation as the Guarantors may have under applicable law (but subject to Section 6(d)), the Borrower agrees that in the event a payment in respect of any Obligation shall be made by any Guarantor under this Guarantee Agreement, the Borrower shall indemnify such Guarantor for the full amount of such payment and such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the Person to whom such payment shall have been made to the extent of such payment.
 
(c)
 
Each Subsidiary Guarantor (a ) agrees (subject to Section 6(d)) that, in the event a payment shall be made by any other Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder in respect of any Obligation and such other Subsidiary Guarantor
Contributing Party
 
 
 
 
4
 
(the ) shall not have been fully indemnified by the Borrower as provided in Section 6(b), the Contributing Party shall indemnify the Claiming Party in an amount equal to the amount of such payment multiplied by a fraction of which the numerator shall be the net worth of the Contributing Party on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Subsidiary Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date of the supplement hereto executed and delivered by such Subsidiary Guarantor) and the denominator shall be the aggregate net worth of all the Subsidiary Guarantors on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Subsidiary Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date of the supplement hereto executed and delivered by such Subsidiary Guarantor).  Any Contributing Party making any payment to a Claiming Party pursuant to this Section 6(c) shall (subject to Section 6(d)) be subrogated to the rights of such Claiming Party under Section 6(b) to the extent of such payment.
Claiming Party
 
(d)
 
(i)  Notwithstanding any provision of this Guarantee Agreement to the contrary, all rights of the Guarantors under Sections 6(b) and 6(c) and all other rights of the Guarantors of indemnity, reimbursement, contribution or subrogation under applicable law or otherwise shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations.  No failure on the part of the Borrower or any Guarantor to make the payments required by Sections 6(b) and 6(c) (or any other payments required under applicable law or otherwise) shall in any respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor with respect to its obligations hereunder, and each Guarantor shall remain liable for the full amount of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder.
 
(ii)
 
Each Guarantor hereby agrees that all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations owed by it to, or to it by, any other Guarantor or any other Subsidiary shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations.
 
(e)
 
If, at any time that a Default has occurred and is continuing, any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor on account of (i) such subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or similar right or (ii) any such indebtedness of any Loan Party, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent to be credited against the payment of the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents.
 
SECTION 7.
 
  Each Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that such Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders or the Issuing Banks will have any duty to advise such Guarantor of information known to it or any of them regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information.
 
SECTION 8.
 
  Each Guarantor represents and warrants that all representations and warranties relating to it contained in the Credit Agreement are true and correct.
Representations and Warranties.
 
 
 
 
5
 
SECTION 9.
 
  The guarantees made hereunder (a) shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations) have been indefeasibly paid in full and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Banks have no further obligation to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement and (b) shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of any Obligation is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any Guarantor upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Borrower or any Guarantor or otherwise.  A Subsidiary Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations hereunder upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by the Credit Agreement as a result of which such Subsidiary Guarantor ceases to be a Subsidiary, that the Required Lenders shall have consented to such transaction (to the extent required by the Credit Agreement) and the terms of such consent did not provide otherwise.
Termination.
provided
 
SECTION 10.
 
  Whenever in this Guarantee Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of any Guarantor that are contained in this Guarantee Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  This Guarantee Agreement shall become effective as to any Guarantor when a counterpart hereof (or a supplement referred to in Section 20) executed on behalf of such Guarantor shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent, and a counterpart hereof (or such supplement, as applicable) shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon such Guarantor and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Guarantor, the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks, and their respective successors and assigns, except that no Guarantor shall have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void).  This Guarantee Agreement shall be construed as a separate agreement with respect to each Guarantor and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived or released with respect to any Guarantor without the approval of any other Guarantor and without affecting the obligations of any other Guarantor hereunder.
Binding Effect; Assignments; Several Agreement.
 
SECTION 11.
 
  (a)  No failure or delay of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or the Issuing Banks in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent hereunder and of the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Guarantee Agreement or consent to any departure by the Borrower or any Guarantor therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which
Waivers; Amendment.
 
 
 
 
6
 
given.  No notice or demand on the Borrower or any Guarantor in any case shall entitle the Borrower or such Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
 
(b)
 
Neither this Guarantee Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Guarantor or Guarantors with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification relates, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 12.
 
  THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law.
 
SECTION 13.
 
  All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement, and all communications and notices to any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be given care of the Borrower.
Notices.
 
SECTION 14.
 
  (a)  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Borrower and Guarantors herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks and shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Banks regardless of any investigation made by such Lenders or such Issuing Banks or on their behalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until all the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Lenders have no further commitment to lend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Banks have no further commitment to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement.
Survival of Agreement; Severability.
 
(b)
 
In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Guarantee Agreement or in any other Loan Document should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and therein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
SECTION 15.
 
  This Guarantee Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract, and shall become effective as provided in Section 10.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Guarantee Agreement by facsimile or other electronic method of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Guarantee Agreement.
Counterparts.
 
 
 
 
7
 
SECTION 16.
 
  The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement shall be applicable to this Guarantee Agreement.
Rules of Interpretation.
 
SECTION 17.
 
  (a)  The Borrower and each Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding shall be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower or any Guarantor or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
 
Each of the Borrower and the Guarantors hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(c)
 
Each party to this Guarantee Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 13.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Guarantee Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 18.
 
  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT OR THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS. EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
 
 
 
8
 
DOCUMENTS, AS APPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 18.
 
SECTION 19.
 
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other Indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender to or for the credit or the account of any Guarantor against any or all the obligations of such Guarantor now or hereafter existing under this Guarantee Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section 19 are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
 
SECTION 20.
 
.  Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of such term in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary.  Upon execution and delivery after the date hereof by the Administrative Agent and such a Subsidiary of an instrument in the form of Annex I hereto, such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder with the same force and effect as if originally named as a Subsidiary Guarantor herein and thereafter each reference to a Guarantor hereunder shall be deemed to include such Subsidiary.  The execution and delivery of any instrument adding an additional Subsidiary Guarantor as a party to this Guarantee Agreement shall not require the consent of the Borrower or any other Guarantor hereunder.  The rights and obligations of the Borrower and each Guarantor hereunder shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the addition of any new Subsidiary Guarantor as a party to this Guarantee Agreement.
Additional Subsidiary Guarantors
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SUPPLEMENT No. [  ] (this ) dated as of [                ], to the Guarantee Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (the ), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the ), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party thereto (the  and, together with Holdings, the ) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
Supplement
Guarantee Agreement
Holdings
Borrower
Subsidiary Guarantors
Guarantors
JPMCB
 
A.  Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the ) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ) for the Lenders.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agent
 
B.  Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement.
 
C.  The Borrower and the Guarantors have entered into the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit.  Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement and Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of such term in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary.  Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement.  The undersigned Subsidiary (the ) is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement to become a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue additional Letters of Credit and as consideration for Loans previously made and Letters of Credit previously issued.
New Guarantor
 
Accordingly, the Administrative Agent and the New Guarantor agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.  In accordance with Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, the New Guarantor by its signature below becomes a Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as a Guarantor
 
 
 
 
 
and the New Guarantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Guarantee Agreement applicable to it as a Guarantor thereunder and (b) represents and warrants that the representations and warranties made by it as a Guarantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof.  Each reference to a Guarantor in the Guarantee Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Guarantor.  The Guarantee Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
The New Guarantor represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
 
This Supplement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Supplement shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile or other electronic methods of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Supplement.
 
Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Guarantee Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 2.  
THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the Guarantee Agreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision hereof in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 13 of the Guarantee Agreement.  All communications and notices hereunder to the New Guarantor shall be given to it in care of the Borrower.
 
The New Guarantor agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel for the Administrative Agent.
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent have duly executed this Supplement to the Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
EXHIBIT C
 
[FORM OF OPINION OF COUNSEL FOR THE LOAN PARTIES]
 
May 27, 2011
 
JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as Administrative Agent, and
the Lenders that are parties to the
Credit Agreement (as defined below)
1111 Fannin Street, 10th Floor
Houston, Texas 77002
 
 
Ladies and Gentlemen:
 
We have acted as counsel to (i) Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation (the ) in connection with the Credit Agreement dated as of the date hereof (the ), among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (), the Borrower, JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ), and the lenders party thereto and referred to therein as Lenders (the ), and the transactions contemplated thereby; and (ii) Advance Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation (); Advance Patriot, Inc., a Delaware corporation (); TTR, Inc., a Delaware corporation ( and, together with Holdings, AAPR, and Advance Patriot, the ); Advance Auto Business Support, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company (); Advance Auto Innovations, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company (); Advance Trucking Corporation, Virginia corporation (); Crossroads Global Trading Corp., a Virginia corporation (); Discount Auto Parts, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company (); E-Advance, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company ( and, together with the Borrower, AA Business, AA Innovations, Advance Trucking, Crossroads, and Discount, the ); and Autopart International, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation ( or the  and, together with the Delaware Entities and the Virginia Entities (other than the Borrower), each, a  and collectively, the , and together with the Borrower, the ) in connection with the Guarantee Agreement dated as of the date hereof (the ) from the Loan Parties in favor of the Agent and the Lenders.  The Guarantors (other than Holdings) are collectively referred to herein as the
Borrower
Credit Agreement
Holdings
Agent
Lenders
AAPR
Advance Patriot
TTR
Delaware Entities
AA Business
AA Innovations
Advance Trucking
Crossroads
Discount
E-Advance
Virginia Entities
Autopart International
Massachusetts Entity
Guarantor
Guarantors
Loan Parties
Guarantee
 
 
 
 
 
 
.  Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined shall have the respective meanings given such terms in the Credit Agreement.  This opinion is rendered to you pursuant to Section 4.01(b) of the Credit Agreement.
Subsidiary Guarantors
 
Although we act generally as counsel to the Loan Parties, our representation is limited to matters individually referred to us by the management of the Loan Parties.
 
As to all matters of fact (including factual conclusions and characterizations and descriptions of purpose, intention or other state of mind), we have relied, with your permission, entirely upon (a) the representations and warranties of the Loan Parties set forth in each of the Loan Documents (as defined below) and (b) certificates of certain of the officers, managers, members, or other representatives of the Loan Parties and have assumed, without independent inquiry, the accuracy of those representations, warranties, and certificates.  For purposes of our opinion rendered in paragraph below, with respect to the incorporation, organization, formation, existence, qualification, or standing of any Loan Party, our opinion relies entirely upon and is limited by those certificates of public officials attached hereto as on which we have relied without independent inquiry, and we assume that the information contained therein is true and correct as of the date of this opinion.  With respect to any Loan Party which is a Virginia limited liability company, we have assumed that no events, circumstances, or conditions exist or have taken place which have previously constituted or resulted in, or which constitute or result in, or which will in the future constitute or result in, the termination, dissolution, cancellation, liquidation, winding up, loss of qualification or cessation of the existence of such Loan Party, whether pursuant to its Governing Documents (as defined below), applicable law, or otherwise.
1
Exhibit A,
 
In connection with this opinion, we have examined originals or copies of the following documents:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
The documents specified in items (i) and (ii) above are referred to herein, collectively, as the .  We have examined the documents listed in the preceding paragraph and such other corporate, limited liability company, and public records and agreements, instruments, certificates and other documents as we have deemed necessary or appropriate for the purposes of this opinion.
Loan Documents
 
We have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the conformity to the originals of all documents reviewed by us as copies, the authenticity and completeness of all original documents reviewed by us in original or copy form and the legal competence of each individual executing any document.
 
As used in this opinion, the UCC means the Uniform Commercial Code as adopted and in effect in a specified jurisdiction; the  means the UCC of the State of New York, the  means the UCC of the Commonwealth of Virginia, VA Code Ann. Titles 8.1A through 8.9A, the  means the UCC of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts and the  means the UCC of the State of Delaware.
New York UCC
Virginia UCC
Massachusetts UCC
Delaware UCC
 
For purposes of this opinion, we have made such examination of law as we have deemed necessary.  This opinion is limited solely to the internal substantive laws of the State of New York, the Commonwealth of Virginia (including, without limitation, the Virginia Stock Corporation Act as applied by courts located in Virginia (the ), and the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act as applied by courts located in Virginia (the )), and the Commonwealth of Massachusetts (including, without limitation, the Massachusetts Business Corporation Act as applied by courts located in Massachusetts (the )), each as applied by courts located in its respective jurisdiction without regard to
VSCA
VLLCA
MBCA
 
 
 
 
 
 
choice of law, the federal laws of the United States of America (except for Federal and state tax, antitrust, energy, utilities, national security, anti-terrorism, anti-money laundering, securities, or blue sky laws, as to which we express no opinion in this letter, except as set forth in paragraphs and below with respect to the federal statutes and regulations specifically referred to therein), and the Delaware General Corporation Law as applied by courts located in Delaware (the ); and we express no opinion as to the laws of any other jurisdiction.  We have not conducted any special review of statutes, rules, or regulations for purposes of this opinion, and our opinions are in any event limited to such laws, rules, and regulations as in our experience are normally applicable to transactions of the type contemplated by the Loan Documents.  Our opinions in paragraph below are limited to New York law.
5
6
DGCL
3
 
We note that the Loan Documents contain provisions stating that they are to be governed by the laws of the State of New York (each contractual choice of law clause being referred to as a ).  As to each such Chosen-Law Provision, our opinion in paragraph below is based solely upon and limited to the extent provided in New York General Obligations Law Section 5-1401, as applied by a New York state court or a federal court sitting in New York and applying New York choice of law principles, and no other opinion is given herein as to any Chosen-Law Provision, or otherwise as to the choice of law or internal substantive rules of law that any court or other tribunal may apply to the transactions contemplated by the Loan Documents.
Chosen-Law Provision
3
 
Our opinion is further subject to the following exceptions, qualifications and assumptions, all of which we understand to be acceptable to you:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, and subject to the limitations and qualifications set forth below, we are of the opinion that:
 
 
(b)           Each of the Borrower, Advance Trucking, and Crossroads is a corporation validly existing and in corporate good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
 
(c)           Each of AA Business, AA Innovations, Discount, and E-Advance is a limited liability company legally existing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
 
 
 
 
 
 
(d)           Autopart International is a corporation validly existing and in corporate good standing under the laws of the Commonwealth of Massachusetts.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This opinion is delivered solely to you and for your benefit in connection with the Loan Documents.  It may not be relied upon by you for any other purpose, furnished or referred to any other person or entity (other than your successors and permitted assigns as Agent or Lenders, as the case may be, under and in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement) for any other reason without our prior written consent, or relied upon, by any other person or entity (other than your successors and permitted assigns as Agent or Lenders, as the case may be, under and in accordance with the terms of the Credit Agreement) for any reason without our prior written consent.
 
Very truly yours,
 
 
BINGHAM McCUTCHEN LLP
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Schedule 1
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit A
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Exhibit B
 
 
The Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (as amended, restated, supplemented or otherwise modified), among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., the Subsidiary Guarantors as listed on the signature pages thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, a national banking association, as trustee.
 

Exhibit 10.44
 
GUARANTEE AGREEMENT (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, this ) dated as of May 27, 2011 among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the ), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party hereto (the  and, together with Holdings, the ) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
Guarantee Agreement
Holdings
Borrower
Subsidiary Guarantors
Guarantors
JPMCB
 
Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the ) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the t) for the Lenders.  Capitalized terms used herein and not defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agen
 
The Lenders have agreed to make Loans to the Borrower, and the Issuing Banks have agreed to issue Letters of Credit for the account of the Borrower, pursuant to, and upon the terms and subject to the conditions specified in, the Credit Agreement.  The Borrower has elected that the Guarantors guarantee the Obligations (as defined below) by entering into this Guarantee Agreement.  The Guarantors acknowledge that they will derive substantial benefit from the making of the Loans by the Lenders and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Banks.  The obligations of the Lenders to make Loans and of the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit are conditioned on, among other things, the execution and delivery by the Guarantors of a Guarantee Agreement in the form hereof.  As consideration therefor and in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit, the Guarantors are willing to execute this Guarantee Agreement.
 
Accordingly, the parties hereto agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.
 
  Each Guarantor unconditionally guarantees, as a primary obligor and not merely as a surety, (a) the due and punctual payment of (i) the principal of and premium, if any, and interest (including interest accruing during the pendency of any bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding) on the Loans, when and as due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, upon one or more dates set for prepayment or otherwise, (ii) each payment required to be made by the Borrower under the Credit Agreement in respect of any Letter of Credit, when and as due, including payments in respect of reimbursement of disbursements made by the Issuing Banks with respect thereto, interest thereon and obligations to provide, under certain circumstances, cash collateral in connection therewith, and (iii) all other monetary obligations, including fees, costs, expenses and indemnities, whether primary, secondary, direct, contingent, fixed or otherwise (including monetary obligations incurred during the pendency of any
Guarantee.
 
 
 
 
2
 
bankruptcy, insolvency, receivership or other similar proceeding, regardless of whether allowed or allowable in such proceeding), of the Loan Parties to the Lenders under the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents and (b) the due and punctual performance of all covenants, agreements, obligations and liabilities of the Borrower under or pursuant to the Credit Agreement and the other Loan Documents (all the monetary obligations described in the preceding clauses (a) and (b) being collectively called the ).  Each Guarantor further agrees that the Obligations may be extended or renewed, in whole or in part, without notice to or further assent from it, and that the security interest granted hereunder and the obligations of such Guarantor will survive any extension or renewal of any Obligation.
Obligations
 
SECTION 2.
 
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives presentment to, demand of payment from and protest to the Borrower of any of the Obligations, and also waives notice of acceptance of its guarantee and notice of protest for nonpayment.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be affected by (a) the failure of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to assert any claim or demand or to enforce or exercise any right or remedy against the Borrower or the Guarantors under the provisions of the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or otherwise or (b) any rescission, waiver, amendment or modification of, or any release from, any of the terms or provisions of this Guarantee Agreement, any other Loan Document, any Guarantee or any other agreement.
Obligations Not Waived.
 
SECTION 3.
 
  Each Guarantor further agrees that its guarantee constitutes a guarantee of payment when due and not of collection, and waives any right to require that any resort be had by the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to any of the security held for payment of the Obligations or to any balance of any deposit account or credit on the books of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank in favor of the Borrower or any other Person.
Guarantee of Payment.
 
SECTION 4.
 
  The obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be subject to any reduction, limitation, impairment or termination for any reason (other than the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations), including any claim of waiver, release, surrender, alteration or compromise of any of the Obligations, and shall not be subject to any defense or setoff, counterclaim, recoupment or termination whatsoever by reason of the invalidity, illegality or unenforceability of the Obligations or otherwise.  Without limiting the generality of the foregoing, the obligations of each Guarantor hereunder shall not be discharged or impaired or otherwise affected by the failure of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank to assert any claim or demand or to enforce any remedy under the Credit Agreement, any other Loan Document or any other agreement, by any waiver or modification of any provision of any thereof, by any default, failure or delay, wilful or otherwise, in the performance of the Obligations, or by any other act or omission that may or might in any manner or to any extent vary the risk of such Guarantor or that would otherwise operate as a discharge of such Guarantor as a matter of law or equity (other than the indefeasible
No Discharge or Diminishment of Guarantee.
 
 
 
 
3
 
payment in full in cash of all the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations).
 
SECTION 5.
 
  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense based on or arising out of any defense of the Borrower or any other Guarantor or the unenforceability of the Obligations or any part thereof from any cause, or the cessation from any cause of the liability of the Borrower or any other Guarantor, other than the final and indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations and inchoate indemnification and reimbursement obligations.  The Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks may, at their election, compromise or adjust any part of the Obligations, make any other accommodation with the Borrower or any other guarantor or exercise any other right or remedy available to them against the Borrower or any other guarantor, without affecting or impairing in any way the liability of any Guarantor hereunder except to the extent the Obligations have been fully, finally and indefeasibly paid in cash.  Pursuant to applicable law, each Guarantor waives any defense arising out of any such election even though such election operates, pursuant to applicable law, to impair or to extinguish any right of reimbursement or subrogation or other right or remedy of such Guarantor against the Borrower or any other Guarantor.
Defenses of Borrower Waived.
 
SECTION 6.
 
  (a)  In furtherance of the foregoing and not in limitation of any other right that the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank has at law or in equity against any Guarantor by virtue hereof, upon the failure of the Borrower or any other Guarantor to pay any Obligation when and as the same shall become due, whether at maturity, by acceleration, after notice of prepayment or otherwise, each Guarantor hereby promises to and will forthwith pay, or cause to be paid, to or as directed by the Administrative Agent in cash the amount of such unpaid Obligation.  Upon payment by any Guarantor of any sums to the Administrative Agent as provided above, all rights of such Guarantor against the Borrower or any other Loan Party arising as a result thereof by way of right of subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or otherwise shall in all respects be subject to Sections 6(b), (c) and (d) below.
Agreement to Pay; Subordination.
 
(b)
 
In addition to all such rights of indemnity and subrogation as the Guarantors may have under applicable law (but subject to Section 6(d)), the Borrower agrees that in the event a payment in respect of any Obligation shall be made by any Guarantor under this Guarantee Agreement, the Borrower shall indemnify such Guarantor for the full amount of such payment and such Guarantor shall be subrogated to the rights of the Person to whom such payment shall have been made to the extent of such payment.
 
(c)
 
Each Subsidiary Guarantor (a ) agrees (subject to Section 6(d)) that, in the event a payment shall be made by any other Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder in respect of any Obligation and such other Subsidiary Guarantor (the ) shall not have been fully indemnified by the Borrower as provided in Section 6(b), the Contributing Party shall indemnify the Claiming Party in an amount equal to the amount of such payment multiplied by a fraction of which the numerator
Contributing Party
Claiming Party
 
 
 
 
4
 
shall be the net worth of the Contributing Party on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Subsidiary Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date of the supplement hereto executed and delivered by such Subsidiary Guarantor) and the denominator shall be the aggregate net worth of all the Subsidiary Guarantors on the date hereof (or, in the case of any Subsidiary Guarantor becoming a party hereto after the date hereof, the date of the supplement hereto executed and delivered by such Subsidiary Guarantor).  Any Contributing Party making any payment to a Claiming Party pursuant to this Section 6(c) shall (subject to Section 6(d)) be subrogated to the rights of such Claiming Party under Section 6(b) to the extent of such payment.
 
(d)
 
(i)  Notwithstanding any provision of this Guarantee Agreement to the contrary, all rights of the Guarantors under Sections 6(b) and 6(c) and all other rights of the Guarantors of indemnity, reimbursement, contribution or subrogation under applicable law or otherwise shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations.  No failure on the part of the Borrower or any Guarantor to make the payments required by Sections 6(b) and 6(c) (or any other payments required under applicable law or otherwise) shall in any respect limit the obligations and liabilities of any Guarantor with respect to its obligations hereunder, and each Guarantor shall remain liable for the full amount of the obligations of such Guarantor hereunder.
 
(ii)
 
Each Guarantor hereby agrees that all Indebtedness and other monetary obligations owed by it to, or to it by, any other Guarantor or any other Subsidiary shall be fully subordinated to the indefeasible payment in full in cash of the Obligations.
 
(e)
 
If, at any time that a Default has occurred and is continuing, any amount shall be paid to any Guarantor on account of (i) such subrogation, contribution, reimbursement, indemnity or similar right or (ii) any such indebtedness of any Loan Party, such amount shall be held in trust for the benefit of the Lenders and shall forthwith be paid to the Administrative Agent to be credited against the payment of the Obligations, whether matured or unmatured, in accordance with the terms of the Loan Documents.
 
SECTION 7.
 
  Each Guarantor assumes all responsibility for being and keeping itself informed of the Borrowers financial condition and assets, and of all other circumstances bearing upon the risk of nonpayment of the Obligations and the nature, scope and extent of the risks that such Guarantor assumes and incurs hereunder, and agrees that none of the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders or the Issuing Banks will have any duty to advise such Guarantor of information known to it or any of them regarding such circumstances or risks.
Information.
 
SECTION 8.
 
  Each Guarantor represents and warrants that all representations and warranties relating to it contained in the Credit Agreement are true and correct.
Representations and Warranties.
 
SECTION 9.
 
  The guarantees made hereunder (a) shall terminate when all the Obligations (other than inchoate indemnification and
Termination.
 
 
 
 
5
 
reimbursement obligations) have been indefeasibly paid in full and the Lenders have no further commitment to lend under the Credit Agreement, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Banks have no further obligation to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement and (b) shall continue to be effective or be reinstated, as the case may be, if at any time payment, or any part thereof, of any Obligation is rescinded or must otherwise be restored by any Lender, any Issuing Bank or any Guarantor upon the bankruptcy or reorganization of the Borrower or any Guarantor or otherwise.  A Subsidiary Guarantor shall automatically be released from its obligations hereunder upon the consummation of any transaction permitted by the Credit Agreement as a result of which such Subsidiary Guarantor ceases to be a Subsidiary, that the Required Lenders shall have consented to such transaction (to the extent required by the Credit Agreement) and the terms of such consent did not provide otherwise.
provided
 
SECTION 10.
 
  Whenever in this Guarantee Agreement any of the parties hereto is referred to, such reference shall be deemed to include the successors and assigns of such party; and all covenants, promises and agreements by or on behalf of any Guarantor that are contained in this Guarantee Agreement shall bind and inure to the benefit of each party hereto and their respective successors and assigns.  This Guarantee Agreement shall become effective as to any Guarantor when a counterpart hereof (or a supplement referred to in Section 20) executed on behalf of such Guarantor shall have been delivered to the Administrative Agent, and a counterpart hereof (or such supplement, as applicable) shall have been executed on behalf of the Administrative Agent, and thereafter shall be binding upon such Guarantor and the Administrative Agent and their respective successors and assigns, and shall inure to the benefit of such Guarantor, the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks, and their respective successors and assigns, except that no Guarantor shall have the right to assign its rights or obligations hereunder or any interest herein (and any such attempted assignment shall be void).  This Guarantee Agreement shall be construed as a separate agreement with respect to each Guarantor and may be amended, modified, supplemented, waived or released with respect to any Guarantor without the approval of any other Guarantor and without affecting the obligations of any other Guarantor hereunder.
Binding Effect; Assignments; Several Agreement.
 
SECTION 11.
 
  (a)  No failure or delay of the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or the Issuing Banks in exercising any power or right hereunder shall operate as a waiver thereof, nor shall any single or partial exercise of any such right or power, or any abandonment or discontinuance of steps to enforce such a right or power, preclude any other or further exercise thereof or the exercise of any other right or power.  The rights and remedies of the Administrative Agent hereunder and of the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks under the other Loan Documents are cumulative and are not exclusive of any rights or remedies that they would otherwise have.  No waiver of any provision of this Guarantee Agreement or consent to any departure by the Borrower or any Guarantor therefrom shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be permitted by paragraph (b) below, and then such waiver or consent shall be effective only in the specific instance and for the purpose for which given.  No notice or demand on the Borrower or any Guarantor in any case shall entitle
Waivers; Amendment.
 
 
 
 
6
 
the Borrower or such Guarantor to any other or further notice or demand in similar or other circumstances.
 
(b)
 
Neither this Guarantee Agreement nor any provision hereof may be waived, amended or modified except pursuant to a written agreement entered into between the Guarantor or Guarantors with respect to which such waiver, amendment or modification relates, the Borrower and the Administrative Agent, subject to any consent required in accordance with Section 9.02 of the Credit Agreement.
 
SECTION 12.
 
  THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
Governing Law.
 
SECTION 13.
 
  All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 9.01 of the Credit Agreement, and all communications and notices to any Subsidiary Guarantor shall be given care of the Borrower.
Notices.
 
SECTION 14.
 
  (a)  All covenants, agreements, representations and warranties made by the Borrower and Guarantors herein and in the certificates or other instruments prepared or delivered in connection with or pursuant to this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document shall be considered to have been relied upon by the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks and shall survive the making by the Lenders of the Loans and the issuance of the Letters of Credit by the Issuing Banks regardless of any investigation made by such Lenders or such Issuing Banks or on their behalf, and shall continue in full force and effect until all the Obligations have been indefeasibly paid in full, the Lenders have no further commitment to lend, the LC Exposure has been reduced to zero and the Issuing Banks have no further commitment to issue Letters of Credit under the Credit Agreement.
Survival of Agreement; Severability.
 
(b)
 
In the event any one or more of the provisions contained in this Guarantee Agreement or in any other Loan Document should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and therein shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
SECTION 15.
 
  This Guarantee Agreement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract, and shall become effective as provided in Section 10.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Guarantee Agreement by facsimile or other electronic method of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Guarantee Agreement.
Counterparts.
 
 
 
 
7
 
 
SECTION 16.
 
  The rules of interpretation specified in Section 1.03 of the Credit Agreement shall be applicable to this Guarantee Agreement.
Rules of Interpretation.
 
SECTION 17.
 
  (a)  The Borrower and each Guarantor hereby irrevocably and unconditionally submits, for itself and its property, to the exclusive jurisdiction of the Supreme Court of the State of New York sitting in New York County and of the United States District Court of the Southern District of New York, and any appellate court from any thereof, in any action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents, or for recognition or enforcement of any judgment, and each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably and unconditionally agrees that all claims in respect of any such action or proceeding shall be heard and determined in such New York State or, to the extent permitted by law, in such Federal court.  Each of the parties hereto agrees that a final judgment in any such action or proceeding shall be conclusive and may be enforced in other jurisdictions by suit on the judgment or in any other manner provided by law.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement shall affect any right that the Administrative Agent, any other Lender or any Issuing Bank may otherwise have to bring any action or proceeding relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents against the Borrower or any Guarantor or its properties in the courts of any jurisdiction.
Jurisdiction; Consent to Service of Process.
 
(b)
 
Each of the Borrower and the Guarantors hereby irrevocably and unconditionally waives, to the fullest extent it may legally and effectively do so, any objection that it may now or hereafter have to the laying of venue of any suit, action or proceeding arising out of or relating to this Guarantee Agreement or the other Loan Documents in any court referred to in paragraph (a) of this Section.  Each of the parties hereto hereby irrevocably waives, to the fullest extent permitted by law, the defense of an inconvenient forum to the maintenance of such action or proceeding in any such court.
 
(c)
 
Each party to this Guarantee Agreement irrevocably consents to service of process in the manner provided for notices in Section 13.  Nothing in this Guarantee Agreement will affect the right of any party to this Guarantee Agreement to serve process in any other manner permitted by law.
 
SECTION 18.
 
  EACH PARTY HERETO HEREBY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY RIGHT IT MAY HAVE TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN RESPECT OF ANY LITIGATION DIRECTLY OR INDIRECTLY ARISING OUT OF, UNDER OR IN CONNECTION WITH THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT OR THE OTHER LOAN DOCUMENTS. EACH PARTY HERETO (A) CERTIFIES THAT NO REPRESENTATIVE, AGENT OR ATTORNEY OF ANY OTHER PARTY HAS REPRESENTED, EXPRESSLY OR OTHERWISE, THAT SUCH OTHER PARTY WOULD NOT, IN THE EVENT OF LITIGATION, SEEK TO ENFORCE THE FOREGOING WAIVER AND (B) ACKNOWLEDGES THAT IT AND THE OTHER PARTIES HERETO HAVE BEEN INDUCED TO ENTER INTO THIS GUARANTEE AGREEMENT AND THE OTHER LOAN
Waiver of Jury Trial.
 
 
 
 
8
 
DOCUMENTS, AS APPLICABLE, BY, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THE MUTUAL WAIVERS AND CERTIFICATIONS IN THIS SECTION 18.
 
SECTION 19.
 
  If an Event of Default shall have occurred and be continuing, each Lender is hereby authorized at any time and from time to time, to the fullest extent permitted by law, to set off and apply any and all deposits (general or special, time or demand, provisional or final) at any time held and other Indebtedness at any time owing by such Lender to or for the credit or the account of any Guarantor against any or all the obligations of such Guarantor now or hereafter existing under this Guarantee Agreement and the other Loan Documents held by such Lender, irrespective of whether or not such Lender shall have made any demand under this Guarantee Agreement or any other Loan Document and although such obligations may be unmatured.  The rights of each Lender under this Section 19 are in addition to other rights and remedies (including other rights of setoff) which such Lender may have.
Right of Setoff.
 
SECTION 20.
 
.  Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of such term in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary.  Upon execution and delivery after the date hereof by the Administrative Agent and such a Subsidiary of an instrument in the form of Annex I hereto, such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Guarantor hereunder with the same force and effect as if originally named as a Subsidiary Guarantor herein and thereafter each reference to a Guarantor hereunder shall be deemed to include such Subsidiary.  The execution and delivery of any instrument adding an additional Subsidiary Guarantor as a party to this Guarantee Agreement shall not require the consent of the Borrower or any other Guarantor hereunder.  The rights and obligations of the Borrower and each Guarantor hereunder shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding the addition of any new Subsidiary Guarantor as a party to this Guarantee Agreement.
Additional Subsidiary Guarantors
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties hereto have duly executed this Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Annex I to the
Guarantee Agreement
 
SUPPLEMENT No. [  ] (this ) dated as of [                ], to the Guarantee Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (the ), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the ), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party thereto (the  and, together with Holdings, the ) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
Supplement
Guarantee Agreement
Holdings
Borrower
Subsidiary Guarantors
Guarantors
JPMCB
 
A.  Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the ), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the ) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the ) for the Lenders.
Credit Agreement
Lenders
Administrative Agent
 
B.  Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement.
 
C.  The Borrower and the Guarantors have entered into the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit.  Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement and Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of such term in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary.  Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement.  The undersigned Subsidiary (the ) is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement to become a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue additional Letters of Credit and as consideration for Loans previously made and Letters of Credit previously issued.
New Guarantor
 
Accordingly, the Administrative Agent and the New Guarantor agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1.  In accordance with Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, the New Guarantor by its signature below becomes a Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as a Guarantor
 
 
 
 
 
 
and the New Guarantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Guarantee Agreement applicable to it as a Guarantor thereunder and (b) represents and warrants that the representations and warranties made by it as a Guarantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof.  Each reference to a Guarantor in the Guarantee Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Guarantor.  The Guarantee Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
The New Guarantor represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
 
This Supplement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract.  This Supplement shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent.  Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile or other electronic methods of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Supplement.
 
Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Guarantee Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 2.  
THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the Guarantee Agreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision hereof in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction).  The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 13 of the Guarantee Agreement.  All communications and notices hereunder to the New Guarantor shall be given to it in care of the Borrower.
 
The New Guarantor agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel for the Administrative Agent.
 
 
 
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent have duly executed this Supplement to the Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
 
[Name Of New Guarantor],
by
 
 
Name:
Title:
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent,
by
 
 
Name:
Title:
 

Exhibit 10.45
 
 
_________________________
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Page
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECOND SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of May 27, 2011 (this ), to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified, the ), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (the ), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (the ).
Second Supplemental Indenture
Original Indenture
Company
Trustee
 
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered the Original Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, Sections 9.01(i) and 10.05 of the Original Indenture provide, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of releasing any Subsidiary Guarantors under the conditions specified in the Original Indenture;
 
WHEREAS, the guarantees by Western Auto Supply Company; Western Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc.; and Western Auto of St. Thomas, Inc. (collectively, the ) of the Revolving Credit Facility (as defined in the Original Indenture) have been terminated (the ) in connection with the refinancing of the Revolving Credit Facility;
WASCO Parties
Guaranty Releases
 
WHEREAS, by virtue of the Guaranty Releases, and the fact that the WASCO Parties are not guarantors of any other Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company and no Default or Event of Default is continuing, Section 10.05 of the Indenture provides that the WASCO Parties are automatically and unconditionally released from their Subsidiary Guarantees under the Original Indenture and;
 
WHEREAS, the Company has requested the Trustee to enter into this Second Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of confirming the release of the WASCO Parties as Subsidiary Guarantors pursuant to Section 10.05;
 
WHEREAS, all action on the part of the Company necessary to authorize this Second Supplemental Indenture (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture and this Second Supplemental Indenture, being hereinafter called the ) has been duly taken;
Indenture
 
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS SECOND SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
 
 
 
 
SECTION 1.01.
 
.  Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Original Indenture.  The rules of interpretation set forth in the Original Indenture shall be applied hereto as if set forth in full herein.
Definitions
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
SECTION 2.01.
 
.  Pursuant to Section 10.05 of the Indenture, the release of the WASCO Parties as Subsidiary Guarantors under the Indenture is hereby confirmed.  The remaining Subsidiary Guarantors as of the date hereof are those identified as such on the signature pages hereto.
Release of Subsidiary Guarantors
 
 
 
 
SECTION 3.01.
 
  Except as expressly amended hereby, the Original Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect.  This Second Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Original Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
Ratification of Original Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Original Indenture.
 
SECTION 3.02.
 
  The recitals contained herein, except with respect to the Trustees certificates of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the same.  The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Second Supplemental Indenture or of the Notes.
Concerning the Trustee.
 
SECTION 3.03.
 
  This Second Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument.  The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes.  Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Counterparts.
 
SECTION 3.04.
 
  THIS SECOND SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY.  EACH OF THE COMPANY, EACH SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES OR THE TRANSACTION CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.  To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any federal or State court located in the Borough of Manhattan in The
GOVERNING LAW; WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; CONSENT TO JURISDICTION AND SERVICES.
 
 
2
 
 
City of New York, New York in any suit, action or proceeding based on or arising out of or relating to this Indenture or any Securities and irrevocably agree that all claims in respect of such suit or proceeding may be determined in any such court. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably waive, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which they may have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in an inconvenient forum. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor agree that final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding brought in such a court shall be conclusive and binding upon them, and may be enforced in any courts to the jurisdiction of which the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor are subject by a suit upon such judgment, provided, that service of process is effected upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in the manner specified herein or as otherwise permitted by law. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoint National Registered Agents, Inc. (in all jurisdictions except Virginia where the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoints Sarah Powell) (the ) as their authorized agent for purposes of this section, it being understood that the designation and appointment of the Process Agent as such authorized agent shall become effective immediately without any further action on the part of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree that service of process upon the Process Agent and written notice of said service to the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, mailed by prepaid registered first class mail or delivered to the Process Agent at its principal office, shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, in any such suit or proceeding. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree to take any and all action, including the execution and filing of any and all such documents and instruments as may be necessary, to continue such designation and appointment of the Process Agent in full force and effect so long as the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, have any outstanding obligations under this Indenture. To the extent the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor has or hereafter may acquire any immunity from jurisdiction of any court or from any legal process (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution, executor or otherwise) with respect to itself or its property, the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably waives such immunity in respect of its obligations under this Indenture to the extent permitted by law.
Process Agent
 
 
3
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Second Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized as of the date first above written.
 
S-1
 
 
S-2
 
 
S-3
 
 
 
 
 
S-4


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110810170927.txt.gz
TIME:20110810170927
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) August 10, 2011
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On August 10, 2011, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its second quarter ended July 16, 2011. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2011 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
Advance Auto Parts Reports Second Quarter Fiscal 2011 Diluted EPS Increase of 26%
to $1.46; Operating Income Rate Expands to 12.8%
ROANOKE, Va, August 10, 2011
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the second quarter ended July 16, 2011. Second quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.46 which was a 26% increase over the second quarter last year.
We are very pleased with our second quarter results that include double-digit comparable store sales growth in commercial and incremental improvements in DIY, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer. Our teams have done a terrific job retooling our operations and financial plans without compromising our core strategic investments to adapt to the reality of the current business environment. We are pleased with our solid start to our third quarter and we remain on track to deliver our financial and strategic objectives for the year.
 
Second Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
Total sales for the second quarter increased 4.4% to $1.48 billion, compared with total sales of $1.42 billion during the second quarter of fiscal 2010. The sales increase reflects the net addition of 130 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 2.5% on top of a 5.8% comparable store sales gain during the second quarter of fiscal 2010. Year-to-date, comparable store sales increased 1.9% which was on top of a 6.9% increase over the same period in fiscal 2010.
The Company's gross profit rate was 49.7% of sales during the second quarter as compared to 50.4% during the second quarter last year. The 72 basis-point decline in the gross profit rate was driven by increased shrink expense, supply chain expense deleverage due to investments in HUBs and higher fuel costs, and increased product acquisition costs, partially offset by continued improvements in merchandising and pricing capabilities. Year-to-date, the Company's gross profit rate was 50.2%, or 10 basis points favorable over the same period in fiscal 2010.
The Company's SG&A rate was 37.0% of sales during the second quarter as compared to 38.3% during the same period last year. This 138 basis point decrease was primarily due to reduced incentive compensation, benefits from the Company's new variable customer driven labor model which includes the anniversary of investment rollout expenses, as well as a significant decrease in support costs. Partially offsetting the expense reductions were increased strategic investments in support of the Company's Service Leadership and Superior Availability strategies as well as higher fuel costs associated with the Company's commercial delivery program. Year-to-date, the Company's SG&A rate was 39.1% versus 39.2% during the same period last year.
The Company's operating income during the second quarter of $188.9 million increased 10.1%, or 66 basis points, to 12.8% of total sales as compared to 12.1% during the second quarter of fiscal 2010.
Operating cash flow through the second quarter was $469.6 million versus $495.5 million last year.  Free cash flow through the second quarter decreased 29.5% to $287.3 million from $407.6 million
2
last year.  Capital expenditures were $151.6 million through the second quarter as compared to $99.3 million through the second quarter of fiscal 2010.
We are pleased with our 26% increase in EPS and our 66 basis-point improvement in the second quarter operating income rate to 12.8%, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. This profit growth was driven by the 138 basis points of cost leverage that our team delivered through our efforts to build a more competitive cost structure. While we are still in the early stages, this work is enabling us to continue to invest in areas such as commercial,
e-commerce and our DIY business. These investments and favorable industry dynamics give us confidence in our ability to grow and improve our profitability.
Store Information
During the second quarter, the Company opened 28 stores, and closed 1 store. As of July 16, 2011, the Company's total store count was 3,627 including 203 Autopart International stores.
3
Share Repurchases
During the second quarter, the Company repurchased 4.0 million shares of its
common stock at an aggregate cost of $239.7 million, or an average price of $60.31 per share. Through the second quarter the Company has repurchased 8.2 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $509.7 million, or an average price of $62.07 per share.
Share Repurchase Authorization
On August 9, 2011, the Company's Board of Directors authorized a $300 million share repurchase program. This new authorization replaces the Company's $500 million share repurchase program authorized in February 2011, which had $112 million remaining.
Dividend
On August 9, 2011, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on October 7, 2011 to stockholders of record as of September 23, 2011.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, August 11, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website,
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until August 12, 2012.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of July 16, 2011, the Company operated 3,627 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
4
5
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110826090151.txt.gz
TIME:20110826090151
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) August 23, 2011
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On August 23, 2011, the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) accepted the resignation of Tamara A. Kozikowski as Chief Development Officer of the Company in conjunction with the elimination of the position of Chief Development Officer. Ms. Kozikowski is expected to remain in her current role through a transition period with her resignation to be effective later in the year. Her employment agreement with the Company will remain in place until the effective date of her resignation.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20110913162429.txt.gz
TIME:20110913162429
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) September 12, 2011
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On September 12, 2011, the Board of Directors (Board) of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) appointed Mr. Jimmie L. Wade, who currently serves as the President of the Company, to serve as a director and a member of the Board's Finance Committee, effective September 15, 2011. The Board also appointed Darren R. Jackson, currently the Chief Executive Officer of the Company, to the combined role of President and Chief Executive Officer, effective January 1, 2012. Mr. Jackson will continue to serve as a member of the Company's Board. Effective as of January 1, 2012, Mr. Wade will continue to be employed by the Company reporting to its Chief Executive Officer and providing strategic leadership to the Company.
In electing Mr. Wade as a director, the Board determined that his seventeen years of experience with the Company in various business, finance and strategic leadership roles and his expertise in the automotive aftermarket industry, as well as his experience in retail finance and operations prior to joining the Company in 1994, make him uniquely suited to serve as a member of the Board. Mr. Wade has also served as a director of Lumber Liquidators, a specialty retailer of hardwood flooring, since September 1, 2011.
Mr. Wade is expected to enter into an employment agreement, the terms of which are being negotiated, that will supersede and replace his current executive employment agreement. The new agreement will be filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission after it has been finalized and executed.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in Exhibit 99.1 shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS ELECTS JIM WADE TO BOARD OF DIRECTORS
ROANOKE, Va., September 13, 2011 -
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories and maintenance items, today announced that Jim Wade has been elected to Advance's Board of Directors. Mr. Wade has also been appointed to serve on the Board's Finance Committee.
We are delighted to welcome Jim to our Board of Directors, said Jack Brouillard, Chair of the Board for Advance Auto Parts. Jim's seventeen years of experience with Advance in strategic leadership roles and his reputation within the automotive aftermarket industry, combined with his experience in retail, finance and operations prior to joining Advance, make him uniquely suited to serve as a member of our Board.
In conjunction with this announcement, Mr. Wade will be transitioning out of his current role as President of Advance over the remainder of 2011
.
After this year, Mr. Wade will continue to play a key role in the Company's Commercial growth strategy as well as leadership development. Additionally, Mr. Wade will assist Advance with government affairs and community relations activities.
Darren Jackson will continue his role of Chief Executive Officer and assume the role of President of Advance Auto Parts, effective January 1, 2012.
These roles enable us to leverage Jim's experience with Advance and the automotive aftermarket industry, said Jackson. I thoroughly enjoy working with Jim and continue to learn leadership lessons from him. These include the critical necessity of focusing on the team and having a passion for our values, as well as understanding the foundations of our industry and continuously striving for differentiation through service. I look forward to working with Jim in his new role on the Board of Directors.
Mr. Wade joined Advance in February 1994 and has served as President from October 1999 through May 2005 and from January 2009 to the present.  He has also held several other key senior executive positions with Advance including Chief Financial Officer and Executive Vice President.  In addition to his role with Advance, Mr. Wade serves on the boards of Lumber Liquidators, a publicly traded company, and non-profit organizations such as the Virginia Tech Alumni Association, the W.E. Skelton 4H Educational Center and Center in the Square. Mr. Wade also represents Advance on the Coalition for Auto Repair Equality. He has served on numerous other non-profit boards and is an active supporter of many local community initiatives.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of July 16, 2011, the Company operated 3,627 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services and online inventory look-up for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20111109163037.txt.gz
TIME:20111109163037
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) November 9, 2011
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On November 9, 2011, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its third quarter ended October 8, 2011. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2011 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
Advance Auto Parts Reports Third Quarter Fiscal 2011 Diluted EPS Increase of 37%
to $1.41; Operating Income Rate Expands 167 basis points to 12.1%
ROANOKE, Va, November 10, 2011 -
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the third quarter ended October 8, 2011. Third quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $1.41 which was a 37% increase over the third quarter last year.
I would like to thank our team for delivering strong third quarter results that include solid top line sales and accelerated earnings results, said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer. As a company,
we will continue to be focused on customer service and executing the business with consistency and excellence.
 
Third Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
Total sales for the third quarter increased 4.2% to $1.46 billion, compared with total sales of $1.41 billion during the third quarter of fiscal 2010. The sales increase reflects the net addition of 105 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 2.2% on top of a 9.9% comparable store sales gain during the third quarter of fiscal 2010. Year-to-date, comparable store sales increased 2.0% which was on top of a 7.8% increase over the same period in fiscal 2010.
The Company's gross profit rate was 49.5% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 50.3% during the third quarter last year. The 87 basis-point decline in the gross profit rate was driven by increased shrink, increased supply chain expenses due to investments in Hubs and higher fuel costs, commodity price inflation and the related timing of the Company's retail price changes. Year-to-date, the Company's gross profit rate was 49.9% versus 50.1% during the same period in fiscal 2010.
The Company's SG&A rate was 37.3% of sales during the third quarter as compared to 39.9% during the same period last year. This 254 basis-point decrease was primarily due to reduced incentive compensation as a result of the Company's lower revenue growth versus the third quarter last year, productivity improvements from the Company's customer-driven labor model which includes the anniversary of investment rollout expenses and a decrease in support costs. The expense reductions were partially offset by increased strategic investments in support of the Company's Service Leadership and Superior Availability strategies. Year-to-date, the Company's SG&A rate decreased 85 basis points to 38.5% from 39.4% during the same period in fiscal 2010.
The Company's operating income during the third quarter increased 20.8% to $177.8 million, or 167 basis points on a rate basis, to 12.1% of total sales as compared to 10.5% during the third quarter of fiscal 2010. Year-to-date, the Company's operating income rate was 11.4% versus 10.8% during the same period last year.
 
2
Operating cash flow through the third quarter was $611.0 million versus $596.5 million last year.  Free cash flow through the third quarter decreased 24.2% to $354.8 million from $467.8 million last year. The decrease in free cash flow was driven primarily by the change in owned inventory this year versus last year as well as higher capital expenditures. Capital expenditures were $207.5 million through the third quarter as compared to $147.2 million through the third quarter of fiscal 2010. This increase was primarily driven by investments in the Company's supply chain, existing stores and information technology.
We are pleased with our strong business performance and execution that drove a 21% increase in operating income and a 37% increase in EPS, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.  Our performance during our third quarter shows we are on the right path and reinforces our commitment to accelerate growth, improve profitability and drive shareholder value. Given our strong third quarter results, we now anticipate our annual 2011 EPS outlook to be $4.90 to $4.95.
Store Information
During the third quarter, the Company opened 20 stores, and closed 2 stores. As of October 8, 2011, the Company's total store count was 3,645 including 203 Autopart International stores.
3
Share Repurchases
During the third quarter, the Company repurchased 1.7 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $100 million, or an average price of $58.81 per share. At the end of the third quarter, the Company had $200 million remaining under the $300.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in August 2011. Through the fiscal third quarter of 2011 the Company has repurchased 9.9 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $609.7 million, or an average price of $61.51 per share.
Dividend
On November 8, 2011, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on January 6, 2012 to stockholders of record as of December 23, 2011.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, November 10, 2011 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until November 10, 2012.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of October 8, 2011, the Company operated 3,645 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast,
4
outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
5
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120103165044.txt.gz
TIME:20120103165044
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) December 27, 2011
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On August 23, 2011, the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) accepted the resignation of Tamara A. Kozikowski as Chief Development Officer of the Company in conjunction with the elimination of the position of Chief Development Officer. Ms. Kozikowski's resignation was disclosed in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) on August 26, 2011. Ms. Kozikowski has remained in her role as Chief Development Officer during a transition period.
On December 27, 2011, the Company and Ms. Kozikowski entered into a Separation and Release Agreement (the Separation Agreement) pursuant to which Ms. Kozikowski's resignation will become effective as of January 1, 2012. In connection with her resignation and as described in the Separation Agreement, Mr. Kozikowski is entitled to receive certain severance payments and other benefits under the terms of her Employment Agreement with the Company (the Employment Agreement), which was previously filed with the SEC on June 2, 2010 as Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q. In addition to the severance payments and other benefits to which Ms. Kozikowski is entitled under the Employment Agreement, the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors of the Company approved an additional severance payment equal to $426,000 to Ms. Kozikowski in recognition of her contributions to the Company during her employment.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120117171340.txt.gz
TIME:20120117171340
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
On January 11, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the "Company") entered into an Underwriting Agreement (the "Underwriting Agreement") by and among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors signatory thereto (the "Subsidiary Guarantors"), and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. and Wells Fargo Securities LLC, as representatives of the several underwriters listed in Schedule 1 thereto, pursuant to which the Company agreed to sell $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 4.500% Notes due January 15, 2022 (the "Notes") to the Underwriters at a public offering price of 99.968% of the principal amount per note. The Underwriting Agreement contains customary representations, warranties and agreements of the Company and customary conditions to closing, indemnification rights and obligations of the parties.
The estimated net proceeds from the offering of the Notes is approximately $297.4 million, after deducting underwriting discounts and commissions and estimated offering expenses payable by the Company. The Company will use the net proceeds from this offering to repay indebtedness outstanding under the Company's $750 million unsecured five-year revolving credit facility (the Company's wholly-owned subsidiary, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, is the borrower). As of October 8, 2011, the amount of indebtedness outstanding under the Company's revolving credit was approximately $299.2 million. Amounts repaid under the Company's revolving credit facility may be reborrowed from time to time for operational purposes, working capital needs, capital expenditures and other general corporate purposes. The Company intends to use the remaining net proceeds, if any, for general corporate purposes. Certain affiliates of the underwriters are lenders under the revolving credit facility.
The terms of the Notes are governed by an Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "Base Indenture"), among the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association as Trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented and modified by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), and the Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012 (the "Third Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the Base Indenture, the First Supplemental Indenture and the Second Supplemental Indenture, the "Indenture").
The Notes bear interest at a rate of 4.500% per year payable semi-annually in arrears on January 15 and July 15 of each year, commencing on July 15, 2012. The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time prior to October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the maturity date of the Notes), at the Company's option, at the greater of 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed or at a make-whole redemption price determined by using a discount rate of the applicable Treasury Rate plus 40 basis points, plus, in each case, accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date. The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time on or after October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the maturity date of the Notes), at the Company's option, at 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date. In addition, in the event of a Change of Control Triggering Event (as defined in the Indenture), the Company will be required to offer to repurchase the Notes at a price equal to 101% of the principal amount thereof, plus accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the repurchase date. The Notes initially will be fully and unconditionally guaranteed, jointly and severally, on an unsubordinated and unsecured basis by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors. The Company will be permitted to release guarantees without the consent of holders of the Notes under the circumstances described in the Indenture.
The Indenture contains customary provisions for events of default including for failure to pay principal or interest when due and payable, failure to comply with covenants or agreements in the Indenture or the Notes and failure to cure or obtain a waiver of such default upon notice, a default under any debt for money borrowed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries that results in acceleration of the maturity of such debt, or failure to pay any such debt within any applicable grace period after final stated maturity, in an aggregate amount greater than $25.0 million without such debt having been discharged or acceleration having been rescinded or annulled within 10 days after receipt by the Company of notice of the default by the trustee or holders of not less than 25% in aggregate principal amount of the notes then outstanding, and events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization affecting the Company and certain of its subsidiaries. In the case of an event of default (other than an event of default resulting from certain events involving bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization), the principal amount of the Notes plus accrued and unpaid interest may be accelerated. The Indenture also contains covenants limiting the ability of the Company and its subsidiaries to incur debt secured by liens and to enter into sale and lease back transactions.
 
The offering of the Notes was registered under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, pursuant to the Company's shelf registration statement on Form S-3 declared effective by the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "SEC") on April 26, 2010, as amended by Post-Effective Amendment No. 1 thereto (File No. 333-166291, as amended and supplemented, the "Registration Statement").
The foregoing description of the Underwriting Agreement, Base Indenture, First Supplemental Indenture, Second Supplemental Indenture, Third Supplemental Indenture, and Notes are qualified in their entirety by the Underwriting Agreement, Base Indenture, First Supplemental Indenture, Second Supplemental Indenture, Third Supplemental Indenture and form of Note, respectively, which are incorporated herein by reference and are attached hereto as Exhibits 1.1, 4.1, 4.2, 4.3, 4.4 and 4.5, respectively.
The agreements included as exhibits to this Form 8-K (including the exhibits to such agreements), which are being filed to provide investors with information regarding their terms, contain various representations, warranties and covenants of, among others, the Company. They are not intended to provide any factual information about any of the parties thereto or any subsidiaries of the parties thereto. The representations, warranties and covenants were made for purposes of each of the agreements, solely for the benefit of the parties thereto.
Item 2.03 Creation of a Direct Financial Obligation or an Obligation under an Off-Balance Sheet Arrangement of a Registrant.
The information provided in Item 1.01 with respect to the Company's issuance of the Notes is incorporated by reference herein.
Item 8.01. Other Events.
A copy of the Company's press release announcing the closing of the offering of the Notes is attached to this report as Exhibit 99.1 and is incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
The exhibits listed in the following index relate to an offering under the Registration Statement and each is filed herewith for incorporation by reference in such Registration Statement.
 
 
 
Note: The information contained in Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
 
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
 
 
 
Note: The information contained in Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed to be "filed" for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.

Exhibit 1.1
EXECUTION COPY
January 11, 2012
J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith
                      Incorporated
SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc.
Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
As Representatives of the
several Underwriters listed
in Schedule 1 hereto
c/o J.P. Morgan Securities LLC
383 Madison Avenue
New York, New York 10179
c/o Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated
One Bryant Park
New York, New York 10036
c/o SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc.
3333 Peachtree Road, 11th Floor
Atlanta, Georgia 30326
c/o Wells Fargo Securities, LLC
One Wells Fargo Center
301 South College Street
Charlotte, North Carolina 28288
Ladies and Gentlemen:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "Company"), proposes to issue and sell to the several Underwriters listed in Schedule 1 hereto (the "Underwriters"), for whom you are acting as representatives (the "Representatives"), $300,000,000 principal amount of its 4.500% Notes due January 15, 2022 (the "Notes"). The Notes will be guaranteed on an
 
unsecured basis (the "Subsidiary Guarantees", and together with the Notes, the "Securities") by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors (as defined below). The Securities will be issued pursuant to an Indenture to be dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "Base Indenture") between the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, N.A., as trustee (the "Trustee"), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), the Second Supplemental Indenture dated as of May 27, 2011 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture") and a Third Supplemental Indenture to be dated as of the Closing Date specified pursuant hereto (the "Third Supplemental Indenture" and, together with the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture and the Base Indenture, the "Indenture").
For purposes of this Agreement, all references to the Subsidiary Guarantors shall mean those entities set forth on Schedule 2 hereto; provided, however, that any such Subsidiary Guarantor shall cease to be a Subsidiary Guarantor under this Agreement at such time as such entity ceases to be a Subsidiary Guarantor pursuant to the terms of the Indenture.
The Company hereby confirms its agreement with the several Underwriters concerning the purchase and sale of the Securities, as follows:
1. . The Company has prepared and filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "Commission") under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Securities Act"), an automatic shelf registration statement on Form S-3 (File No. 333-166291) as amended by Post-Effective Amendment No. 1 thereto, including a prospectus, relating to the Securities. Such registration statement, as of the time it became effective, including the information, if any, deemed pursuant to Rule 430A, 430B or 430C under the Securities Act to be part of the registration statement at the time of its effectiveness ("Rule 430 Information"), is referred to herein as the "Registration Statement"; and as used herein, the term "Preliminary Prospectus" means the prospectus included in the Registration Statement at the time of its effectiveness that omits Rule 430 Information (the "Base Prospectus") and the preliminary prospectus supplement, dated January 11, 2012 relating to the Securities filed with the Commission pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Securities Act that amends or supplements the Base Prospectus, and the term "Prospectus" means the final prospectus supplement (including the Base Prospectus) in the form first used (or made available upon request of purchasers pursuant to Rule 173 under the Securities Act) in connection with confirmation of sales of the Securities. Any reference in this Agreement to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include the documents incorporated by reference therein pursuant to Item 12 of Form S-3 under the Securities Act, as of the effective date of the Registration Statement or the date of such Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus, as the case may be and any reference to "amend", "amendment" or "supplement" with respect to the Registration Statement, any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus shall be deemed to refer to and include any documents filed after such date under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Exchange Act") that are deemed to be incorporated by reference therein. Capitalized terms used but
Registration Statement
 
not defined herein shall have the meanings given to such terms in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus.
At or prior to the time when sales of the Securities were first made (the "Time of Sale"), the Company had prepared the following information (collectively, the "Time of Sale Information"): a Preliminary Prospectus dated January 11, 2012, and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (as defined below) listed on Annex B hereto as constituting part of the Time of Sale Information.
2. . (a) The Company agrees to issue and sell the Securities to the several Underwriters as provided in this Agreement, and each Underwriter, on the basis of the representations, warranties and agreements set forth herein and subject to the conditions set forth herein, agrees, severally and not jointly, to purchase from the Company the respective principal amount of Securities set forth opposite such Underwriter's name in Schedule 1 hereto at a price equal to 99.318% of the principal amount of the Securities plus accrued interest, if any, from January 17, 2012 to the Closing Date (as defined below). The Company will not be obligated to deliver any of the Securities except upon payment for all the Securities to be purchased as provided herein.
Purchase of the Securities by the Underwriters
(b) The Company understands that the Underwriters intend to make a public offering of the Securities as soon after the effectiveness of this Agreement as in the judgment of the Representatives is advisable, and initially to offer the Securities on the terms set forth in the Prospectus. The Company acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters may offer and sell Securities to or through any affiliate of an Underwriter and that any such affiliate may offer and sell Securities purchased by it to or through any Underwriter.
(c) Payment for and delivery of the Securities will be made at the offices of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, 825 8
th
Avenue, New York, NY, at 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on January 17, 2012, or at such other time or place on the same or such other date, not later than the fifth business day thereafter, as the Representatives and the Company may agree upon in writing. The time and date of such payment and delivery is referred to herein as the "Closing Date".
(d) Payment for the Securities shall be made by wire transfer in immediately available funds to the account(s) specified by the Company to the Representatives against delivery to the nominee of The Depository Trust Company, for the account of the Underwriters, of one or more global notes representing the Securities (collectively, the "Global Note"), with any transfer taxes payable in connection with the sale of the Securities duly paid by the Company. The Global Note will be made available for inspection by the Representatives not later than 1:00 P.M., New York City time, on the business day prior to the Closing Date.
(e) The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor acknowledges and agrees that the Underwriters are acting solely in the capacity of an arm's length contractual counterparty to the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors with respect to the offering
 
of Securities contemplated hereby (including in connection with determining the terms of the offering) and not as a financial advisor or a fiduciary to, or an agent of, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or any other person. Additionally, neither the Representatives nor any other Underwriter is advising the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors or any other person as to any legal, tax, investment, accounting or regulatory matters in any jurisdiction. The Company and Subsidiary Guarantors shall consult with their own advisors concerning such matters and shall be responsible for making their own independent investigation and appraisal of the transactions contemplated hereby, and the Underwriters shall have no responsibility or liability to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor with respect thereto. Any review by the Underwriters of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors, the transactions contemplated hereby or other matters relating to such transactions will be performed solely for the benefit of the Underwriters and shall not be on behalf of the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors.
3. . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally represent and warrant to each Underwriter that:
Representations and Warranties of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors
(a) . No order preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus has been issued by the Commission, and each Preliminary Prospectus, at the time of filing thereof, complied in all material respects with the Securities Act and did not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Preliminary Prospectus.
Preliminary Prospectus
(b) . The Time of Sale Information, at the Time of Sale did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in such Time of Sale Information. No statement of material fact included in the Prospectus has been omitted from the Time of Sale Information and no statement of material fact included in the Time of Sale Information that is required to be included in the Prospectus has been omitted therefrom.
Time of Sale Information
(c) . The Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors (including their agents and representatives, other than the Underwriters in their capacity as such) have not prepared, made, used, authorized, approved or referred to and will not prepare, make, use, authorize, approve or refer to any "written communication" (as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act) that constitutes an offer to sell or solicitation of an offer to buy the Securities (each such communication by
Issuer Free Writing Prospectus
 
the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or their agents and representatives (other than a communication referred to in clauses (i), (ii) and (iii) below) an "Issuer Free Writing Prospectus") other than (i) any document not constituting a prospectus pursuant to Section 2(a)(10)(a) of the Securities Act or Rule 134 under the Securities Act, (ii) the Preliminary Prospectus, (iii) the Prospectus, (iv) the documents listed on Annex B hereto and (v) any electronic road show or other written communications, in each case approved in writing in advance by the Representatives. Each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus complied in all material respects with the Securities Act, has been or will be (within the time period specified in Rule 433) filed in accordance with the Securities Act (to the extent required thereby) and, when taken together with the Preliminary Prospectus accompanying, or delivered prior to delivery of, such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, did not, and at the Closing Date will not, contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to any statements or omissions made in each such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus.
(d) . The Registration Statement is an "automatic shelf registration statement" as defined under Rule 405 of the Securities Act that has been filed with the Commission not earlier than three years prior to the date hereof; and no notice of objection of the Commission to the use of such registration statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act has been received by the Company. No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement has been issued by the Commission and no proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act against the Company or related to the offering has been initiated or threatened by the Commission; as of the applicable effective date of the Registration Statement and any amendment thereto, the Registration Statement complied and will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and the Trust Indenture Act of 1939, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, the "Trust Indenture Act"), and did not and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein not misleading; and as of the date of the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto and as of the Closing Date, the Prospectus will comply in all material respects with the Securities Act and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors make no representation and warranty with respect to (i) that part of the Registration Statement that constitutes the Statement of Eligibility and Qualification (Form T-1) of the Trustee under the Trust Indenture Act or (ii) any statements or omissions made in reliance upon and in conformity with information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and any amendment or supplement thereto.
Registration Statement and Prospectus
 
(e) . The documents incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus and the Time of Sale Information, when they became effective or were filed with the Commission, as the case may be, conformed in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and none of such documents contained any untrue statement of a material fact or omitted to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading; and any further documents so filed and incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or the Time of Sale Information, when such documents become effective or are filed with the Commission, as the case may be, will conform in all material respects to the requirements of the Securities Act or the Exchange Act, as applicable, and will not contain any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading.
Incorporated Documents
(f) . The financial statements and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus comply in all material respects with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and present fairly the financial position of the Company and its subsidiaries as of the dates indicated and the results of their operations and the changes in their cash flows for the periods specified; such financial statements have been prepared in conformity with accounting principles generally accepted in the United States applied on a consistent basis throughout the periods covered thereby, except as otherwise noted therein, and the supporting schedules included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement present fairly the information required to be stated therein; and any other financial information included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus has been derived from the accounting records of the Company and its subsidiaries and presents fairly the information shown thereby; and the pro forma financial information, if any, and the related notes thereto included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus have been prepared in accordance with the applicable requirements of the Securities Act and the Exchange Act, as applicable, and the assumptions underlying such pro forma financial information are reasonable and are set forth in the Registration Statement, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus. The interactive data in eXtensible Business Reporting Language included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus fairly presents the information called for in all material respects and is prepared in accordance with the Commission's rules and guidelines applicable thereto.
Financial Statements
(g) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, since the date of the most recent financial statements of the Company included or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, (i) there has not been any change in the capital stock (other than activity related to the Company's authorized stock repurchase program) or long-term debt of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, or any dividend or distribution of any kind declared, set aside for payment,
No Material Adverse Change
 
paid or made by the Company on any class of capital stock, or any material adverse change, or any development involving a prospective material adverse change, in or affecting the business, management, financial position, or results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; (ii) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has entered into any transaction or agreement that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or incurred any liability or obligation, direct or contingent, that is material to the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole; and (iii) neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has sustained any material loss or interference with its business from fire, explosion, flood or other calamity, whether or not covered by insurance, or from any labor disturbance or dispute or any action, order or decree of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except in each case as otherwise disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
(h) . The Company and each of its subsidiaries have been duly organized and are validly existing and in good standing under the laws of their respective jurisdictions of organization, are duly qualified to do business and are in good standing in each jurisdiction in which their respective ownership or lease of property or the conduct of their respective businesses requires such qualification, and have all power and authority necessary to own or hold their respective properties and to conduct the businesses in which they are engaged, except where the failure to be so qualified, in good standing or have such power or authority would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a material adverse effect on the business, management, financial position or, results of operations of the Company and its subsidiaries taken as a whole or on the performance by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors of their respective obligations under this Agreement, the Indenture and the Securities (a "Material Adverse Effect"). The subsidiaries set forth on Schedule 2 to this Agreement are the only significant subsidiaries of the Company.
Organization and Good Standing
(i) . The Company has an authorized capitalization as of October 8, 2011 as set forth in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus under the heading "Capitalization" and all the outstanding shares of capital stock or other equity interests of each subsidiary of the Company have been duly and validly authorized and issued, are fully paid and non-assessable and are owned directly or indirectly by the Company, free and clear of any lien, charge, encumbrance, security interest, restriction on voting or transfer or any other claim of any third party.
Capitalization
(j) . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors has the full right, power and authority to execute and deliver this Agreement, the Securities and the Indenture (collectively, the "Transaction Documents") and to perform its obligations hereunder and thereunder; and all action required to be taken for the due and proper authorization, execution and delivery of each of the Transaction Documents and the consummation of the transactions contemplated thereby has been duly and validly taken.
Due Authorization
(k) . The Indenture has been duly authorized by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors and, when duly executed and delivered in
The Indenture
 
accordance with its terms by each of the parties thereto, will have been duly qualified under the Trust Indenture Act and will constitute a valid and legally binding agreement of the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors enforceable against the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors in accordance with its terms, except as enforceability may be limited by applicable bankruptcy, insolvency or similar laws affecting the enforcement of creditors' rights generally or by equitable principles relating to enforceability (collectively, the "Enforceability Exceptions").
(l) . The Notes have been duly authorized by the Company and, when duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered as provided in the Indenture and paid for as provided herein, will be duly and validly issued and outstanding and will constitute valid and legally binding obligations of the Company enforceable against the Company in accordance with their terms, subject to the Enforceability Exceptions, and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture; and the Subsidiary Guarantees have been duly authorized by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors and, when the Securities have been duly executed, authenticated, issued and delivered as provided in the Indenture and paid for as provided herein, will be valid and legally binding obligations of each of the Subsidiary Guarantors, enforceable against each of the Subsidiary Guarantors in accordance with their terms, subject to the Enforceability Exceptions, and will be entitled to the benefits of the Indenture.
The Notes and the Subsidiary Guarantees
(m) . This Agreement has been duly authorized, executed and delivered by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors.
Underwriting Agreement
(n) . Each Transaction Document conforms in all material respects to the description thereof contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Descriptions of the Transaction Documents
(o) . Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries is (i) in violation of its charter or by-laws or similar organizational documents; (ii) in default, and no event has occurred that, with notice or lapse of time or both, would constitute such a default, in the due performance or observance of any term, covenant or condition contained in any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject; or (iii) in violation of any law or statute or any judgment, order, rule or regulation of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except, in the case of clauses (ii) and (iii) above, for any such default or violation that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
No Violation or Default
(p) . The execution, delivery and performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of each of the Transaction Documents to which it is a party, the issuance and sale of the Securities and compliance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors with the terms thereof and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents will not (i) conflict with or result in a breach or violation of any of the terms or provisions of, or constitute a default
No Conflicts
 
under, or result in the creation or imposition of any lien, charge or encumbrance upon any property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries pursuant to, any indenture, mortgage, deed of trust, loan agreement or other agreement or instrument to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is a party or by which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is bound or to which any of the property or assets of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is subject, (ii) result in any violation of the provisions of the charter or by-laws or similar organizational documents of the Company or any of its subsidiaries or (iii) result in the violation of any law or statute or any judgment, order, rule or regulation of any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority, except, in the case of clauses (i) and (iii) above, for any such conflict, breach, violation or default that would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect.
(q) . No consent, approval, authorization, order, registration or qualification of or with any court or arbitrator or governmental or regulatory authority is required for the execution, delivery and performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of each of the Transaction Documents, the issuance and sale of the Securities and compliance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors with the terms thereof and the consummation of the transactions contemplated by the Transaction Documents, except for the registration of the Securities under the Securities Act, the qualification of the Indenture under the Trust Indenture Act, filings in connection with the Company's reporting obligations under the Exchange Act, any required filings through the FINRA Cobradesk, notice to the New York Stock Exchange and such consents, approvals, authorizations, orders and registrations or qualifications as may be required under applicable state securities laws in connection with the purchase and distribution of the Securities by the Underwriters.
No Consents Required
(r) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no legal, governmental or regulatory investigations, actions, suits or proceedings pending to which the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may be a party or to which any property of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is or may be the subject that, individually or in the aggregate, if determined adversely to the Company or any of its subsidiaries, could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect; no such investigations, actions, suits or proceedings are threatened or, to the knowledge of the Company, contemplated by any governmental or regulatory authority or threatened by others; and (i) there are no current or pending legal, governmental or regulatory actions, suits or proceedings that are required under the Securities Act to be described in the Registration Statement or the Prospectus that are not so described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus and (ii) there are no statutes, regulations or contracts or other documents that are required under the Securities Act to be filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement or described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus that are not so filed as exhibits to the Registration Statement or described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
Legal Proceedings
(s) . Deloitte & Touche LLP, who has certified certain financial statements of the Company and its subsidiaries, is an independent registered public accounting firm with respect to the Company and its subsidiaries within
Independent Accountants
 
the applicable rules and regulations adopted by the Commission and the Public Company Accounting Oversight Board (United States) and as required by the Securities Act.
(t) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, the Company and its subsidiaries have good and marketable title in fee simple to, or have valid rights to lease or otherwise use, all items of real and personal property that are material to the respective businesses of the Company and its subsidiaries, in each case free and clear of all liens, encumbrances, claims and defects and imperfections of title except those that (i) do not materially interfere with the use made and proposed to be made of such property by the Company and its subsidiaries or (ii) could not reasonably be expected, individually or in the aggregate, to have a Material Adverse Effect.
Title to Real and Personal Property
(u) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus or except as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect, the Company and its subsidiaries own or possess adequate rights to use all material patents, patent applications, trademarks, service marks, trade names, trademark registrations, service mark registrations, copyrights, licenses and know-how (including trade secrets and other unpatented and/or unpatentable proprietary or confidential information, systems or procedures) necessary for the conduct of their respective businesses; and the conduct of their respective businesses does not conflict in any material respect with any such rights of others, and the Company and its subsidiaries have not received any notice of any claim of infringement or conflict with any such rights of others.
Title to Intellectual Property
(v) . No relationship, direct or indirect, exists between or among the Company or any of its subsidiaries, on the one hand, and the directors, officers or stockholders of the Company or any of its subsidiaries, on the other, that is required by the Securities Act to be described in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus and that is not so described in such documents and in the Time of Sale Information.
No Undisclosed Relationships
(w) . Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiary Guarantors is or, after giving effect to the offering and sale of the Securities and the application of the proceeds thereof as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, will be an "investment company" or an entity "controlled" by an "investment company" within the meaning of the Investment Company Act of 1940, as amended, and the rules and regulations of the Commission thereunder (collectively, "Investment Company Act").
Investment Company Act
(x) . The Company and its subsidiaries have paid or accrued all material federal, state, local and foreign taxes and filed all material tax returns required to be paid or filed through the date hereof; and except as otherwise disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there is no tax deficiency that has been, or could reasonably be expected to be, asserted against the Company or any of its subsidiaries or any of their respective properties or assets.
Taxes
 
(y) . The Company and its subsidiaries possess all material licenses, certificates, permits and other authorizations issued by, and have made all declarations and filings with, the appropriate federal, state, local or foreign governmental or regulatory authorities that are necessary for the ownership or lease of their respective properties or the conduct of their respective businesses as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, except where the failure to possess or make the same would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries has received notice of any revocation or modification of any such material license, certificate, permit or authorization or has any reason to believe that any such material license, certificate, permit or authorization will not be renewed in the ordinary course.
Licenses and Permits
(z) . No labor disturbance by or dispute with employees of the Company or any of its subsidiaries exists or, to the knowledge of the Company, is threatened and the Company is not aware of any existing or imminent labor disturbance by, or dispute with, the employees of any of its or its subsidiaries' principal suppliers, contractors or customers, except as would not have a Material Adverse Effect.
No Labor Disputes
(aa) . Except as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, (i) the Company and its subsidiaries (x) are, and at all times during the past three years were, in compliance with any and all applicable federal, state, local and foreign laws, rules, regulations, requirements, binding decisions and orders relating to the protection of human health or safety, the environment, natural resources, hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants (collectively, "Environmental Laws"); (y) have received and are in compliance with all permits, licenses, certificates or other authorizations or approvals required of them under applicable Environmental Laws to conduct their respective businesses; and (z) have not received written notice of any actual or potential liability under or relating to any Environmental Laws, including for the investigation or remediation of any disposal or release of hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, and have no actual knowledge of any event or condition that would reasonably be expected to result in any such notice, and (ii) there are no costs or liabilities associated with Environmental Laws of or relating to the Company or its subsidiaries, except in the case of each of (i) and (ii) above, for any such failure to comply, or failure to receive required permits, licenses or approvals, or cost or liability, as would not, individually or in the aggregate, have a Material Adverse Effect; and (iii) (x) there are no proceedings that are pending or threatened against the Company or any of its subsidiaries under any Environmental Laws in which a governmental entity is also a party, other than such proceedings regarding which it is reasonably believed no monetary sanctions of $100,000 or more will be imposed, and (y) the Company and its subsidiaries are not aware of any issues regarding compliance with Environmental Laws, or liabilities or other obligations under Environmental Laws or concerning hazardous or toxic substances or wastes, pollutants or contaminants, and none of the Company and its subsidiaries reasonably expects to incur capital expenditures in order to comply with
Compliance With Environmental Laws
 
applicable Environmental Laws that could reasonably be expected to have a Material Adverse Effect.
(bb) . (i) Each employee benefit plan, within the meaning of Section 3(3) of the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as amended ("ERISA"), for which the Company or any member of its "Controlled Group" (defined as any organization which is a member of a controlled group of corporations within the meaning of Section 414 of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the "Code")) would have any liability (each, a "Plan") has been maintained in material compliance with its terms and the requirements of any applicable statutes, orders, rules and regulations, including but not limited to ERISA and the Code; (ii) no prohibited transaction, within the meaning of Section 406 of ERISA or Section 4975 of the Code, has occurred with respect to any Plan excluding transactions effected pursuant to a statutory or administrative exemption; (iii) for each Plan that is subject to the funding rules of Section 412 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA no failure by the Plan to satisfy the "minimum funding standards" as defined in Section 412 of the Code, whether or not waived, has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur; (iv) the fair market value of the assets of each Plan that is subject to the funding rules of Section 412 or 430 of the Code or Section 302 of ERISA (if any) exceeds the present value of all benefits accrued under such Plan (determined based on those assumptions used to fund such Plan); (v) no "reportable event" (within the meaning of Section 4043(c) of ERISA) has occurred or is reasonably expected to occur that could reasonably be expected to result in material liability to the Company or its subsidiaries; and (vi) neither the Company nor any member of the Controlled Group has incurred, nor reasonably expects to incur, any liability under Title IV of ERISA (other than contributions to the Plan or premiums to the PBGC, in the ordinary course and without default) in respect of a Plan (including a "multiemployer plan", within the meaning of Section 4001(a)(3) of ERISA).
Compliance With ERISA
(cc) . The Company and its subsidiaries maintain an effective system of "disclosure controls and procedures" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(e) and Rule 15(d)-15(e) of the Exchange Act) that is designed to ensure that information required to be disclosed by the Company in reports that it files or submits under the Exchange Act is recorded, processed, summarized and reported within the time periods specified in the Commission's rules and forms, including controls and procedures designed to ensure that such information is accumulated and communicated to the Company's management as appropriate to allow timely decisions regarding required disclosure. The Company and its subsidiaries have carried out evaluations of the effectiveness of their disclosure controls and procedures as required by Rule 13a-15 and Rule 15(d)-15(f) of the Exchange Act.
Disclosure Controls
(dd) . The Company and its subsidiaries maintain systems of "internal control over financial reporting" (as defined in Rule 13a-15(f) and Rule 15(d) -15(f) of the Exchange Act) that comply with the requirements of the Exchange Act and have been designed by, or under the supervision of, their respective principal executive and principal financial officers, or persons performing similar functions, to provide reasonable assurance regarding the reliability of financial reporting and the preparation of financial statements for external purposes in accordance with generally accepted
Accounting Controls
 
accounting principles, including, but not limited to internal accounting controls sufficient to provide reasonable assurance that (i) transactions are executed in accordance with management's general or specific authorizations; (ii) transactions are recorded as necessary to permit preparation of financial statements in conformity with generally accepted accounting principles and to maintain asset accountability; (iii) access to assets is permitted only in accordance with management's general or specific authorization; and (iv) the recorded accountability for assets is compared with the existing assets at reasonable intervals and appropriate action is taken with respect to any differences. Except as disclosed in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus, there are no material weaknesses or significant deficiencies in the Company's internal controls.
(ee) . Neither the Company nor any of its subsidiaries nor, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or other person associated with or acting on behalf of the Company or any of its subsidiaries has (i) used any corporate funds for any unlawful contribution, gift, entertainment or other unlawful expense relating to political activity; (ii) made any direct or indirect unlawful payment to any foreign or domestic government official or employee from corporate funds; (iii) violated or is in violation of any provision of the Foreign Corrupt Practices Act of 1977; or (iv) made any bribe, rebate, payoff, influence payment, kickback or other unlawful payment.
No Unlawful Payments
(ff) The operations of the Company and its subsidiaries are and have been conducted at all times in compliance with applicable financial recordkeeping and reporting requirements of the Currency and Foreign Transactions Reporting Act of 1970, as amended, the money laundering statutes of all jurisdictions, the rules and regulations thereunder and any related or similar rules, regulations or guidelines, issued, administered or enforced by any governmental agency or regulatory authority (collectively, the "Money Laundering Laws") and no action, suit or proceeding by or before any court or governmental agency, authority or body or any arbitrator involving the Company or any of its subsidiaries with respect to the Money Laundering Laws is pending or, to the knowledge of the Company, threatened.
Compliance with Money Laundering Laws.
(gg) . None of the Company, any of its subsidiaries or, to the knowledge of the Company, any director, officer, agent, employee or Affiliate of the Company or any of its subsidiaries is currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by the Office of Foreign Assets Control of the U.S. Department of the Treasury ("OFAC"); and the Company will not directly or indirectly use the proceeds of the offering of the Securities hereunder, or lend, contribute or otherwise make available such proceeds to any subsidiary, joint venture partner or other person or entity, for the purpose of financing the activities of any person currently subject to any U.S. sanctions administered by OFAC.
Compliance with OFAC
(hh) . Except for any restrictions of applicable corporate or limited liability company law, no subsidiary of the Company is currently prohibited, directly or indirectly, under any agreement or other instrument to which it is a party or is subject, from paying any dividends to the Company, from making any other
No Restrictions on Subsidiaries
 
distribution on such subsidiary's capital stock, from repaying to the Company any loans or advances to such subsidiary from the Company or from transferring any of such subsidiary's properties or assets to the Company or any other subsidiary of the Company.
(ii) No person has the right to require the Company or any of its subsidiaries to register any securities for sale under the Securities Act by reason of the filing of the Registration Statement with the Commission or the issuance and sale of the Securities.
No Registration Rights.
(jj) . Neither the Company nor any of the Subsidiary Guarantors taken, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that could reasonably be expected to cause or result in any stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities.
No Stabilization
(kk) Neither the issuance, sale and delivery of the Securities nor the application of the proceeds thereof by the Company as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus will violate Regulation T, U or X of the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System or any other regulation of such Board of Governors.
Margin Rules.
(ll) No forward-looking statement (within the meaning of Section 27A of the Securities Act and Section 21E of the Exchange Act) contained in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus has been made or reaffirmed without a reasonable basis or has been disclosed other than in good faith.
Forward-Looking Statements.
(mm) . Nothing has come to the attention of the Company that has caused the Company to believe that the statistical and market-related data included in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus is not based on or derived from sources that are reliable and accurate in all material respects.
Statistical and Market Data
(nn) . There is and has been no material failure on the part of the Company or any of the Company's directors or officers, in their capacities as such, to comply with any provision of the Sarbanes-Oxley Act of 2002 and the rules and regulations promulgated in connection therewith (the "Sarbanes-Oxley Act"), including Section 402 related to loans and Sections 302 and 906 related to certifications.
Sarbanes-Oxley Act
(oo) The Company is not an ineligible issuer and is a well-known seasoned issuer, in each case as defined under the Securities Act, in each case at the times specified in the Securities Act in connection with the offering of the Securities.
Status under the Securities Act.
4. . The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors covenants and agrees with each Underwriter that:
Further Agreements of the Company
(a) . The Company will file the Prospectus with the Commission within the time periods specified by Rule 424(b) and Rule 430A, 430B or
Required Filings
 
430C under the Securities Act, as applicable, will file any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (including the Term Sheet in the form of Annex C hereto) to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act, and will file promptly all reports and any definitive proxy or information statements required to be filed by the Company with the Commission pursuant to Section 13(a), 13(c), 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act during the Prospectus Delivery Period (as defined below); and the Company will furnish copies of the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus (to the extent not previously delivered) to the Underwriters in New York City prior to 10:00 A.M., New York City time, on the business day next succeeding the date of this Agreement in such quantities as the Representatives may reasonably request. The Company will pay the registration fees for this offering within the time period required by Rule 456(b)(1)(i) under the Securities Act (without giving effect to the proviso therein) and in any event prior to the Closing Date. As used herein, the term "Prospectus Delivery Period" means such period of time after the first date of the public offering of the Securities that a prospectus relating to the Securities is required by law to be delivered (or required to be delivered but for Rule 172 under the Securities Act) in connection with sales of the Securities by any Underwriter or dealer.
(b) . The Company will deliver, without charge, to each Underwriter (i) a conformed copy of the Registration Statement as originally filed and each amendment thereto, in each case including all exhibits and consents filed therewith and (ii) during the Prospectus Delivery Period, as many copies of the Prospectus (including all amendments and supplements thereto and documents incorporated by reference therein) and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Delivery of Copies
(c) ;. Before making, preparing, using, authorizing, approving, referring to or filing any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, whether before or after the time that the Registration Statement becomes effective, and before filing any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information or the Prospectus, during the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will furnish to the Representatives and counsel for the Underwriters a copy of the proposed Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, amendment or supplement for review and will not make, prepare, use, authorize, approve, refer to or file any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or file any such proposed amendment or supplement to which the Representatives reasonably object.
Amendments or Supplements
Issuer Free Writing Prospectuses
(d) . During the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company will advise the Representatives promptly, and confirm such advice in writing, (i) when any amendment to the Registration Statement has been filed or becomes effective; (ii) when any supplement to the Prospectus or any amendment to the Prospectus or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus has been filed; (iii) of any request by the Commission for any amendment to the Registration Statement or any amendment or supplement to the Prospectus or the receipt of any comments from the Commission relating to the Registration Statement or any other request by the Commission for any additional information; (iv) of the issuance by the Commission of any order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement or preventing or suspending the use of any
Notice to the Representatives
 
Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for that purpose or pursuant to Section 8A of the Securities Act; (v) of the occurrence of any event within the Prospectus Delivery Period as a result of which the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information or any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus, the Time of Sale Information or any such Issuer Free Writing Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading; (vi) of the receipt by the Company of any notice of objection of the Commission to the use of the Registration Statement or any post-effective amendment thereto pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) under the Securities Act; and (vii) of the receipt by the Company of any notice with respect to any suspension of the qualification of the Securities for offer and sale in any jurisdiction or the initiation or threatening of any proceeding for such purpose; and the Company will use its reasonable best efforts to prevent the issuance of any such order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement, preventing or suspending the use of any Preliminary Prospectus or the Prospectus or suspending any such qualification of the Securities and, if any such order is issued, will use its reasonable best efforts to obtain as soon as possible the withdrawal thereof.
(e) If at any time prior to the Closing Date (i) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Time of Sale Information as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances, not misleading or (ii) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Time of Sale Information to comply with law, the Company will as promptly as practicable notify the Underwriters thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to paragraph (c) above, file with the Commission and furnish to the Underwriters and to such dealers as the Representatives may designate, such amendments or supplements to the Time of Sale Information as may be necessary so that the statements in the Time of Sale Information as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances, be misleading or so that the Time of Sale Information will comply with law.
Time of Sale Information.
(f) If during the Prospectus Delivery Period (i) any event shall occur or condition shall exist as a result of which the Prospectus as then amended or supplemented would include any untrue statement of a material fact or omit to state any material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, not misleading or (ii) it is necessary to amend or supplement the Prospectus to comply with law, the Company will as promptly as practicable notify the Underwriters thereof and forthwith prepare and, subject to paragraph (c) above, file with the Commission and furnish to the Underwriters and to such dealers as the Representatives may designate, such amendments or supplements to the Prospectus as may be necessary so that the statements in the Prospectus as so amended or supplemented will not, in the light of the circumstances existing when the Prospectus is delivered to a purchaser, be misleading or so that the Prospectus will comply with law.
Ongoing Compliance.
 
(g) The Company will qualify the Securities for offer and sale under the securities or Blue Sky laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives shall reasonably request and will continue such qualifications in effect so long as required for distribution of the Securities; provided that the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall not be required to (i) qualify as a foreign corporation or other entity or as a dealer in securities in any such jurisdiction where it would not otherwise be required to so qualify, (ii) file any general consent to service of process in any such jurisdiction or (iii) subject itself to taxation in any such jurisdiction if it is not otherwise so subject.
Blue Sky Compliance.
(h) . The Company will make generally available to its security holders and the Representatives as soon as practicable an earning statement that satisfies the provisions of Section 11(a) of the Securities Act and Rule 158 of the Commission promulgated thereunder covering a period of at least twelve months beginning with the first fiscal quarter of the Company occurring after the "effective date" (as defined in Rule 158) of the Registration Statement.
Earning Statement
(i) During the period from the date hereof through and including the business day following the Closing Date (other than as contemplated by the Prospectus under the heading "Use of proceeds"), the Company will not, without the prior written consent of the Representatives, offer, sell, contract to sell or otherwise dispose of any debt securities issued or guaranteed by the Company and having a tenor of more than one year.
Clear Market.
(j) The Company will apply the net proceeds from the sale of the Securities as described in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus under the heading "Use of proceeds."
Use of Proceeds.
(k) Neither the Company nor any Subsidiary Guarantor will take, directly or indirectly, any action designed to or that could reasonably be expected to cause or result in any stabilization or manipulation of the price of the Securities.
No Stabilization.
(l) . The Company will, pursuant to reasonable procedures developed in good faith, retain copies of each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus that is not filed with the Commission in accordance with Rule 433 under the Securities Act.
Record Retention
(m) If at any time during the Prospectus Delivery Period, the Company receives from the Commission a notice pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or otherwise ceases to be eligible to use the automatic shelf registration statement form, the Company will (i) promptly notify the Representatives, (ii) promptly file a new registration statement or post-effective amendment on the proper form relating to the Securities, in a form satisfactory to the Representatives, (iii) use its reasonable best efforts to cause such registration statement or post-effective amendment to be declared effective and (iv) promptly notify the Representatives of such effectiveness. The Company will take all other action necessary or appropriate to permit the public offering and sale of the Securities to continue as contemplated in the registration statement that was the subject of the Rule 401(g)(2) notice or for which the Company has otherwise become ineligible.
Notice of Inability to Use Automatic Shelf Registration Statement Form.
 
5. . Each Underwriter hereby represents and agrees that
Certain Agreements of the Underwriters
(a) It has not and will not use, authorize use of, refer to, or participate in the planning for use of, any "free writing prospectus", as defined in Rule 405 under the Securities Act (which term includes use of any written information furnished to the Commission by the Company and not incorporated by reference into the Registration Statement and any press release issued by the Company) other than (i) a free writing prospectus that, solely as a result of use by such underwriter, would not trigger an obligation to file such free writing prospectus with the Commission pursuant to Rule 433, (ii) any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus listed on Annex B or prepared pursuant to Section 3(c) or Section 4(c) above (including any electronic road show), or (iii) any free writing prospectus prepared by such underwriter and approved by the Company in advance in writing (each such free writing prospectus referred to in clauses (i) or (iii), an "Underwriter Free Writing Prospectus"). Notwithstanding the foregoing, the Underwriters may use a term sheet substantially in the form of Annex C hereto without the consent of the Company.
(b) It is not subject to any pending proceeding under Section 8A of the Securities Act with respect to the offering (and will promptly notify the Company if any such proceeding against it is initiated during the Prospectus Delivery Period).
6. . The obligation of each Underwriter to purchase Securities on the Closing Date as provided herein is subject to the performance by the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors of their covenants and other obligations hereunder and to the following additional conditions:
Conditions of Underwriters' Obligations
(a) . No order suspending the effectiveness of the Registration Statement shall be in effect, and no proceeding for such purpose, pursuant to Rule 401(g)(2) or pursuant to Section 8A under the Securities Act shall be pending before or threatened by the Commission; the Prospectus and each Issuer Free Writing Prospectus shall have been timely filed with the Commission under the Securities Act (in the case of a Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, to the extent required by Rule 433 under the Securities Act) and in accordance with Section 4(a) hereof; and all requests by the Commission for additional information shall have been complied with to the reasonable satisfaction of the Representatives.
Registration Compliance; No Stop Order
(b) . The representations and warranties of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors contained herein shall be true and correct on the date hereof and on and as of the Closing Date; and the statements of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and their respective officers made in any certificates delivered pursuant to this Agreement shall be true and correct on and as of the Closing Date.
Representations and Warranties
(c) . Subsequent to the earlier of (A) the Time of Sale and (B) the execution and delivery of this Agreement, (i) no downgrading shall have occurred in the rating accorded the Securities or any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries by any "nationally recognized
No Downgrade
 
statistical rating organization", as such term is defined by the Commission for purposes of Rule 436(g)(2) under the Securities Act and (ii) no such organization shall have publicly announced that it has under surveillance or review, or has changed its outlook with respect to, its rating of the Securities or of any other debt securities or preferred stock of or guaranteed by the Company or any of its subsidiaries (other than an announcement with positive implications of a possible upgrading).
(d) . No event or condition of a type described in Section 3(g) hereof shall have occurred or shall exist, which event or condition is not described in the Time of Sale Information (excluding any amendment or supplement thereto) and the Prospectus (excluding any amendment or supplement thereto) and the effect of which in the judgment of the Representatives makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
No Material Adverse Change
(e) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date certificates of an executive officer of the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor who has specific knowledge of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's financial matters and are satisfactory to the Representatives (i) confirming that such officer has carefully reviewed the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (ii) confirming that the representations and warranties of the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor in this Agreement are true and correct and that the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor has complied with all agreements and satisfied all conditions on its part to be performed or satisfied hereunder at or prior to the Closing Date and (iii) to the effect set forth in paragraphs (a), (c) and (d) above.
Officer's Certificate
(f) . On the date of this Agreement and on the Closing Date, Deloitte & Touche LLP shall have furnished to the Representatives, at the request of the Company, letters, dated the respective dates of delivery thereof and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, containing statements and information of the type customarily included in accountants' "comfort letters" to underwriters with respect to the financial statements and certain financial information contained or incorporated by reference in the Registration Statement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus; provided that the letter delivered on the Closing Date shall use a "cut-off" date no more than three business days prior to the Closing Date.
Comfort Letters
(g) . Bingham McCutchen LLP, counsel for the Company, shall have furnished to the Representatives, at the request of the Company, their written opinion for the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors and 10b-5 Statement, dated the Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect set forth in Annex A-1 hereto.
Opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Counsel for the Company
(h) The Company's general counsel shall have furnished to the Representatives his or her written opinion, dated the
Opinion of the Company's General Counsel.
 
Closing Date and addressed to the Underwriters, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Representatives, to the effect set forth in Annex A-2 hereto.
(i) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date an opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Cravath, Swaine & Moore LLP, counsel for the Underwriters, with respect to such matters as the Representatives may reasonably request, and such counsel shall have received such documents and information as they may reasonably request to enable them to pass upon such matters.
Opinion and 10b-5 Statement of Counsel for the Underwriters
(j) . No action shall have been taken and no statute, rule, regulation or order shall have been enacted, adopted or issued by any federal, state or foreign governmental or regulatory authority that would, as of the Closing Date, prevent the issuance or sale of the Securities; and no injunction or order of any federal, state or foreign court shall have been issued that would, as of the Closing Date, prevent the issuance or sale of the Securities.
No Legal Impediment to Issuance
(k) . The Representatives shall have received on and as of the Closing Date satisfactory evidence of the good standing of the Company and Subsidiary Guarantors in their respective jurisdictions of organization, in each case in writing or any standard form of telecommunication from the appropriate governmental authorities of such jurisdictions.
Good Standing
(l) . On or prior to the Closing Date, the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors shall have furnished to the Representatives such further certificates and documents as the Representatives may reasonably request.
Additional Documents
All opinions, letters, certificates and evidence mentioned above or elsewhere in this Agreement shall be deemed to be in compliance with the provisions hereof only if they are in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to counsel for the Underwriters.
7. .
Indemnification and Contribution
(a) The Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to indemnify and hold harmless each Underwriter, its affiliates, directors and officers and each person, if any, who controls such Underwriter within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act, from and against any and all losses, claims, damages and liabilities (including, without limitation, reasonable legal fees and other reasonable expenses incurred in connection with any suit, action or proceeding or any claim asserted, as such fees and expenses are incurred), joint or several, that arise out of, or are based upon, (i) any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Registration Statement or caused by any omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact required to be stated therein or necessary in order to make the statements therein, not misleading, (ii) or any untrue statement or alleged untrue statement of a material fact contained in the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any Time of Sale Information, or caused by any
Indemnification of the Underwriters.
 
omission or alleged omission to state therein a material fact necessary in order to make the statements therein, in light of the circumstances under which they were made, not misleading, in each case except insofar as such losses, claims, damages or liabilities arise out of, or are based upon, any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with any information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use therein.
(b) . Each Underwriter agrees, severally and not jointly, to indemnify and hold harmless the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors and their respective directors and officers who signed the Registration Statement and each person, if any, who controls the Company or a Subsidiary Guarantor within the meaning of Section 15 of the Securities Act or Section 20 of the Exchange Act to the same extent as the indemnity set forth in paragraph (a) above, but only with respect to any losses, claims, damages or liabilities that arise out of, or are based upon, any untrue statement or omission or alleged untrue statement or omission made in reliance upon and in conformity with any information furnished to the Company in writing by any Underwriter through the Representatives expressly for use in the Registration Statement, the Prospectus (or any amendment or supplement thereto), any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus or any Time of Sale Information, it being understood and agreed that the only such information consists of the following: the last paragraph on the cover of the Prospectus; the 5th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus; the 3rd sentence of the 7th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus; and the 8th paragraph of the Underwriting section of the Prospectus.
Indemnification of the Company
(c) . If any suit, action, proceeding (including any governmental or regulatory investigation), claim or demand shall be brought or asserted against any person in respect of which indemnification may be sought pursuant to either paragraph (a) or (b) above, such person (the "Indemnified Person") shall promptly notify the person against whom such indemnification may be sought (the "Indemnifying Person") in writing; provided that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have under this Section 7 except to the extent that it has been materially prejudiced (through the forfeiture of substantive rights or defenses) by such failure; and provided, further, that the failure to notify the Indemnifying Person shall not relieve it from any liability that it may have to an Indemnified Person otherwise than under this Section 7. If any such proceeding shall be brought or asserted against an Indemnified Person and it shall have notified the Indemnifying Person thereof, the Indemnifying Person shall retain counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnified Person (who shall not, without the consent of the Indemnified Person, be counsel to the Indemnifying Person) to represent the Indemnified Person and any others entitled to indemnification pursuant to Section 7 that the Indemnifying Party may designate in such proceeding and shall pay the fees and expenses of such proceeding and shall pay the fees and expenses of counsel related to such proceeding, as incurred. In any such proceeding, any Indemnified Person shall have the right to retain its own counsel, but the fees and expenses of such counsel shall be at the expense of such Indemnified Person unless (i) the Indemnifying Person and the Indemnified Person shall have mutually agreed to the contrary; (ii) the Indemnifying Person has failed within a reasonable time to retain
Notice and Procedures
 
counsel reasonably satisfactory to the Indemnified Person; (iii) the Indemnified Person shall have reasonably concluded that there may be legal defenses available to it that are different from or in addition to those available to the Indemnifying Person; or (iv) the named parties in any such proceeding (including any impleaded parties) include both the Indemnifying Person and the Indemnified Person and representation of both parties by the same counsel would be inappropriate due to actual or potential differing interests between them. It is understood and agreed that the Indemnifying Person shall not, in connection with any proceeding or related proceeding in the same jurisdiction, be liable for the fees and expenses of more than one separate firm (in addition to any local counsel) for all Indemnified Persons, and that all such fees and expenses shall be reimbursed as they are incurred. Any such separate firm for any Underwriter, its affiliates, directors and officers and any control persons of such Underwriter shall be designated in writing by the Representatives and any such separate firm for the Company, its directors, its officers who signed the Registration Statement and any control persons of the Company shall be designated in writing by the Company. The Indemnifying Person shall not be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent, but if settled with such consent or if there be a final judgment for the plaintiff, the Indemnifying Person agrees to indemnify each Indemnified Person from and against any loss or liability by reason of such settlement or judgment. Notwithstanding the foregoing sentence, if at any time an Indemnified Person shall have requested (any such request to be sent in accordance with the notice provisions of Section 15(b) hereof) that an Indemnifying Person reimburse the Indemnified Person for fees and expenses of counsel as contemplated by this paragraph, the Indemnifying Person shall be liable for any settlement of any proceeding effected without its written consent if (i) such settlement is entered into more than 45 days after receipt by the Indemnifying Person of such request and (ii) the Indemnifying Person shall not have reimbursed the Indemnified Person in accordance with such request prior to the date of such settlement. No Indemnifying Person shall, without the written consent of the Indemnified Person, effect any settlement of any pending or threatened proceeding in respect of which any Indemnified Person is or could have been a party and indemnification could have been sought hereunder by such Indemnified Person, unless such settlement (x) includes an unconditional release of such Indemnified Person, in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to such Indemnified Person, from all liability on claims that are the subject matter of such proceeding and (y) does not include any statement as to or any admission of fault, culpability or a failure to act by or on behalf of any Indemnified Person.
(d) . If the indemnification provided for in paragraphs (a) or (b) above is unavailable to an Indemnified Person or insufficient in respect of any losses, claims, damages or liabilities referred to therein, then each Indemnifying Person under such paragraph, in lieu of indemnifying such Indemnified Person thereunder, shall contribute to the amount paid or payable by such Indemnified Person as a result of such losses, claims, damages or liabilities (i) in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect the relative benefits received by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other from the offering of the Securities or (ii) if the allocation provided by clause (i) is not permitted by applicable law, in such proportion as is appropriate to reflect not only the relative benefits referred to in clause (i) but also the relative fault of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the
Contribution
 
Underwriters on the other in connection with the statements or omissions that resulted in such losses, claims, damages or liabilities, as well as any other relevant equitable considerations. The relative benefits received by the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be deemed to be in the same respective proportions as the net proceeds (before deducting expenses) received by the Company from the sale of the Securities and the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by the Underwriters in connection therewith, in each case as set forth in the table on the cover of the Prospectus, bear to the aggregate offering price of the Securities. The relative fault of the Company and the Subsidiary Guarantors on the one hand and the Underwriters on the other shall be determined by reference to, among other things, whether the untrue or alleged untrue statement of a material fact or the omission or alleged omission to state a material fact relates to information supplied by the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor or by the Underwriters and the parties' relative intent, knowledge, access to information and opportunity to correct or prevent such statement or omission.
(e) . The Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Underwriters agree that it would not be just and equitable if contribution pursuant to this Section 7 were determined by pro rata allocation (even if the Underwriters were treated as one entity for such purpose) or by any other method of allocation that does not take account of the equitable considerations referred to in paragraph (d) above. The amount paid or payable by an Indemnified Person as a result of the losses, claims, damages and liabilities referred to in paragraph (d) above shall be deemed to include, subject to the limitations set forth above, any legal or other expenses incurred by such Indemnified Person in connection with any such action or claim. Notwithstanding the provisions of this Section 7, in no event shall an Underwriter be required to contribute any amount in excess of the amount by which the total underwriting discounts and commissions received by such Underwriter with respect to the offering of the Securities exceeds the amount of any damages that such Underwriter has otherwise been required to pay by reason of such untrue or alleged untrue statement or omission or alleged omission. No person guilty of fraudulent misrepresentation (within the meaning of Section 11(f) of the Securities Act) shall be entitled to contribution from any person who was not guilty of such fraudulent misrepresentation. The Underwriters' obligations to contribute pursuant to this Section 7 are several in proportion to their respective purchase obligations hereunder and not joint.
Limitation on Liability
(f) . The remedies provided for in this Section 7 are not exclusive and shall not limit any rights or remedies which may otherwise be available to any Indemnified Person at law or in equity.
Non-Exclusive Remedies
8. . This Agreement shall become effective upon the execution and delivery hereof by the parties hereto.
Effectiveness of Agreement
9. . This Agreement may be terminated in the absolute discretion of the Representatives, by notice to the Company, if after the execution and delivery of this Agreement and prior to the Closing Date (i) trading generally shall have been suspended or materially limited on the New York Stock Exchange or the over-the-
Termination
 
counter market; (ii) trading of any securities issued or guaranteed by the Company shall have been suspended on any exchange or in any over-the-counter market; (iii) a general moratorium on commercial banking activities shall have been declared by federal or New York State authorities or there has occurred a material disruption in commercial banking or securities settlement or clearance services; or (iv) there shall have occurred any outbreak or escalation of hostilities or any change in financial markets or any calamity or crisis, either within or outside the United States, that, in the judgment of the Representatives, is material and adverse and makes it impracticable or inadvisable to proceed with the offering, sale or delivery of the Securities on the terms and in the manner contemplated by this Agreement, the Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus.
10. . (a) If, on the Closing Date, any Underwriter defaults on its obligation to purchase the Securities that it has agreed to purchase hereunder, the non-defaulting Underwriters may in their discretion arrange for the purchase of such Securities by other persons satisfactory to the Company on the terms contained in this Agreement. If, within 36 hours after any such default by any Underwriter, the non-defaulting Underwriters do not arrange for the purchase of such Securities, then the Company shall be entitled to a further period of 36 hours within which to procure other persons satisfactory to the non-defaulting Underwriters to purchase such Securities on such terms. If other persons become obligated or agree to purchase the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter, either the non-defaulting Underwriters or the Company may postpone the Closing Date for up to five full business days in order to effect any changes that in the opinion of counsel for the Company or counsel for the Underwriters may be necessary in the Registration Statement and the Prospectus or in any other document or arrangement, and the Company agrees to promptly prepare any amendment or supplement to the Registration Statement and the Prospectus that effects any such changes. As used in this Agreement, the term "Underwriter" includes, for all purposes of this Agreement unless the context otherwise requires, any person not listed in Schedule 1 hereto that, pursuant to this Section 10, purchases Securities that a defaulting Underwriter agreed but failed to purchase.
Defaulting Underwriter
(b) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the non-defaulting Underwriters and the Company as provided in paragraph (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of such Securities that remains unpurchased does not exceed one-eleventh of the aggregate principal amount of all the Securities, then the Company shall have the right to require each non-defaulting Underwriter to purchase the principal amount of Securities that such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder plus such Underwriter's pro rata share (based on the principal amount of Securities that such Underwriter agreed to purchase hereunder) of the Securities of such defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters for which such arrangements have not been made.
(c) If, after giving effect to any arrangements for the purchase of the Securities of a defaulting Underwriter or Underwriters by the non-defaulting Underwriters and the Company as provided in paragraph (a) above, the aggregate principal amount of such Securities that remains unpurchased exceeds one-eleventh of
 
the aggregate principal amount of all the Securities, or if the Company shall not exercise the right described in paragraph (b) above, then this Agreement shall terminate without liability on the part of the non-defaulting Underwriters. Any termination of this Agreement pursuant to this Section 10 shall be without liability on the part of the Company, except that the Company will continue to be liable for the payment of expenses as set forth in Section 11 hereof and except that the provisions of Section 7 hereof shall not terminate and shall remain in effect.
(d) Nothing contained herein shall relieve a defaulting Underwriter of any liability it may have to the Company or any non-defaulting Underwriter for damages caused by its default.
11. . (a) Whether or not the transactions contemplated by this Agreement are consummated or this Agreement is terminated, the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to pay or cause to be paid all costs and expenses incident to the performance of its obligations hereunder, including without limitation, (i) the costs incident to the authorization, issuance, sale, preparation and delivery of the Securities and any taxes payable in that connection; (ii) the costs incident to the preparation, printing and filing under the Securities Act of the Registration Statement, the Preliminary Prospectus, any Issuer Free Writing Prospectus, any Time of Sale Information and the Prospectus (including all exhibits, amendments and supplements thereto) and the distribution thereof; (iii) the costs of reproducing and distributing each of the Transaction Documents; (iv) the fees and expenses of the Company's and the Subsidiary Guarantor's counsel and independent accountants; (v) the fees and expenses incurred in connection with the registration or qualification and determination of eligibility for investment of the Securities under the laws of such jurisdictions as the Representatives may designate and the preparation, printing and distribution of a Blue Sky Memorandum (including the related fees and expenses of counsel for the Underwriters not to exceed $15,000); (vi) any fees charged by rating agencies for rating the Securities; (vii) the fees and expenses of the Trustee and any paying agent (including related fees and expenses of any counsel to such parties); (viii) all expenses and application fees incurred in connection with any filing with, and clearance of the offering by, FINRA; (ix) all expenses incurred by the Company in connection with any "road show" presentation to potential investors; and (x) any expenses and application fees related to the listing of the Securities on any exchange, if applicable.
Payment of Expenses
(b) If (i) this Agreement is terminated pursuant to Section 9 (other than the circumstances set forth in Sections 9(i), (iii) and (iv)), (ii) the Company for any reason fails to tender the Securities for delivery to the Underwriters or (iii) the Underwriters decline to purchase the Securities for any reason permitted under this Agreement (other than as a result of the circumstances set forth in Sections 9(i), (iii) and (iv)), the Company and each of the Subsidiary Guarantors jointly and severally agree to reimburse the Underwriters for all out-of-pocket costs and expenses (including the fees and expenses of their counsel) reasonably incurred by the Underwriters in connection with this Agreement and the offering contemplated hereby.
 
12. . This Agreement shall inure to the benefit of and be binding upon the parties hereto and their respective successors and the officers and directors and any controlling persons referred to in Section 7, and the affiliates of each Underwriter referred to in Section 7 hereof. Nothing in this Agreement is intended or shall be construed to give any other person any legal or equitable right, remedy or claim under or in respect of this Agreement or any provision contained herein. No purchaser of Securities from any Underwriter shall be deemed to be a successor merely by reason of such purchase.
Persons Entitled to Benefit of Agreement
13. . The respective indemnities, rights of contribution, representations, warranties and agreements of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Underwriters contained in this Agreement or made by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or the Underwriters pursuant to this Agreement or any certificate delivered pursuant hereto shall survive the delivery of and payment for the Securities and shall remain in full force and effect, regardless of any termination of this Agreement or any investigation made by or on behalf of the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors or the Underwriters.
Survival
14. . For purposes of this Agreement, (a) except where otherwise expressly provided, the term "affiliate" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act; (b) the term "business day" means any day other than a day on which banks are permitted or required to be closed in New York City; (c) the term "subsidiary" has the meaning set forth in Rule 405 under the Securities Act; and (d) the term "significant subsidiary" has the meaning set forth in Rule 1-02 of Regulation S-X under the Exchange Act.
Certain Defined Terms
15. . (a) . Any action by the Underwriters hereunder may be taken by the Representatives on behalf of the Underwriters, and any such action taken by the Representatives shall be binding upon the Underwriters.
Miscellaneous
Authority of the Representatives
(b) . All notices and other communications hereunder shall be in writing and shall be deemed to have been duly given if mailed or transmitted and confirmed by any standard form of telecommunication. Notices to the Underwriters shall be given to the Representatives c/o J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, 383 Madison Avenue, New York, New York 10179 (fax: 212-834-6081), Attention: High Grade Syndicate Desk; Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, 50 Rockefeller Plaza, NY1-050-12-01, New York, New York 10020 (fax: 646-855-5943), Attention: High Grade Transaction Management/Legal; SunTrust Robinson Humphrey Inc., 3333 Peachtree Road, 11th Floor, Atlanta, GA 30326 (fax: 404-926-5129); and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, 301 S. College Street, 6th Floor, Charlotte, NC 28288 (fax: 704-383-9165), Attention: Transaction Management. Notices to the Company or the Subsidiary Guarantors shall be given to it at Advance Auto Parts, Inc., 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012 (fax: 540-561-1448); Attention Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer and Sarah Powell, Senior Vice President and General Counsel.
Notices
 
(c) . This Agreement shall be governed by and construed in accordance with the laws of the State of New York.
Governing Law
(d) . This Agreement may be signed in counterparts (which may include counterparts delivered by any standard form of telecommunication or PDF via email), each of which shall be an original and all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
Counterparts
(e) . No amendment or waiver of any provision of this Agreement, nor any consent or approval to any departure therefrom, shall in any event be effective unless the same shall be in writing and signed by the parties hereto.
Amendments or Waivers
(f) . The headings herein are included for convenience of reference only and are not intended to be part of, or to affect the meaning or interpretation of, this Agreement.
Headings
 
If the foregoing is in accordance with your understanding, please indicate your acceptance of this Agreement by signing in the space provided below.
 
 
 
 
 
For itself and on behalf of the
several Underwriters listed
in Schedule 1 hereto.
 
For itself and on behalf of the
several Underwriters listed
in Schedule 1 hereto
 
For itself and on behalf of the
several Underwriters listed
in Schedule 1 hereto.
 
For itself and on behalf of the
several Underwriters listed
in Schedule 1 hereto
 
Schedule 1
 
Schedule 2
Significant Subsidiaries
Advance Auto Business Support, LLC
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated
Autopart International, Inc.
Discount Auto Parts, LLC
Subsidiary Guarantors
Advance Auto Business Support, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
Advance Auto Innovations, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
Advance Auto of Puerto Rico, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Advance e-Service Solutions, Inc., a Virginia corporation.
Advance Patriot, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, a Virginia corporation.
Advance Trucking Corporation, a Virginia corporation.
Autopart International, Inc., a Massachusetts corporation.
Crossroads Global Trading Corp., a Virginia corporation.
Discount Auto Parts, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
Driverside, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
E-Advance, LLC, a Virginia limited liability company.
MotoLogic, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
TTR, Inc., a Delaware corporation.
Annex A-1
Annex A-2
Annex B
Issuer Free-Writing Prospectuses
Pricing Term Sheet dated as of January 11, 2012 substantially in the form of Annex C

Exhibit 4.4
EXECUTION COPY
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
THIRD SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of January 17, 2012 (this ""), to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the ""), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (the ""), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (the "").
Third Supplemental Indenture
Original Indenture
Company
Trustee
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered the Original Indenture to provide for the issuance from time to time of Securities (as defined in the Original Indenture) of the Company, to be issued in one or more Series;
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Original Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered a first supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, to provide for a Series of Securities (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), and a second supplement indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011, to provide for the release of certain Subsidiary Guarantors (the "Second Supplemental Indenture") (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture and this Third Supplemental Indenture is hereinafter called the "Indenture");
WHEREAS, Sections 2.02 and 9.01 of the Original Indenture provide, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of establishing the designation, form, terms and conditions of Securities of any Series as permitted by Sections 2.01 and 9.01 of the Original Indenture;
WHEREAS, Section 2.02(t) of the Original Indenture provides, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of establishing the applicability of, and any addition to, deletion of or change in, the covenants (and the related definitions) set forth in Article Four or Article Five of the Original Indenture which apply to Securities of such Series;
WHEREAS, the Company (i) desires the issuance of a Series of Securities to be designated as hereinafter provided and (ii) has requested the Trustee to enter into this Third Supplemental Indenture for the purpose of establishing the designation, form, terms and conditions of the Securities of such Series;
WHEREAS, the Company has duly authorized the creation of an issue of its 4.500% Notes Due 2022 (as defined in Section 2.01, the ""); and
Notes
WHEREAS, all actions on the part of the Company necessary to authorize the issuance of the Notes under the Original Indenture and this Third Supplemental Indenture have been duly taken.
 
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS THIRD SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That, in order to establish the designation, form, terms and conditions of, and to authorize the authentication and delivery of, the Notes, and in consideration of the acceptance of the Notes by the Holders thereof and of other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which are hereby acknowledged, the parties hereto hereby agree as follows:
SECTION 1.01.
Definitions.
A. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Original Indenture.
B. The rules of interpretation set forth in the Original Indenture shall be applied hereto as if set forth in full herein.
C. For all purposes of this Third Supplemental Indenture, except as otherwise expressly provided or unless the context otherwise requires, the following terms shall have the following respective meanings (such meanings shall apply equally to both the singular and plural forms of the respective terms):
"" means the occurrence of any one of the following:
Change of Control
(1) the direct or indirect sale, lease, transfer, conveyance or other disposition (other than by way of merger or consolidation), in one or a series of related transactions, of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company and its Subsidiaries taken as a whole to any Person (including any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act)) other than the Company or one of its Subsidiaries;
(2) the consummation of any transaction (including without limitation, any merger or consolidation) the result of which is that any Person (including any "person" (as that term is used in Section 13(d)(3) of the Exchange Act)) becomes the "beneficial owner" (as defined in Rules 13d-3 and 13d-5 under the Exchange Act), directly or indirectly, of more than 50% of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed, measured by voting power rather than number of shares;
(3) the Company consolidates with, or merges with or into, any Person, or any Person consolidates with, or merges with or into, the Company, in any such event pursuant to a transaction in which any of the outstanding Voting Stock of the Company (or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed) or such other Person is converted into or exchanged
 
for cash, securities or other property, other than any such transaction where the shares of the Voting Stock of the Company (or any other Voting Stock into which the Voting Stock of the Company is reclassified, consolidated, exchanged or changed) outstanding immediately prior to such transaction constitute, or are converted into or exchanged for, a majority of the Voting Stock of the surviving Person immediately after giving effect to such transaction;
(4) the first day on which the majority of the members of the board of directors of the Company cease to be Continuing Directors; or
(5) the adoption of a plan relating to the liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
"" means the Notes cease to be rated Investment Grade by each of the Rating Agencies on any date during the Trigger Period.
Change of Control Triggering Event
If a Rating Agency is not providing a rating for the Notes at the commencement of any Trigger Period, the Notes will be deemed to have been downgraded by at least one rating category or have ceased to be rated Investment Grade, as applicable, by such Rating Agency during that Trigger Period. Notwithstanding the foregoing, no Change of Control Triggering Event will be deemed to have occurred in connection with any particular Change of Control unless and until such Change of Control has actually occurred.
"" means the U.S. Treasury security selected by the Company as having a maturity comparable to the remaining term of the Notes to be redeemed that would be utilized, at the time of selection and in accordance with customary financial practice, in pricing new issues of corporate debt securities of comparable maturity to the remaining term of such Notes.
Comparable Treasury Issue
"" means, with respect to any redemption date, (1) the average of five Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations for such redemption date, after excluding the highest and lowest Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, or (2) if the Company obtains fewer than five such Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations, the average of all such quotations.
Comparable Treasury Price
"" means, as of any date of determination, any member of the Board of Directors who:
Continuing Director
(1) was a member of such Board of Directors on the date of the indenture; or
(2) was nominated for election or elected to such Board of Directors with the approval of a majority of the Continuing Directors who were members of such Board of Directors at the time of such nomination or election.
"" means a Note in definitive registered form without coupons.
Definitive Note
"" means Notes in the form of a Global Security as delivered to the Depositary.
Global Notes
 
"" means a rating of Baa3 or better by Moody's (or its equivalent under any successor rating category of Moody's, and a rating of BBB- or better by S&P (or its equivalent under any successor rating category of S&P).
Investment Grade
"" means Moody's Investors Service, Inc., a subsidiary of Moody's Corporation, and its successors.
Moody's
"" means, with respect to the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, a Person who has an account with the Depositary, Euroclear or Clearstream, respectively (and, with respect to DTC, shall include Euroclear or Clearstream) as indirect participants.
Participant
"" means each of Moody's and S&P; provided, that if either Moody's or S&P ceases to provide rating services to issuers or investors, the Company may appoint a replacement for such Rating Agency.
Rating Agency
"" means, with respect to each Reference Treasury Dealer and any redemption date, the average, as determined by the Company, of the bid and asked prices for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed in each case as a percentage of its principal amount) quoted in writing to the Trustee at 5:00 p.m., New York City time, on the third Business Day preceding such redemption date.
Reference Treasury Dealer Quotations
"" means Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated and J.P. Morgan Securities LLC and their respective successors, and any other primary Treasury dealer the Company may select. If any of the foregoing ceases to be a primary U.S. government securities dealer in New York City (a "Primary Treasury Dealer"), the Company must substitute another Primary Treasury Dealer.
Reference Treasury Dealers
"" means Standard & Poor's Ratings Services, a division of The McGraw-Hill Companies, Inc., and its successors.
S&P
"" means, with respect to any redemption date: (a) the yield, under the heading which represents the average for the immediately preceding week, appearing in the most recently published statistical release designated "H.15 (519)" or any successor publication which is published weekly by the Board of Governors of the Federal Reserve System and which establishes yields on actively traded U.S. Treasury securities adjusted to constant maturity under the caption Treasury Constant Maturities", for the maturity corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue (if no maturity is within three months before or after the remaining life (as defined below), yields for the two published maturities most closely corresponding to the Comparable Treasury Issue will be determined and the Treasury Rate will be interpolated or extrapolated from such yields on a straight-line basis, rounding to the nearest month), or (b) if such release (or any successor release) is not published during the week preceding the calculation date or does not contain such yields, the rate per annum equal to the semiannual equivalent yield to maturity of the Comparable Treasury Issue, calculated using a price for the Comparable Treasury Issue (expressed as a percentage of its principal amount) equal to the Comparable Treasury Price for such redemption date. The Treasury Rate will be calculated on the third business day preceding the date fixed for redemption.
Treasury Rate
 
"" means the period commencing 60 days prior to the first public announcement by the Company of any Change of Control (or pending Change of Control) and ending 60 days following consummation of such Change of Control (which Trigger Period will be extended following consummation of a Change of Control for so long as either of the Rating Agencies has publicly announced that it is considering a possible ratings change).
Trigger Period
"" of any specified Person as of any date means the capital stock of such Person that is at the time entitled to vote generally in the election of the board of directors of such Person.
Voting Stock
Other Definitions:
 
SECTION 2.01. There is hereby created one Series of Securities and designated: 4.500% Notes Due 2022 (the ""). The Notes will initially be guaranteed by the Subsidiary Guarantors on the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Original Indenture.
Title and Aggregate Principal Amount.
Notes
SECTION 2.02. The Notes may forthwith be executed by the Company and delivered to the Trustee for authentication and delivery by the Trustee in accordance with the provisions of Section 2.04 of the Original Indenture. The Subsidiary Guarantee of each Subsidiary Guarantor shall be evidenced by its notation attached to the Notes.
Execution.
SECTION 2.03. The Notes shall have and be subject to such other terms as provided in the Original Indenture and this Third Supplemental Indenture and shall be evidenced by one or more Global Notes in the form of hereto. The Notes shall only be issued in denominations of $2,000 and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof.
Other Terms and Form of the Notes; Denominations.
Exhibit A
SECTION 2.04. The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
Further Issues of Notes.
SECTION 2.05. The Notes will mature on January 15, 2022 and will bear interest at the rate of 4.500% per annum. The Company will pay interest on
Interest and Principal.
 
the Notes on each January 15 and July 15 (each an ""), beginning on July 15, 2012, to the holders of record on the immediately preceding January 1 or July 1 (each a ""), respectively. Interest on the Notes shall accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from the date of issuance. Payments of the principal of and interest on the Notes shall be made in Dollars, and the Notes shall be denominated in Dollars.
Interest Payment Date
Record Date
SECTION 2.06. The place of payment where the Notes issued in the form of Definitive Notes may be presented or surrendered for payment, where the principal of and interest and any other payments due on the Notes issued in the form of Definitive Notes are payable, where the Notes may be surrendered for registration of transfer or exchange and where notices and demands to and upon the Company in respect of the Notes and the Indenture may be served shall be in the Borough of Manhattan, The City of New York, and the office or agency maintained by the Company for such purpose shall initially be the Corporate Trust Office of the Trustee. The Company shall pay principal and interest (i) on any Definitive Note by check mailed to the address of the Person entitled thereto as it appears in the Note register (or upon written notice from such Person, given at least 15 days before the payment date, by wire transfer in immediately available funds if such Person is entitled to Interest on an aggregate principal amount of Notes in excess of $2.0 million) or (ii) on any Global Note by wire transfer of immediately available funds to the account of the Depositary or its nominee.
Place and Manner of Payment.
SECTION 2.07. Notes shall be issued in the form of one or more Global Notes in definitive, fully registered form without interest coupons with such applicable legends as are provided for in Section 2.15(c) of the Original Indenture, except as otherwise permitted herein. Such Global Notes shall be registered in the name of the Depositary or its nominee and deposited with the Trustee, at its Corporate Trust Office, as custodian for the Depositary, duly executed by the Company, notated by the Subsidiary Guarantors and authenticated by the Trustee as provided in the Original Indenture. The Global Notes shall constitute Global Securities for purposes of the Original Indenture, and the Company only shall issue Definitive Notes under the circumstances set forth in Section 2.15 of the Original Indenture.
Form of Notes.
SECTION 2.08. . The Company initially appoints The Depository Trust Company ("") to act as Depositary with respect to the Global Notes. The Company initially appoints the Trustee to act as the Registrar and the Paying Agent and designates the Trustee's New York office as the office or agency referred to in Section 2.05 of the Original Indenture.
Depositary; Registrar
DTC
SECTION 2.09. . The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time prior to October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), at the option of the Company, at a redemption price equal to the greater of:
Optional Redemption
(a) 100% of the principal amount of the Note being redeemed, or
(b) the sum of the present values of the remaining scheduled payments of principal and interest on such Note (not including any portion of such payments of interest
 
accrued to the date of redemption), discounted to the date of redemption on a semiannual basis (assuming a 360-day year consisting of twelve 30-day months) at the Treasury Rate (as defined below) plus 40 basis points.
The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time on or after October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), at the option of the Company, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed.
In the case of any redemption pursuant to this Section 2.09, the Company will also pay accrued and unpaid interest, if any, to the redemption date.
SECTION 2.10. . The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
Sinking Fund
SECTION 2.11. .
Change of Control
(a) Upon the occurrence of a Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company will make an offer (a "Change of Control Offer") to each Holder to repurchase all or any part (in integral multiples of $1,000) of each Holder's Notes at a purchase price equal to 101% of the aggregate principal amount thereof plus accrued and unpaid interest on the Notes repurchased, if any, to the date of purchase, subject to the rights of holders of Notes on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the relevant interest payment date (the "Change of Control Payment"). Within 30 days following any Change of Control Triggering Event, the Company shall mail a notice to holders of the Notes describing the transaction or transactions that constitute the Change of Control Triggering Event, stating:
(i) that the Change of Control Offer is being made pursuant to this Section 2.11 and that all Notes tendered will be accepted for payment;
(ii) the purchase price and the purchase date, which shall be no earlier than 30 days and no later than 60 days from the date such notice is mailed (the "");
Change of Control Payment Date
(iii) that any Note not tendered will continue to accrue interest;
(iv) that, unless the Company defaults in the payment of the Change of Control Payment, all Notes accepted for payment pursuant to the Change of Control Offer will cease to accrue interest after the Change of Control Payment Date;
(v) that Holders electing to have any Notes purchased pursuant to a Change of Control Offer will be required to surrender the Notes, with the form entitled "" on the reverse of the Note completed, to the Paying Agent at the address specified in the notice prior to the close of business on the third Business Day preceding the Change of Control Payment Date;
Option of Holder to Elect Purchase
(vi) that Holders will be entitled to withdraw their election if the Paying Agent receives, no later than the close of business on the second Business Day preceding the
 
Change of Control Payment Date, a facsimile transmission or letter setting forth the name of the Holder, the principal amount of the Notes delivered for purchase, and a statement that such Holder is withdrawing his election to have the Notes purchased; and
(vii) that Holders whose Notes are being purchased only in part will be issued new Notes equal in principal amount to the unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered, which unpurchased portion must be equal to $2,000 in principal amount or an integral multiple thereof.
(b) The Company will comply with the requirements of Rule 14e-1 under the Exchange Act and any other securities laws and regulations thereunder to the extent those laws and regulations are applicable in connection with the repurchase of the Notes as a result of a Change of Control Triggering Event. To the extent that the provisions of any securities laws or regulations conflict with the provisions of this Section 2.11, the Company will comply with the applicable securities laws and regulations and will not be deemed to have breached its obligations under this Section 2.11 by virtue of such compliance.
(c) On the Change of Control Payment Date, the Company will, to the extent lawful,
(i) accept for payment all Notes or portions thereof properly tendered pursuant to the Change of Control Offer;
(ii) deposit with the Paying Agent an amount equal to the Change of Control Payment in respect of all Notes or portions of Notes properly tendered; and
(iii) deliver or cause to be delivered to the Trustee the Notes properly accepted together with an Officer's Certificate stating the aggregate principal amount of Note or portions of Notes being purchased by the Company.
(d) The Paying Agent will promptly mail to each Holder of Notes properly tendered the Change of Control Payment for such Notes, and the Trustee will promptly authenticate and mail (or cause to be transferred by book entry) to each Holder a new Note equal in principal amount to any unpurchased portion of the Notes surrendered, if any;that each new Note will be in a principal amount of $2,000 and or any integral multiple of $1,000. The Company will publicly announce the results of the Change of Control Offer on or as soon as practicable after the Change of Control Payment Date. Except as described above with respect to a Change of Control, this Indenture does not contain provisions that permit Holders of the Notes to require the Company to repurchase or redeem the Notes in the event of a takeover, recapitalization or similar transaction.
provided
(e) Notwithstanding anything to the contrary in this Section 2.11, the Company shall not be required to make a Change of Control Offer upon a Change of Control Triggering Event if (1) a third party makes the Change of Control Offer in the manner, at the times and otherwise in compliance with the requirements set forth in this Section 2.11 and purchases all Notes validly tendered and not withdrawn under the Change of Control Offer; or (2) notice of
 
redemption has been given pursuant to Section 2.9 hereof, unless and until there is a default in the payment of the applicable redemption price.
(f) The Company shall not repurchase any Note if there has occurred and is continuing on the Change of Control Payment Date an event of default under the Indenture, other than a default in the payment of the Change of Control Payment upon a Change of Control Triggering Event.
SECTION 2.12. For purposes of the Notes issued hereunder, the definition of "Permitted Liens" in Section 1.01 of the Original Indenture shall be amended by the following changes:
Amendment of Permitted Liens.
(a) removing the "and" at the end of subsection (23);
(b) inserting the following new subsection (24) following subsection (23): "(24) Liens securing indebtedness in an aggregate principal amount at any time outstanding not exceeding $150.0 million in respect of any arrangement under which the Company or any subsidiary transfers, once or on a revolving basis, without recourse (except for indemnities and representations customary for securitization transactions and except for the retention of risk in an amount and form required by applicable laws and regulations or as is customary for a similar type of transaction) involving one or more "true sale" transactions, accounts receivable or interests therein and related assets customarily transferred in connection with securitization transactions (a) to a trust, partnership, corporation, limited liability company or other entity, which transfer is funded in whole or in part, directly or indirectly, by the incurrence or issuance by the transferee or successor transferee of indebtedness or other securities that are to receive payments from, or that represent interests in, the cash flow derived from such accounts receivable or interests therein, or (b) directly to one or more investors or other purchasers; and"; and
(c) renumbering original subsection (24) as subsection (25).
SECTION 3.01. Article Eight of the Original Indenture shall be applicable to the Notes. For purposes of Article Eight of the Original Indenture, solely for purposes of the Notes, if the Company exercises its right of covenant defeasance pursuant to Sections 8.01 and 8.03 of the Original Indenture, in addition to being released from its obligations under the provisions of the Original Indenture set forth in Section 8.03, the Company also shall be released from its obligations under Section 2.11 of this Third Supplemental Indenture.
Defeasance and Covenant Defeasance.
 
SECTION 4.01. Except as expressly amended hereby, the Original Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect. This Third Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
Ratification of Original Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Original Indenture.
SECTION 4.02. The recitals contained herein and in the Notes, except with respect to the Trustee's certificates of authentication, shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the same. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Third Supplemental Indenture or of the Notes.
Concerning the Trustee.
SECTION 4.03. This Third Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument. The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
Counterparts.
SECTION 4.04. To the fullest extent permitted by applicable law, the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably submit to the non-exclusive jurisdiction of any federal or State court located in the Borough of Manhattan in The City of New York, New York in any suit, action or proceeding based on or arising out of or relating to this Indenture or any Securities and irrevocably agree that all claims in respect of such suit or proceeding may be determined in any such court. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor irrevocably waive, to the fullest extent permitted by law, any objection which they may have to the laying of the venue of any such suit, action or proceeding brought in an inconvenient forum. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor agree that final judgment in any such suit, action or proceeding brought in such a court shall be conclusive and binding upon them, and may be enforced in any courts to the jurisdiction of which the Company and each
THIS THIRD SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE AND THE NOTES SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY. EACH OF THE COMPANY, EACH SUBSIDIARY GUARANTOR AND THE TRUSTEE HEREBY IRREVOCABLY WAIVES, TO THE FULLEST EXTENT PERMITTED BY APPLICABLE LAW, ANY AND ALL RIGHT TO TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY LEGAL PROCEEDING ARISING OUT OF OR RELATING TO THIS INDENTURE, THE NOTES OR THE TRANSACTION CONTEMPLATED HEREBY.
GOVERNING LAW; WAIVER OF JURY TRIAL; CONSENT TO JURISDICTION AND SERVICES.
 
Subsidiary Guarantor are subject by a suit upon such judgment, provided, that service of process is effected upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor in the manner specified herein or as otherwise permitted by law. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoint National Registered Agents, Inc. (in all jurisdictions except Virginia where the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably designate and appoints Sarah Powell) (the "Process Agent") as their authorized agent for purposes of this section, it being understood that the designation and appointment of the Process Agent as such authorized agent shall become effective immediately without any further action on the part of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree that service of process upon the Process Agent and written notice of said service to the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, mailed by prepaid registered first class mail or delivered to the Process Agent at its principal office, shall be deemed in every respect effective service of process upon the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, in any such suit or proceeding. The Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor further agree to take any and all action, including the execution and filing of any and all such documents and instruments as may be necessary, to continue such designation and appointment of the Process Agent in full force and effect so long as the Company and each Subsidiary Guarantor, have any outstanding obligations under this Indenture. To the extent the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor has or hereafter may acquire any immunity from jurisdiction of any court or from any legal process (whether through service of notice, attachment prior to judgment, attachment in aid of execution, executor or otherwise) with respect to itself or its property, the Company or such Subsidiary Guarantor hereby irrevocably waives such immunity in respect of its obligations under this Indenture to the extent permitted by law.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Third Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized as of the date first above written.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION, TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL BECAUSE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
THIS SECURITY IS HELD BY THE DEPOSITARY (AS DEFINED IN THE INDENTURE GOVERNING THIS SECURITY) OR ITS NOMINEE IN CUSTODY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE BENEFICIAL OWNERS HEREOF, AND IS NOT TRANSFERABLE TO ANY PERSON UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES EXCEPT THAT (A) THE TRUSTEE MAY MAKE SUCH NOTATIONS HEREON AS MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.04 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (B) THIS SECURITY MAY BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (C) THIS SECURITY MAY BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE FOR CANCELLATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.13 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE AND (D) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, THIS SECURITY MAY BE TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART, ONLY (X) BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY, (Y) BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR (Z) BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR TO A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY.
 
promises to pay to CEDE & CO. or registered assigns, the principal sum: $300,000,000 (THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND NO CENTS), as such amount may be increased or decreased as set forth in the Schedule of Increase or Decrease in Principal Amount of Global Note attached hereto on January 15, 2022.
Interest Payment Dates: January 15 and July 15, commencing on July 15, 2012.
Record Dates: January 1 and July 1.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF AUTHENTICATION
Dated:
 
Each of the undersigned (the "Subsidiary Guarantors") hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, to the extent set forth in the Indenture (the "Indenture") dated as of April 29, 2010, by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., as issuer, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes (as defined in the Indenture), when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal of, and premium and, to the extent permitted by law, interest, and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders of the Notes or the Trustee, all in accordance with the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Notes or any of such other obligations, that the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise.
The obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Notes and to the Trustee pursuant to this Subsidiary Guarantee and the Indenture are expressly set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for the precise terms and limitations of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
This Subsidiary Guarantee has been executed and issued to the requirements of Section 4.09 of the Indenture. This Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to automatic and unconditional release as set forth in Section 10.05 of the Indenture.
In WITNESS THEREOF, each Subsidiary Guarantor has caused this Subsidiary Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officer.
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of Securities of the Company, designated as its 4.500% Notes due 2022 (herein called the "Notes," which expression includes any additional notes issued pursuant to Section 2.04 of the Third Supplemental Indenture (as hereinafter defined) and forming a single series therewith), issued and to be issued under an indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (herein called the "Original Indenture"), as supplemented by a first supplemental indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), a second supplemental indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), and a third supplemental indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012 (the "Third Supplemental Indenture") (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture and the Third Supplemental Indenture is hereinafter called the "Indenture"), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (such company, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the "Company"), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature pages hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as trustee (the "Trustee"), to which the Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto relevant to the Notes reference is hereby made for a complete description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company and the Holders of the Notes. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Note shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Indenture.
The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company and its Subsidiaries to create or incur Liens or engage in Sale and Leaseback Transactions. The Indenture also imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company to merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other person (other than a merger of a wholly owned Subsidiary into the Company) or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property of the Company in any one transaction or series of related transactions.
Each Note is subject to, and qualified by, all such terms as set forth in the Indenture certain of which are summarized herein and each Holder of a Note is referred to the corresponding provisions of the Indenture for a complete statement of such terms. To the extent that there is any inconsistency between the summary provisions set forth in the Notes and the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern.
 
The Company promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Note at the rate per annum shown above. The Company will pay interest semiannually on January 15 and
July 15 of each year, commencing July 15, 2012. Interest on the Notes will accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from January 17, 2012. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months.
 
Initially, the Trustee will act as Paying Agent, registrar and service agent. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, registrar or co-registrar and service agent without notice. The Company or any of its Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, registrar, co-registrar or service agent.
 
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Notes, subject to certain limitations, may declare all the Notes due and payable immediately. In the case of an Event of Default resulting from certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization, the principal (or such specified amount) and premium, if any, of all outstanding Notes will become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act by the Trustee or any Holder of outstanding Notes.
Holders of Notes may not enforce the Indenture or the Notes except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Notes unless it receives reasonable indemnification. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power under the Indenture.
At any time after the principal of the Notes shall have been so declared due and payable (or have become immediately due and payable), and before any judgment or decree for the payment of the moneys due shall have been obtained or entered, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding under the Indenture, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences if (i) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay all matured installments of interest upon all the Notes and the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any and all Notes that shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest upon such principal and premium, if any, and, to the extent that such payment is enforceable under applicable law, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate per annum expressed in the Notes to the date of such payment or deposit) and the amount payable to the Trustee under Section 7.07 of the Original Indenture and (ii) any and all existing Events of Default under the Indenture with respect to the Notes, other than the nonpayment of principal on Notes that shall not have become due by their terms, shall have been remedied or waived as provided in Section 6.04 of the Original Indenture. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereto.
The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default and its consequences except a Default in the payment of
the principal amount of premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Note. When a Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any consequent right.
 
In addition to any supplemental indenture otherwise authorized by the Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may from time to time and at any time enter into supplemental indentures (which shall conform to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect), without the consent of any Holder of Notes, for one or more of the following purposes: (i) to evidence the succession of another person to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's covenants, agreements and obligations; (ii) to surrender any right or power conferred upon the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor by the Indenture, to add to the covenants of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor such further covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions for the protection of the Holders of all or any Notes as the Board of Directors of the Company shall consider to be for the protection of the Holders of such Notes, and to make the occurrence, or the occurrence and continuance, of a default in respect of any such additional covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions a Default or an Event of Default under the Indenture; , that with respect to any such additional covenant, restriction, condition or provision, such amendment may provide for a period of grace after default, which may be shorter or longer than that allowed in the case of other Defaults, may provide for an immediate enforcement upon such Default, may limit the remedies available to the Trustee upon such Default or may limit the right of Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes to waive such default; (iii) to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Indenture, in any supplemental indenture or in any Notes that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision contained therein; (iv) to convey, transfer, assign, mortgage or pledge any property to or with the Trustee, or to make such other provisions in regard to matters or questions arising under the Indenture as shall not adversely affect the interests of any Holders of Notes; (v) to modify or amend the Indenture in such a manner as to permit the qualification of the Indenture or any supplemental indenture thereto under the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect; (vi) to add or to change any of the provisions of the Indenture to provide that Notes in bearer form may be registrable as to principal, to change or eliminate any restrictions on the payment of principal or premium with respect to Notes in registered form or of principal, premium or interest with respect to Notes in bearer form, or to permit Notes in registered form to be exchanged for Notes in bearer form, so as to not adversely affect the interests of the Holders or any coupons in any material respect or permit or facilitate the issuance of Notes in uncertificated form; (vii) to secure the Notes; (viii) to release Subsidiary Guarantors as provided in Article Ten of the Indenture; (ix) to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect; (x) to add to, change, or eliminate any of the provisions of the Indenture with respect to the Notes, so long as any such addition, change or elimination not otherwise permitted under the Indenture shall (A) neither apply to any Note created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture and entitled to the benefit of such provision nor modify the rights of the Holders of any such Note with respect to the benefit of such provision or (B) become effective only when there is no such Note outstanding; and (xi) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment by a
provided
however,
successor or separate Trustee with respect to the Notes and to add to or change any of the provisions of the Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the Indenture by more than one Trustee.
With the written consent (as evidenced as provided in Section 9.02 of the Original Indenture) of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding affected by such amendment (including consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for the Notes), the Company the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, may amend the Indenture without notice to any Holder; that no such amendment shall, without the consent of the Holders of each Note then outstanding and affected thereby, (i) reduce the principal amount of Notes whose Holders must consent to an amendment, modification, supplement or waiver; (ii) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Note; (iii) reduce the principal of or change the Stated Maturity of any Note; (iv) reduce the amount payable upon the redemption of any Note or add redemption provisions to any Note; (v) make any Note payable in money other than that stated in the Note or, other than in accordance with the provisions of Article Ten of the Indenture, eliminate any existing Subsidiary Guarantor; or (vi) make any change in the Sections of the Indenture relating to waivers of past defaults and the rights of Holders to receive payments, or in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions. It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof.
provided
Any consent to an amendment or a waiver by the Holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders and owners of this Note and any Notes that may be issued in exchange or substitution hereof, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Notes. Any Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke its consent if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment or waiver becomes effective. Neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company shall, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration, whether by way of interest, fee or otherwise, to any Holder for or as an inducement to any consent, waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of the Indenture or the Notes unless such consideration is offered to be paid to all Holders, ratably, that so consent, waive or agree to amend.
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
 
Upon a Change of Control Triggering Event, any Holder of Notes shall have the right to cause the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such Holder at a repurchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Notes to be repurchased plus accrued interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of holders of record on the
relevant record date to receive interest due on the related interest payment date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
 
The Notes shall not be redeemable at the option of any Holder thereof, upon the occurrence of any particular circumstances or otherwise. The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
 
The Notes are issuable in registered form without coupons in minimum denominations of $2,000 principal amount and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. When Notes are presented to the Registrar or a co-registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Notes, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without payment of any service charge but with payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration or exchange of Notes.
The Company and the Registrar shall not be required (a) to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Notes during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before the day of the mailing of a notice of redemption of Notes selected for redemption and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (b) to register the transfer or exchange of Notes selected, called or being called for redemption as a whole or the portion being redeemed of any such Notes selected, called or being called for redemption in part.
 
The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
 
The Notes may be redeemed at the option of the Company, upon notice as set forth in the Indenture, in whole at any time or in part from time to time prior to October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), on the terms set forth in the Indenture. The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time on or after October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), at the option of the Company, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed.
 
The ownership of Notes shall be proved by the register maintained by the Registrar.
No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, as such, of any Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Notes or the Indenture or a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Note, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. This waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issuance of the Notes.
 
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Notes and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money and/or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
 
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Note and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, and premium, if any, or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on its request or, if then held by the Company, shall be discharged from such trust. Thereafter the Holder of such Note shall look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, shall at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal (national edition), notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification or publication, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
provided
however,
 
Subject to certain limitations imposed by the Trust Indenture Act, the Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-Paying Agent may do the same with like rights.
 
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian), and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes and has directed the Trustee to use CUSIP numbers in notices of redemption as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice of redemption and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
For value received                  hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto                      (please insert social security or other identifying number of assignee) the within Note, and hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints                      attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
 
Signature(s) must be guaranteed by an eligible Guarantor Institution (banks, stock brokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions) with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program pursuant to Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 17Ad-15.
 
The initial principal amount of this Global Note is $300,000,000. The following increases or decreases in this Global Note have been made:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 4.5
UNLESS THIS CERTIFICATE IS PRESENTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, A NEW YORK CORPORATION, TO THE COMPANY OR ITS AGENT FOR REGISTRATION OR TRANSFER, EXCHANGE OR PAYMENT, AND ANY CERTIFICATE ISSUED IS REGISTERED IN THE NAME OF CEDE & CO. OR IN SUCH OTHER NAME AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, AND ANY PAYMENT IS MADE TO CEDE & CO. OR TO SUCH OTHER ENTITY AS IS REQUESTED BY AN AUTHORIZED REPRESENTATIVE OF THE DEPOSITORY TRUST COMPANY, ANY TRANSFER, PLEDGE OR OTHER USE HEREOF FOR VALUE OR OTHERWISE BY OR TO ANY PERSON IS WRONGFUL BECAUSE THE REGISTERED OWNER HEREOF, CEDE & CO., HAS AN INTEREST HEREIN.
THIS SECURITY IS HELD BY THE DEPOSITARY (AS DEFINED IN THE INDENTURE GOVERNING THIS SECURITY) OR ITS NOMINEE IN CUSTODY FOR THE BENEFIT OF THE BENEFICIAL OWNERS HEREOF, AND IS NOT TRANSFERABLE TO ANY PERSON UNDER ANY CIRCUMSTANCES EXCEPT THAT (A) THE TRUSTEE MAY MAKE SUCH NOTATIONS HEREON AS MAY BE REQUIRED PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.04 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (B) THIS SECURITY MAY BE EXCHANGED IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, (C) THIS SECURITY MAY BE DELIVERED TO THE TRUSTEE FOR CANCELLATION PURSUANT TO SECTION 2.13 OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE AND (D) EXCEPT AS OTHERWISE PROVIDED IN SECTION 2.15(B) OF THE ORIGINAL INDENTURE, THIS SECURITY MAY BE TRANSFERRED, IN WHOLE BUT NOT IN PART, ONLY (X) BY THE DEPOSITARY TO A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY, (Y) BY A NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY TO THE DEPOSITARY OR ANOTHER NOMINEE OF THE DEPOSITARY OR (Z) BY THE DEPOSITARY OR ANY NOMINEE TO A SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY OR TO A NOMINEE OF SUCH SUCCESSOR DEPOSITARY.
 
promises to pay to CEDE & CO. or registered assigns, the principal sum: $300,000,000 (THREE HUNDRED MILLION DOLLARS AND NO CENTS), as such amount may be increased or decreased as set forth in the Schedule of Increase or Decrease in Principal Amount of Global Note attached hereto on January 15, 2022.
Interest Payment Dates: January 15 and July 15, commencing on July 15, 2012.
Record Dates: January 1 and July 1.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this instrument to be duly executed.
 
TRUSTEE'S CERTIFICATE OF
AUTHENTICATION
Dated:
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION
 
Each of the undersigned (the "Subsidiary Guarantors") hereby jointly and severally unconditionally guarantees, to the extent set forth in the Indenture (the "Indenture") dated as of April 29, 2010, by and among Advance Auto Parts, Inc., as issuer, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as Trustee, and subject to the provisions of the Indenture, (a) the due and punctual payment of the principal of, and premium, if any, and interest on the Notes (as defined in the Indenture), when and as the same shall become due and payable, whether at maturity, by acceleration or otherwise, the due and punctual payment of interest on overdue principal of, and premium and, to the extent permitted by law, interest, and the due and punctual performance of all other obligations of the Company to the Holders of the Notes or the Trustee, all in accordance with the terms set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and (b) in case of any extension of time of payment or renewal of any Notes or any of such other obligations, that the same shall be promptly paid in full when due or performed in accordance with the terms of the extension or renewal, whether at stated maturity, by acceleration or otherwise.
The obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors to the Holders of the Notes and to the Trustee pursuant to this Subsidiary Guarantee and the Indenture are expressly set forth in Article Ten of the Indenture and reference is hereby made to the Indenture for the precise terms and limitations of this Subsidiary Guarantee.
This Subsidiary Guarantee has been executed and issued to the requirements of Section 4.09 of the Indenture. This Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to automatic and unconditional release as set forth in Section 10.05 of the Indenture.
In WITNESS THEREOF, each Subsidiary Guarantor has caused this Subsidiary Guarantee to be signed manually or by facsimile by its duly authorized officer.
 
 
 
 
 
This Security is one of a duly authorized issue of Securities of the Company, designated as its 4.500% Notes due 2022 (herein called the "Notes," which expression includes any additional notes issued pursuant to Section 2.04 of the Third Supplemental Indenture (as hereinafter defined) and forming a single series therewith), issued and to be issued under an indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (herein called the "Original Indenture"), as supplemented by a first supplemental indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the "First Supplemental Indenture"), a second supplemental indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011 (the "Second Supplemental Indenture"), and a third supplemental indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012 (the "Third Supplemental Indenture") (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture and the Third Supplemental Indenture is hereinafter called the "Indenture"), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (such company, and its successors and assigns under the Indenture hereinafter referred to, being herein called the "Company"), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature pages hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, as trustee (the "Trustee"), to which the Indenture and all indentures supplemental thereto relevant to the Notes reference is hereby made for a complete description of the rights, limitations of rights, obligations, duties and immunities thereunder of the Trustee, the Company and the Holders of the Notes. Capitalized terms used but not defined in this Note shall have the meanings ascribed to them in the Indenture.
The Indenture imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company and its Subsidiaries to create or incur Liens or engage in Sale and Leaseback Transactions. The Indenture also imposes certain limitations on the ability of the Company to merge, consolidate or amalgamate with or into any other person (other than a merger of a wholly owned Subsidiary into the Company) or sell, transfer, assign, lease, convey or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the property of the Company in any one transaction or series of related transactions.
Each Note is subject to, and qualified by, all such terms as set forth in the Indenture certain of which are summarized herein and each Holder of a Note is referred to the corresponding provisions of the Indenture for a complete statement of such terms. To the extent that there is any inconsistency between the summary provisions set forth in the Notes and the Indenture, the provisions of the Indenture shall govern.
 
The Company promises to pay interest on the principal amount of this Note at the rate per annum shown above. The Company will pay interest semiannually on January 15 and
July 15 of each year, commencing July 15, 2012. Interest on the Notes will accrue from the most recent date to which interest has been paid or, if no interest has been paid, from January 17, 2012. Interest shall be computed on the basis of a 360-day year comprised of twelve 30-day months.
 
Initially, the Trustee will act as Paying Agent, registrar and service agent. The Company may appoint and change any Paying Agent, registrar or co-registrar and service agent without notice. The Company or any of its Subsidiaries may act as Paying Agent, registrar, co-registrar or service agent.
 
If an Event of Default occurs and is continuing, the Trustee or the Holders of at least 25% in aggregate principal amount of the outstanding Notes, subject to certain limitations, may declare all the Notes due and payable immediately. In the case of an Event of Default resulting from certain events of bankruptcy, insolvency or reorganization, the principal (or such specified amount) and premium, if any, of all outstanding Notes will become and be immediately due and payable without any declaration or other act by the Trustee or any Holder of outstanding Notes.
Holders of Notes may not enforce the Indenture or the Notes except as provided in the Indenture. The Trustee may refuse to enforce the Indenture or the Notes unless it receives reasonable indemnification. Subject to certain limitations, Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding may direct the Trustee in its exercise of any trust or power under the Indenture.
At any time after the principal of the Notes shall have been so declared due and payable (or have become immediately due and payable), and before any judgment or decree for the payment of the moneys due shall have been obtained or entered, the Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes then outstanding under the Indenture, by written notice to the Company and the Trustee, may rescind and annul such declaration and its consequences if (i) the Company has paid or deposited with the Trustee a sum sufficient to pay all matured installments of interest upon all the Notes and the principal of (and premium, if any, on) any and all Notes that shall have become due otherwise than by acceleration (with interest upon such principal and premium, if any, and, to the extent that such payment is enforceable under applicable law, upon overdue installments of interest, at the rate per annum expressed in the Notes to the date of such payment or deposit) and the amount payable to the Trustee under Section 7.07 of the Original Indenture and (ii) any and all existing Events of Default under the Indenture with respect to the Notes, other than the nonpayment of principal on Notes that shall not have become due by their terms, shall have been remedied or waived as provided in Section 6.04 of the Original Indenture. No such rescission shall affect any subsequent Default or impair any right consequent thereto.
The Holders of a majority in principal amount of the Notes by notice to the Trustee may waive an existing Default and its consequences except a Default in the payment of
the principal amount of premium, if any, and accrued and unpaid interest on a Note. When a Default is waived, it is deemed cured, but no such waiver shall extend to any subsequent or other Default or impair any consequent right.
 
In addition to any supplemental indenture otherwise authorized by the Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may from time to time and at any time enter into supplemental indentures (which shall conform to the provisions of the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect), without the consent of any Holder of Notes, for one or more of the following purposes: (i) to evidence the succession of another person to the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor and the assumption by such successor of the Company's or such Subsidiary Guarantor's covenants, agreements and obligations; (ii) to surrender any right or power conferred upon the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor by the Indenture, to add to the covenants of the Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor such further covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions for the protection of the Holders of all or any Notes as the Board of Directors of the Company shall consider to be for the protection of the Holders of such Notes, and to make the occurrence, or the occurrence and continuance, of a default in respect of any such additional covenants, restrictions, conditions or provisions a Default or an Event of Default under the Indenture; , that with respect to any such additional covenant, restriction, condition or provision, such amendment may provide for a period of grace after default, which may be shorter or longer than that allowed in the case of other Defaults, may provide for an immediate enforcement upon such Default, may limit the remedies available to the Trustee upon such Default or may limit the right of Holders of a majority in aggregate principal amount of the Notes to waive such default; (iii) to cure any ambiguity or correct or supplement any provision contained in the Indenture, in any supplemental indenture or in any Notes that may be defective or inconsistent with any other provision contained therein; (iv) to convey, transfer, assign, mortgage or pledge any property to or with the Trustee, or to make such other provisions in regard to matters or questions arising under the Indenture as shall not adversely affect the interests of any Holders of Notes; (v) to modify or amend the Indenture in such a manner as to permit the qualification of the Indenture or any supplemental indenture thereto under the Trust Indenture Act as then in effect; (vi) to add or to change any of the provisions of the Indenture to provide that Notes in bearer form may be registrable as to principal, to change or eliminate any restrictions on the payment of principal or premium with respect to Notes in registered form or of principal, premium or interest with respect to Notes in bearer form, or to permit Notes in registered form to be exchanged for Notes in bearer form, so as to not adversely affect the interests of the Holders or any coupons in any material respect or permit or facilitate the issuance of Notes in uncertificated form; (vii) to secure the Notes; (viii) to release Subsidiary Guarantors as provided in Article Ten of the Indenture; (ix) to make any change that does not adversely affect the rights of any Holder in any material respect; (x) to add to, change, or eliminate any of the provisions of the Indenture with respect to the Notes, so long as any such addition, change or elimination not otherwise permitted under the Indenture shall (A) neither apply to any Note created prior to the execution of such supplemental indenture and entitled to the benefit of such provision nor modify the rights of the Holders of any such Note with respect to the benefit of such provision or (B) become effective only when there is no such Note outstanding; and (xi) to evidence and provide for the acceptance of appointment by a
provided
however,
successor or separate Trustee with respect to the Notes and to add to or change any of the provisions of the Indenture as shall be necessary to provide for or facilitate the administration of the Indenture by more than one Trustee.
With the written consent (as evidenced as provided in Section 9.02 of the Original Indenture) of the Holders of at least a majority in principal amount of the Notes at the time outstanding affected by such amendment (including consents obtained in connection with a tender offer or exchange offer for the Notes), the Company the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee, may amend the Indenture without notice to any Holder; that no such amendment shall, without the consent of the Holders of each Note then outstanding and affected thereby, (i) reduce the principal amount of Notes whose Holders must consent to an amendment, modification, supplement or waiver; (ii) reduce the rate of or extend the time for payment of interest on any Note; (iii) reduce the principal of or change the Stated Maturity of any Note; (iv) reduce the amount payable upon the redemption of any Note or add redemption provisions to any Note; (v) make any Note payable in money other than that stated in the Note or, other than in accordance with the provisions of Article Ten of the Indenture, eliminate any existing Subsidiary Guarantor; or (vi) make any change in the Sections of the Indenture relating to waivers of past defaults and the rights of Holders to receive payments, or in the foregoing amendment and waiver provisions. It shall not be necessary for the consent of the Holders to approve the particular form of any proposed amendment, but it shall be sufficient if such consent approves the substance thereof.
provided
Any consent to an amendment or a waiver by the Holder of this Note (unless revoked as provided in the Indenture) shall be conclusive and binding upon such Holder and upon all future Holders and owners of this Note and any Notes that may be issued in exchange or substitution hereof, irrespective of whether or not any notation thereof is made upon this Note or such other Notes. Any Holder or subsequent Holder may revoke its consent if the Trustee receives the notice of revocation before the date the amendment or waiver becomes effective. Neither the Company nor any Affiliate of the Company shall, directly or indirectly, pay or cause to be paid any consideration, whether by way of interest, fee or otherwise, to any Holder for or as an inducement to any consent, waiver or amendment of any of the terms or provisions of the Indenture or the Notes unless such consideration is offered to be paid to all Holders, ratably, that so consent, waive or agree to amend.
 
No reference herein to the Indenture and no provision of this Note or of the Indenture shall alter or impair the obligation of the Company, which is absolute and unconditional, to pay the principal of and any premium and interest on this Note at the place, at the respective times, at the rate and in the coin or currency herein prescribed.
 
Upon a Change of Control Triggering Event, any Holder of Notes shall have the right to cause the Company to repurchase all or any part of the Notes of such Holder at a repurchase price equal to 101% of the principal amount of the Notes to be repurchased plus accrued interest, if any, to the date of repurchase (subject to the right of holders of record on the relevant record date to receive interest due on the related interest payment date) as provided in, and subject to the terms of, the Indenture.
The Notes shall not be redeemable at the option of any Holder thereof, upon the occurrence of any particular circumstances or otherwise. The Notes will not have the benefit of any sinking fund.
 
The Notes are issuable in registered form without coupons in minimum denominations of $2,000 principal amount and integral multiples of $1,000 in excess thereof. When Notes are presented to the Registrar or a co-registrar with a request to register a transfer or to exchange them for an equal principal amount of Notes, the Registrar shall register the transfer or make the exchange in the manner and subject to the limitations provided in the Indenture, without payment of any service charge but with payment of a sum sufficient to cover any transfer tax or other governmental charge that may be imposed in connection with any registration or exchange of Notes.
The Company and the Registrar shall not be required (a) to issue, register the transfer of or exchange any Notes during a period beginning at the opening of business 15 days before the day of the mailing of a notice of redemption of Notes selected for redemption and ending at the close of business on the day of such mailing or (b) to register the transfer or exchange of Notes selected, called or being called for redemption as a whole or the portion being redeemed of any such Notes selected, called or being called for redemption in part.
 
The Company may from time to time, without the consent of the Holders of the Notes and in accordance with the Indenture, create and issue further notes having the same terms and conditions as the Notes in all respects (or in all respects except for the first payment of interest) so as to form a single series with the Notes.
 
The Notes may be redeemed at the option of the Company, upon notice as set forth in the Indenture, in whole at any time or in part from time to time prior to October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), on the terms set forth in the Indenture. The Notes may be redeemed in whole at any time or in part from time to time on or after October 15, 2021 (three months prior to the Stated Maturity of the Notes), at the option of the Company, at a redemption price equal to 100% of the principal amount of the Notes being redeemed.
 
The ownership of Notes shall be proved by the register maintained by the Registrar.
No shareholder, partner, manager, member, director, officer, employee, agent or incorporator, as such, of any Company or any Subsidiary Guarantor shall have any liability for any obligations of the Company under the Notes or the Indenture or a Subsidiary Guarantor under its Subsidiary Guarantee or the Indenture or for any claim based on, in respect of or by reason of such obligations or their creation. By accepting a Note, each Holder shall waive and release all such liability. This waiver and release shall be part of the consideration for the issuance of the Notes.
 
Subject to certain conditions set forth in the Indenture, the Company at any time may terminate some or all of its obligations under the Notes and the Indenture if the Company deposits with the Trustee money and/or U.S. Government Obligations for the payment of principal of, premium, if any, and interest on the Notes to redemption or maturity, as the case may be.
 
Any money deposited with the Trustee or any Paying Agent, or then held by the Company, in trust for the payment of the principal of, premium, if any, or interest on any Note and remaining unclaimed for two years after such principal, and premium, if any, or interest has become due and payable shall be paid to the Company on its request or, if then held by the Company, shall be discharged from such trust. Thereafter the Holder of such Note shall look only to the Company for payment thereof, and all liability of the Trustee or such Paying Agent with respect to such trust money, and all liability of the Company as trustee thereof, shall thereupon cease; , that the Trustee or such Paying Agent, before being required to make any such repayment, shall at the expense of the Company cause to be published once, in the New York Times and The Wall Street Journal (national edition), notice that such money remains unclaimed and that, after a date specified therein, which shall not be less than 30 days from the date of such notification or publication, any unclaimed balance of such money then remaining will be repaid to the Company.
provided
however,
 
Subject to certain limitations imposed by the Trust Indenture Act, the Trustee in its individual or any other capacity may become the owner or pledgee of Notes and may otherwise deal with the Company or its Affiliates with the same rights it would have if it were not Trustee. Any Paying Agent, Registrar or co-Paying Agent may do the same with like rights.
 
Customary abbreviations may be used in the name of a Holder or an assignee, such as TEN COM (=tenants in common), TEN ENT (=tenants by the entireties), JT TEN (=joint tenants with rights of survivorship and not as tenants in common), CUST (=custodian), and U/G/M/A (=Uniform Gift to Minors Act).
Pursuant to a recommendation promulgated by the Committee on Uniform Security Identification Procedures, the Company has caused CUSIP numbers to be printed on the Notes and has directed the Trustee to use CUSIP numbers in notices of redemption as a convenience to Holders. No representation is made as to the accuracy of such numbers either as printed on the Notes or as contained in any notice of redemption and reliance may be placed only on the other identification numbers placed thereon.
For value received              hereby sell(s), assign(s) and transfer(s) unto                      (please insert social security or other identifying number of assignee) the within Note, and hereby irrevocably constitutes and appoints                      attorney to transfer the said Note on the books of the Company, with full power of substitution in the premises.
Dated:
                                    
                                                 
                                                 
Signature(s)
Signature(s) must be guaranteed by an eligible Guarantor Institution (banks, stock brokers, savings and loan associations and credit unions) with membership in an approved signature guarantee medallion program pursuant to Securities and Exchange Commission Rule 17Ad-15.
                                                 
Signature Guarantee
The initial principal amount of this Global Note is $300,000,000. The following increases or decreases in this Global Note have been made:
 
 
 
 
 
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
January 17, 2012
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, Virginia 24012
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as special counsel for Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the "") and its direct and indirect subsidiaries listed on hereto (the ""), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the ""), of $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of the Company's 4.500% Notes due 2022 (the ""), pursuant to a Registration Statement on Form S-3, File No. 333-166291 (as amended and supplemented from time to time, the ""), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the "") on April 26, 2010.
Company
Schedule I
Subsidiary Guarantors
Act
Notes
Registration Statement
SEC
The Notes are being offered and sold by the Company by means of the prospectus supplement dated January 11, 2012 relating to the Notes filed by the Company with the SEC on January 12, 2012 pursuant to Rule 424(b) under the Act (the "" and, together with the prospectus dated April 26, 2010, the "") and pursuant to the Underwriting Agreement dated January 11, 2012 between the Company and Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, as Representatives of the several Underwriters named therein (the ""). The Notes will be issued as senior indebtedness of the Company under an indenture between the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (the ""), dated as of April 29, 2010 (the ""), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the ""), the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011 (the "") and the Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012 (the ""; the Base Indenture together with (and as supplemented by) the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture and the Third Supplemental Indenture being referred to herein as the ""). The Notes are guaranteed on an unsecured basis (the "" and together with the Notes, the "") by each of the Subsidiary Guarantors. This opinion is being furnished in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K under the Act. No opinion is expressed herein as to any matter pertaining to the contents of the Registration Statement or the Prospectus other than as to the validity of the Securities.
Prospectus Supplement
Prospectus
Underwriting Agreement
Trustee
Base Indenture
First Supplemental Indenture
Second Supplemental Indenture
Third Supplemental Indenture
Indenture
Subsidiary Guarantees
Securities
We have reviewed the corporate proceedings taken by the Company with respect to the authorization of the issuance of the Notes and the corporate or limited liability company proceedings, as applicable, of the Subsidiary Guarantors with respect to the authorization of the issuance of the Subsidiary Guarantees. We have also examined and relied upon originals or copies of such corporate records, documents, agreements or other instruments of the Company as we consider appropriate. As to all matters of fact, we have entirely relied upon certificates of officers of the Company and of public officials, and have assumed, without independent inquiry, the accuracy of those certificates. In connection with this opinion, we have also examined and relied upon the Registration Statement and Prospectus. In our examination, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the conformity to the originals of all documents reviewed by us as copies, the authenticity and completeness of all original documents reviewed by us in original or copy form.
We have assumed the Securities will be duly executed and delivered upon the payment of the consideration specified in the Underwriting Agreement.
The opinion set forth below relating to the binding effect of the Securities is subject to the following general qualifications:
(i) the enforceability of any obligation of the Company may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance, reorganization, moratorium, marshalling or other laws and rules affecting the enforcement generally of creditors' rights and remedies (including such as may deny giving effect to waivers of debtors' or guarantors' rights);
(ii) the enforcement of any rights may in all cases be subject to an implied duty of good faith and general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
(iii) we express no opinion as to the enforceability of any particular provision of any of the Registration Statement, the Prospectus or the Indenture relating to (i) waivers of rights to object to jurisdiction or venue, or consents to jurisdiction or venue, (ii) waivers of rights to (or methods of) service of process, or rights to trial by jury, or other rights or benefits bestowed by operation of law, (iii) waivers of any applicable defenses, setoffs, recoupments or counterclaims, (iv) the granting of any power of attorney or of any proxy to any person, (v) exculpation or exoneration clauses, clauses relating to rights of indemnity or contribution, and clause relating to releases or waivers of unmatured claims or rights, (vi) waivers or variations of legal provisions or rights which are not capable of waiver or variation under applicable law, or (vii) the imposition or collection of interest on overdue interest or providing for a penalty rate of interest or late charges on overdue or defaulted obligations, or the payment of any premium, liquidated damages or other amount that may be held by any court to be a "penalty" or a "forfeiture"; and
(iv) we express no opinion as to the effect of suretyship defenses, or defenses in the nature thereof, with respect to the obligations of any Subsidiary Guarantor.
This opinion is limited solely to (i) the Delaware General Corporation Law, (ii) the Massachusetts Business Corporations Act; (iii) the Virginia Stock Corporation Act and the Virginia Limited Liability Company Act; and (iv) the internal, substantive laws of the State of New York as applied by courts located in New York, in each case to the extent the same may apply to or govern the transactions contemplated by the Registration Statement, and we express no opinion as to the laws of any other jurisdiction.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, we are of the opinion that (i) the Notes, when authenticated and delivered by the Trustee and executed and issued by the Company, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Company and (ii) the Subsidiary Guarantees, when executed and issued by the Subsidiary Guarantors, will constitute valid and binding obligations of the Subsidiary Guarantors.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement and to the reference to this firm in the Prospectus Supplement, under the heading "Legal Matters." In rendering this opinion and giving this consent, we do not admit that we are "experts" within the meaning of the Act.
Very truly yours,
/s/ Bingham McCutchen LLP
BINGHAM McCUTCHEN LLP
 

Exhibit 12.1
The table below sets forth our ratios of earnings to fixed charges for the periods indicated. The ratios have been based upon earnings from continuing operations before fixed charges and taxes on income. Fixed charges include interest (expense and capitalized) and an estimate of the portion of rent expense that is representative of the interest factor in these rentals.
Ratio of Earnings to Fixed Charges
In Thousands, Except Ratio Data
 
 

Exhibit 99.1
 
 Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE: AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, announced today the closing of its Senior Unsecured Notes offering. The Company completed the offering of $300 million in principal amount of 4.50% Senior Unsecured Notes due 2022 at an issue price of 99.968%. The Company will use the proceeds of the offering to pay off borrowings under its revolving credit facility, pay transaction fees and expenses and for general corporate purposes.
ROANOKE, Va., January 17, 2012
Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc. and Wells Fargo Securities, LLC acted as joint book-running managers of the debt offering. The offering is being made solely by means of a prospectus supplement and accompanying prospectus, which has been filed with the SEC. A copy of the prospectus for the offering may be obtained on the SEC's website, www.sec.gov. Alternatively, you may request it by contacting Merrill Lynch, Pierce, Fenner & Smith Incorporated, Attention: Prospectus Department, 100 West 33
rd
Street, 3
rd
Floor, New York, NY 10001 (phone: 800-294-1322 and e-mail: dg.prospectus_requests@baml.com); J.P. Morgan Securities LLC, Attention: High Grade Syndicate Deck  3
rd
Floor, 383 Madison Avenue, New York, NY 10179, at 212-834-4533; SunTrust Robinson Humphrey, Inc., Attention: Investment Grade Debt Capital Markets, 3333 Peachtree Road, 11th Floor, Atlanta, GA 30326, at 800-685-4786; or Wells Fargo Securities, LLC, Attention: Capital Markets Client Support, 1525 West W.T. Harris Boulevard, NC 0675, Charlotte, NC 28262.
This press release does not constitute an offer to sell or a solicitation of an offer to buy the securities described herein, and shall not constitute an offer, solicitation or sale in any state or other jurisdiction in which such an offer, solicitation or sale would be unlawful.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of October 8, 2011, the Company operated 3,645 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at .
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
 


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120124161423.txt.gz
TIME:20120124161423
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) January 18, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02
    
Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On January 18, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) entered into an Employment Agreement, effective as of January 1, 2012 (Employment Agreement), with Jimmie L. Wade, Director and former President of the Company, with an initial one-year term, which will be automatically renewable for additional one-year terms unless either party provides notice of non-renewal at least 90 days prior to the end of the then effective term. The Employment Agreement supersedes and replaces his former executive employment agreement and was entered into in conjunction with Mr. Wade's transition to the role of former President and his continued employment with the Company as disclosed in a Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on September 13, 2011. Mr. Wade also continues in his role as a Director of the Company.
Under the terms of the agreement, Mr. Wade will receive an annual base salary of $150,000 and annual equity grants in the form of restricted stock valued at no less than $100,000. Mr. Wade is eligible to participate in all of the Company's applicable benefit plans and programs pursuant to the terms of such programs. If his employment is terminated in the event of his death, the Company shall pay $300,000 to Mr. Wade or his designated beneficiary or estate.  In the event Mr. Wade's employment is terminated on account his disability, the Company will pay him an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Employee's Base Salary for a one year period. In addition, if Mr. Wade's employment is terminated on account of his death or disability, all of the time-based restricted stock, stock appreciation rights (SARs) and stock options granted to Mr. Wade pursuant to the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2004 Plan) or any successor plan will vest and become exercisable if not then vested or exercisable. All performance-based restricted stock and SARs will become eligible for issuance or exercise on the normal vesting date for the applicable performance-based awards on a pro rata basis for the time that Mr. Wade was employed during the performance period. The pro rata amount of performance-based restricted stock and SARs that will become eligible for issuance or exercise will be no fewer than the total number of shares at target level less the previously vested portion of time-based restricted stock and SARs.
If the Company terminates Mr. Wade's employment without Cause (as defined in the agreement) or if he terminates his employment for Good Reason (as defined in the agreement) (other than following a Change in Control), he will be entitled to severance in the amount of $300,000.  In addition, the Company will pay his COBRA premium for continuation of health coverage, all subject to his signing a general release and complying with the non-competition and non-solicitation agreements described below.  In addition, all shares of restricted stock, SARs and stock options granted to the executive pursuant to the Company's 2004 Plan will vest as specified in the preceding paragraph.
 
If within twelve months after a Change in Control (as defined by reference to the definition of Change in Control contained in the 2004 Plan), the Company terminates Mr. Wade's employment other than for Cause, death or disability or he terminates his employment for Good Reason, he will be entitled to a severance payment in the amount of $300,000, together with the other benefits and 2004 Plan awards as specified in the preceding paragraph.  If payments upon termination of employment related to a Change in Control would be subjected to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, and if reducing the amount of the payments would result in greater benefits to him (after taking into consideration the payment of all income and excise taxes that would be owed by Mr. Wade as a result of the Change in Control payments), the Company will
reduce the Change in Control payments by the amount necessary to maximize the benefits received by him, determined on an after-tax basis.
Mr. Wade will be subject to standard confidentiality and non-disparagement agreements during and following their employment as well as customary non-competition and non-solicitation covenants which will continue following the termination of his employment.
The above description of the employment agreement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the employment agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.46 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.46
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
AGREEMENT (the Agreement), dated as of January 1, 2012, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Jimmie L. Wade (the Employee).
The Company and the Employee agree as follows:
The term of the Employee's employment by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall commence on January 1, 2012 (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the first anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date and on each anniversary thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such automatic extension date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end on the day prior to such automatic extension date.
(a)
    
Duties and Responsibilities
.
As an employee, and in addition to the Employee's responsibilities as otherwise described in Section 1, the Employee will assist the Company with talent and leadership development, governmental affairs and community relations activities. The Employee agrees to devote such time as reasonably necessary to fulfill his obligations to the Company and its subsidiaries, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities). The Employee shall observe and conform to the applicable policies and directives promulgated from time to time by the Company and its Board of Directors that apply to Company employees. The Employee will not be considered an Executive Officer of the Company.
(b)
    
Other Activities.
Except as otherwise set forth in this Agreement, both the Company and the Employee recognize and acknowledge that this Agreement is not intended to prevent the Employee from engaging in other employment, occupation, consulting, or other business activity. It shall not be a violation of this Agreement for the Employee to engage in employment, occupation, consulting or other business activities provided such activities (i) do not significantly interfere with the performance of the Employee's duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement, (ii) are in compliance with the Company's policies and procedures in effect from time to time, including the
Code of Ethics & Business Conduct
and the 
Additional Guidance for Team Members
 relating thereto, and the
Guidelines on Significant Governance
Issues
, in each case as may be amended periodically and (iii) do not violate Section 18 of this Agreement.
(a)
Base Salary
.
During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay to the Employee a salary of $150,000 per annum, payable consistent with the Company's standard payroll practices then in effect (Base Salary).
(a)
Bonus
.
Subject to achievement of applicable Company results, the Employee shall be eligible to receive a payment under the Employee's 2011 Annual Bonus Plan in effect immediately preceding the effective date of this Agreement (2011 Bonus Payment). This 2011 Bonus Payment, if due, will be paid to the Employee at the time such bonus payments are made to other employees within the Company. To be eligible to receive this 2011 Bonus Payment, the Employee must still be employed by the Company on the date the bonus is paid. The Employee will not be eligible for any additional bonus payments related to his duties during the Employment Term.
(c)
    
Benefit Plans
.
During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans and programs of the Company that are generally available to officers of the Company. Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans and programs, as the same shall be amended from time to time. The Employee shall be entitled to four (4) weeks paid vacation annually.
(d)
    
Equity Awards.
During the Employment Term, the Employee shall be awarded an annual equity grant under the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2004 LTIP) comprised of restricted stock with at least an estimated value of $100,000 at the time of the equity grant.
(e)
    
Business Expenses
.
During the Employment Term, the Company shall, in accordance with policies then in effect with respect to payments of business expenses, pay or reimburse the Employee for all reasonable out-of-pocket travel and other expenses (other than ordinary commuting expenses) incurred by the Employee in performing services hereunder; provided, however, that, with respect to reimbursements, if any, not otherwise excludible from the Employee's gross income, to the extent required to comply with the provisions of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the Code), no reimbursement of expenses incurred by the Employee during any taxable year shall be made after the last day of the following taxable year, and the right to reimbursement of such expenses shall not be subject to liquidation or exchange for another benefit. All such expenses shall be accounted for in such reasonable detail as the Company may require.
(a)
    
Death
.
In the event of the death of the Employee during the Employment Term, the Employee's employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equal to $300,000, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Employee's death, to the Employee's designated beneficiary, or to the Employee's estate or other legal
2
representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of the Employee's death. In the event of the death of the Employee during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Employee pursuant to the Company's 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall vest immediately and the Stock Options or Stock Appreciation Rights (SARs) granted to the Employee pursuant to the Company's 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall become exercisable upon the date of the Employee's death for all such Stock Options and SARs if not then exercisable in full. The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans and programs in which the Employee was participating at the time of his death.
Except in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect, after the date of the Employee's death, the Employee shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
(b)
    
Disability
.
In the event of the Employee's Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Employee may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below). In such event, the Company shall pay the Employee an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Employee's Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within 45 days following the Employee's separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Employee or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Employee's behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(k)(ii)(B). In the event of the Disability of the Employee during the Employment Term, the shares of Restricted Stock granted to the Employee pursuant to the Company's 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall vest immediately upon the date of the Employee's Separation from Service and the Stock Options or SARs granted to the Employee pursuant to the Company's 2004 LTIP or any successor plan shall become exercisable upon the date of the Employee's Separation from Service for all such Stock Options and SARs if not then exercisable in full. The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans in which the Employee participates. The purpose and intent of the preceding two sentences is to ensure that the Employee receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period. Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Company's benefit programs and other plans then in effect, the Employee shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Employee's incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing the Employee's complete and full-time absence from the Employee's duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least 180 days within any 270-day period. Any determination of the Employee's Disability made in good faith by the Company shall be conclusive and binding on the Employee, unless within 10 days after written notice to the Employee of such determination, the Employee elects by written notice to the Company to challenge such determination, in which case the determination of Disability shall be made by arbitration pursuant to Paragraph 11 below. Except as provided in this Subsection 4(b), the Company shall not be required to provide the Employee
3
any compensation or benefits after the determination by the Company unless the arbitration results in a determination that the Employee is not disabled, in which case the Company shall pay to the Employee within 10 days after such arbitration decision all compensation due through the date of such arbitration decision. The Company shall not be deemed to have breached its obligations related to such compensation and benefits under this Agreement if it makes such payment within 10 days after such arbitration decision. The Disability Termination Date shall be the date on which the Company makes such determination of the Employee's Disability unless the arbitration, if any, results in a determination that the Employee is not disabled. The Employee shall have a legally binding right to the disability severance benefit as of the Disability Termination Date.
(c)
    
Termination by the Company for Due Cause
.
Nothing herein shall prevent the Company from terminating the Employee's employment at any time for Due Cause (as hereinafter defined). The Employee shall continue to receive the Base Salary provided for in this Agreement only through the period ending with the date of such termination. Any rights and benefits the Employee may have under employee benefit plans and programs of the Company shall be determined in accordance with the terms of such plans and programs. Except as provided in the two immediately preceding sentences, after termination of employment for Due Cause, the Employee shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
For purposes of this Agreement, Due Cause shall mean:
(i)
    
a material breach by the Employee of the Employee's duties and obligations under this Agreement or violation in any material respect of any code or standard of conduct generally applicable to the officers of the Company, including, but not limited to, the Company's Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, (1) which is willful and deliberate on the Employee's part, (2) which is not due to the Disability of the Employee (within the meaning of Subsection 4(b) but without regard to the requirement that it continue for more than six months or 180 days within a 270-day period), (3) which is committed in bad faith or without reasonable belief that such breach is in the best interests of the Company, and (4) which, if curable, has not been cured by the Employee within 15 business days after the Employee's receipt of notice to the Employee specifying the nature of such violations;
(ii)
    
a material violation by the Employee of the Employee's Loyalty Obligations as provided in Paragraph 18;
(iii)
    
conviction of
a crime of moral turpitude or a felony involving fraud, breach of trust, or misappropriation;
(iv)
    
the Employee's willfully engaging in bad faith conduct that is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Company, monetarily or otherwise; or
(v)
    
a determination by the Company that the Employee is in material violation of the Company's Substance Abuse Policy.
4
(d)
    
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, the Company may terminate the Employee's employment for any or no reason, as it may deem appropriate in its sole discretion and judgment;
provided
,
however
, that in the event such termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Employee shall (i) be entitled to a Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and (ii) be sent written notice by the Company stating the termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause. In the event of such termination by the Company, the Employee shall receive certain payments and benefits as set forth in this Subsection 4(d).
(i)
    
Termination Payment
.
If the Company terminates the Employee's employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term, the term Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to $300,000 (the Termination Salary Payment).
(ii)
    
Medical Coverage
.
In addition, the Company shall provide the Employee with medical, dental and vision insurance benefits (which may also cover, if applicable, the Employee's spouse and eligible dependents) for three hundred sixty-five (365) days from the date of the Employee's termination of employment or until such time as the Employee obtains other group health coverage, whichever occurs first. In order to trigger the Company's obligation to provide health care continuation benefits, the Employee must elect continuation coverage pursuant to the Consolidation Omnibus Budget Act of 1985, as amended (COBRA), upon such eligibility. The Company's obligation shall be satisfied solely through the payment of the Employee's COBRA premiums during the 365-day period, but only to the extent that such premiums exceed the amount that would otherwise have been payable by the Employee for coverage of the Employee and the Employee's eligible dependents that were covered by the Company's medical, dental, and vision insurance programs at the time of the Employee's termination of employment had the Employee continued to be employed by the Company.
(iii)
    
Timing of Payment
.
The Termination Salary Payment shall be paid in one lump sum payment within 45 days following the date of the Employee's Separation From Service, provided that the Employee executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(k)(ii)(B) below.
(iv)
    
Entire Obligation
.
Except as provided in Subsection 4(j) of this Agreement, following the Employee's termination of employment under this Subsection 4(d), the Employee will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20). Except for the Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Employee shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
    
5
(e)
    
Resignation from Employment by the Company for Good Reason
.
Termination by the Company without Due Cause under Subsection 4(d) shall be deemed to have occurred if the Employee elects to terminate the Employee's employment for Good Reason.
(i)
    
Good Reason.
For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason shall mean:
(A)
    
a material diminution in the Employee's Total Direct Compensation, which shall mean the value of the total of the Employee's Base Salary and annual equity award taken together;
(B) a material diminution in the Employee's authority, duties, or responsibilities;
(C)
    
a material diminution in the authority, duties, or responsibilities of the supervisor to whom the Employee is required to report;
(D) a material reduction in aggregate benefits available to the Employee if no similar reduction is made for all other senior Employees of the Company;
(E)
    
the Company's requiring the Employee to be based more than 60 miles from the Company's office in Roanoke, VA at which the Employee was principally employed immediately prior to the date of the relocation;
(F) delivery by the Company of a notice discontinuing the automatic extension of the Employment Term under this Agreement; or
(G)
    
any other action or inaction that constitutes a material breach by the Company of the terms of this Agreement.
(ii)
    
Notice of Good Reason Condition.
In order to be considered a resignation for Good Reason for purposes of this Agreement, the Employee must provide the Company with written notice and description of the existence of the Good Reason condition within 90 days of the initial discovery by the Employee of the existence of said Good Reason condition and the Company shall have 15 business days to cure such Good Reason condition. Notwithstanding the foregoing, this notice and cure provision shall not apply to the existence of Good Reason under Section 4(e)(i)(F) above.
(iii)
    
Effective Date of Resignation.
The effective date of the Employee's resignation for Good Reason must occur no longer than one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above. If Employee has not resigned for Good Reason effective within one year following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above the Employee shall be deemed to have waived said Good Reason condition.
6
(f)
    
Termination by the Company Other Than For Due Cause, Death or Disability or Resignation from Employment for Good Reason Within Twelve Months After a Change In Control
. If the Company terminates the Employee's employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control (as defined below), or if the Employee elects to terminate the Employee's employment for Good Reason prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, then (i) the Employee shall be entitled to a Change In Control Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and the Employee shall receive medical coverage benefits as defined in Subsection 4(d)(ii) above, and (ii) either the Company or the Employee, as the case may be, shall provide Notice of Termination pursuant to Subsection 4(k).
(i)
Change In Control Termination Payment
. The term Change In Control Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to $300,000 (the Change In Control Termination Salary Payment).
(ii)
Timing of Payment
.
The Change In Control Termination Salary Payment shall be paid in one lump sum payment within 45 days following the date of the Employee's Separation From Service, provided that the Employee executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(k)(ii)(B) below.
(iii)
    
Entire Obligation
.
Except as provided in Subsection 4(j) of this Agreement, following the Employee's termination of employment under this Subsection 4(f), the Employee will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20). Except for the Change In Control Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause or after termination by the Employee for Good Reason, the Employee shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
(iii)
Change In Control
.
For purposes of this Agreement, Change In Control shall have the same meaning as set forth in the 2004 LTIP, as in existence on the date hereof.
(g)
    
IRC 280G Net-Best
.
Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that (A) any payment, award, benefit or distribution (or any acceleration of any payment, award, benefit or distribution) by the Company (or any of its affiliated entities) or any entity which effectuates a Change in Control (or any of its affiliated entities) to or for the benefit of Employee (whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise) (the Payments) would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (the Excise Tax), and (B) the reduction of the amounts payable to Employee under this Agreement to the maximum amount that could be paid
7
to Employee without giving rise to the Excise Tax (the Safe Harbor Cap) would provide Employee with a greater after tax amount than if such amounts were not reduced, then the amounts payable to Employee under this Agreement shall be reduced (but not below zero) to the Safe Harbor Cap. If the reduction of the amounts payable hereunder would not result in a greater after tax result to Employee, no amounts payable under this Agreement shall be reduced pursuant to this provision.
(i)
    
Reduction of Payments
.
The reduction of the amounts payable hereunder, if applicable, shall be made by reducing first cash amounts payable under this Agreement (in contrast to benefit amounts), and applying any reduction to amounts payable in the following order: (A) first, any cash amounts payable to Employee as a Termination Payment or Change in Control Termination Payment under this Agreement, as applicable; (B) second, any amounts payable by Company on behalf of Employee under the terms of this Agreement for continued Medical Coverage; (C) third, any other cash amounts payable by Company to or on behalf of Employee under the terms of this Agreement: (D) fourth, outstanding performance-based equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax; and (E) finally, any time-vesting equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax.
    
(ii)
    
Determinations by Accounting Firm
.
All determinations required to be made under this Section 4(g) shall be made by the public accounting firm that is retained by the Company as of the date immediately prior to the Change in Control (the Accounting Firm) which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Company and Employee within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt of notice from the Company or Employee that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time as is requested by the Company. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event (A) the Board shall determine prior to the Change in Control that the Accounting Firm is precluded from performing such services under applicable auditor independence rules or (B) the Audit Committee of the Board determines that it does not want the Accounting Firm to perform such services because of auditor independence concerns or (C) the Accounting Firm is serving as accountant or auditor for the person(s) effecting the Change in Control, the Board shall appoint another nationally recognized public accounting firm to make the determinations required hereunder (which accounting firm shall then be referred to as the Accounting Firm hereunder). All fees, costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, the costs of retaining experts) of the Accounting Firm shall be borne by the Company. If Payments are reduced to the Safe Harbor Cap or the Accounting Firm determines that no Excise Tax is payable by Employee without a reduction in Payments, the Accounting Firm shall provide a written opinion to Employee to the effect that the Employee is not required to report any Excise Tax on the Employee's federal income tax return, and that the failure to report the Excise Tax, if any, on Employee's applicable federal income tax return will not result in the imposition of a negligence or similar penalty. The determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Company and Employee (except as provided in paragraph 4(g)(iii) below).
(iii)
    
Excess Payment/Underpayment
.
If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an Internal Revenue Service (the IRS) proceeding which
8
has been finally and conclusively resolved, that Payments have been made to, or provided for the benefit of, Employee, which are in excess of the limitations provided in this Section (referred to hereinafter as an Excess Payment), Employee shall repay the Excess Payment to the Company on demand, together with interest on the Excess Payment at the applicable federal rate (as defined in Section 1274(d) of the Code) from the date of Employee's receipt of such Excess Payment until the date of such repayment. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999 of the Code at the time of the determination, it is possible that Payments which will not have been made by the Company should have been made (an Underpayment), consistent with the calculations required to be made under this Section. In the event that it is determined (A) by the Accounting Firm, the Company (which shall include the position taken by the Company, or together with its consolidated group, on its federal income tax return) or the IRS or (B) pursuant to a determination by a court, that an Underpayment has occurred, the Company shall pay an amount equal to such Underpayment to Employee within ten (10) days of such determination together with interest on such amount at the applicable federal rate from the date such amount would have been paid to Employee until the date of payment. Employee shall cooperate, to the extent the Employee's reasonable expenses are reimbursed by the Company, with any reasonable requests by the Company in connection with any contests or disputes with the IRS in connection with the Excise Tax or the determination of the Excess Payment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that amounts payable under this Agreement were reduced pursuant to paragraph 4(g)(i) and the value of stock options is subsequently re-determined by the Accounting Firm (as defined below) within the context of Treasury Regulation 1.280G-1 Q/A 33 that reduces the value of the Payments attributable to such options, the Company shall promptly pay to Employee any amounts payable under this Agreement that were not previously paid solely as a result of paragraph 4(g)(i) up to the Safe Harbor Cap.
(h)
    
Voluntary Termination
.
In the event that the Employee terminates the Employee's employment at the Employee's own volition prior to the expiration of the Employment Term (except as provided in Subsection 4(e) above), such termination shall constitute a Voluntary Termination and in such event the Employee shall be limited to the same rights and benefits as provided in connection with a termination for Due Cause under Subsection 4(c) above.
(i)
    
Compliance With Code Section 409A
.
Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be interpreted and operated so that the payment of the benefits set forth herein either shall either be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A of the Code or shall comply with the requirements of such provision; provided however that in no event shall the Company be liable to the Employee for or with respect to any taxes, penalties or interest which may be imposed upon the Employee pursuant to Section 409A. To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(ii), (e) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Employee's Separation from Service, the Employee is a specified employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Employee earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Employee's Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death. The 409A
9
Payments under this Agreement that would otherwise be made during such period shall be aggregated and paid in one lump sum, without interest, on the first business day following the end of the six (6) month period or following the date of the Employee's death, whichever is earlier, and the balance of the 409A Payments, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the applicable payment schedule provided in this Section 4. The Employee hereby acknowledges that she has been advised to seek and has sought the advice of a tax advisor with respect to the tax consequences to the Employee of all payments pursuant to this Agreement, including any adverse tax consequences or penalty taxes under Code Section 409A and applicable State tax law. The Employee hereby agrees to bear the entire risk of any such adverse federal and State tax consequences and penalty taxes in the event any payment pursuant to this Agreement is deemed to be subject to Code Section 409A, and that no representations have been made to the Employee relating to the tax treatment of any payment pursuant to this Agreement under Code Section 409A and the corresponding provisions of any applicable State income tax laws.
(j)
    
Cooperation
.
During the term of the Employee's employment by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Employee's employment with the Company, the Employee agrees to be reasonably available to assist the Company and its representatives and agents with any business and/or litigation (or potential litigation) matters affecting or involving the Company. The Company will reimburse the Employee for all associated reasonable costs of travel.
(k)
    
Notice of Termination, Resignation and Release
.
Any termination (A) by the Company under Subsection 4(b) for Disability, Subsection 4(c) for Due Cause or Subsection 4(d) for Other than For Due Cause, Death or Disability, (B) by the Employee for Good Reason under Subsection 4(e) or as a Voluntary Termination under Subsection 4(h) or (C) by the Company or the Employee within twelve (12) months after a Change in Control under Subsection 4(f) shall, in each case, be communicated by Notice of Termination to the other party thereto given in accordance with Paragraph 10.
(i)
    
Notice of Termination
.
For purposes of this Agreement, a Notice of Termination means a written notice which (X) indicates the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, (Y) sets forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Employee's employment under the provision so indicated and (Z) if the termination date is other than the date of receipt of such Notice, specifies the termination date (which date shall not be prior to the date of such notice or more than 15 days after the giving of such Notice).
(ii)
    
Resignation and Release
.
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in order to be eligible to receive any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Employee's employment, in addition to fulfilling all other conditions precedent to such receipt, the Employee or the Employee's legal representative must:
(A) within 10 days after the termination date, resign as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company, if applicable, and as an officer, director, manager and employee of the Company and its Related Entities, and
10
(B) within 21 days after presentation of a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel, execute said release, on behalf of the Employee and the Employee's estate, heirs and representatives, releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Company's and such Related Entities' respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to the Employee's employment with the Company; termination of the Employee's employment; all matters alleged or which could have been alleged in a charge or complaint against the Company; any and all injuries, losses or damages to Employee, including any claims for attorney's fees; any and all claims relating to the conduct of any employee, servant, officer, director or agent of the Company; and any and all matters, transactions or things occurring prior to the date of said release, including any and all possible claims, known or unknown, which could have been asserted against the Company or the Company's employees, agents, servants, officers or directors. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the form of release shall except out therefrom, and acknowledge the Employee's continuing rights with respect to, the following: (i) all vested rights that the Employee may have under all welfare, retirement and other plans and programs of the Company in which the Employee was participating at the time of his employment termination, including all equity plans and programs of the Company with respect to which equity awards were made to the Employee, (ii) all continuing rights that the Employee may have under this Agreement, and (iii) all rights that the Employee may have following the termination of his employment under the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, any applicable Company insurance and any indemnity agreements to which the Employee is a party which provide for indemnification, insurance or other, similar coverage for the Employee with respect to his actions or inactions as an officer, employee and/or member of the Board. Employee may, within five business days of receipt from the Company of the form of release, provide comments to the Company regarding material provisions of the form of release, which the Company in good faith will consider. For clarification, unless and until the Employee executes the release, the Company shall have no obligation to make any Termination Payment to the Employee, and, even if the Employee does not execute the release, the Employee shall be bound by the post-termination provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation Section 18.
(l)
    
Earned and Accrued Payments
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, upon the termination of the Employee's employment at any time, for any reason, the Employee shall be paid all amounts that had already been earned and accrued as of the time of termination, including but not limited to (i) pay for unused vacation accrued in accordance with the Company's vacation policy and (ii) reimbursement for any business expenses accrued in accordance with Subsection 3(e).
11
(m)
    
Employment at Will.
The Employee hereby agrees that the Company may terminate the Employee's employment under this Paragraph 4 without regard to: (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of the Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to the Employee, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to the Employee's relationship with the Company; or (iii) without a determination of Due Cause by the Company.
5.
    
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
. In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Restricted Stock or any Other Stock Unit Awards granted to the Employee shall lapse and such Restricted Stock or Other Stock Unit Awards shall become fully vested and transferable to the full extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred; and any Stock Options or SARs granted to the Employee that are outstanding as of the date of such Change In Control shall become fully exercisable and vested to the extent of the original grant as of the date such Change In Control is determined to have occurred.
6.
    
Successors and Assigns
.
(a)
Assignment by the Company
.
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company or any corporation or other entity to which the Company may transfer all or substantially all of its assets and business and to which the Company may assign this Agreement, in which case the term Company, as used herein, shall mean such corporation or other entity, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the Company from any obligations hereunder, whether arising prior to or after such assignment.
(b)
Assignment by the Employee
.
The Employee may not assign this Agreement or any part hereof without the prior written consent of the Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall preclude the Employee from designating one or more beneficiaries to receive any amount that may be payable following occurrence of the Employee's legal incompetency or Death and shall not preclude the legal representative of the Employee's estate from assigning any right hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto under the Employee's will or, in the case of intestacy, to the person or persons entitled thereto under the laws of intestacy applicable to the Employee's estate. The term beneficiaries, as used in this Agreement, shall mean a beneficiary or beneficiaries so designated to receive any such amount or, if no beneficiary has been so designated, the legal representative of the Employee (in the event of the Employee's incompetency) or the Employee's estate.
7.
    
Governing Law
.
This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
8.
    
Entire Agreement
.
This Agreement, which shall include the Exhibits hereto, contains all of the understandings and representations between the parties hereto pertaining to the matters referred to herein, and supersedes all undertakings and agreements, whether oral or in writing, previously entered into by them with respect thereto, including any previous employment, severance and/or non-competition agreements. This Agreement may only be modified by an instrument in writing.
12
9.
    
Waiver of Breach
.
The waiver by any party of a breach of any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall not operate or be construed to be a waiver of a similar or dissimilar provision or condition at the same or any prior or subsequent time.
10.
    
Notices
.
Any notice to be given hereunder shall be in writing and delivered personally, or sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such other address as such party may subsequently give notice of hereunder in writing:
If to the Company
:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: General Counsel
With a copy to:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: Chief Employee Officer
If to the Employee:
Jimmie L. Wade
11.
    
Arbitration
.
Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or any breach thereof, excepting only the enforcement of any Loyalty Obligations arising under Paragraph 18 of this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association then in effect in the Commonwealth of Virginia and judgment upon such award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. The board of arbitrators shall consist of one arbitrator to be appointed by the Company, one by the Employee, and one by the two arbitrators so chosen. The arbitration shall be held at such place as may be agreed upon at the time by the parties to the arbitration. The cost of arbitration shall be borne as determined by the arbitrators.
12.
    
Withholding
.
Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments required to be made by the Company hereunder to the Employee or the Employee's estate or beneficiaries shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts relating to taxes as the Company may reasonably determine it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation. In lieu of withholding such amounts, in whole or in part, the Company may, in its sole discretion, accept other provisions for payment of taxes and withholdings as required by law, provided it is satisfied that all requirements of law affecting its responsibilities to withhold have been satisfied.
13
13.
    
Severability
.
In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
14.
    
Titles
.
Titles to the paragraphs and subsections in this Agreement are intended solely for convenience and no provision of this Agreement is to be construed by reference to the title of any paragraph or subsection.
15.
    
Counterparts
. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
16.
    
Amendment
. Except as provided in Paragraph 13 above, this Agreement may not be modified or amended except by written instrument signed by all parties hereto.
17.
    
Counsel
.
The Employee has reviewed the contents of this Agreement and fully understands its terms. The Employee acknowledges that the Employee is fully aware of the Employee's right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company. The Employee further acknowledges that the Company has not made representations or given any advice with respect to the tax or other consequences of this Agreement or any transactions contemplated by this Agreement to him, that the Employee has been advised of the importance of seeking independent counsel with respect to such consequences, and that the Employee has obtained independent counsel with respect to such consequences. By executing this Agreement, the Employee represents that the Employee has, after being advised of the potential conflicts between him and the Company with respect to the future consequences of this Agreement, either consulted independent legal counsel or elected, notwithstanding the advisability of seeking such independent legal counsel, not to consult with such independent legal counsel.
18.
    
Loyalty Obligations
.
The Employee agrees that the following obligations (Loyalty Obligations) shall apply in consideration of the Employee's employment by or continued employment with the Company:
    
    
(a)
    
Confidential Information
.
(i)
    
Company Information
. The Employee agrees at all times during the term of the Employee's employment and thereafter, to hold any Confidential Information of the Company or its Related Entities in strictest confidence, and not to use (except for the benefit of the Company to fulfill the Employee's employment obligations) or to disclose to any person, firm or corporation other than the Company or those designated by it said Confidential Information without the prior authorization of the Company, except as may otherwise be required by law or legal process. The Employee agrees that Confidential Information means any proprietary information prepared or maintained in any format, including technical data, trade secrets or know-how in which the Company or Related Entities have an interest, including, but not limited to, business records, contracts, research, product or service plans, products, services, customer lists and customers (including, but not limited to, vendors to the Company or Related Entities on whom the Employee called, with whom the Employee dealt or with whom the Employee
14
became acquainted during the term of the Employee's employment), pricing data, costs, markets, expansion plans, summaries, marketing and other business strategies, software, developments, inventions, processes, formulas, technology, designs, drawings, engineering, hardware configuration or marketing, financial or other business information obtained by the Employee or disclosed to the Employee by the Company or Related Entities or any other person or entity during the term of the Employee's employment with the Company either directly or indirectly electronically, in writing, orally, by drawings, by observation of services, systems or other aspects of the business of the Company or Related Entities or otherwise. Confidential Information does not include information that: (A) was available to the public prior to the time of disclosure, whether through press releases, SEC filings or otherwise; or (B) otherwise becomes available to the public through no act or omission of the Employee.
(ii)
    
Third Party Information
. The Employee recognizes that the Company and Related Entities have received and in the future will receive from third parties their confidential or proprietary information subject to a duty on the part of the Company or Related Entities to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to use it only for certain limited purposes. The Employee agrees at all times during the Employee's employment and thereafter to hold all such confidential or proprietary information in the strictest confidence and not to disclose it to any person, firm or corporation or to use it except as necessary in carrying out the Employee's work for the Company consistent with the obligations of the Company or Related Entities with such third party.
(b)
    
Returning Company Property
. The Employee agrees that any and all devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items developed by the Employee or others pursuant to or during the Employee's employment with the Company or otherwise shall be the property of the Company or its Related Entities and their respective successors or assigns. At the time of leaving the employ of the Company, the Employee will deliver all material Company property to the Company or to the Company's designee and will not keep in the Employee's possession, recreate or deliver said property to anyone else. In the event of the termination of the Employee's employment and upon request by the Company, the Employee agrees to sign and deliver the Termination Certification attached hereto as
Exhibit A
.
(c)
    
Notification of New Employer
. In the event that the Employee leaves the employ of the Company and becomes employed by a Restricted Company, the Employee hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to the Employee's new employer (whether the Employee is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, Employee or manager) about the Employee's obligations under this Agreement.
(d)
    
Non-Interference
. The Employee covenants and agrees that while the Employee is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Employee's employment with the Company for any reason, the Employee shall not, without the prior written approval of the Company, directly or indirectly, either on
15
behalf of the Employee or any other person or entity, Interfere with the Company or any of its Related Entities.
(i)
    
For purposes of this Agreement, Interfere shall mean, except in the performance of the Employee's duties and responsibilities on behalf of and for the benefit of the Company, to solicit, entice, persuade, induce, influence or attempt to influence, directly or indirectly, customers or prospective customers, suppliers or prospective suppliers, employees, agents or independent contractors of the Company or any of its Related Entities to restrict, reduce, sever or otherwise alter their relationship with the Company or any of its Related Entities.
(ii)
    
After termination of the Employee's employment, this provision shall only apply to those employees, independent contractors, customers or suppliers of the Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to the date of such termination.
 
(e)
    
Covenants Not to Compete
(i)
    
Non-Competition
. The Employee covenants and agrees that during the period from the date hereof until, one (1) year immediately following the termination, for any reason, of the Employee's employment with the Company (the Non-Compete Period), the Employee will not, directly or indirectly:
(A)
    
own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 5% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder, any equity or other interest of a Restricted Company; or
(B)
    
engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, partner, independent contractor, service provider, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) with any Restricted Company without the prior written disclosure by Employee and the written consent of the Company as provided in Section 18(e)(iii) below.
(ii)
    
Restricted Companies
.
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Companies means Autozone, Inc., O'Reilly Automotive, Inc., Pep Boys, Genuine Parts Company and/or NAPA Auto Parts, Uni-select, Inc. and members of the Uni-select Network, CARQUEST Auto Parts, Fisher Auto Parts and Parts Depot, Inc. and any successor, affiliate or subsidiary of any of the foregoing.
(iii)
    
Association with Restricted Company
.
In the event that the Employee intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, Employee or director) with any Restricted Company during the Non-Compete Period, the Employee must provide information in writing to the
16
Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by the Employee for such Restricted Company. All such current associations are set forth on
Exhibit B
to this Agreement. In the event that the Company consents in writing to the Employee's engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by the Employee shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of this Subsection 18(e). Such consent is not intended and shall not be deemed to be a waiver or nullification of the covenant of non-competition of the Employee or other similarly bound Employees.
(f)
    
Non-Disparagement
. The Employee agrees that while the Employee is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year following the termination of the Employee's employment with the Company for any reason, the Employee will not take any action or make any statement which disparages the Company or its practices or which disrupts or impairs its normal operations, such that it causes a material adverse impact to the Company.
(g)
    
Effect of Non-Payment of Benefits; Clawback
.
The Employee's post-termination of employment obligations under this Paragraph 18 shall cease upon the Company's failure to make any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Employee's employment when due if within 15 days after written notice of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment. In the event that the Employee materially violates Subsection 18(d), 18(e), or 18(f), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Employee agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Employee shall repay to the Company a portion of $750,000 equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the applicable period under Subsection 18(d), 18(e), or 18(f), and the denominator of which is the total number of days in the applicable period under such Section. In the event that the Employee materially violates Subsection 18(a) or 18(b), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five days after written notice of such failure, the Employee agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Employee shall repay to the Company a portion of $750,000 equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the one (1) year period immediately following the termination and the denominator of which is 365. The Employee further agrees that such repayment obligation shall constitute liquidated damages and that the Company shall have no other right to damages under this Agreement or at law with respect to breaches of Subsection 18(a), 18(b), 18(d), 18(e), or 18(f), but the Company shall have the right to seek equitable relief pursuant to Subsection 18(h) hereunder.
(h)
    
Specific Enforcement; Remedies Cumulative; Attorney Fees
. The Employee acknowledges that the Company and Related Entities, as the case may be, may be irreparably injured if the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(d), 18(e) and 18(f) hereof are not specifically enforced and the Employee agrees that the terms of such provisions (including without limitation the periods set forth in Subsections 18(d), 18(e) and 18(f)) are reasonable and appropriate. If the Employee commits, or the Company has evidence based on which it reasonably believes the Employee threatens to commit, a material breach of any of the provisions
17
of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(d), 18(e) or 18(f) hereof,
the Company and/or Related Entities, as the case may be, shall have the right and remedy, in addition to and not in limitation of any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, to have the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(d), 18(e) or 18(f) hereof specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction through immediate injunctive and other equitable relief
, it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach will cause irreparable injury to the Company and/or Related Entities and that money damages will not provide an adequate remedy therefore. Such injunction shall be available without the posting of any bond or other security, and the Employee hereby consents to the issuance of such injunction.
(i)
    
Re-Set of Period for Non-Competition and Non-Interference
.
In the event that a legal or equitable action is commenced with respect to any of the provisions of Subsections 18(d), 18(e) or 18(f) hereof and the Employee has not complied, in all material respects, with the provisions in such subsections with respect to which such action has been commenced, then the one-year period, as described in such subsections not so complied with by the Employee, shall be extended from its original expiration date, day-for-day, for each day that the Employee is found to have not complied, in all material respects, with such subsections.
(j)
    
Jurisdiction and Venue.
WITH RESPECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY AND ALL LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS ARISING UNDER PARAGRAPH 18, THE SUBSECTIONS 18(j) AND 18(k) OF THIS AGREEMENT SHALL APPLY. THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY CONSENT TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE FOLLOWING COURTS IN MATTERS RELATED TO THIS PARAGRAPH 18 AND AGREE NOT TO COMMENCE ANY SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING THERETO EXCEPT IN ANY OF SUCH COURTS: THE STATE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE CITY OF ROANOKE, VIRGINIA, OR THE STATE COURTS OR THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN ANY MUNICIPALITY WHEREIN AN OFFICE OF THE COMPANY IS LOCATED AND IN WHICH OFFICE THE EMPLOYEE WAS TEMPORARILY OR PERMANENTLY ASSIGNED AS HIS PRINCIPAL WORKPLACE LOCATION, WHILE RENDERING SERVICES FOR THE COMPANY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING OR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE TERMINATION OF EMPLOYEE'S EMPLOYMENT, IF TERMINATED.
(k)
    
Waiver of Jury Trial.
EMPLOYEE AGREES TO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BASED UPON, OR RELATED TO, ANY LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS. THIS WAIVER IS KNOWINGLY, INTENTIONALLY, AND VOLUNTARILY MADE BY EMPLOYEE, AND EMPLOYEE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT, EXCEPT FOR THE COMPANY'S AGREEMENT TO LIKEWISE WAIVE ITS RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY (WHICH THE COMPANY HEREBY MAKES), THE COMPANY HAS NOT MADE ANY REPRESENTATIONS OF FACTS TO INDUCE THIS WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY OR IN ANY WAY TO MODIFY OR NULLIFY ITS EFFECT. EMPLOYEE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEE HAS BEEN REPRESENTED (OR HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO BE REPRESENTED) IN THE
18
SIGNING OF THIS AGREEMENT AND IN THE MAKING OF THIS WAIVER BY INDEPENDENT LEGAL COUNSEL, SELECTED OF EMPLOYEE'S OWN FREE WILL, AND THAT EMPLOYEE HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS THIS WAIVER WITH COUNSEL. EMPLOYEE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EMPLOYEE HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE MEANING AND RAMIFICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER AND AS EVIDENCE OF THIS FACT SIGNS THIS AGREEMENT BELOW.
19.
    
Adherence to Company Policies
.
The Employee agrees to adhere diligently to all established Company policies and procedures, including but not limited to the Company's Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and, if applicable, the Code of Ethics for Financial Professionals. The Employee agrees that if the Employee does not adhere to any of the provisions of such Guidelines and Codes, the Employee will be in breach of the provisions hereof.
20.
    
Representations
. The Employee agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement. The Employee represents that Employee's performance of all the terms of this Agreement will not breach any agreement to keep in confidence proprietary information acquired by the Employee in confidence or in trust prior to the Employee's employment by the Company. The Employee has not entered into, and the Employee agrees the Employee will not enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith and the Employee's employment by the Company and the Employee's services to the Company will not violate the terms of any oral or written agreement to which the Employee is a party.
21.
    
Binding Effect of Execution
. The Company and the Employee agree that this Agreement shall not bind or be enforceable by or against either party until this Agreement has been duly executed by both the Employee and the Company.
    
19
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and the Employee have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
20
EXHIBIT A
TERMINATION CERTIFICATION
This is to certify that I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return, any material devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items belonging to the Company.
I further certify that I have, to the best of my knowledge, complied in all material respects with all the terms of my Employment Agreement with the Company.
                        
EXHIBIT B
LIST OF ASSOCIATIONS WITH RESTRICTED COMPANIES
____ None
____ Additional Sheets Attached
Signature of the Employee:_________________________________
Print Name of the Employee:________________________________
Date:
                


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120216084031.txt.gz
TIME:20120216084031
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported) February 16, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On February 16, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 31, 2011. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 99.1
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER FISCAL 2011
DILUTED EPS INCREASE OF 57.9% TO $0.90 AND RECORD ANNUAL
FREE CASH FLOW OF $507 MILLION
ROANOKE, Va, February 16, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for its fourth quarter and fiscal year ended December 31, 2011.
Fourth quarter comparable earnings per diluted share (EPS) were $0.90 which was a 57.9% increase over the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. For fiscal 2011, EPS increased 29.4% to $5.11 on top of a 31.7% increase in EPS during fiscal 2010.
I would like to thank our 52,000 Team Members for their hard work and congratulate them on their outstanding performance in the fourth quarter and for the 2011 fiscal year. Our team's conviction and commitment helped build momentum throughout the year, which resulted in a very strong finish to another great year, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  Once again, our team reached many record strategic and financial milestones in 2011 including sales of over $6 billion, continued improvement in customer satisfaction, and record profitability, free cash flow and returns on invested capital.  Based on our Team's focus on execution combined with strong industry fundamentals, we expect 2012 will be another successful year.
Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2011 Highlights
Total sales for the fourth quarter increased 4.5% to $1.33 billion, compared with total sales of $1.27 billion during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. The 4.5% sales increase reflects the net addition of 99 new stores during the past 12 months and a comparable store sales gain of 2.9% compared to an 8.9% comparable store sales gain during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. Fiscal 2011 comparable store sales increased 2.2% on top of an 8.0% increase in fiscal 2010.
The Company's gross profit rate was 49.0% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 49.4% during the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. The 39 basis-point decline in the gross profit rate was driven by increased supply chain expenses due to investments in hub stores and increased shrink expense. For fiscal 2011, the Company's gross profit rate was 49.7%, or a 24 basis-point decline from fiscal 2010.
    
The Company's SG&A rate was 40.6% of sales during the fourth quarter as compared to 42.8% during the same period in fiscal 2010. This 221 basis-point decrease was driven by productivity improvements from the Company's variable customer-driven labor model which includes the anniversary of investment rollout expenses, reduced incentive compensation as a result of the Company's lower comparable sales growth versus the fourth quarter of 2010, occupancy cost leverage and a significant decrease in overall administrative costs. The expense reductions were partially offset by continued strategic
2
investments in support of the Company's Service Leadership and Superior Availability strategies. For fiscal 2011, the Company's SG&A rate decreased 114 basis points to 39.0% versus 40.1% in fiscal 2010.
The Company's operating income increased 33.3% during the fourth quarter to $111.9 million as compared to the fourth quarter of fiscal 2010. The Company's operating income rate increased 182 basis points to 8.4% of sales. For the year, the Company's operating income rate increased 90 basis points to 10.8% as compared to fiscal 2010.
During fiscal 2011, the Company generated $828.8 million in operating cash flow and a record $507.2 million of free cash flow. Free cash flow was driven by a significant decrease in inventory, net of payables, and strong growth in net income, partially offset by an increase in capital expenditures. Capital expenditures were $268.1 million for fiscal 2011 as compared to $199.6 million in fiscal 2010.
As a direct result of our Team's ability to respond, adapt and provide outstanding service, our operating income rate increased to a record 10.8% of sales in fiscal 2011 and our diluted EPS increased 29.4% on top of a 31.7% EPS increase in 2010, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer.
3
Store Information
During the fourth quarter, the Company opened 19 stores, closed one Advance store and one Autopart International store. For fiscal 2011, the Company opened 104 stores, including 9 Autopart International stores, and closed 4 Advance stores and one Autopart International store. As of December 31, 2011, the Company's total store count was 3,662 including 202 Autopart International stores.
Share Repurchases
During fiscal 2011, the Company repurchased 9.9 million shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of $609.7 million, or an average price of $61.51 per share. At the end of the fourth quarter, the Company had $200.0 million remaining under the $300.0 million share repurchase authorization approved by the Board of Directors in August 2011.
2012 Annual Financial Outlook
The Company has provided the following annual financial outlook and certain key assumptions for fiscal 2012.
Fiscal 2012 Annual Financial Outlook Key Assumptions
4
In fiscal 2012, the Company anticipates low to mid-single digit increase in comparable store sales driven by continued strong Commercial sales growth. The Company expects a modest increase in gross profit rate. The Company expects its rate of growth in SG&A dollars per store to increase low-single digits. The Company estimates an EPS range of approximately $5.55 to $5.75 for fiscal 2012, which assumes an average diluted share count of approximately 74 million shares.
We believe 2012 will be another strong year based on the solid industry fundamentals, previous strategic and capability investments coupled with improving service levels. As a result, our Company is positioned to grow our comp store sales, expand our operating income rate and generate double-digit EPS growth for our fifth consecutive year, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Our pursuit of increased growth and profitability requires a relentless focus on service, operational excellence and continued investments in the areas of Service Leadership and Superior Availability as we progress towards our goal of a 12% operating income.
Dividend
On February 13, 2012, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on April 6, 2012 to stockholders of record as March 23, 2012.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, February 16, 2012 at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Standard Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until February 16, 2013.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of December
5
31, 2011, the Company operated 3,662 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts and accessories can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, acts of terrorism, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended January 1, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
6
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120517084923.txt.gz
TIME:20120517084923
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
May 17, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
May 17, 2012
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its first quarter ended
April 21, 2012
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FIRST QUARTER FISCAL 2012 DILUTED EPS INCREASE OF
32.6%
TO
$1.79
ROANOKE, Va,
May 17, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the first fiscal quarter ended
April 21, 2012
. First quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were
$1.79
which was a
32.6%
increase over the first quarter last year.
We are pleased with our overall performance during our first quarter despite a meaningful slowdown in our sales trends in the month of April. Our commitment to lead in Service, while adapting our costs to the current business environment allowed us to generate a solid comp store sales performance and a 21% growth in our operating income, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  Our second quarter sales trends remain challenging despite the positive long-term industry fundamentals. We remain committed to executing our key priorities while making adjustments to these short term sales trends.
First Quarter Highlights
Total sales for the
first quarter
increased
3.1%
to
$2.0 billion
, compared with total sales of
$1.9 billion
during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2011. The sales increase reflected a comparable store sales gain of
2.1%
compared to a
1.4%
comparable store sales gain during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2011 and the net addition of
82
new stores during the past 12 months. The Company's gross profit rate was
50.1%
of sales during the
first quarter
as compared to
50.5%
during the
first quarter
last year. The
38
basis-point decrease in gross profit rate was primarily due to a slower pace of inventory growth which drove higher supply chain costs, partially offset by improvements in supply chain labor and transportation costs. The Company's SG&A rate was
38.6%
of sales during the
first quarter
as compared to
40.7%
during the same period last year. The
205
basis point decrease was primarily due to actions the Company took last year to increase the productivity of the Company's store labor, a planned shift in expenses from the first quarter to the second quarter and continued actions to reduce overall administrative support costs.
The Company's operating income during the
first quarter
of
$224.6 million
increased
20.7%
versus the
first quarter
of fiscal 2011. On a rate basis, operating income was
11.5%
of total sales as compared to
9.8%
during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2011.
Operating cash flow for the quarter decreased
13.6%
to
$235.4 million
from
$272.5 million
in the
first quarter
of 2011. Free cash flow for the quarter was
$153.1 million
versus
$152.9 million
during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2011. Capital expenditures were
$82.5 million
for the quarter as compared to
$88.9 million
during the
first quarter
of 2011.
We are pleased with our business performance that drove improvement in our operating income rate which was 11.5% in our first quarter, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Due to our slow start to the second quarter we anticipate our business results will be constrained during our second quarter. As a result, we now anticipate our annual comp store sales will be in the low single digits for 2012 and are maintaining our previously communicated 2012 EPS outlook of $5.55 to $5.75 per share.
 
2
 
Store Information
    
During the
first quarter
, the Company opened
25
stores, including
three
Autopart International stores, and closed five Autopart International stores. As of
April 21, 2012
, the Company's total store count was
3,682
including
200
Autopart International stores.
Share Repurchase Authorization
On May 14, 2012, the Company's Board of Directors authorized a $500 million share repurchase program. This new authorization replaces the Company's $300 million share repurchase program authorized in August 2011, which had $200 million remaining.
Dividend
On May 14, 2012, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on July 6, 2012 to stockholders of record as of June 22, 2012.
Annual Stockholders' Meeting Announcements
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 15, 2012. During the meeting, the following individuals were elected to serve on the Company's Board of Directors for the next year: John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Frances X. Frei, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray, Carlos A. Saladrigas and Jimmie L. Wade.
3
The Company's stockholders voted to approve the compensation of the Company's named executive officers, reapproved the performance objectives contained in the company's 2007 Executive Initiative Plan, reapproved the performance objectives contained in the company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan and approved the amended and restated 2002 Employee Stock purchase plan. The stockholders ratified the appointment by the Company's Audit Committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as its independent registered public accounting firm for 2012. A majority of stockholders also voted in favor of an advisory stockholder proposal on stockholder voting requirements.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday,
May 17, 2012
at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until May 17, 2013.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of
April 21, 2012
, the Company operated
3,682
stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2011. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
4
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120518140545.txt.gz
TIME:20120518140545
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
May 15, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
At the 2012 annual meeting of stockholders of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) held May 15, 2012, the Company's stockholders re-elected John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Frances X. Frei, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray, Carlos A. Saladrigas and Jimmie L. Wade to serve as members of the Company's Board of Directors (Board) until the 2013 annual meeting of stockholders.
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
There were 4,341,906 broker non-votes recorded for each nominee.
The compensation of the named executive officers was approved by the following non-binding advisory vote:
                            
The re-approval of performance objectives contained in the Company's 2007 Executive Incentive Plan was approved by the following vote:
The re-approval of performance objectives contained in the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan was approved by the following vote:
The approval of the Company's Amended and Restated 2002 Employee Stock Purchase Plan was approved by the following vote:
Stockholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte and Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for 2012. The vote on the proposal was as follows:
The advisory stockholder proposal regarding stockholder voting requirements was approved by the following non-binding advisory vote:
                            
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20120809084002.txt.gz
TIME:20120809084002
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
August 9, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
August 9, 2012
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its
second quarter
ended
July 14, 2012
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS SECOND QUARTER FISCAL 2012 RESULTS
ROANOKE, Va,
August 9, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the second fiscal quarter ended
July 14, 2012
. Second quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were
$1.34
which was an
8.2%
decrease versus the second quarter last year. Year-to-date, EPS was
$3.14
which was an increase of
12.5%
over the same period last year.
As we anticipated, our second quarter faced weak consumer demand in both DIY and Commercial which resulted in our performance coming in at the low end of our outlook. The most significant slowdown was within our cold weather markets, principally in the Northeast and Great Lakes regions of the U.S., said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  We remain encouraged by our positive comp store sales growth during the last period of our quarter, as well as the long-term fundamentals of our industry. As we look to the balance of the year we continue to focus on growing Commercial and competing more effectively through investments in areas such as Hub and inventory upgrades, our Commercial Sales Force and the launch of the new Advance Commercial Credit program.
Fiscal Second Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
Total sales for the
second quarter
decreased
1.3%
to
$1.46 billion
, compared with total sales of
$1.48 billion
during the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011. The sales decrease reflected a comparable store sales decrease of
2.7%
versus a comparable store sales increase of
2.5%
during the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011, partially offset by the net addition of
65
new stores during the past 12 months. Year-to-date, total sales increased
1.2%
to
$3.42 billion
, compared with total sales of
$3.38 billion
over the same period last year.
The Company's gross profit rate was
49.9%
of sales during the
second quarter
as compared to
49.7%
during the
second quarter
last year. The
16
basis-point increase in gross profit rate was primarily due to improved store shrink and lower supply chain costs, partially offset by increased promotional activity. Year-to-date, the Company's gross profit rate was
50.0%
, a
14
basis-point decrease over the same period in fiscal 2011.
The Company's SG&A rate was
38.3%
of sales during the
second quarter
as compared to
37.0%
during the same period last year. The
135
basis-point increase was primarily due to expense deleverage as a result of the Company's lower sales volume and a planned shift in expenses that occurred during the second quarter versus the first quarter. Year-to-date, the Company's SG&A rate was
38.5%
versus
39.1%
during the same period last year.
The Company's operating income during the
second quarter
of
$169.2 million
decreased
10.4%
versus the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011. On a rate basis, operating income was
11.6%
of total sales as compared to
12.8%
during the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011.
Operating cash flow decreased
12.4%
to
$411.4 million
from
$469.6 million
through the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011. Free cash flow was
$265.4 million
versus
$287.3 million
through the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011. Capital expenditures were
$146.3 million
as compared to
$151.6 million
through the
second quarter
of fiscal 2011.
While we are not satisfied with our second quarter performance, resulting from weaker consumer demand, we remain committed to our strategic investments in commercial and availability as they are foundational to our future growth, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Given the continued softness in our business trends, we believe it's prudent to be cautious in our outlook for both sales and profitability for the balance of the year. As a result, we now anticipate our fiscal 2012 comparable store sales to be flat to slightly down and our EPS to be in the range $5.25 to $5.35 per share.
 
2
Store Information
    
During the
second quarter
, the Company opened
10
stores, including
three
Autopart International stores. Year-to-date, the Company opened
35
stores, including
six
Autopart International stores. As of
July 14, 2012
, the Company's total store count was
3,692
including
203
Autopart International stores. The Company remains on pace to open approximately 120 to 140 stores in fiscal 2012.
Dividend
On August 7, 2012, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of $0.06 per share to be paid on October 5, 2012 to stockholders of record as of September 21, 2012.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday,
August 9, 2012
at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until August 9, 2013.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of
July 14, 2012
, the Company operated
3,692
stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin
3
Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###
4
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared balance sheets filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP, for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously prepared statements of cash flows filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
Note: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121012165854.txt.gz
TIME:20121012165854
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
October 8, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
On October 8, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) and Darren R. Jackson, the Company's President and Chief Executive Officer, entered into a Fifth Amendment to the Employment Agreement between the Company and Mr. Jackson dated as of January 7, 2008 (Fifth Amendment). The Fifth Amendment will become effective as of January 7, 2013, and will continue for an initial one-year term, which will be automatically renewable for additional one-year terms unless either party provides notice of non-renewal at least 90 days prior to the end of the then effective term.
The Fifth Amendment amends the Employment Agreement to provide that any incentive compensation granted to Mr. Jackson by the Company be subject to the Company's Incentive Compensation Clawback Policy as adopted by the Company's Board of Directors or Compensation Committee from time to time. The Fifth Amendment also provides that the Company shall reduce the payments to be made to Mr. Jackson in connection with a Change in Control to the maximum amount that could be paid to Mr. Jackson without giving rise to an excise tax if the aggregate after-tax amount payable to Mr. Jackson would be greater after giving effect to such reduction. The Fifth Amendment also eliminates (i) the tax gross-up payment intended to make Mr. Jackson whole for excise taxes that may be imposed on the Change in Control payments that was previously included in the Employment Agreement and (ii) the obligation to accelerate vesting of equity awards upon Change in Control and provides that the vesting of equity compensation in the event of Change in Control will be governed by the terms of the applicable award agreement or grant.  The Fifth Amendment also contains a technical amendment related to Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code. 
The foregoing description of the Fifth Amendment is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the First Amendment, which is filed as Exhibit 10.35 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.35
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
Fifth Amendment
FIFTH AMENDMENT, dated as of October 8, 2012 (Fifth Amendment) to the EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, dated as of January 7, 2008, and previously amended as of June 4, 2008, January 1, 2010, September 1, 2010, and January 7, 2011 between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Darren R. Jackson (the Executive) (the Agreement).
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
1.
    
Amendment of Section 1 of the Agreement
. Effective January 7, 2013, Section 1 of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the second paragraph thereof to read as follows:
The term of Executive's employment by the Company pursuant to this Fifth Amendment to the Agreement shall commence on January 7, 2013 (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the first anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date (Anniversary Date) the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to the Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end on the day prior to the Anniversary Date; and on each Anniversary Date thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end 90 days following such notice.
2.
    
Amendment of Section 3 of the Agreement
. Effective January 7, 2013, Section 3 of the Agreement is hereby amended by redesignating the current Subsection 3(e) as 3(d) and the current Subsection 3(f) as 3(e) and by inserting a new Subsection 3(c), which shall read its entirety as follows:
(c)
Incentive Compensation Clawback
.
    
Any compensation provided by the Company to the Executive, excepting only compensation pursuant to Section 3(a) above, shall be subject to the Company's Incentive Compensation Clawback Policy as such policy shall be adopted, and from time to time amended, by the Board or the Compensation Committee.
3.
    
Amendment of Section 4(f)(v) of the Agreement
. Effective January 7, 2013, Section 4(f)(v) of the Agreement is hereby amended by amending the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
2
(v)
    
IRC 280G Net-Best
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that (A) any payment, award, benefit or distribution (or any acceleration of any payment, award, benefit or distribution) by the Company (or any of its affiliated entities) or any entity which effectuates a Change in Control (or any of its affiliated entities) to or for the benefit of Executive (whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise) (the Payments) would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (the Excise Tax), and (B) the reduction of the amounts payable to Executive to the maximum amount that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to the Excise Tax (the Safe Harbor Cap) would provide Executive with a greater after tax amount than if such amounts were not reduced, then the amounts payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below zero) to the Safe Harbor Cap. If the reduction of the amounts payable would not result in a greater after tax result to Executive, no amounts payable under this Agreement shall be reduced pursuant to this provision.
(A)
Reduction of Payments
. The reduction of the amounts payable hereunder, if applicable, shall be made by reducing first cash amounts payable under this Agreement (in contrast to benefit amounts), and applying any reduction to amounts payable in the following order: (A) first, any cash amounts payable to Executive as a Termination Payment or Change in Control Termination Payment under this Agreement, as applicable; (B) second, any cash amounts payable by Company for Outplacement Services on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement; (C) third, any amounts payable by Company on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement for continued Medical Coverage; (D) fourth, any other cash amounts payable by Company to or on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement: (E) fifth, outstanding performance-based equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax; and (F) finally, any time-vesting equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax.
(B)
Determinations by Accounting Firm
. All determinations required to be made under this Section 4(f)(v) shall be made by the public accounting firm that is retained by the Company as of the date immediately prior to the Change in Control (the Accounting Firm) which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Company and Executive within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt of notice from the Company or Executive that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time as is requested by the Company. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event (A) the Board shall determine prior to the Change in Control that the Accounting Firm is precluded from performing such services under applicable auditor independence rules or (B) the Audit Committee of the Board determines that it does not want the Accounting Firm to perform such services because of auditor independence concerns or (C) the Accounting Firm is serving as accountant or auditor for the person(s) effecting the Change in Control, the Board shall appoint another nationally recognized public accounting firm reasonably acceptable to Executive to make the determinations required hereunder (which accounting firm shall then be referred to as the Accounting Firm hereunder). All fees, costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, the costs of retaining experts) of the Accounting Firm shall be borne by the Company. If Payments are reduced to the Safe Harbor Cap or the Accounting Firm determines that no Excise Tax is payable by Executive without a reduction in Payments, the Accounting Firm shall provide a written opinion to Executive to the effect that the Executive is not required to report any Excise Tax on the Executive's federal income tax return, and that the failure to report the Excise Tax, if any, on Executive's applicable federal income tax return will
2
not result in the imposition of a negligence or similar penalty. The determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Company and Executive (except as provided in paragraph 4(g)(iii) below).
(C)
Excess Payment/Underpayment
. If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an Internal Revenue Service (the IRS) proceeding which has been finally and conclusively resolved, that Payments have been made to, or provided for the benefit of, Executive, which are in excess of the limitations provided in this Section (referred to hereinafter as an Excess Payment), Executive shall repay the Excess Payment to the Company on demand, together with interest on the Excess Payment at the applicable federal rate (as defined in Section 1274(d) of the Code) from the date of Executive's receipt of such Excess Payment until the date of such repayment. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999 of the Code at the time of the determination, it is possible that Payments which will not have been made by the Company should have been made (an Underpayment), consistent with the calculations required to be made under this Section. In the event that it is determined (i) by the Accounting Firm, the Company (which shall include the position taken by the Company, or together with its consolidated group, on its federal income tax return) or the IRS or (ii) pursuant to a determination by a court, that an Underpayment has occurred, the Company shall pay an amount equal to such Underpayment to Executive within ten (10) days of such determination together with interest on such amount at the applicable federal rate from the date such amount would have been paid to Executive until the date of payment. Executive shall cooperate, to the extent the Executive's reasonable expenses are reimbursed by the Company, with any reasonable requests by the Company in connection with any contests or disputes with the IRS in connection with the Excise Tax or the determination of the Excess Payment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that amounts payable under this Agreement were reduced pursuant to paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) and the value of stock options is subsequently re-determined by the Accounting Firm (as defined below) within the context of Treasury Regulation 1.280G-1 Q/A 33 that reduces the value of the Payments attributable to such options, the Company shall promptly pay to Executive any amounts payable under this Agreement that were not previously paid solely as a result of paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) up to the Safe Harbor Cap.
4.
    
Amendment of Section 4(h) of the Agreement
. Effective January 7, 2013, Section 4(h) of the Agreement is hereby amended by amending the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(h)
    
Compliance With Code Section 409A
. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be interpreted and operated so that the payment of the benefits set forth herein either shall either be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A of the Code or shall comply with the requirements of such provision; provided however that in no event shall the Company be liable to the Executive for or with respect to any taxes, penalties or interest which may be imposed upon the Executive pursuant to Section 409A. To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(iii) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Executive's separation from service, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(h)(1), from the Company (his Separation from Service), the Executive is a specified
3
employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Executive earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Executive's Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death. The 409A Payments under this Agreement that would otherwise be made during such period shall be aggregated and paid in one lump sum, without interest, on the first business day following the end of the six (6) month period or following the date of the Executive's death, whichever is earlier, and the balance of the 409A Payments, if any, shall be paid in accordance with the applicable payment schedule provided in this Section 4. To the extent any 409A Payment is conditioned on the Executive (or his legal representative) executing a release of claims, which 409A Payment would be made in a later taxable year of the Executive than the taxable year in which his Separation from Service occurs if such release were executed and delivered and became irrevocable at the last possible date allowed under this Agreement, such 409A Payment will be paid no earlier than such later taxable year. In applying Section 409A to compensation paid pursuant to this Agreement, any right to a series of installment payments under this Agreement shall be treated as a right to a series of separate payments. The Executive hereby acknowledges that he has been advised to seek and has sought the advice of a tax advisor with respect to the tax consequences to the Executive of all payments pursuant to this Agreement, including any adverse tax consequences or penalty taxes under Code Section 409A and applicable State tax law. Executive hereby agrees to bear the entire risk of any such adverse federal and State tax consequences and penalty taxes in the event any payment pursuant to this Agreement is deemed to be subject to Code Section 409A, and that no representations have been made to the Executive relating to the tax treatment of any payment pursuant to this Agreement under Code Section 409A and the corresponding provisions of any applicable State income tax laws.
5.
    
Amendment of Section 21 of the Agreement
. Effective January 7, 2013, Section 21 of the Agreement is hereby amended by amending the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
21.
    
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
. In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards) as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to such provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant.
6.
    
Full Force and Effect
. Except for those terms and provisions amended herein, all other terms and conditions in the Agreement shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect.
[SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS]
4
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Fifth Amendment to the Agreement as of the date first written above.
5


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121022084030.txt.gz
TIME:20121022084030
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
October 22, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
October 22, 2012
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth certain of its preliminary financial results for its
third quarter
ended
October 6, 2012
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2012 SALES AND
EPS PERFORMANCE; UPDATES ANNUAL EPS OUTLOOK
ROANOKE, Va, October 22, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its third quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) are anticipated to be $1.21, a decrease of 14.2% versus the third quarter last year of $1.41.
The decline in EPS was driven by a decrease in total sales for the third quarter of approximately 0.5% to $1.46 billion, as compared with total sales during the third quarter of fiscal 2011. The sales decrease reflected a comparable store sales decrease of approximately 1.8%, partially offset by the net addition of 82 new stores during the past 12 months. Additionally, the decrease in the Company's EPS was driven by increased promotions, higher spending on in-store labor and advertising in an effort to drive consumer traffic and maintain market share in the softer consumer environment, and expense deleverage as a result of the lower sales volume.
The Company anticipates that its operating performance will continue to be constrained for the balance of the year driven by continued softness in its colder weather markets, lower overall consumer spending on maintenance and failure parts and continued investments in the Company's strategic initiatives primarily focused on growing its Commercial sales. The Company does not anticipate any changes to its previously shared annual outlook for SG&A per store to decrease 1% to 2% and its previously shared annual outlook for the Company's gross profit rate to improve modestly for the year. As a result, the Company now anticipates its full year EPS outlook for fiscal 2012 will be in the range of $5.05 to $5.15.
Our efforts to invest in the continued long-term growth of Commercial and increase customer traffic helped drive improvements in our comp store sales from the second quarter to the third quarter of this year and strengthened our positive Commercial comps for Advance stores through the quarter. Despite these improved sales trends, we were still unable to achieve our profitability expectations and fully mitigate the weak consumer demand within several of our markets, especially in our colder weather markets, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  As we look beyond our current quarter, we believe the industry fundamentals remain positive and that we are well positioned with our initiatives to fuel our future growth. These initiatives include the successful launch of our Advance Commercial Credit program, our new distribution center in Remington, IN, our recent expansion into New York City and our continued momentum from our B2B online ordering capability, hub investments and inventory upgrades.
Earnings Release and Investor Conference Call
The financial results contained in this release are preliminary, and therefore, subject to the Company's completion of its customary quarterly closing and review procedures. Further details will be released during the Company's previously scheduled earnings release and conference call.
The Company will report its third quarter financial results before market open on Thursday, November 8, 2012. The Company will host a conference call scheduled to begin at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time on Thursday, November 8, 2012, which will be made available concurrently on the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com. The call is also available by dialing (866) 908-1AAP. The pass code is Advance Auto Parts. A replay of the conference call will available on the Advance website for one year.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of October 6, 2012, the Company operated 3,727 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
2
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###
3


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121108083437.txt.gz
TIME:20121108083437
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
November 8, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
November 8, 2012
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its
third quarter
ended
October 6, 2012
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS THIRD QUARTER FISCAL 2012 RESULTS
ROANOKE, Va,
November 8, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the third fiscal quarter ended
October 6, 2012
. Third quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were
$1.21
which was a
14.2%
decrease versus the third quarter last year. Year-to-date, EPS was
$4.34
which was an increase of
3.6%
over the same period last year.
Our efforts to invest in the continued long-term growth of Commercial and increase customer traffic helped drive improvements in our comp store sales from the second quarter to the third quarter of this year and strengthened our positive Commercial comps for Advance stores through the quarter. Despite these improved sales trends, we were still unable to achieve our profitability expectations and fully mitigate the weak consumer demand within several of our markets, especially in our colder weather markets, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  As we look beyond our current quarter, we believe the industry fundamentals remain positive and that we
are well positioned with our initiatives to fuel our future growth. These initiatives include the successful launch of our Advance Commercial Credit program, our new distribution center in Remington, IN, our recent expansion into New York City and our continued momentum from our B2B online ordering capability, hub investments and inventory upgrades.
Fiscal Third Quarter and Year-to-Date Highlights
Total sales for the
third quarter
decreased
0.5%
to nearly
$1.46 billion
, as compared with total sales during the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011. The sales decrease reflected a comparable store sales decrease of
1.8%
versus a comparable store sales increase of
2.2%
during the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011, partially offset by the net addition of
82
new stores during the past 12 months. Year-to-date, total sales increased
0.7%
to
$4.88 billion
, compared with total sales of
$4.84 billion
over the same period last year.
The Company's gross profit rate was
49.8%
of sales during the
third quarter
as compared to
49.5%
during the
third quarter
last year. The
31
basis-point increase in gross profit rate was primarily due to improved shrink, cost deflation and supply chain efficiencies, partially offset by increased promotional activity.
Year-to-date, the Company's gross profit rate was
49.9%
, which was consistent with the same period in fiscal 2011.
The Company's SG&A rate was
39.4%
of sales during the
third quarter
as compared to
37.3%
during the same period last year. The
213
basis-point increase was primarily due to increased spending on in-store labor and advertising in an effort to drive consumer traffic and maintain market share in the softer consumer environment and expense deleverage as a result of the Company's lower sales volume. Year-to-date, the Company's SG&A rate was
38.8%
versus
38.5%
during the same period last year.
The Company's operating income during the
third quarter
of
$150.4 million
decreased
15.4%
versus the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011. On a rate basis, operating income was
10.3%
of total sales as compared to
12.1%
during the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011. Year-to-date the Company's operating income rate was
11.2%
versus
11.4%
during the same period last year.
Operating cash flow decreased
17.4%
to
$504.8 million
from
$611.0 million
through the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011. Free cash flow was
$298.6 million
versus
$354.8 million
through the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011. Capital expenditures were
$201.2 million
as compared to
$207.5 million
through the
third quarter
of fiscal 2011.
Our third quarter performance continued to reflect the ongoing softness in our colder weather markets and a tougher economic environment impacting consumer demand for auto parts as evidenced by softness in both our maintenance and failure categories. While we are disappointed we did not achieve our profitability expectations, we are encouraged by the improvements in our sales trends, particularly in Commercial, from our second to third quarter, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Our decision to trade off profitability in the short term is driven by our confidence in the long-term industry fundamentals and ensuring we position the company for fiscal 2013 with momentum as we expect a more normalized winter. As a result of the short-term softness in our performance, we now anticipate our fiscal 2012 EPS to be in the range $5.05 to $5.15 per share.
2
Store Information
    
During the
third quarter
, the Company opened
35
stores, including
seven
Autopart International stores. Year-to-date, the Company opened
70
stores, including
13
Autopart International stores. As of
October 6, 2012
, the Company's total store count was
3,727
including
210
Autopart International stores. The Company remains on pace to open approximately 120 to 140 stores in fiscal 2012.
Dividend
On
November 6, 2012
, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of
$0.06
per share to be paid on
January 4, 2013
to stockholders of record as of
December 21, 2012
.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday,
November 8, 2012
at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until November 8, 2013.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of
October 6, 2012
, the Company operated
3,727
stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online
3
shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###
4
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared balance sheets filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP, for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously prepared statements of cash flows filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
Note: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.
Note: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121219090457.txt.gz
TIME:20121219090457
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
December 19, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On December 19, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Company), issued a press releasing announcing that it has entered into a definitive purchase agreement to acquire B.W.P. Distributors Inc., a Delaware corporation (BWP), in an all-cash transaction. BWP is a privately held company that supplies automotive aftermarket parts and products principally to commercial customers in the Northeast through its company-owned and independently owned locations under the CARQUEST brand.
The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS ANNOUNCES ACQUISITION OF BWP DISTRIBUTORS
ROANOKE, Va, December 19, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, announced today that it has entered into a definitive purchase agreement to acquire B.W.P. Distributors, Inc. (BWP) in an all-cash transaction. The parties expect to close at the end of December, subject to the satisfaction of certain customary conditions, including expiration of the waiting period under the Hart-Scott-Rodino Antitrust Improvements Act of 1976.
BWP, a privately held company that supplies, markets and distributes automotive aftermarket parts and products principally to commercial customers, was founded in 1962 and is based in Armonk, New York. BWP currently operates or supplies 216 locations in Connecticut, Delaware, Maryland, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, and Vermont. This acquisition will enable Advance Auto Parts to continue its expansion in the Northeast, which continues to be a strategic growth area for Advance.
After completion of this transaction, Advance will operate 124 BWP company-owned stores and will transfer the rights to distribute to 92 independently owned locations to an affiliate of General Parts International, Inc. (GPI), a privately held auto supply company. Additionally, Advance will continue to operate two of BWP's distribution centers in Sutton, Massachusetts and Delran, New Jersey. GPI will operate BWP's other distribution center in Armonk, New York.
We are excited about the combination of our two businesses as it will position us for accelerated growth in the Northeast, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer of Advance Auto Parts. This new partnership with BWP is another example of Advance's commitment to long-term growth and serving commercial customers. With our other investments in parts, technology, systems and people, we have enhanced our ability to improve our profitability and increase value for our shareholders. We are also thrilled that Neil Stockel, BWP President, will continue to collaborate with us as we grow our commercial business.
We thank Advance Auto Parts for this exciting new relationship. Our rich history of serving commercial customers, combined with Advance Auto Parts' best-in-class commercial capabilities, will allow us to build on our strong service reputation with our customers, said Neil Stockel, President, BWP.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of October 6, 2012, the Company operated 3,727 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121221171048.txt.gz
TIME:20121221171048
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
December 21, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (the Company) entered into the Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December 21, 2012 to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, among the Company, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, the Company's wholly owned subsidiary (Advance Stores), certain of Advance Stores' domestic subsidiaries, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee (the Trustee) (the Fourth Supplemental Indenture), to acknowledge the addition of one of Advance Stores' domestic subsidiaries as a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Indenture related to the Company's 5.75% senior unsecured notes that were issued in April 2010 and 4.50% senior unsecured notes that were issued in January 2012. The above description of the Fourth Supplemental Indenture is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Fourth Supplemental Indenture, which is filed as Exhibit 4.5 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
On May 27, 2011, the Company, as Guarantor, entered into a $750 million unsecured five-year revolving credit facility (the 2011 Credit Agreement) with Advance Stores, as Borrower, the lenders party thereto, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. The 2011 Credit Agreement is guaranteed by the Company and certain domestic subsidiaries of Advance Stores, including its Material Subsidiaries (as defined in the 2011 Credit Agreement) pursuant to the Guarantee Agreement (the "Guarantee Agreement") among the Company, Advance Stores, and its Material Subsidiaries in favor of the Agent for the lenders under the 2011 Credit Agreement. Pursuant to the Supplement No. 1 to Guarantee Agreement, dated as of December 21, 2012 (the Supplement), certain domestic subsidiaries of Advance Stores have been added as guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement. The above description of the Supplement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Supplement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
______________________________
(1) Incorporated by reference from the same numbered exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2010.
(2) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 3, 2011.
(3) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.4 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 17, 2012.
 
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX
______________________________
(1) Incorporated by reference from the same numbered exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2010.
(2) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 3, 2011.
(3) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.4 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 17, 2012.

Exhibit 4.5
Execution Version
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
______________________________________
FOURTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE
Dated as of December 21, 2012
______________________________________
to the
INDENTURE
Dated as of April 29, 2010
among
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
as Issuer,
EACH OF THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS FROM
TIME TO TIME PARTY HERETO
and
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION,
as Trustee
FOURTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of December 21, 2012 (this 
Fourth Supplemental Indenture
), to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the 
Original Indenture
), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (the 
Company
), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (the 
Trustee
).
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered the Original Indenture to provide for the issuance from time to time of Securities (as defined in the Original Indenture) of the Company, to be issued in one or more Series;
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Original Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered a (i) first supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, to provide for a Series of Securities (the 
First Supplemental Indenture
), (ii) second supplemental indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011, to provide for the release of certain Subsidiary Guarantors (the 
Second Supplemental Indenture
) and (iii) third supplemental indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012, to provide for a Series of Securities (the 
Third Supplemental Indenture
) (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture, the Third Supplemental Indenture and this Fourth Supplemental Indenture is hereinafter called the 
Indenture
);
WHEREAS, Section 4.09 of the Original Indenture provides, among other things, that if any Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company is or becomes guaranteed by any Domestic Subsidiary of the Company, then, if such Subsidiary of the Company is not already a Subsidiary Guarantor, the Company shall cause such Subsidiary to execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture pursuant to which such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Guarantor;
WHEREAS, Section 9.01(i) of the Original Indenture provides, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of adding a Guarantee with respect to the Securities; and
WHEREAS, all action on the part of the Company necessary to authorize this Fourth Supplemental Indenture has been duly taken.
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS FOURTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That, in consideration of the foregoing and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee covenant and agree for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders as follows:
ARTICLE I
Definitions
SECTION 1.02.
Definitions
.
A. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Original Indenture.
B. The rules of interpretation set forth in the Original Indenture shall be applied hereto as if set forth in full herein.
ARTICLE II
Guarantors
SECTION 2.02.
Subsidiary Guarantors
. From this date, in accordance with Sections 4.09 and 10.01 of the Indenture and by executing this Fourth Supplemental Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantors whose signatures appear below are subject to the provisions of the Indenture to the extent provided for in Article 10 thereof.
ARTICLE III
Miscellaneous
SECTION 3.01
Ratification of Original Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Original Indenture
. Except as expressly amended hereby, the Original Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect. This Fourth Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
SECTION 3.02
Concerning the Trustee
. The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the same. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Third Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.03
Counterparts
. This Fourth Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument. The exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
SECTION 3.04
GOVERNING LAW
. THIS FOURTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING
EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY.
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Fourth Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized as of the date first above written.
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
 
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]

Exhibit 10.1
Execution Version
SUPPLEMENT No. 1 (this 
Supplement
) dated as of December 21, 2012, to the Guarantee Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (the 
Guarantee Agreement
), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (
Holdings
), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the 
Borrower
), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party thereto (the 
Subsidiary Guarantors
 and, together with Holdings, the 
Guarantors
) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (
JPMCB
), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
 
A. Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the 
Lenders
) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the 
Administrative Agent
) for the Lenders.
 
B. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement.
 
C. The Borrower and the Guarantors have entered into the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit. Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement and Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of such term in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary. Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement. The undersigned Subsidiaries (each a 
New Guarantor
 and, collectively, the 
New Guarantors
") are executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement to become Subsidiary Guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue additional Letters of Credit and as consideration for Loans previously made and Letters of Credit previously issued.
 
Accordingly, the Administrative Agent and the New Guarantors agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1. In accordance with Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, each New Guarantor by its signature below becomes a Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as a Guarantor and such New Guarantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Guarantee Agreement applicable to it as a Guarantor thereunder and (b) represents and warrants that the representations and warranties made by it as a Guarantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof. Each reference to a Guarantor in the Guarantee Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Guarantors. The Guarantee Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
Each New Guarantor represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and
delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
 
This Supplement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Supplement shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Guarantors and the Administrative Agent. Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile or other electronic methods of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Supplement.
 
Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Guarantee Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 2.
THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the Guarantee Agreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision hereof in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 13 of the Guarantee Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to the New Guarantors shall be given to them in care of the Borrower.
 
The New Guarantors agree to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel for the Administrative Agent.
    
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantors and the Administrative Agent have duly executed this Supplement to the Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
AAP FINANCIAL SERVICES, INC.
By:
    
/s/ Michael Norona
            
Name: Michael Norona
Title: Chief Financial Officer
DRIVERSIDE, INC.
By:
    
/s/ Michael Norona
            
Name: Michael Norona
Title: Executive Vice President, Chief Financial
Officer, Assistant Secretary
MOTOLOGIC, INC.
By:
    
/s/ Michael Norona
            
Name: Michael Norona
Title: Executive Vice President, Chief Financial
Officer, Assistant Secretary
ADVANCE E-SERVICE SOLUTIONS, INC.
By:
    
/s/ Michael Norona
            
Name: Michael Norona
Title: Executive Vice President, Chief Financial
Officer, Assistant Secretary
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as
Administrative Agent
By:
                        
Name:
Title:


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20121231162542.txt.gz
TIME:20121231162542
EVENTS:	Other Events	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Other Events
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
December 31, 2012
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 8.01 Other Events.
On December 31, 2012, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation (the Company), issued a press releasing announcing that it has completed the acquisition of B.W.P. Distributors Inc., a Delaware corporation (BWP), in an all-cash transaction. BWP is a privately held company that supplies automotive aftermarket parts and products principally to commercial customers in the Northeast through its company-owned and independently owned locations under the CARQUEST brand.
The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2012 fiscal year.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report on Form 8-K shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS ANNOUNCES CLOSING OF ACQUISITION OF
BWP DISTRIBUTORS
ROANOKE, Va, December 31, 2012
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, announced today that it has completed the acquisition of B.W.P. Distributors, Inc. (BWP) in an all-cash transaction.
BWP, a privately held company that supplies, markets and distributes automotive aftermarket parts and products principally to commercial customers, was founded in 1962 and is based in Armonk, New York. BWP operates or supplies 216 locations in Connecticut, Delaware, Maryland, Massachusetts, New Hampshire, New Jersey, New York, Pennsylvania, Rhode Island, and Vermont. This acquisition will enable Advance Auto Parts to continue its expansion in the Northeast, which continues to be a strategic growth area for Advance.
As a result of the closing of this transaction, Advance will operate 124 BWP company-owned stores and will transfer the rights to distribute to 92 independently owned locations to an affiliate of General Parts International, Inc. (GPI), a privately held auto supply company. Additionally, Advance will continue to operate two of BWP's distribution centers in Sutton, Massachusetts and Delran, New Jersey.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of October 6, 2012, the Company operated 3,727 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2012. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130207084926.txt.gz
TIME:20130207084926
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
February 7, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
February 7, 2013
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its
fourth quarter
and fiscal year ended
December 29, 2012
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2013 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FOURTH QUARTER AND FISCAL 2012 RESULTS
ROANOKE, Va,
February 7, 2013
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the fourth quarter and fiscal year ended
December 29, 2012
. Fourth quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were
$0.88
which was a
2.2%
decrease versus the fourth quarter last year. For fiscal 2012, EPS was
$5.22
which was an increase of
2.2%
over the same period last year.
We are pleased that our fourth quarter profitability results exceeded our expectations. Our comparable sales trends continued to improve sequentially, after adjusting for the holiday shift in our fourth quarter, as well as our operating profits, said Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer.  Overall fiscal 2012 was a challenging environment, which is reflected in our results. Yet we achieved many key milestones that position us for a strong future. Those achievements include the launch of our in-house commercial credit program, the opening of our new distribution center in Remington, Indiana, improvements in our commercial customer satisfaction, the market entry into the boroughs of New York and the acquisition of BWP which closed after our fiscal year ended. These milestones are significant steps which will allow us to more effectively compete in the larger and faster growing Commercial market.
Fourth Quarter and Fiscal 2012 Highlights
Total sales for the
fourth quarter
increased
0.1%
to
$1.33 billion
, as compared with total sales during the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011. The sales increase reflected a comparable store sales decrease of
1.9%
versus a comparable store sales increase of
2.9%
during the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011, partially offset by the net addition of
132
new stores over the past 12 months. For fiscal 2012, total sales increased
0.6%
to
$6.21 billion
, compared with total sales of
$6.17 billion
during fiscal 2011.
The Company's gross profit rate was
49.9%
of sales during the
fourth quarter
as compared to
49.0%
during the
fourth quarter
last year. The
87
basis-point increase in gross profit rate was primarily due to improvements in shrink and supply chain efficiencies. The supply chain efficiencies, which were driven by an increase in the volume of inventory handled during the quarter, more than offset the increase in supply chain costs associated with the opening of the Company's new distribution center and increased new store openings. For fiscal 2012, the Company's gross profit rate was
49.9%
, compared with
49.7%
in fiscal 2011.
The Company's SG&A rate was
41.4%
of sales during the
fourth quarter
as compared to
40.6%
during the same period last year. The
79
basis-point increase was primarily due to expense deleverage as a result of the Company's 1.9% comp store sales decline, increased new store openings and costs associated with the Company's acquisition related activities during the quarter, partially offset by lower incentive compensation. For fiscal 2012, the Company's SG&A rate was
39.3%
versus
39.0%
during fiscal 2011.
The Company's operating income during the
fourth quarter
of
$113.2 million
increased
1.1%
versus the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011. On a rate basis, operating income was
8.5%
of total sales as compared to
8.4%
during the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011. For fiscal 2012, the Company's operating income rate was
10.6%
versus
10.8%
during fiscal 2011.
Operating cash flow decreased
17.3%
to
$685.3 million
from
$828.8 million
through the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011. Free cash flow was
$412.3 million
versus
$507.2 million
through the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011. Capital expenditures were
$271.2 million
as compared to
$268.1 million
through the
fourth quarter
of fiscal 2011.
2012 was a challenging year for our company primarily driven by the ongoing softness in our colder weather markets and decreased consumer demand for auto parts. While we are disappointed we did not achieve our growth and profitability expectations for the year, we are encouraged by our improved sales performance trends versus the market, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. Our decision to maintain our investment profile through the course of the year is driven by our confidence in the long-term industry fundamentals and provides us with a strong foundation to build upon as we head into fiscal 2013.
2
Store Information
    
During the
fourth quarter
, the Company added
67
stores, including
eight
Autopart International stores. For fiscal 2012, the Company added
137
stores, including
21
Autopart International stores. As of
December 29, 2012
, the Company's total store count was
3,794
including
218
Autopart International stores. For the year, the Company closed five stores.
Fiscal 2013 Annual Financial Outlook
The Company has provided the following annual financial outlook and certain key assumptions for fiscal 2013.
Fiscal 2013 Annual Financial Outlook and Key Assumptions
3
In fiscal 2013, the Company anticipates a low-single digit increase in comparable store sales driven by continued strong Commercial sales growth. The Company expects a modest increase in gross profit rate. The Company expects its rate of growth in SG&A dollars per store to increase three to five percent.
As a result of the acquisition of BWP Distributors, Inc. (BWP), the Company estimates that BWP will add roughly $170 million to $180 million of revenue in fiscal 2013. The Company anticipates BWP will generate positive operating income when excluding the impact of one-time integration costs. Additionally, the Company anticipates free cash flow will be a minimum of $375 million, excluding the net acquisition price of BWP, which was approximately one times the anticipated additional revenue from BWP in fiscal 2013.
Our 2013 annual operating EPS outlook will be in the range of $5.45 to $5.60 per share excluding one-time integration costs for BWP of approximately $0.15 to $.20 per share. On a reported basis, including the BWP one-time integration costs, our EPS outlook is expected to be $5.30 to $5.45, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. "Consistent with our historical practice, our outlook does not reflect any anticipated share repurchase activity. However, we plan to continue our historical practice of opportunistically repurchasing shares in a disciplined manner, which could positively impact our 2013 annual EPS outlook."
Share Repurchase Program
As of December 29, 2012, the Company had approximately $492 million available on the Company's $500 million share repurchase program authorized by the Company's Board of Directors on May 14, 2012.
Dividend
On February 5, 2013, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of
$0.06
per share to be paid on April 5, 2013 to stockholders of record as of March 22, 2013.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday,
February 7, 2013
at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until February 7, 2014.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of
December 29, 2012
, the Company operated
3,794
stores in
39
states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These
4
statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2013. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 31, 2011 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###
5
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared balance sheets filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP, for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously prepared statements of cash flows filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.
NOTE: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130208170238.txt.gz
TIME:20130208170238
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
February 7, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130307162053.txt.gz
TIME:20130307162053
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
March 1, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02 Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
    
(e) On March 1, 2013, the Compensation Committee (the Committee) of the Board of Directors of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company), approved a special performance-based long-term incentive award pursuant to the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2004 Plan) to certain officers, including Darren R. Jackson, President and Chief Executive Officer; Michael A. Norona, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer; Kevin P. Freeland, Chief Operating Officer; Charles E. Tyson, Senior Vice President, Merchandising and Marketing; and Donna J. Broome, Senior Vice President, Commercial Sales and Marketing, who are named executive officers for purposes of the Company's Annual Report on Form 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2012.
The special grant was made in the form of performance-based restricted stock units (RSUs). Each performance-based RSU may vest on March 1, 2016, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target during the 2013 through 2015 fiscal years as described below. Any performance-based RSUs that vest will be settled in shares of common stock. Each executive was granted a number of performance-based RSUs valued in an amount equal to one-times his or her base salary as determined by the grant date fair market value, which is the closing price of the Company's common stock as reported by the New York Stock Exchange on the date of grant.
A maximum of 100% of the performance-based RSUs may be earned based on achievement of the target level of cumulative operating income over the three-year period. If the specified threshold level performance objective is achieved, 50% of the target level award will vest. If the threshold performance objective is not achieved, no RSUs will vest. If the Company's performance exceeds the threshold level but falls below the target level, a portion of the RSUs will vest in a proportional amount between the 50% threshold and 100% target level awards. Prior to vesting of the award, award recipients will not be entitled to receive dividends or to voting rights with respect to the performance-based RSUs.
The threshold/minimum and target/maximum award amounts that may be earned by each of the named executive officers pursuant to the performance-based criteria are set forth in the table furnished as Exhibit 99.1 to this Current Report of Form 8K.
Except for certain specified circumstances described in the performance-based RSU agreements filed as exhibits to this Current Report on Form 8-K, if the executive's employment terminates prior to March 1, 2016, all rights with respect to the performance-based RSUs will be immediately and irrevocably forfeited.
The foregoing is a summary of the equity awards and does not purport to be complete. The foregoing is qualified in its entirety by reference to the respective form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreement issued in connection with the awards. Copies of the form of Restricted Stock Unit Agreements are filed as Exhibit 10.37 and 10.38 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and are incorporated herein by reference.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.37
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
2013 PERFORMANCE-VESTING RESTRICTED STOCK UNIT AWARD AGREEMENT
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company) has on the Award Date specified above granted to
Darren R. Jackson
(Participant) an award (the Award) of that number of Performance-vesting Restricted Stock Units (the RSUs) representing the right to receive a like number of shares (Shares) of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share (the Common Stock), indicated above in the box labeled Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level), subject to certain restrictions and on the terms and conditions contained in this Award and the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the Plan). A copy of the Plan is available on the Company's Intranet site or upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
* * * * *
1. 
Vesting
. Subject to the remaining provisions of this Award:
Performance-vesting RSUs shall vest in an amount up to your Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level on March 1, 2016, subject to your continued employment to that date and except as otherwise provided in Section 2 below. The precise amount in which you may vest will be determined in accordance with the following rules, subject to certification by the Committee of the Company's Cumulative Operating Income during its 2013 to 2015 fiscal years (the Performance Period).
(i)
If the Company achieves the target Cumulative Operating Income dollars as shown in Exhibit 1 to this Agreement (Target Level) during the Performance Period, you will have the opportunity to vest in all of the Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level).
(ii)
If the Company achieves threshold Cumulative Operating Income dollars as shown in Exhibit 1 to this Agreement (Threshold Level) during the Performance Period, you will have the opportunity to vest in an award that will be 50% of the Target Level award.
(iii)
If the Company achieves Cumulative Operating Income during the Performance Period that exceeds the Threshold Level but is less than Target Level, you will have the opportunity to vest in an award that will be pro-rated between 50% and 100% of the Target Level award.
For purposes of this Award, Cumulative Operating Income shall mean the sum of the Company's Operating Income for the three fiscal years that comprise the Performance Period.
You must retain all shares delivered to you upon vesting for a minimum of one year after the vesting date.
2.
Duration
.
(a) If, prior to vesting of the Performance-vesting RSUs pursuant to Section 1 or this Section 2 of this Award, your employment or other association with the Company and its Affiliates ends for any reason (voluntary or involuntary), then your rights to Performance-vesting RSUs shall be immediately and irrevocably forfeited, except as follows:
(i) If your employment or other association is terminated prior to March 1, 2016, on account of your Retirement, Death, or Disability, your Performance-vesting RSUs will vest on March 1, 2016, based on the Company's performance during the performance period, on a pro-rata basis for the time that you were employed during the
performance period. The pro rata amount will be determined by multiplying the number of Performance-vesting RSUs that you would have received if you had been employed by the Company on March 1, 2016, by a fraction whose numerator is the number of days worked during the performance period prior to termination of employment divided by the total number of days in the performance period. For purposes of this Award, on account of Retirement means termination of employment or other association following the attainment of at least 55 years of age and at least 10 years of service, of which the last three must be consecutive years with the Company. For purposes of this Award, Disability shall have the same meaning as that term is defined in your employment agreement with the Company in effect as of the date of this Award Agreement.
(ii) If the termination of your employment or other association is for cause, as defined in your employment agreement, all of your Performance-vesting RSUs, will expire on the date your employment ends.
(iii) If your employment or other association is terminated prior to March 1, 2016, by the Company other than for Due Cause, or by you for Good Reason, as those terms are defined in your Employment Agreement, your performance-vesting RSUs will vest on March 1, 2016, based on the Company's performance during the performance period, on a pro-rata basis for the time that you were employed during the performance period. The pro rata amount will be determined by multiplying the number of Performance-vesting RSUs that you would have received if you had been employed by the Company on March 1, 2016, by a fraction whose numerator is the number of days worked during the performance period prior to termination of employment divided by the total number of days in the performance period.
(b) Immediately prior to a Change in Control event, the Company will convert your Performance-vesting RSUs to time-vesting RSUs, at target level and prorated based on the number of days worked during the performance period preceding the Change of Control divided by the total number of days in the performance period. The pro rata portion of the time-vesting RSUs will continue to vest and will be converted to shares on March 1, 2016, and the remaining Performance-vesting unconverted RSUs will expire. The pro rata portion of your time-vesting RSUs as determined pursuant to this Section 2 will vest immediately (i) upon the Change in Control in the event that the successor organization does not assume, convert, or replace the awards; or (ii) upon the termination of your employment in the event that the successor organization assumes, converts or replaces the awards, and your employment is terminated without cause within 24 months following the Change in Control.
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Award, the Company may cancel this Award at any time on ninety (90) days prior notice to you in response to actions taken by you that could be considered detrimental to the Company or any of its Affiliates. Whether any of your actions could be considered detrimental will be determined by the Compensation Committee of the Board of Directors (the Committee) in its sole discretion for Cause as defined in your employment agreement.
3. 
Transfer of Award
. Until the Performance-vesting RSUs vest pursuant to Section 2 of this Award, the Performance-vesting RSUs may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged, hypothecated or otherwise disposed of or encumbered, and no attempt to transfer Performance, vesting RSUs, whether voluntary or involuntary, by operation of law or otherwise, shall vest the transferee with any interest or right in or with respect to the Shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may, in the manner established by the Committee, designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries to exercise your rights to receive any property distributable with respect to the Performance-vesting RSUs upon your death.
4.
No Rights as a Stockholder
. You shall have no rights of a shareholder of the Common Stock on and after the Award Date and until the date on which the Performance-vesting RSUs vest and are converted to Shares and the restrictions with respect to the Performance-vesting RSUs lapse in accordance with Section 1 or 2 of this Award, as described above.
5. 
Issuing Shares
. Upon vesting of any RSUs pursuant to Section 1 or 2 of this Award and payment of the applicable withholding taxes pursuant to Section 7 below, the Company shall cause shares of Common Stock to be issued in book-entry form, registered in your name.
6.
Notices
. Except as otherwise provided herein, all notices, requests, demands and other communications under this Award shall be in writing, and if by telecopy, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered when sent, or if by personal delivery or messenger or courier service, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered upon actual delivery (but in no event may notice be given by deposit in the United States mail), at the following addresses, telephone and facsimile numbers (or such other address(es), telephone and facsimile numbers a party may designate for itself by like notice):
If to the Company: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: General Counsel or by telephone at (540) 561-3225 or telecopy at (540) 561-1448;
With copy to: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: Vice President, Rewards & HR Services or by telephone at (540) 561-6818 or telecopy at (540) 561-6998;
If to you, the Participant, to your home address on record at Advance Auto Parts or your business address at Advance Auto Parts.
7. 
Income Tax Matters
.
(a) The Company makes no representation or warranty as to the tax treatment of your receipt or vesting of the Performance-vesting RSUs or upon your sale or other disposition of the Shares received upon vesting of your Performance-vesting RSUs. You should rely on your own tax advisors for such advice. In order to comply with all applicable federal or state income tax laws or regulations, the Company may take such action as it deems appropriate to ensure that all applicable federal or state payroll, withholding, income or other taxes, which are your sole and absolute responsibility, are withheld or collected from you at the time of vesting. The Company will inform you of alternative methods to settle any applicable taxes due prior to the first vesting date of your Award.
(b) For the purposes determining when Shares otherwise issuable on account of your termination of employment will be issued, termination of employment or words of similar import, as used in this Agreement, shall mean the date as of which the Company and you reasonably anticipate that no further services will be performed by you, and shall be construed as the date that you first incur a separation from service for purposes of Section 409A of the Code on or following termination of employment. Furthermore, if you are a specified employee of a public company as determined pursuant to Section 409A as of your termination of employment, any Shares otherwise issuable on account of your termination of employment which constitute deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and which are otherwise payable during the first six months following your termination of employment shall be issued to you on the earlier of (1) the date of your death and (2) the first business day of the seventh calendar month immediately following the month in which your termination of employment occurs.
8. 
Miscellaneous.
(a) This Award is made under the provisions of the Plan and shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with it. To the extent that any provision in this Award is inconsistent with the Plan, the provisions of the Plan shall control. The interpretation of the Committee of any provision of the Plan, the RSUs or this Award, and any determination with respect thereto or hereto by the Committee, shall be binding on all parties.
(b) Nothing contained in this Agreement shall confer, intend to confer or imply any rights to an employment relationship or rights to a continued employment relationship with the Company or any Affiliate in your favor or limit the ability of the Company or an Affiliate, as the case may be, to terminate, with or without cause, in its sole and absolute discretion, your employment relationship with the Company or such Affiliate, subject to the terms of any written employment agreement to which you are a party.
(c) Neither the Plan nor this Award shall create or be construed to create a trust or separate fund of any kind or a fiduciary relationship between the Company or any Affiliate and You or any other Person. To the extent that any Person acquires a right to receive payments from the Company or any Affiliate pursuant to an Award, such right shall be no greater than the right of any unsecured creditor of the Company or any Affiliate.
(d) The Company shall not be required to deliver any shares of Common Stock until the requirements of any federal or state securities laws, rules or regulations or other laws or rules (including the rules of any securities exchange) as may be determined by the Company to be applicable are satisfied.
(e) An original record of this Award and all the terms hereof, executed by the Company, is held on file by the Company. To the extent there is any conflict between the terms contained in this Award and the terms contained in the original held by the Company, the terms of the original held by the Company shall control.
(f) This Award is intended to be consistent with your employment or loyalty agreement with the Company in effect on the date first written above. To the extent that any provision of this Award Agreement is inconsistent with the terms of your employment or loyalty agreement with the Company in effect as of the date first written above, the provisions of this Award Agreement shall control with respect to this Award.
In Witness Whereof, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
Accepted and agreed, including specifically but without limitation as to the treatment of this Award in accordance with the terms of the Plan and this Award notwithstanding any terms of an Employment or Loyalty Agreement between the Company and the undersigned to the contrary:

Exhibit 10.38
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
2013 PERFORMANCE-VESTING RESTRICTED STOCK UNIT AWARD AGREEMENT
THIS CERTIFIES THAT Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company) has on the Award Date specified above granted to
Name
(Participant) an award (the Award) of that number of Performance-vesting Restricted Stock Units (the RSUs) representing the right to receive a like number of shares (Shares) of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. Common Stock, $.0001 par value per share (the Common Stock), indicated above in the box labeled Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level), subject to certain restrictions and on the terms and conditions contained in this Award and the Advance Auto Parts, Inc. 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (the Plan). A copy of the Plan is available on the Company's Intranet site or upon request. In the event of any conflict between the terms of the Plan and this Award, the terms of the Plan shall govern. Any terms not defined herein shall have the meaning set forth in the Plan.
* * * * *
1. 
Vesting
. Subject to the remaining provisions of this Award:
Performance-vesting RSUs shall vest in an amount up to your Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level on March 1, 2016, subject to your continued employment to that date and except as otherwise provided in Section 2 below. The precise amount in which you may vest will be determined in accordance with the following rules, subject to certification by the Committee of the Company's Cumulative Operating Income during its 2013 to 2015 fiscal years (the Performance Period).
(i)
If the Company achieves the target Cumulative Operating Income dollars as shown in Exhibit 1 to this Agreement (Target Level) during the Performance Period, you will have the opportunity to vest in all of the Performance-vesting RSUs (at Target Level).
(ii)
If the Company achieves threshold Cumulative Operating Income dollars as shown in Exhibit 1 to this Agreement (Threshold Level) during the Performance Period, you will have the opportunity to vest in an award that will be 50% of the Target Level award.
(iii)
If the Company achieves Cumulative Operating Income during the Performance Period that exceeds the Threshold Level but is less than Target Level, you will have the opportunity to vest in an award that will be pro-rated between 50% and 100% of the Target Level award.
For purposes of this Award, Cumulative Operating Income shall mean the sum of the Company's Operating Income for the three fiscal years that comprise the Performance Period.
2.
Duration
.
(a) If, prior to vesting of the Performance-vesting RSUs pursuant to Section 1 or this Section 2 of this Award, your employment or other association with the Company and its Affiliates ends for any reason (voluntary or involuntary), then your rights to Performance-vesting RSUs shall be immediately and irrevocably forfeited, except as follows:
(i) If your employment or other association is terminated prior to March 1, 2016, on account of your Retirement, Death, or Disability, your Performance-vesting RSUs will vest on March 1, 2016, based on the Company's performance during the performance period, on a pro-rata basis for the time that you were employed during the performance period. The pro rata amount will be determined by multiplying the number of Performance-vesting RSUs that you would have received if you had been employed by the Company on March 1, 2016, by a fraction
whose numerator is the number of days worked during the performance period prior to termination of employment divided by the total number of days in the performance period. For purposes of this Award, on account of Retirement means termination of employment or other association following the attainment of at least 55 years of age and at least 10 years of service, of which the last three must be consecutive years with the Company. Disability is defined as having become disabled within the meaning of Section 22(e) (3) of the Internal Revenue Code.
(ii) If the termination of your employment or other association is for cause, as determined in good faith by the Committee, all of your Performance-vesting RSUs, will expire on the date your employment ends.
(b) Immediately prior to a Change in Control event, the Company will convert your Performance-vesting RSUs to time-vesting RSUs, at target level and prorated based on the number of days worked during the performance period preceding the Change of Control divided by the total number of days in the performance period. The pro rata portion of the time-vesting RSUs will continue to vest and will be converted to shares on March 1, 2016, and the remaining Performance-vesting unconverted RSUs will expire. The pro rata portion of your time-vesting RSUs as determined pursuant to this Section 2 will vest immediately (i) upon the Change in Control in the event that the successor organization does not assume, convert, or replace the awards; or (ii) upon the termination of your employment in the event that the successor organization assumes, converts or replaces the awards, and your employment is terminated without cause within 24 months following the Change in Control.
Notwithstanding any contrary provision of this Award, the Company may cancel this Award at any time on ninety (90) days prior notice to you in response to actions taken by you that could be considered detrimental to the Company or any of its Affiliates. Whether any of your actions could be considered detrimental will be determined by the Committee in its sole discretion.
3. 
Transfer of Award
. Until the Performance-vesting RSUs vest pursuant to Section 2 of this Award, the Performance-vesting RSUs may not be sold, assigned, transferred, pledged, hypothecated or otherwise disposed of or encumbered, and no attempt to transfer Performance, vesting RSUs, whether voluntary or involuntary, by operation of law or otherwise, shall vest the transferee with any interest or right in or with respect to the Shares. Notwithstanding the foregoing, you may, in the manner established by the Committee, designate a beneficiary or beneficiaries to exercise your rights to receive any property distributable with respect to the Performance-vesting RSUs upon your death.
4.
No Rights as a Stockholder
. You shall have no rights of a shareholder of the Common Stock on and after the Award Date and until the date on which the Performance-vesting RSUs vest and are converted to Shares and the restrictions with respect to the Performance-vesting RSUs lapse in accordance with Section 1 or 2 of this Award, as described above.
5. 
Issuing Shares
. Upon vesting of any RSUs pursuant to Section 1 or 2 of this Award and payment of the applicable withholding taxes pursuant to Section 7 below, the Company shall cause shares of Common Stock to be issued in book-entry form, registered in your name.
6.
Notices
. Except as otherwise provided herein, all notices, requests, demands and other communications under this Award shall be in writing, and if by telecopy, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered when sent, or if by personal delivery or messenger or courier service, shall be deemed to have been validly served, given or delivered upon actual delivery (but in no event may notice be given by deposit in the United States mail), at the following addresses, telephone and facsimile numbers (or such other address(es), telephone and facsimile numbers a party may designate for itself by like notice):
If to the Company: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: General Counsel or by telephone at (540) 561-3225 or telecopy at (540) 561-1448;
With copy to: Advance Auto Parts, Inc. located at 5008 Airport Road, Roanoke, Virginia, 24012, Attention: Vice President, Rewards & HR Services or by telephone at (540) 561-6818 or telecopy at (540) 561-6998;
If to you, the Participant, to your home address on record at Advance Auto Parts or your business address at Advance Auto Parts.
7. 
Income Tax Matters
.
(a) The Company makes no representation or warranty as to the tax treatment of your receipt or vesting of the Performance-vesting RSUs or upon your sale or other disposition of the Shares received upon vesting of your Performance-vesting RSUs. You should rely on your own tax advisors for such advice. In order to comply with all applicable federal or state income tax laws or regulations, the Company may take such action as it deems appropriate to ensure that all applicable federal or state payroll, withholding, income or other taxes, which are your sole and absolute responsibility, are withheld or collected from you at the time of vesting. The Company will inform you of alternative methods to settle any applicable taxes due prior to the first vesting date of your Award.
(b) For the purposes determining when Shares otherwise issuable on account of your termination of employment will be issued, termination of employment or words of similar import, as used in this Agreement, shall mean the date as of which the Company and you reasonably anticipate that no further services will be performed by you, and shall be construed as the date that you first incur a separation from service for purposes of Section 409A of the Code on or following termination of employment. Furthermore, if you are a specified employee of a public company as determined pursuant to Section 409A as of your termination of employment, any Shares otherwise issuable on account of your termination of employment which constitute deferred compensation within the meaning of Section 409A of the Code and which are otherwise payable during the first six months following your termination of employment shall be issued to you on the earlier of (1) the date of your death and (2) the first business day of the seventh calendar month immediately following the month in which your termination of employment occurs.
8. 
Miscellaneous.
(a) This Award is made under the provisions of the Plan and shall be interpreted in a manner consistent with it. To the extent that any provision in this Award is inconsistent with the Plan, the provisions of the Plan shall control. The interpretation of the Committee of any provision of the Plan, the RSUs or this Award, and any determination with respect thereto or hereto by the Committee, shall be binding on all parties.
(b) Nothing contained in this Agreement shall confer, intend to confer or imply any rights to an employment relationship or rights to a continued employment relationship with the Company or any Affiliate in your favor or limit the ability of the Company or an Affiliate, as the case may be, to terminate, with or without cause, in its sole and absolute discretion, your employment relationship with the Company or such Affiliate.
(c) Neither the Plan nor this Award shall create or be construed to create a trust or separate fund of any kind or a fiduciary relationship between the Company or any Affiliate and You or any other Person. To the extent that any Person acquires a right to receive payments from the Company or any Affiliate pursuant to an Award, such right shall be no greater than the right of any unsecured creditor of the Company or any Affiliate.
(d) The Company shall not be required to deliver any shares of Common Stock until the requirements of any federal or state securities laws, rules or regulations or other laws or rules (including the rules of any securities exchange) as may be determined by the Company to be applicable are satisfied.
(e) An original record of this Award and all the terms hereof, executed by the Company, is held on file by the Company. To the extent there is any conflict between the terms contained in this Award and the terms contained in the original held by the Company, the terms of the original held by the Company shall control.
In Witness Whereof, this Award has been executed by the Company as of the date first above written.
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.

EXHIBIT 99.1
Special Long-Term Incentive Award Table


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130404164544.txt.gz
TIME:20130404164544
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Regulation FD Disclosure	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
April 4, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On April 4, 2013, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) announced that its Board of Directors (Board) has appointed George E. Sherman to become the Company's President, effective April 21, 2013. Darren R. Jackson, who most recently served as President and Chief Executive Officer, will continue to serve as the Company's Chief Executive Officer. The Company also announced that Charles E. Tyson has been appointed to become the Company's Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Marketing & Supply Chain, effective April 21, 2013.
Mr. Sherman, 51, served as the Senior Vice President, Best Buy Services, Best Buy Co., Inc., a national retailer of consumer electronics, from June 2009 to March 2013. Prior to that position, he served in various positions with The Home Depot, a home improvement specialty retailer, as Senior Vice President and President, Home Depot Home Services from October 2007 to February 2009, as Senior Vice President, Operations from January 2006 to October 2007 and as Vice President Store Operations from January 2005 to January 2006. Prior to January 2005, Mr. Sherman served in executive positions with Mervyn's Department Stores, and in escalating management positions with Target Corporation. Before joining Target, Mr. Sherman served as an officer in the United States Air Force.
Mr. Tyson, 51, who most recently served as Senior Vice President, Merchandising and Marketing, joined Advance in March 2008 and has served in his current position since August 20ll. Prior to that, Mr. Tyson served as Senior Vice President, Merchandising. Prior to joining Advance, Mr. Tyson served as Senior Vice President, Merchandising and Technology with OfficeMax, Inc., from March 2005 to February 2008. Prior to joining OfficeMax, Mr. Tyson was President of Diversitech Group, an importer of hand and power tools, from September 2001 to March 2005. He worked for Office Depot, Inc., from October 1997 to September 2001 where he held multiple positions with increasing responsibilities, including Senior Vice President, Merchandising and General Merchandising Manager; Senior Vice President, World Wide Global Sourcing; and Vice President, Divisional Merchandise Manager.
Mr. Sherman and the Company have agreed upon the key terms of Mr. Sherman's employment arrangements, which are effective upon the commencement of his employment on April 21, 2013, and have been approved by the Compensation Committee of the Company's Board of Directors (Committee). Under the terms of his employment arrangement, Mr. Sherman is entitled to receive an annual base salary of $600,000 and is eligible to participate in the Company's annual incentive bonus plan with a pro-rated bonus target of 100% of base salary for fiscal year 2013, and an opportunity to earn up to 200% of base salary (assuming all financial and other performance targets as specified in the bonus plan are exceeded), the metrics of which bonus plan are consistent with the metrics applied to other senior officers of the Company. Effective on or about May 28, 2013, Mr. Sherman will receive a pro-rated annual equity grant under the Company's 2004 Long-Term Incentive Plan (2004 LTIP) with an aggregate value of $538,462 on date of grant consisting of 25% of the value issued in the form of restricted stock units (RSUs) and 75% of the value issued in the form of stock appreciation rights (SARs). Fifty percent (50%) of the equity grants will vest in equal thirds upon the first three anniversaries of the grant date. The remaining 50% are performance-based and represent the target level of the SARs and RSUs that may become vested on May 28, 2016, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target during the 2013 through 2015 fiscal years. Mr. Sherman has an opportunity to receive additional SARs and RSUs up to a maximum 200% of the target grant value if the Company's performance during that period substantially exceeds the performance targets established by the Committee with respect to the annual equity grants awarded to other Company executives on December 3, 2012.
In addition, effective on or about May 28, 2013, Mr. Sherman will receive a pro-rated grant of performance-based RSUs with a grant date fair market value of $533,333, as determined by the closing price of the Company's common stock as reported by the New York Stock Exchange on the date of grant. Each performance-based RSU may vest on March 1, 2016, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target during the 2013 through 2015 fiscal years as described below. Any performance-based RSUs that vest will be settled in shares of common stock. A maximum of 100% of the performance-based RSUs may be earned based on achievement of the target level of cumulative operating income over the three-year period. If the specified threshold level performance objective is achieved, 50% of the target level award will vest. If the threshold performance objective is not achieved, no RSUs will vest. If the Company's performance exceeds the threshold level but falls below the target level, a portion of the RSUs will vest in a proportional amount between the 50% threshold and 100% target level awards. Prior to vesting of the award, award recipients will not be entitled to receive dividends or to voting rights with respect to the performance-based RSUs. This grant represents a pro-ration of a special performance-based LTI grant
that was made to certain officers of the Company effective March 1, 2013, and which is more fully described in the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K that was filed with the SEC on March 7, 2013.
Mr. Sherman will be entitled to participate in the benefit plans generally available to executives of the Company. As an executive officer of the Company, Mr. Sherman will be offered an employment agreement to be negotiated by the Company and Mr. Sherman prior to the commencement of his employment. The Company will file an amendment to this Form 8-K to disclose the terms of the employment agreement when executed.
In conjunction with his promotion, the Committee has approved certain changes to Mr. Tyson's compensation arrangements, including an annual base salary of $450,000, an additional pro-rated annual equity incentive grant with an aggregate value of $121,154 based on the closing price of the Company's common stock as reported by the New York Stock Exchange on May 28, 2013, and consisting of 25% in RSUs and 75% in SARs. Seventy-five percent (75%) of the equity grants will vest in equal thirds upon the first three anniversaries of the grant date. The remaining 25% are performance-based and represent the target level of the SARs and RSUs that may become vested on May 28, 2016, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target during the 2013 through 2015 fiscal years. Mr. Tyson has an opportunity to receive additional SARs and RSUs up to a maximum 200% of the target grant value if the Company's performance during that period substantially exceeds the performance targets established by the Committee.
In addition, effective on or about May 28, 2013, Mr. Tyson will receive an additional pro-rated grant of performance-based restricted stock units (RSUs) with a grant date fair market value of $38,222, as determined by the closing price of the Company's common stock as reported by the New York Stock Exchange on the date of grant. Each performance-based RSU may vest on March 1, 2016, following certification by the Committee of the achievement of a performance target during the 2013 through 2015 fiscal years as described below. Any performance-based RSUs that vest will be settled in shares of common stock. A maximum of 100% of the performance-based RSUs may be earned based on achievement of the target level of cumulative operating income over the three-year period. If the specified threshold level performance objective is achieved, 50% of the target level award will vest. If the threshold performance objective is not achieved, no RSUs will vest. If the Company's performance exceeds the threshold level but falls below the target level, a portion of the RSUs will vest in a proportional amount between the 50% threshold and 100% target level awards. Prior to vesting of the award, award recipients will not be entitled to receive dividends or to voting rights with respect to the performance-based RSUs. This grant represents the a pro-rated supplemental portion of the special performance-based LTI grant that was made to certain officers of the Company, including Mr. Tyson, effective March 1, 2013, and which is more fully described in the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K that was filed with the SEC on March 7, 2013.
Mr. Tyson will continue to be entitled to participate in the benefit plans generally available to executives of the Company. As an executive officer of the Company, Mr. Tyson will be offered an employment agreement, which will replace his current Senior Vice President Loyalty Agreement, to be negotiated by the Company and Mr. Tyson prior to the effective date of his new position. The Company will file an amendment to this Form 8-K to disclose the terms of the employment agreement when executed.
On April 4, 2013, the Company announced that the Board has accepted Kevin P. Freeland's resignation as Chief Operating Officer of the Company in conjunction with the elimination of his position, effective no later than June 1, 2013. In connection with his termination of employment, Mr. Freeland will receive severance benefits as provided in his employment agreement with the Company. A copy of Mr. Freeland's employment agreement and subsequent amendments were previously filed with the SEC as Exhibits 10.33 and 10.34 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K that was filed on June 4, 2008, Exhibit 10.44 to the Company's Quarterly Report on Form 10-Q that was filed on June 2, 2010 and Exhibit 10.36 to the Company's Report on Form 10-Q that was filed on November 15, 2012.
On April 4, 2013, the Company also announced that the Board has accepted the resignation of Donna J. Broome, Senior Vice President, Commercial Sales and Marketing and a named executive officer of the Company, in conjunction with the elimination of her position, effective no later than June 1, 2013. In conjunction with her termination of employment, Ms. Broome will receive severance benefits as provided in her Senior Vice President Loyalty Agreement with the Company. A copy of the form of Ms. Broome's agreement was previously filed with the SEC as Exhibit 10.37 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K that was filed on November 12, 2008.
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
On April 4, 2013, the Company issued a press release announcing the appointment of George E. Sherman as President and Charles E. Tyson as Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Marketing & Supply Chain and the resignations of Kevin P. Freeland as Chief Operating Officer and Donna J. Broome as Senior Vice President, Commercial Sales and Marketing.
 
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in Item 7.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1 hereto) is furnished pursuant to Item 7.01 of Form 8-K and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS APPOINTS GEORGE SHERMAN AS PRESIDENT; ANNOUNCES LEADERSHIP CHANGES
ROANOKE, VA (April 4, 2013)
-In an effort to simplify its organizational alignment, improve role clarity and provide a more intense focus on strategic and operational execution, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (NYSE:AAP), a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, batteries, accessories, and maintenance items, today announced several organizational changes.
George Sherman will be joining the Company as President. In his role as President, Mr. Sherman will be responsible for growing Commercial and driving excellence throughout the Company's operations. Mr. Sherman will lead the Company's Commercial Sales, Field Operations, Store Operations Support, Merchandising, Marketing, Supply Chain and Ecommerce Teams.
Mr. Sherman served as an officer in the United States Air Force for seven years. Afterward, he was with Target for 15 years where he worked his way from Store Manager to Regional Vice President, then served as Senior Vice President, Store Operations for their Mervyn's department stores. He then moved to Home Depot where he led their installation business as Senior Vice President and President of their Home Services Division. Most recently, Mr. Sherman served as Senior Vice President, Best Buy Services, which included leading the Geek Squa
d. Mr. Sherman will report to Darren Jackson, Chief Executive Officer and will relocate to Roanoke, VA.
Charles Tyson, who currently serves as Senior Vice President, Merchandising and Marketing, has been promoted to Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Marketing and Supply Chain. Mr. Tyson joined Advance in 2008 as Senior Vice President, Merchandising and has been instrumental in improving the Company's gross profit rate, strengthening its parts assortment and positioning the Company as an industry leader in inventory availability. In his new role, Mr. Tyson will report to George Sherman, President.
Jim Durkin, who currently serves as President, Autopart International (AI), will assume the new role of Senior Vice President, Commercial Business. Mr. Durkin will be responsible for the Company's Commercial Sales Team, Commercial Marketing and AI. Mr. Durkin joined AI in 2011 and under his leadership AI has seen its largest period of growth and expansion. Before joining AI, Mr. Durkin led the global business segment of OfficeMax where he served as Executive Vice President. Prior to OfficeMax, Mr. Durkin served as Vice President, Sales for ARAMARK Corporation. Mr. Durkin will report to Mr. Sherman and will relocate to Roanoke, VA. All changes outlined above are effective April 21, 2013.
Tammy Finley, who most recently served as Vice President, Employment Counsel and Government Affairs, has been promoted to the role of Senior Vice President, Human Resources, effective immediately.  Ms. Finley joined Advance Auto Parts in 1998 and has served in several human resources and legal capacities including Vice President, Human Resources. Ms. Finley's tenure and background in human resources will be a tremendous asset as she takes over leadership of the Company's human resources functions including team member relations, organizational development and staffing.  Ms. Finley will report to Darren Jackson, Chief Executive Officer and will continue to be based in Roanoke, VA. 
I am thrilled to welcome George to the Advance Team and I am excited about the promotions of Charles, Jim and Tammy. Advance's future success lies in our ability to empower and enable our team to drive outcomes and grow sales, said Jackson. In order to allow our leaders to better inspire their teams, serve their customers and grow our business, we needed to simplify our business alignment and clarify roles so we can work together to build on our capabilities, accelerate our Commercial growth and improve our profitability.
  
As a result of these changes, Darren Jackson, President and CEO will continue to operate as the Company's chief executive officer and will focus on strategic and leadership development. Additionally the role of chief operating officer, which is currently held by Kevin Freeland, has been eliminated. Mr. Freeland, who has been with the Company since 2008 has been a critical part of the Company's success over the past five years and has helped build stronger Ecommerce, Supply Chain and Inventory capabilities. The role of Senior Vice President, Commercial Sales and Marketing, which is currently held by Donna Broome, has also been eliminated. Ms. Broome joined the Company in 2008 and has played a key role in developing the Company's commercial sales force. Mr. Freeland and Ms. Broome will both remain with the Company for a period of time to allow for a smooth transition of their leadership responsibilities.
I would like to thank both Kevin and Donna for their many contributions to Advance and wish them the best in their future endeavors, said Jackson.
# # #
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets.  As of December 29, 2012, the Company operated 3,794 stores in 39 states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands.  Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at
www.AdvanceAutoParts.com
.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130409170923.txt.gz
TIME:20130409170923
EVENTS:	Regulation FD Disclosure
TEXT:
ITEM: Regulation FD Disclosure
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
April 9, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 7.01 Regulation FD Disclosure.
At an investor conference to be held on Wednesday, April 10, 2013, which will be webcast live at 8:30 a.m. Eastern Daylight Time, the Company will be updating its first quarter 2013 outlook as follows:
As part of its earnings release and conference call on February 7, 2013, the Company indicated that it expected its first quarter 2013 operating income to be down mid to high single digits, generally due to softness in the industry carried over from fiscal year 2012, as well as tougher sales and SG&A comparisons to the Company's first quarter of fiscal year 2012, the annualization of new stores opened in 2012, including a high concentration of openings in the fourth quarter of 2012, and the return to a more normal rate of incentive compensation.
During the April 10, 2013 investor conference, the Company will indicate that while it had expected the first 90 days of fiscal 2013 to be challenging, they have been more challenging, especially in DIY, than anticipated. Some factors that have negatively impacted performance during the first quarter to date include the impacts on customers due to higher payroll taxes, delayed tax refunds and a slow start to spring. As a result, the Company now expects first quarter 2013 operating income to be slightly below the outlook previously provided by the Company.
The webcast will be accessible on the investor relations section of the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com and will be archived on the Company's website until April 10, 2014.
Forward-Looking Statements
The outlook provided in this Current Report on Form 8-K contains forward-looking statements as defined under U.S. securities laws, conveying management's expectations as to future results. As a general matter, forward-looking statements are those focused on anticipated events or trends, expectations and beliefs relating to matters that are not historical in nature. Forward-looking statements involve risks and uncertainties that may cause the Company's actual results to be materially different from the future results expressed or implied by the statements. You are cautioned not to place undue reliance on these forward-looking statements, which speak only as of the date of this guidance. The actual future performance of the Company could differ materially from such statements. Factors that could cause actual results to differ materially from those in the forward-looking statements include the risk factors described in the Company's SEC filings. The Company does not undertake, and hereby disclaims, any duty to update these forward-looking statements, although its situation and circumstances may change in the future.
Note: The information contained in Item 7.01 of this Current Report on Form 8-K is furnished pursuant to Item 7.01 of Form 8-K and shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130419164822.txt.gz
TIME:20130419164822
EVENTS:	Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
April 19, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 1.01. Entry into a Material Definitive Agreement.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc., (the Company) entered into the Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of
April 19, 2013
to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, among the Company, Advance Stores Company, Incorporated, the Company's wholly owned subsidiary (Advance Stores), certain of Advance Stores' domestic subsidiaries, and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association, as trustee (the Trustee) (the Fifth Supplemental Indenture), to acknowledge the addition of one of Advance Stores' domestic subsidiaries as a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Indenture related to the Company's 5.75% senior unsecured notes that were issued in April 2010 and 4.50% senior unsecured notes that were issued in January 2012. The above description of the Fifth Supplemental Indenture is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Fifth Supplemental Indenture, which is filed as Exhibit 4.6 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
On May 27, 2011, the Company, as Guarantor, entered into a $750 million unsecured five-year revolving credit facility (the 2011 Credit Agreement) with Advance Stores, as Borrower, the lenders party thereto, and JPMorgan Chase Bank, N.A., as administrative agent. The 2011 Credit Agreement is guaranteed by the Company and certain domestic subsidiaries of Advance Stores, including its Material Subsidiaries (as defined in the 2011 Credit Agreement) pursuant to the Guarantee Agreement (the "Guarantee Agreement") among the Company, Advance Stores, and its Material Subsidiaries in favor of the Agent for the lenders under the 2011 Credit Agreement. Pursuant to the Supplement No. 2 to Guarantee Agreement, dated as of
April 19, 2013
(the Supplement), one domestic subsidiary of Advance Stores has been added as a guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement. The above description of the Supplement is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Supplement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.2 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
______________________________
(1) Incorporated by reference from the same numbered exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2010.
(2) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 3, 2011.
(3) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.4 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 17, 2012.
(4) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.5 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 21, 2012.
(5) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 21, 2012.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX
______________________________
(1) Incorporated by reference from the same numbered exhibit to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on April 29, 2010.
(2) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.45 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on June 3, 2011.
(3) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.4 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on January 17, 2012.
(4) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 4.5 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 21, 2012.
(5) Incorporated by reference from Exhibit 10.1 to the Company's Current Report on Form 8-K filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission on December 21, 2012.

Exhibit 4.6
Execution Version
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
____________________________________
FIFTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE
Dated as of April 19, 2013
____________________________________
to the
INDENTURE
Dated as of April 29, 2010
among
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
as Issuer,
EACH OF THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS FROM
TIME TO TIME PARTY HERETO
and
WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION,
as Trustee
 
FIFTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE, dated as of April 19, 2013 (this 
Fifth Supplemental Indenture
), to the Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the 
Original Indenture
), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (the 
Company
), THE SUBSIDIARY GUARANTORS listed on the signature page hereto and WELLS FARGO BANK, NATIONAL ASSOCIATION, a national banking association, as trustee (the 
Trustee
).
WHEREAS, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered the Original Indenture to provide for the issuance from time to time of Securities (as defined in the Original Indenture) of the Company, to be issued in one or more Series;
WHEREAS, pursuant to the Original Indenture, the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee have heretofore executed and delivered a (i) first supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010, to provide for a Series of Securities (the 
First Supplemental Indenture
), (ii) second supplemental indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011, to provide for the release of certain Subsidiary Guarantors (the 
Second Supplemental Indenture
), (iii) third supplemental indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012, to provide for a Series of Securities (the 
Third Supplemental Indenture
) and (iv) fourth supplemental indenture, dated as of December 21, 2012, to provide for the addition of certain new Subsidiary Guarantors (the 
Fourth Supplemental Indenture
) (the Original Indenture, as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture, the Third Supplemental Indenture, the Fourth Supplemental Indenture and this Fifth Supplemental Indenture is hereinafter called the 
Indenture
);
WHEREAS, Section 4.09 of the Original Indenture provides, among other things, that if any Credit Facility Debt or Capital Markets Debt of the Company or any Subsidiary of the Company is or becomes guaranteed by any Domestic Subsidiary of the Company, then, if such Subsidiary of the Company is not already a Subsidiary Guarantor, the Company shall cause such Subsidiary to execute and deliver to the Trustee a supplemental indenture pursuant to which such Subsidiary shall become a Subsidiary Guarantor;
WHEREAS, Section 9.01(i) of the Original Indenture provides, among other things, that the Company, the Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee may enter into indentures supplemental to the Original Indenture for, among other things, the purpose of adding a Guarantee with respect to the Securities; and
WHEREAS, all action on the part of the Company necessary to authorize this Fifth Supplemental Indenture has been duly taken.
NOW, THEREFORE, THIS FIFTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE WITNESSETH:
That, in consideration of the foregoing and for other good and valuable consideration, the receipt and sufficiency of which is hereby acknowledged, the Company, the
1
 
 
Subsidiary Guarantors and the Trustee covenant and agree for the equal and ratable benefit of the Holders as follows:
ARTICLE I
Definitions
SECTION 1.01.
Definitions
.
A. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the respective meanings ascribed thereto in the Original Indenture.
B. The rules of interpretation set forth in the Original Indenture shall be applied hereto as if set forth in full herein.
ARTICLE II
Guarantors
SECTION 2.01.
Subsidiary Guarantors
. From this date, in accordance with Sections 4.09 and 10.01 of the Indenture and by executing this Fifth Supplemental Indenture, the Subsidiary Guarantors whose signatures appear below are subject to the provisions of the Indenture to the extent provided for in Article 10 thereof.
ARTICLE III
Miscellaneous
SECTION 3.01.
Ratification of Original Indenture; Supplemental Indentures Part of Original Indenture
. Except as expressly amended hereby, the Original Indenture is in all respects ratified and confirmed and all the terms, conditions and provisions thereof shall remain in full force and effect. This Fifth Supplemental Indenture shall form a part of the Indenture for all purposes, and every Holder heretofore or hereafter authenticated and delivered shall be bound hereby.
SECTION 3.02.
Concerning the Trustee
. The recitals contained herein shall be taken as the statements of the Company, and the Trustee assumes no responsibility for the correctness of the same. The Trustee makes no representations as to the validity or sufficiency of this Fifth Supplemental Indenture.
SECTION 3.03.
Counterparts
. This Fifth Supplemental Indenture may be executed in any number of counterparts, each of which when so executed shall be deemed to be an original, but all such counterparts shall together constitute one and the same instrument. The
2
 
 
exchange of copies of this Indenture and of signature pages by facsimile or PDF transmission shall constitute effective execution and delivery of this Indenture as to the parties hereto and may be used in lieu of the original Indenture for all purposes. Signatures of the parties hereto transmitted by facsimile or PDF shall be deemed to be their original signatures for all purposes.
SECTION 3.04.
GOVERNING LAW
. THIS FIFTH SUPPLEMENTAL INDENTURE SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK BUT WITHOUT GIVING EFFECT TO APPLICABLE PRINCIPLES OF CONFLICTS OF LAW TO THE EXTENT THAT THE APPLICATION OF THE LAWS OF ANOTHER JURISDICTION WOULD BE REQUIRED THEREBY.
3
 
 
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the parties have caused this Fifth Supplemental Indenture to be duly executed by their respective officers thereunto duly authorized as of the date first above written.
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
 
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
 
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
 
[Supplemental Indenture - Signature Page]
 
 

Exhibit 5.1
April 19, 2013
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, Virginia 24012
Ladies and Gentlemen:
We have acted as special counsel for B.W.P. Distributors, Inc., a New York corporation (the 
Company
), in connection with the registration under the Securities Act of 1933, as amended (the 
Act
), of the Companys guarantee of $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of 5.75% senior unsecured notes due 2020 of Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a Delaware corporation and indirect parent of the Company (
Advance
), and $300,000,000 aggregate principal amount of Advances 4.500% Notes due 2022 (collectively, the 
Notes
), pursuant to the Registration Statement on Form S-3, File No. 333-166291 (as amended and supplemented from time to time, the 
Registration
Statement
), filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission (the 
SEC
) on April 26, 2010, as amended by Post-Effective Amendment No. 1 filed with the SEC on December 1, 2011, Post-Effective Amendment No. 2 filed with the SEC on December 21, 2012 and Post-Effective Amendment No. 3 filed with the SEC on April 19, 2013.
The Notes were issued as senior indebtedness of Advance under an indenture between Advance, the subsidiary guarantors party thereto and Wells Fargo Bank, National Association (the 
Trustee
), dated as of April 29, 2010 (the 
Base Indenture
), as supplemented by the First Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 29, 2010 (the 
First Supplemental Indenture
), the Second Supplemental Indenture, dated as of May 27, 2011 (the 
Second Supplemental Indenture
), the Third Supplemental Indenture, dated as of January 17, 2012 (the 
Third Supplemental Indenture
) and the Fourth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of December 21, 2012 (the 
Fourth Supplemental Indenture
). The Base Indenture together with (and as supplemented by) the First Supplemental Indenture, the Second Supplemental Indenture, the Third Supplemental Indenture and the Fourth Supplemental Indenture is referred to herein as the 
Existing Indenture
. The Notes are guaranteed on an unsecured basis by each of the subsidiary guarantors party to the Existing Indenture. This opinion is being furnished in connection with the addition of the Company as a subsidiary guarantor under the Existing Indenture pursuant to the Fifth Supplemental Indenture, dated as of April 19, 2013 (the 
Fifth Supplemental Indenture
), and the Companys guarantee on an unsecured basis of the Notes pursuant to the Companys execution of the Fifth Supplemental Indenture (the 
Subsidiary Guarantee
), and in accordance with the requirements of Item 601(b)(5) of Regulation S-K under the Act. No opinion is expressed herein as to any matter pert
aining to the contents of the Registration Statement other than as to the validity of the Subsidiary Guarantee.
We have reviewed the corporate proceedings taken by the Company with respect to the authorization of the issuance of the Subsidiary Guarantee. We have also examined and relied upon originals or copies of such corporate records, documents, agreements or other instruments of the Company as we consider appropriate. As to all matters of fact, we have entirely relied upon certificates of officers of the Company and of public officials, and have assumed, without independent inquiry, the accuracy of those certificates. In connection with this opinion, we have also examined and relied upon the Registration Statement. In our examination, we have assumed the genuineness of all signatures, the conformity to the originals of all documents reviewed by us as copies, the authenticity and completeness of all original documents reviewed by us in original or copy form.
We have assumed that, as of immediately before the execution and delivery of the Fifth Supplemental Indenture, the Existing Indenture is in full force and effect and constitutes the valid and binding agreement of each party thereto and has not been supplemented, amended, modified or otherwise changed, whether by agreement, conduct or performance.
The opinion set forth below relating to the binding effect of the Subsidiary Guarantee is subject to the following general qualifications:
(i)  the enforceability of any obligation of the Company may be limited by bankruptcy, insolvency, fraudulent conveyance, reorganization, moratorium, marshalling or other laws and rules affecting the enforcement generally of creditors rights and remedies (including such as may deny giving effect to waivers of debtors or guarantors rights);
(ii)  the enforcement of any rights may in all cases be subject to an implied duty of good faith and general principles of equity (regardless of whether such enforceability is considered in a proceeding at law or in equity);
(iii) we express no opinion as to the enforceability of any particular provision of the Subsidiary Guarantee relating to (i) waivers of rights to object to jurisdiction or venue, or consents to jurisdiction or venue, (ii) waivers of rights to (or methods of) service of process, or rights to trial by jury, or other rights or benefits bestowed by operation of law, (iii) waivers of any applicable defenses, setoffs, recoupments or counterclaims, (iv) the granting of any power of attorney or of any proxy to any person, (v) exculpation or exoneration clauses, clauses relating to rights of indemnity or contribution, and clause relating to releases or waivers of unmatured claims or rights, (vi) waivers or variations of legal provisions or rights which are not capable of waiver or variation under applicable law, or (vii) the imposition or collection of interest on overdue interest or providing for a penalty rate of interest or late charges on overdue or defaulted
obligations, or the payment of any premium, liquidated damages or other amount that may be held by any court to be a penalty or a forfeiture; and
(iv) we express no opinion as to the effect of suretyship defenses, or defenses in the nature thereof, with respect to the obligations of the Company.
This opinion is limited solely to the internal, substantive laws of the State of New York as applied by courts located in New York, in each case to the extent the same may apply to or govern the Subsidiary Guarantee, and we express no opinion as to the laws of any other jurisdiction.
Based upon and subject to the foregoing, we are of the opinion that the Subsidiary Guarantee, when executed and issued by the Company, will constitute a valid and binding obligation of the Company.
We hereby consent to the filing of this opinion as an exhibit to the Registration Statement. In rendering this opinion and giving this consent, we do not admit that we are experts within the meaning of the Act.
Very truly yours,
/s/ Bingham McCutchen LLP
BINGHAM McCUTCHEN LLP
 

Exhibit 10.2
Execution Version
SUPPLEMENT No. 2 (this 
Supplement
) dated as of April 19, 2013, to the Guarantee Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (the 
Guarantee Agreement
), among ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC., a Delaware corporation (
Holdings
), ADVANCE STORES COMPANY, INCORPORATED, a Virginia corporation (the 
Borrower
), the subsidiaries of the Borrower from time to time party thereto (the 
Subsidiary Guarantors
 and, together with Holdings, the 
Guarantors
) and JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., a New York banking corporation (
JPMCB
), as administrative agent for the Lenders (as defined in the Credit Agreement referred to below).
 
A. Reference is made to the Credit Agreement dated as of May 27, 2011 (as amended, supplemented or otherwise modified from time to time, the 
Credit Agreement
), among Holdings, the Borrower, the lenders from time to time party thereto (the 
Lenders
) and JPMCB, as administrative agent (in such capacity, the 
Administrative Agent
) for the Lenders.
 
B. Capitalized terms used herein and not otherwise defined herein shall have the meanings assigned to such terms in the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement.
 
C. The Borrower and the Guarantors have entered into the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue Letters of Credit. Pursuant to Section 5.10 of the Credit Agreement and Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, each Material Subsidiary that was not in existence or not a Material Subsidiary on the date of the Credit Agreement is required to enter into this Guarantee Agreement as a Subsidiary Guarantor no more than 30 days after the date of determination (in accordance with the provisions of the definition of Material Subsidiary in the Credit Agreement) that such Subsidiary has become (or is deemed to be) a Material Subsidiary. Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement provides that additional Subsidiaries may become Subsidiary Guarantors under the Guarantee Agreement by execution and delivery of an instrument in the form of this Supplement. The undersigned Subsidiary (the 
New Guarantor
") is executing this Supplement in accordance with the requirements of the Credit Agreement and the Guarantee Agreement to become a Subsidiary Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement in order to induce the Lenders to make additional Loans and the Issuing Banks to issue additional Letters of Credit and as consideration for Loans previously made and Letters of Credit previously issued.
 
Accordingly, the Administrative Agent and the New Guarantor agree as follows:
 
SECTION 1. In accordance with Section 20 of the Guarantee Agreement, the New Guarantor by its signature below becomes a Guarantor under the Guarantee Agreement with the same force and effect as if originally named therein as a Guarantor and such New Guarantor hereby (a) agrees to all the terms and provisions of the Guarantee Agreement applicable to it as a Guarantor thereunder and (b) represents and warrants that the representations and warranties made by it as a Guarantor thereunder are true and correct on and as of the date hereof. Each reference to a Guarantor in the Guarantee Agreement shall be deemed to include the New Guarantor. The Guarantee Agreement is hereby incorporated herein by reference.
 
The New Guarantor represents and warrants to the Administrative Agent, the other Lenders and the Issuing Banks that this Supplement has been duly authorized, executed and
delivered by it and constitutes its legal, valid and binding obligation, enforceable against it in accordance with its terms.
 
This Supplement may be executed in counterparts, each of which shall constitute an original, but all of which when taken together shall constitute a single contract. This Supplement shall become effective when the Administrative Agent shall have received counterparts of this Supplement that, when taken together, bear the signatures of the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent. Delivery of an executed signature page to this Supplement by facsimile or other electronic methods of transmission shall be as effective as delivery of a manually executed counterpart of this Supplement.
 
Except as expressly supplemented hereby, the Guarantee Agreement shall remain in full force and effect.
 
SECTION 2.
THIS SUPPLEMENT SHALL BE GOVERNED BY, AND CONSTRUED IN ACCORDANCE WITH, THE LAWS OF THE STATE OF NEW YORK.
 
In case any one or more of the provisions contained in this Supplement should be held invalid, illegal or unenforceable in any respect, the validity, legality and enforceability of the remaining provisions contained herein and in the Guarantee Agreement shall not in any way be affected or impaired thereby (it being understood that the invalidity of a particular provision hereof in a particular jurisdiction shall not in and of itself affect the validity of such provision in any other jurisdiction). The parties hereto shall endeavor in good-faith negotiations to replace the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions with valid provisions the economic effect of which comes as close as possible to that of the invalid, illegal or unenforceable provisions.
 
All communications and notices hereunder shall be in writing and given as provided in Section 13 of the Guarantee Agreement. All communications and notices hereunder to the New Guarantor shall be given to it in care of the Borrower.
 
The New Guarantor agrees to reimburse the Administrative Agent for its out-of-pocket expenses in connection with this Supplement, including the reasonable fees, disbursements and other charges of counsel for the Administrative Agent.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the New Guarantor and the Administrative Agent have duly executed this Supplement to the Guarantee Agreement as of the day and year first above written.
 
B.W.P. DISTRIBUTORS, INC.
By:
    /s/ Michael A. Norona            
Name: Michael A. Norona
Title: Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Assistant Secretary
JPMORGAN CHASE BANK, N.A., as Administrative Agent
By:
    /s/ Sarah Freedman            
Name: Sarah Freedman
Title: Executive Director


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130430155815.txt.gz
TIME:20130430155815
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
April 29, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On April 29, 2013, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) and George E. Sherman, President, and Charles E. Tyson, Executive Vice President, Merchandising, Marketing and Supply Chain, respectively, entered into employment agreements, effective as of April 21, 2013, with an initial one-year term, which will be automatically renewable for additional one-year terms unless either party provides notice of non-renewal at least 90 days prior to the end of the then effective term.  The respective agreements specify the following initial annual base salary and annual performance-based cash target bonus amount and maximum payout bonus for each executive, calculated as a specified percentage of the executive's base salary. The performance measures for achievement of the bonus amounts will be determined consistent with the measures applied to other senior officers. 
 
The executives are eligible to participate in all of the Company's applicable benefit plans and programs pursuant to the terms of such programs.
 
If the executive's employment is terminated in the event of the executive's death, the Company shall pay to the executive or to the executive's designated beneficiary or estate an amount equal to one year of his base salary at the rate then in effect, plus an amount equal to his target bonus for such year.  In the event of termination of employment due to disability as defined in the agreement, the executive will receive a lump sum payment amount equal to 30 percent of base salary at the rate then in effect, plus an amount equal to his target bonus for such year in addition to the benefits payable under the Company's qualified group disability plan.
If the Company terminates the executive's employment without Due Cause (as defined in the agreement) or if the executive terminates his employment for Good Reason (as defined in the agreement) (other than following a Change in Control as defined in the Agreement), he will be entitled to severance in an amount equal to one year of his base salary at the rate then in effect, plus an amount equal to the average of the annual bonuses paid to the executive for the three completed fiscal years immediately prior to the date of termination of employment.  In addition, the Company will pay his COBRA premium for continuation of health coverage for one year and provide certain outplacement services, all subject to the executive's signing a general release and complying with the non-competition and non-solicitation agreements described below.  
 
If within twelve months after a Change in Control, the Company terminates the executive's employment other than for Cause, death or disability or the executive terminates his employment for Good Reason, he will be entitled to a severance payment equal to two times his base salary at the rate then in effect, plus two times his target bonus, together with the other benefits specified in the preceding paragraph.  If payments upon termination of employment related to a Change in Control would be subjected to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code, and if reducing the amount of the payments would result in greater benefits to him (after taking into consideration the payment of all income and excise taxes that would be owed by the executive as a result of Change in Control payments), the Company will reduce the Change in Control payments by the amount necessary to maximize the benefits received by the executive, determined on an after-tax basis.
The executives will be subject to standard confidentiality and non-disparagement agreements during and following their employment as well as customary non-competition and non-solicitation covenants which will continue following the termination of their employment. Mr. Tyson's employment agreement supersedes and replaces his prior loyalty agreement with the Company.
 
The above description of the employment agreements is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the form of employment agreement, which is filed as Exhibit 10.39 to this Current Report on Form 8-K.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.39
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
AGREEMENT (the Agreement), dated as of
        
, 2013, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and [NAME] (the Executive).
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
1.
Position; Term of Employment
.
Subject to the terms and conditions of this Agreement, the Company agrees to employ the Executive, and the Executive agrees to serve the Company, as its [TITLE] (Executive's Position). The parties intend that the Executive shall continue to so serve in this capacity throughout the Employment Term (as such term is defined below).
The term of Executive's employment by the Company pursuant to this Agreement shall commence on [DATE] (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the first anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date (Anniversary Date) the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to the Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end on the day prior to the Anniversary Date; and on each Anniversary Date thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end 90 days following such notice.
(a)
    
Duties and Responsibilities
.
The Executive shall have such duties and responsibilities of the Executive's Position and such other duties and responsibilities reasonably consistent with the Executive's Position as the Company may request from time to time and shall perform such duties and carry out such responsibilities to the best of the Executive's ability for the purpose of advancing the business of the Company and its subsidiaries, if any (jointly and severally, Related Entities). The Executive shall observe and conform to the applicable policies and directives promulgated from time to time by the Company and its Board of Directors or by any superior officer(s) of the Company. Subject to the provisions of Subsection 2(b) below, the Executive shall devote the Executive's full time, skill and attention during normal business hours to the business and affairs of the Company and its Related Entities, except for holidays and vacations consistent with applicable Company policy and except for illness or incapacity. The services to be performed by the Executive hereunder may be changed from time to time at the discretion of the Company. The Company shall retain full direction and control of the means and methods by which the Executive performs the Executive's services and of the place or places at which such services are to be rendered.
(b)
    
Other Activities.
During the Term of this Agreement, it shall not be a violation of this Agreement for the Executive to, and the Executive shall be entitled to (i) serve on corporate, civic, charitable, retail industry association or professional association boards or committees within the limitations of the Company's Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, (ii) deliver lectures, fulfill speaking engagements or teach at educational institutions and (iii) manage personal investments, so long as the activities set forth in (i), (ii), and (iii) above (x) do not significantly interfere with the performance of the Executive's duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement and do not involve a conflict of interest with the Executive's duties or responsibilities hereunder, (y) are in compliance with the Company's policies and procedures in effect from time to time, including the
Code of Ethics & Business Conduct
and the
Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues
, in each case as may be amended periodically, and (z) do not violate Section 18 of this Agreement.
(a)
Base Salary
.
During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay to the Executive a salary of $
    
per annum, payable consistent with the Company's standard payroll practices then in effect (Base Salary). Such Base Salary shall be reviewed by the Compensation Committee of Advance's Board of Directors (hereinafter the Compensation Committee) at least annually, with any changes taking into account, among other factors, Company and individual performance.
(b)
Bonus
.
The Executive shall receive a bonus in such amounts and based upon achievement of such corporate and individual performance and other criteria as shall be approved by the Compensation Committee from time to time, with a target amount, if such performance and other criteria are achieved, of
    
percent (
    
%) of the Base Salary (the Target Bonus Amount), with a maximum payout of
    
        
percent (
    
%) of the Base Salary during the initial Term of this Agreement, which bonus shall be paid in a manner consistent with the Company's bonus practices then in effect. The Target Bonus Amount and the maximum payout for any subsequent renewal Term of the Agreement shall be determined by the Compensation Committee. To be eligible to receive a bonus, the Executive must be employed by the Company on the date the bonus is paid.
(c)
    
Incentive Compensation Clawback
. Any compensation provided by the Company to the Executive, excepting only compensation pursuant to Section 3(a) above, shall be subject to the Company's Incentive Compensation Clawback Policy as such policy shall be adopted, and from time to time amended, by the Board or the Compensation Committee.
(d)
    
Benefit Plans
.
During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans and programs of the Company that are generally available to senior executives of the Company. Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans and programs, as the same shall be amended from time to time. The Executive shall be entitled to
    
weeks paid vacation annually.
(e)
    
Business Expenses
.
During the Employment Term, the Company shall, in accordance with policies then in effect with respect to payments of business expenses, pay or reimburse the Executive for all reasonable out-of-pocket travel and other expenses (other than ordinary commuting expenses) incurred by the Executive in performing services hereunder; provided, however, that, with respect to reimbursements, if any, not otherwise excludible from the Executive's gross income, to the extent required to comply with the provisions of Section 409A of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended (the Code), no reimbursement of expenses incurred by the Executive during any taxable year shall be made after the last day of the following taxable year, and the right to reimbursement of such expenses shall not be subject to liquidation or exchange
2
for another benefit. All such expenses shall be accounted for in such reasonable detail as the Company may require.
(a)
    
Death
.
In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the Executive's employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to the Executive's annual Base Salary and Target Bonus then in effect, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Executive's death, to the Executive's designated beneficiary, or to the Executive's estate or other legal representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of the Executive's death. In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Unit, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards), as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to the provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant. The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans and programs in which the Executive was participating at the time of his death.
Except in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect, after the date of the Executive's death, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
(b)
    
Disability
.
In the event of the Executive's Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below). In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executive's Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within 45 days following the Executive's separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executive's behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(k)(ii)(B). The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans in which the Executive participates. For the avoidance of doubt, participation by the Executive in the Company's long-term and/or short-term disability insurance benefit plans is voluntary on the part of the Executive and is made available by the Company at the sole cost of the Executive. The purpose and intent of the preceding three sentences is to ensure that the Executive receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period. In the event that Executive does not elect to participate in the Company's long-term and/or short-term disability insurance benefit plans, the Company shall not be obligated to pay the Executive any amount in excess of thirty percent (30%) of the Executive's Base Salary. In the event of the Disability of the Executive during the Employment Term, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Unit, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards), as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to the provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant. The Company shall also pay to the Executive a lump sum amount equivalent to the Executive's Target Bonus Amount then in effect, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within 45 days following the Executive's Separation from Service, provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executive's behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B). Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Company's benefit
3
programs and other plans then in effect, the Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
Disability, for purposes of this Agreement, shall mean the Executive's incapacity due to physical or mental illness causing the Executive's complete and full-time absence from the Executive's duties, as defined in Paragraph 2, for either a consecutive period of more than six months or at least 180 days within any 270-day period.
(c)
    
Termination by the Company for Due Cause
.
Nothing herein shall prevent the Company from terminating the Executive's employment at any time for Due Cause (as hereinafter defined). The Executive shall continue to receive the Base Salary provided for in this Agreement only through the period ending with the date of such termination. Any rights and benefits the Executive may have under employee benefit plans and programs of the Company shall be determined in accordance with the terms of such plans and programs. Except as provided in the two immediately preceding sentences, after termination of employment for Due Cause, the Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
For purposes of this Agreement, Due Cause shall mean:
(i)
    
a material breach by the Executive of the Executive's duties and obligations under this Agreement or violation in any material respect of any code or standard of conduct generally applicable to the officers of the Company, including, but not limited to, the Company's Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, which, if curable, has not been cured by the Executive within 15 business days after the Executive's receipt of notice to the Executive specifying the nature of such breach or violations;
(ii)
    
a material violation by the Executive of the Executive's Loyalty Obligations as provided in Paragraph 18;
(iii)
    
the commission by the Executive or indictment for
a crime of moral turpitude or a felony involving fraud, breach of trust, or misappropriation;
(iv)
    
the Executive's willfully engaging in bad faith conduct that is demonstrably and materially injurious to the Company, monetarily or otherwise; or
(v)
    
a determination by the Company that the Executive is in violation of the Company's Substance Abuse Policy.
(d)
    
Termination by the Company Other than for Due Cause, Death or Disability
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, the Company may terminate the Executive's employment for any or no reason, as it may deem appropriate in its sole discretion and judgment;
provided
,
however
, that in the event such termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall (i) be entitled to a Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and (ii) be sent written notice stating the termination is not due to Death, Disability or Due Cause. In the event of such termination by the Company, the Executive shall receive certain payments and benefits as set forth in this Subsection 4(d).
    
4
(i)
    
Termination Payment
.
If the Company terminates the Executive's employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term, the term Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
    
(A)
    
an amount equal to the Executive's annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is in connection with an action that would have enabled the Executive to terminate his employment for Good Reason pursuant to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be the Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Termination Salary Payment), and
(B)
    
an amount equal to the average value of the annual bonuses pursuant to Section 3(b)
paid to Executive for the three completed fiscal years immediately prior to the date of such termination; provided, however, that if Executive has been employed by the Company for fewer than three complete fiscal years prior to the date of such termination, Executive shall receive an amount equal to the average value of the annual bonuses pursuant to Section 3(b) that the Executive has received during the period of the Executive's employment,
(ii)
    
Outplacement Services
.
The Company shall make outplacement services available to the Executive, at a cost to the Company not to exceed $12,000, for a period of time not to exceed 12 months following the date of termination pursuant to the Company's executive outplacement program with the Company's selected vendor, to include consulting, search support and administrative services.
(iii)
    
Medical Coverage
.
In addition, the Company shall provide the Executive with medical, dental and vision insurance benefits (which may also cover, if applicable, the Executive's spouse and eligible dependents) for three hundred sixty-five (365) days from the date of the Executive's termination of employment or until such time as the Executive is eligible for group health coverage under another employer's plan, whichever occurs first. In order to trigger the Company's obligation to provide health care continuation benefits, the Executive must elect continuation coverage pursuant to the Consolidation Omnibus Budget Act of 1985, as amended (COBRA), upon such eligibility. The Company's obligation shall be satisfied solely through the payment of the Executive's COBRA premiums during the 365-day period, but only to the extent that such premiums exceed the amount that would otherwise have been payable by the Executive for coverage of the Executive and the Executive's eligible dependents that were covered by the Company's medical, dental, and vision insurance programs at the time of the Executive's termination of employment had the Executive continued to be employed by the Company.
(iv)
    
Timing of Payments
.
The Termination Salary Payment and Termination Bonus Payment shall be paid in one lump sum within 45 days following the date of the Executive's Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
(v)
    
Entire Obligation
.
Except as provided in Subsection 4(j) of this Agreement, following the Executive's termination of employment under this Subsection 4(d), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20). Except for the Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death,
5
Disability or Due Cause, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
(e)
    
Resignation from Employment by the Company for Good Reason
.
Termination by the Company without Due Cause under Subsection 4(d) shall be deemed to have occurred if the Executive elects to terminate the Executive's employment for Good Reason.
(i)
    
Good Reason.
For purposes of this Agreement, Good Reason shall mean:
(A)
    
a material diminution in the Executive's Total Direct Compensation, which shall mean the value of the total of the Executive's Base Salary, Target Bonus opportunity, and annual equity award taken together;
(B)     a material diminution in the Executive's authority, duties, or responsibilities;
(C)
    
the Company's requiring the Executive to be based more than 60 miles from the Company's office in [LOCATION] at which the Executive was principally employed immediately prior to the date of the relocation; or
(D)
    
delivery by the Company of a notice discontinuing the automatic extension of the Term of the Executive's employment under this Agreement; or
(E)     any other action or inaction that constitutes a material breach by the Company of the terms of this Agreement.
6
(ii)
    
Notice of Good Reason Condition.
In order to be considered a resignation for Good Reason for purposes of this Agreement, the Executive must provide the Company with written notice and description of the existence of the Good Reason condition within 60 days of the initial discovery by the Executive of the existence of said Good Reason condition and the Company shall have 30 business days to cure such Good Reason condition.
(iii)
    
Effective Date of Resignation.
The effective date of the Executive's resignation for Good Reason must occur no longer than six (6) months following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above. If Executive has not resigned for Good Reason effective within six (6) months following the expiration of the cure period set forth in Section 4(e)(ii), above the Executive shall be deemed to have waived said Good Reason condition.
(f)
    
Termination by the Company Other Than For Due Cause, Death or Disability or Resignation from Employment for Good Reason Within Twelve Months After a Change In Control
. If the Company terminates the Executive's employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control (as defined below), or if the Executive elects to terminate the Executive's employment for Good Reason prior to the expiration of the Employment Term and within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, then (i) the Executive shall be entitled to a Change In Control Termination Payment as hereinafter defined and the Executive shall receive benefits as defined in Subsections 4(d)(ii) and (iii) above, and (ii) either the Company or the Executive, as the case may be, shall provide Notice of Termination pursuant to Subsection 4(k).
(i)
Change In Control Termination Payment
. The term Change In Control Termination Payment shall mean a cash payment equal to the sum of:
(A)
an amount equal to two times the Executive's annual Base Salary, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Section 4(e)(i)(A), in which case, it shall be two times the Executive's annual Base Salary in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Base Salary) (the Change In Control Termination Salary Payment), and
(B)
an amount equal to two times the Executive's Target Bonus Amount, as in effect immediately prior to such termination (unless the termination is due to Sections 4(e)(i)(A) or (E), in which case, it shall be two times the Executive's Target Bonus in effect prior to any such material diminution of the Target Bonus or termination of the bonus plan, respectively) (the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment).,
(ii)
Timing of Payments
.
The Change In Control Termination Salary Payment and the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment shall be paid in lump sum payments within 45 days following the date of the Executive's Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(k)(ii)(B) below.
7
(iii)
    
Entire Obligation
.
Except as provided in Subsection 4(i) of this Agreement, following the Executive's termination of employment under this Subsection 4(f), the Executive will have no further obligation to the Company pursuant to this Agreement (other than under Sections 6, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 16, 18, 19 (to the extent such policies, guidelines and codes by their terms apply post-employment) and 20). Except for the Change In Control Termination Payment and as otherwise provided in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and plans then in effect or as expressly required under applicable law, within twelve (12) months after a Change In Control, after termination by the Company of employment for other than Death, Disability or Due Cause or after termination by the Executive for Good Reason, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
(iv)
Change In
Control
. For purposes of this Agreement, Change In Control shall mean the happening of any of the following events:
(A)
an acquisition by any individual, entity or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) or 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) (an Entity) of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) of 25% or more of either (x) the then outstanding shares of the common stock of the Company (the Outstanding Company Common Stock) or (y) the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of the Company entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (the Outstanding Company Voting Securities); excluding, however, the following: (1) any acquisition directly from the Company, other than an acquisition by virtue of the exercise of a conversion privilege unless the security being so converted was itself acquired directly from the Company, (2) any acquisition by the Company, (3) any acquisition by any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Company or any corporation controlled by the Company, or (4) any acquisition by any corporation pursuant to a transaction that complies with clauses (x), (y) and (z) of Section 4(f)(iv)(C);
(B)
a change in the composition of the Board on the effective date of this Agreement such that the individuals who, as of the effective date, constitute the Board (such Board shall be hereinafter referred to as the Incumbent Board) cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board; provided, however, that for purposes of this definition, any individual who becomes a member of the Board subsequent to the effective date, whose election, or nomination for election, by the Company's stockholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of those individuals who are members of the Board and who were also members of the Incumbent Board (or deemed to be such pursuant to this proviso) shall be considered as though such individual were a member of the Incumbent Board; and provided further, however, that any such individual whose initial assumption of office occurs as a result of or in connection with either an actual or threatened solicitation with respect to the election of directors (as such terms are used in Rule 14a-12(c) of Regulation 14A promulgated under the Exchange Act) or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of an Entity other than the Board shall not be so considered as a member of the Incumbent Board;
8
(C)
the consummation of a merger, reorganization or consolidation or sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company (each, a Corporate Transaction), excluding however, any Corporate Transaction pursuant to which (x) all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who are the beneficial owners, respectively, of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of, respectively, the outstanding shares of common stock, and the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, as the case may be, of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction (including, without limitation, a corporation or other Person that as a result of such transaction owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries (a Parent Company)) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction, of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities, as the case may be, (y) no Entity (other than the Company, any employee benefit plan (or related trust) of the Company, such corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction or, if reference was made to equity ownership of any Parent Company for purposes of determining whether clause (x) above is satisfied in connection with the applicable Corporate Transaction, such Parent Company) will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, 25% or more of, respectively, the outstanding shares of common stock of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction or the combined voting power of the outstanding voting securities of such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors unless such ownership resulted solely from ownership of securities of the Company prior to the Corporate Transaction, and (z) individuals who were members of the Incumbent Board will immediately after the consummation of the Corporate Transaction constitute at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction (or, if reference was made to equity ownership of any Parent Company for purposes of determining whether clause (x) above is satisfied in connection with the applicable Corporate Transaction, of the Parent Company); or
(D)
the approval by the stockholders of the Company of the complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
(v)
    
IRC 280G Net-Best
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that (A) any payment, award, benefit or distribution (or any acceleration of any payment, award, benefit or distribution) by the Company (or any of its affiliated entities) or any entity which effectuates a Change in Control (or any of its affiliated entities) to or for the benefit of Executive (whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise) (the Payments) would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (the Excise Tax), and (B) the reduction of the amounts payable to Executive to the maximum amount that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to the Excise Tax (the Safe Harbor Cap) would provide Executive with a greater after tax amount than if such amounts were not reduced, then
9
the amounts payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below zero) to the Safe Harbor Cap. If the reduction of the amounts payable would not result in a greater after tax result to Executive, no amounts payable under this Agreement shall be reduced pursuant to this provision.
(A)     Reduction of Payments. The reduction of the amounts payable hereunder, if applicable, shall be made by reducing first cash amounts payable under this Agreement (in contrast to benefit amounts), and applying any reduction to amounts payable in the following order: (A) first, any cash amounts payable to Executive as a Termination Payment or Change in Control Termination Payment under this Agreement, as applicable; (B) second, any cash amounts payable by Company for Outplacement Services on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement; (C) third, any amounts payable by Company on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement for continued Medical Coverage; (D) fourth, any other cash amounts payable by Company to or on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement: (E) fifth, outstanding performance-based equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax; and (F) finally, any time-vesting equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax.
(B)     Determinations by Accounting Firm. All determinations required to be made under this Section 4(f)(v) shall be made by the public accounting firm that is retained by the Company as of the date immediately prior to the Change in Control (the Accounting Firm) which shall provide detailed supporting calculations both to the Company and Executive within fifteen (15) business days of the receipt of notice from the Company or Executive that there has been a Payment, or such earlier time as is requested by the Company. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event (A) the Board shall determine prior to the Change in Control that the Accounting Firm is precluded from performing such services under applicable auditor independence rules or (B) the Audit Committee of the Board determines that it does not want the Accounting Firm to perform such services because of auditor independence concerns or (C) the Accounting Firm is serving as accountant or auditor for the person(s) effecting the Change in Control, the Board shall appoint another nationally recognized public accounting firm reasonably acceptable to Executive to make the determinations required hereunder (which accounting firm shall then be referred to as the Accounting Firm hereunder). All fees, costs and expenses (including, but not limited to, the costs of retaining experts) of the Accounting Firm shall be borne by the Company. If Payments are reduced to the Safe Harbor Cap or the Accounting Firm determines that no Excise Tax is payable by Executive without a reduction in Payments, the Accounting Firm shall provide a written opinion to Executive to the effect that the Executive is not required to report any Excise Tax on the Executive's federal income tax return, and that the failure to report the Excise Tax, if any, on Executive's applicable federal income tax return will not result in the imposition of a negligence or similar penalty. The determination by the Accounting Firm shall be binding upon the Company and Executive (except as provided in paragraph 4(f)(v)(C) below).
10
(C)     Excess Payment/Underpayment. If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an Internal Revenue Service (the IRS) proceeding which has been finally and conclusively resolved, that Payments have been made to, or provided for the benefit of, Executive, which are in excess of the limitations provided in this Section (referred to hereinafter as an Excess Payment), Executive shall repay the Excess Payment to the Company on demand, together with interest on the Excess Payment at the applicable federal rate (as defined in Section 1274(d) of the Code) from the date of Executive's receipt of such Excess Payment until the date of such repayment. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999 of the Code at the time of the determination, it is possible that Payments which will not have been made by the Company should have been made (an Underpayment), consistent with the calculations required to be made under this Section. In the event that it is determined (i) by the Accounting Firm, the Company (which shall include the position taken by the Company, or together with its consolidated group, on its federal income tax return) or the IRS or (ii) pursuant to a determination by a court, that an Underpayment has occurred, the Company shall pay an amount equal to such Underpayment to Executive within ten (10) days of such determination together with interest on such amount at the applicable federal rate from the date such amount would have been paid to Executive until the date of payment. Executive shall cooperate, to the extent the Executive's reasonable expenses are reimbursed by the Company, with any reasonable requests by the Company in connection with any contests or disputes with the IRS in connection with the Excise Tax or the determination of the Excess Payment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that amounts payable under this Agreement were reduced pursuant to paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) and the value of stock options is subsequently re-determined by the Accounting Firm within the context of Treasury Regulation 1.280G-1 Q/A 33 that reduces the value of the Payments attributable to such options, the Company shall promptly pay to Executive any amounts payable under this Agreement that were not previously paid solely as a result of paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) up to the Safe Harbor Cap.
(g)
    
Voluntary Termination Without Good Reason
.
In the event that the Executive terminates the Executive's employment at the Executive's own volition prior to the expiration of the Employment Term (except as provided in Subsection 4(e) above), such termination shall constitute a Voluntary Termination and in such event the Executive shall be limited to the same rights and benefits as provided in connection with a termination for Due Cause under Subsection 4(c) above.
(h)
    
Compliance With Code Section 409A
. Notwithstanding anything herein to the contrary, this Agreement is intended to be interpreted and operated so that the payment of the benefits set forth herein either shall either be exempt from the requirements of Section 409A of the Code or shall comply with the requirements of such provision; provided however that in no event shall the Company be liable to the Executive for or with respect to any taxes, penalties or interest which may be imposed upon the Executive pursuant to Section 409A. To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(iii) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Executive's separation from service, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(h)(1), from the Company (his Separation from Service), the Executive is a specified employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Executive earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Executive's Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death. The 409A Payments under this Agreement that would otherwise be made during such period shall be aggregated and paid in one lump sum, without interest, on the first business day following the end of the six (6) month period or following the date of the Executive's death, whichever is earlier, and the balance of the 409A Payments, if any, shall be paid in
11
accordance with the applicable payment schedule provided in this Section 4. To the extent any 409A Payment is conditioned on the Executive (or his legal representative) executing a release of claims, which 409A Payment would be made in a later taxable year of the Executive than the taxable year in which his Separation from Service occurs if such release were executed and delivered and became irrevocable at the last possible date allowed under this Agreement, such 409A Payment will be paid no earlier than such later taxable year. In applying Section 409A to compensation paid pursuant to this Agreement, any right to a series of installment payments under this Agreement shall be treated as a right to a series of separate payments. The Executive hereby acknowledges that he has been advised to seek and has sought the advice of a tax advisor with respect to the tax consequences to the Executive of all payments pursuant to this Agreement, including any adverse tax consequences or penalty taxes under Code Section 409A and applicable State tax law. Executive hereby agrees to bear the entire risk of any such adverse federal and State tax consequences and penalty taxes in the event any payment pursuant to this Agreement is deemed to be subject to Code Section 409A, and that no representations have been made to the Executive relating to the tax treatment of any payment pursuant to this Agreement under Code Section 409A and the corresponding provisions of any applicable State income tax laws.
(i)
    
Cooperation
.
During the term of the Executive's employment by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Executive's employment with the Company, the Executive agrees to be reasonably available to assist the Company and its representatives and agents with any business and/or litigation (or potential litigation) matters affecting or involving the Company. The Company will reimburse the Executive for all associated reasonable costs of travel.
(j)
    
Notice of Termination, Resignation and Release
.
Any termination under Subsection 4(b) by the Company for Disability or Subsection 4(c) for Due Cause or by the Executive for Good Reason under Subsection 4(e) or by the Company or the Executive within twelve (12) months after a Change in Control under Subsection 4(f) or by the Executive by Voluntary Termination under Subsection 4(g) shall be communicated by Notice of Termination to the other party thereto given in accordance with Paragraph 10.
(i)
    
Notice of Termination
.
For purposes of this Agreement, a Notice of Termination means a written notice which (i) indicates the specific termination provision in this Agreement relied upon, (ii) sets forth in reasonable detail the facts and circumstances claimed to provide a basis for termination of the Executive's employment under the provision so indicated and (iii) if the termination date is other than the date of receipt of such Notice, specifies the termination date (which date shall not be prior to the date of such notice or more than 15 days after the giving of such Notice).
12
(ii)
    
Resignation and Release
.
Notwithstanding anything in this Agreement to the contrary, in order to be eligible to receive any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executive's employment, in addition to fulfilling all other conditions precedent to such receipt, the Executive or the Executive's legal representative must:
(A) within 10 days after the termination date, resign as a member of the Board of Directors of the Company, if applicable, and as an officer, director, manager and employee of the Company and its Related Entities, and
(B) within 21 days (or such other period as required under applicable law) after presentation of a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel, execute said release, and within 7 days (or such other period as required under applicable law) after such execution not revoke said release, on behalf of the Executive and the Executive's estate, heirs and representatives, releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Company's and such Related Entities' respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to the Executive's employment with the Company; termination of the Executive's employment; all matters alleged or which could have been alleged in a charge or complaint against the Company; any and all injuries, losses or damages to Employee, including any claims for attorney's fees; any and all claims relating to the conduct of any employee, servant, officer, director or agent of the Company; and any and all matters, transactions or things occurring prior to the date of said release, including any and all possible claims, known or unknown, which could have been asserted against the Company or the Company's employees, agents, servants, officers or directors. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the form of release shall except out therefrom, and acknowledge the Executive's continuing rights with respect to, the following: (i) all vested rights that the Executive may have under all welfare, retirement and other plans and programs of the Company in which the Executive was participating at the time of his employment termination, including all equity plans and programs of the Company with respect to which equity awards were made to the Executive, (ii) all continuing rights that the Executive may have under this Agreement, and (iii) all rights that the Executive may have following the termination of his employment under the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, any applicable Company insurance and any indemnity agreements to which the Executive is a party which provide for indemnification, insurance or other, similar coverage for the Executive with respect to his actions or inactions as an officer, employee and/or member of the Board. For clarification, unless and until the Executive executes and does not, within any applicable revocation period, revoke the release, the Company shall have no obligation to make any Termination Payment to the Executive, and, even if the Executive does not execute the release, the Executive shall be bound by the post-termination provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation Section 18.
13
(k)
    
Earned and Accrued Payments
.
The foregoing notwithstanding, upon the termination of the Executive's employment at any time, for any reason, the Executive shall be paid all amounts that had already been earned and accrued as of the time of termination, including but not limited to (i) pay for unused vacation accrued in accordance with the Company's vacation policy; (ii) any bonus that had been earned but not yet paid; and (iii) reimbursement for any business expenses accrued in accordance with Subsection 3(d).
(l)
    
Employment at Will.
The Executive hereby agrees that the Company may terminate the Executive's employment under this Paragraph 4 at will, without regard to: (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of the Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to the Executive, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to the Executive's relationship with the Company; or (iii) without a determination of Due Cause by the Company.
5.
    
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
. In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards) as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to such provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant.
6.
    
Successors and Assigns
.
(a)
Assignment by the Company
.
This Agreement shall be binding upon and inure to the benefit of the Company or any corporation or other entity to which the Company may transfer all or substantially all of its assets and business and to which the Company may assign this Agreement, in which case the term Company, as used herein, shall mean such corporation or other entity, provided that no such assignment shall relieve the Company from any obligations hereunder, whether arising prior to or after such assignment.
(b)
Assignment by the Executive
.
The Executive may not assign this Agreement or any part hereof without the prior written consent of the Company;
provided
,
however
, that nothing herein shall preclude the Executive from designating one or more beneficiaries to receive any amount that may be payable following occurrence of the Executive's legal incompetency or Death and shall not preclude the legal representative of the Executive's estate from assigning any right hereunder to the person or persons entitled thereto under the Executive's will or, in the case of intestacy, to the person or persons entitled thereto under the laws of intestacy applicable to the Executive's estate. The term beneficiaries, as used in this Agreement, shall mean a beneficiary or beneficiaries so designated to receive any such amount or, if no beneficiary has been so designated, the legal representative of the Executive (in the event of the Executive's incompetency) or the Executive's estate.
7.
    
Governing Law
.
This Agreement shall be governed by the laws of the Commonwealth of Virginia.
8.
    
Entire Agreement
.
This Agreement, which shall include the Exhibits hereto, contains all of the understandings and representations between the parties hereto pertaining to the matters referred to herein, and supersedes all undertakings and agreements, whether oral or in writing, previously entered into by them with respect thereto, including any previous employment, severance and/or non-competition agreements. This Agreement may only be modified by an instrument in writing signed by both parties hereto.
14
9.
    
Waiver of Breach
.
The waiver by any party of a breach of any condition or provision of this Agreement to be performed by such other party shall not operate or be construed to be a waiver of a similar or dissimilar provision or condition at the same or any prior or subsequent time.
10.
    
Notices
.
Any notice to be given hereunder shall be in writing and delivered personally, or sent by certified mail, postage prepaid, return receipt requested, addressed to the party concerned at the address indicated below or to such other address as such party may subsequently give notice of hereunder in writing:
If to the Company
:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: General Counsel
With a copy to:
Advance Auto Parts, Inc.
5008 Airport Road
Roanoke, VA 24012
Attn: Chief Executive Officer
If to the Executive:
_________________________________________                        
_________________________________________                        
_________________________________________                        
                                    
11.
    
Arbitration
.
Any controversy or claim arising out of or relating to this Agreement, or any breach thereof, excepting only the enforcement of any Loyalty Obligations arising under Paragraph 18 of this Agreement, shall be settled by arbitration in accordance with the rules of the American Arbitration Association then in effect in the Commonwealth of Virginia and judgment upon such award rendered by the arbitrators may be entered in any court having jurisdiction thereof. The board of arbitrators shall consist of one arbitrator to be appointed by the Company, one by the Executive, and one by the two arbitrators so chosen. The arbitration shall be held at such place as may be agreed upon at the time by the parties to the arbitration. The cost of arbitration shall be borne as determined by the arbitrators.
12.
    
Withholding
.
Anything to the contrary notwithstanding, all payments required to be made by the Company hereunder to the Executive or the Executive's estate or beneficiaries shall be subject to the withholding of such amounts relating to taxes as the Company may reasonably determine it should withhold pursuant to any applicable law or regulation. In lieu of withholding such amounts, in whole or in part, the Company may, in its sole discretion, accept other provisions for payment of taxes and withholdings as required by law, provided it is satisfied that all requirements of law affecting its responsibilities to withhold have been satisfied.
15
13.
    
Severability
.
In the event that any provision or portion of this Agreement shall be determined to be invalid or unenforceable for any reason, the remaining provisions or portions of this Agreement shall be unaffected thereby and shall remain in full force and effect to the fullest extent permitted by law.
14.
    
Titles
.
Titles to the paragraphs and subsections in this Agreement are intended solely for convenience and no provision of this Agreement is to be construed by reference to the title of any paragraph or subsection.
15.
    
Counterparts
. This Agreement may be executed in two or more counterparts, each of which shall be deemed an original but all of which together shall constitute one and the same instrument.
16.
    
Amendment
. Except as provided in Paragraph 13 above, this Agreement may not be modified or amended except by written instrument signed by all parties hereto.
17.
    
Counsel
.
This Agreement has been prepared by the Company with the assistance of Bingham McCutchen LLP, as counsel to the Company (Counsel), after full disclosure of its representation of the Company and with the consent and direction of the Company and the Executive. The Executive has reviewed the contents of this Agreement and fully understands its terms. The Executive acknowledges that the Executive is fully aware of the Executive's right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company, that the Company has advised him of such right and disclosed to him the risks in not seeking such independent advice, and that the Executive fully understands the potentially adverse interests of the parties with respect to this Agreement. The Executive further acknowledges that neither the Company nor its Counsel has made representations or given any advice with respect to the tax or other consequences of this Agreement or any transactions contemplated by this Agreement to him and that the Executive has been advised of the importance of seeking independent counsel with respect to such consequences. By executing this Agreement, the Executive represents that the Executive has, after being advised of the potential conflicts between him and the Company with respect to the future consequences of this Agreement, either consulted independent legal counsel or elected, notwithstanding the advisability of seeking such independent legal counsel, not to consult with such independent legal counsel.
18.
    
Loyalty Obligations
.
The Executive agrees that the following obligations (Loyalty Obligations) shall apply in consideration of the Executive's employment by or continued employment with the Company:
    
(a)
    
Confidential Information
.
(i)
    
Company Information
. The Executive agrees at all times during the term of the Executive's employment and thereafter, to hold any Confidential Information of the Company or its Related Entities in strictest confidence, and not to use (except for the benefit of the Company to fulfill the Executive's employment obligations) or to disclose to any person, firm or corporation other than the Company or those designated by it said Confidential Information without the prior authorization of the Company, except as may otherwise be required by law or legal process. The Executive agrees that Confidential Information means any proprietary information prepared or maintained in any format, including technical data, trade secrets or know-how in which the Company or Related Entities have an interest, including, but not limited to, business records, contracts, research, product or service plans, products, services, customer lists and customers (including, but not limited to, vendors to the Company or Related Entities on whom the Executive called, with whom the Executive dealt or with whom the Executive became acquainted during the term of the Executive's employment), pricing data, costs, markets, expansion plans, summaries, marketing and other business strategies, software, developments, inventions, processes, formulas, technology, designs, drawings, engineering, hardware configuration or marketing, financial or other business information obtained by the Executive or
16
disclosed to the Executive by the Company or Related Entities or any other person or entity during the term of the Executive's employment with the Company either directly or indirectly electronically, in writing, orally, by drawings, by observation of services, systems or other aspects of the business of the Company or Related Entities or otherwise. Confidential Information does not include information that: (A) was available to the public prior to the time of disclosure, whether through press releases, SEC filings or otherwise; or (B) otherwise becomes available to the public through no act or omission of the Executive.
(ii)
    
Third Party Information
. The Executive recognizes that the Company and Related Entities have received and in the future will receive from third parties their confidential or proprietary information subject to a duty on the part of the Company or Related Entities to maintain the confidentiality of such information and to use it only for certain limited purposes. The Executive agrees at all times during the Executive's employment and thereafter to hold all such confidential or proprietary information in the strictest confidence and not to disclose it to any person, firm or corporation or to use it except as necessary in carrying out the Executive's work for the Company consistent with the obligations of the Company or Related Entities with such third party.
(b)
    
Conflicting Employment
. The Executive agrees that, during the term of the Executive's employment with the Company, the Executive will not engage in any other employment, occupation, consulting or other business activity directly related to the business in which the Company or Related Entities are now involved or become involved during the term of the Executive's employment. Nor will the Executive engage in any other activities that conflict with the business of the Company or Related Entities. Furthermore the Executive agrees to devote such time as may be necessary to fulfill the Executive's obligations to the Company.
(c)
    
Returning Company Property
. The Executive agrees that any and all devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items developed by the Executive or others pursuant to or during the Executive's employment with the Company or otherwise shall be the property of the Company or its Related Entities and their respective successors or assigns. At the time of leaving the employ of the Company, the Executive will deliver all material Company property to the Company or to the Company's designee and will not keep in the Executive's possession, recreate or deliver said property to anyone else. In the event of the termination of the Executive's employment and upon request by the Company, the Executive agrees to sign and deliver the Termination Certification attached hereto as
Exhibit A
.
17
(d)
    
Notification of New Employer
. In the event that the Executive leaves the employ of the Company, the Executive hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to the Executive's new employer (whether the Executive is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, executive, volunteer or manager) about the Executive's Loyalty Obligations specified under this Agreement.
(e)
    
Non-Interference
. The Executive covenants and agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and for a period of one (1) year immediately following the termination of the Executive's employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive shall not, without the prior written approval of the Company, directly or indirectly, either on behalf of the Executive or any other person or entity, Interfere with the Company or any of its Related Entities.
(i)
    
For purposes of this Agreement, Interfere shall mean, except in the performance of the Executive's duties and responsibilities on behalf of and for the benefit of the Company, (A) to solicit, entice, persuade, induce, influence or attempt to influence, directly or indirectly, customers or prospective customers, suppliers or prospective suppliers, employees, agents or independent contractors of the Company or any of its Related Entities to restrict, reduce, sever or otherwise alter their relationship with the Company or any of its Related Entities, or (B) to hire on the Executive's own behalf or on behalf of any other person or entity, directly or indirectly, any current or former employee or independent contractor of the Company who at any time was supervised (1) directly by the Executive or (2) by another person who was supervised directly by the Executive, or (C) whether as a direct solicitor or provider of such services, or in a direct management or direct supervisory capacity over others who solicit or provide such services, to solicit or provide services that fall within the definition of Restricted Activities as defined in Subsection 18(f)(ii) below to any customer of the Company or its Related Entities.
(ii)
    
After termination of the Executive's employment, this provision shall only apply to those current or former employees, independent contractors, customers or suppliers of the Company or Related Entities who were such at any time within 12 months prior to the date of such termination.
 
18
(f)
    
Covenants Not to Compete
(i)
    
Non-Competition
. The Executive covenants and agrees that during the period from the date hereof until, one (1) year immediately following the termination, for any reason, of the Executive's employment with the Company (the Non-Compete Period), the Executive will not, directly or indirectly:
(A)
    
own or hold, directly or beneficially, as a shareholder (other than as a shareholder with less than 5% of the outstanding common stock of a publicly traded corporation), option holder, warrant holder, partner, member or other equity or security owner or holder of any company or business that derives more than 15% of its revenue from the Restricted Activities (as defined below) within the Restricted Area (as defined below), or any company or business controlling, controlled by or under common control with any company or business directly engaged in such Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area (any of the foregoing, a Restricted Company) or
(B)
    
engage or participate as an employee, director, officer, manager, executive, partner, independent contractor, consultant or technical or business advisor (or any foreign equivalents of the foregoing) with any Restricted Company in the Restricted Activities within the Restricted Area.
(ii)
    
Restricted Activities/Restricted Area
.
For purposes of this Agreement, the term Restricted Activities means the retail, wholesale or commercial sale of aftermarket auto parts and accessories. The term Restricted Area means the United States of America, including its territories and possessions.
(iii)
    
Association with Restricted Company
.
In the event that the Executive intends to associate (whether as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, officer, manager, advisor, partner, executive, volunteer or director) with any Restricted Company during the Non-Compete Period, the Executive must provide information in writing to the Company relating to the activities proposed to be engaged in by the Executive for such Restricted Company. All such current associations are set forth on
Exhibit B
to this Agreement. In the event that the Company consents in writing to the Executive's engagement in such activity, the engaging in such activity by the Executive shall be conclusively deemed not to be a violation of this Subsection 18(f). Such consent is not intended and shall not be deemed to be a waiver or nullification of the covenant of non-competition of the Executive or other similarly bound executives.
(g)
    
Non-Disparagement
. The Executive agrees that while the Executive is employed by the Company and at all times following the termination of the Executive's employment with the Company for any reason, the Executive will not take any action or make any statement which disparages the Company or its practices or which disrupts or impairs its normal operations, such that it causes a material adverse impact to the Company.
19
(h)
    
Effect of Non-Payment of Benefits; Clawback
.
The Executive's post-termination of employment obligations under this Paragraph 18 shall cease upon the Company's failure to make any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executive's employment when due if within 15 days after written notice from the Executive to the Company of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment. In the event that the Executive materially violates Subsection 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five (5) days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the applicable period under Subsection 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g), and the denominator of which is the total number of days in the applicable period under such Section. In the event that the Executive materially violates Subsection 18(a) or 18(c), and does not cure such violation (if it can be cured) within five days after written notice of such failure, the Executive agrees that calculation of the harm to the Company from such violation would be uncertain and not capable of being readily ascertained, and that as a reasonable estimation of the harm to the Company from such violation the Executive shall repay to the Company a portion of the Termination Payment paid to the Executive pursuant to Section 4(d)(i) equal to a fraction, the numerator of which is the number of days left in the one (1) year period immediately following the termination and the denominator of which is 365. The Executive further agrees that such repayment obligation shall constitute liquidated damages and that the Company shall have no other right to damages under this Agreement or at law with respect to breaches of Subsection 18(a), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f), or 18(g), but the Company shall have the right to seek equitable relief pursuant to Subsection 18(i) hereunder.
(i)
    
Specific Enforcement; Remedies Cumulative; Attorney Fees
. The Executive acknowledges that the Company and Related Entities, as the case may be, will be irreparably injured if the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) and 18(g) hereof are not specifically enforced and the Executive agrees that the terms of such provisions (including without limitation the periods set forth in Subsections 18(e), 18(f) and 18(g)) are reasonable and appropriate. If the Executive commits, or the Company has evidence based on which it reasonably believes the Executive threatens to commit, a material breach of any of the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof, the Company and/or Related Entities, as the case may be, shall have the right and remedy, in addition to and not in limitation of any other remedy that may be available at law or in equity, to have the provisions of Subsections 18(a), 18(b), 18(c), 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof specifically enforced by any court having jurisdiction through immediate injunctive and other equitable relief, it being acknowledged and agreed that any such breach or threatened breach will cause irreparable injury to the Company and/or Related Entities and that money damages will not provide an adequate remedy therefore. Such injunction shall be available without the posting of any bond or other security, and the Executive hereby consents to the issuance of such injunction.
(j)
    
Re-Set of Period for Non-Competition and Non-Interference
.
In the event that a legal or equitable action is commenced with respect to any of the provisions of Subsections 18(e), 18(f) or 18(g) hereof and the Executive has not complied, in all material respects, with the provisions in such subsections with respect to which such action has been commenced, then the one-year period, as described in such subsections not so complied with by the Executive, shall be extended from its original expiration date, day-for-day, for each day that the Executive is found to have not complied, in all material respects, with such subsections.
20
(k)
    
Jurisdiction and Venue.
WITH RESPECT TO THE ENFORCEMENT OF ANY AND ALL LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS ARISING UNDER PARAGRAPH 18, THE SUBSECTIONS 18(k) AND 18(l) OF THIS AGREEMENT SHALL APPLY. THE PARTIES HERETO IRREVOCABLY AND UNCONDITIONALLY CONSENT TO THE EXCLUSIVE JURISDICTION OF THE FOLLOWING COURTS IN MATTERS RELATED TO THIS PARAGRAPH 18 AND AGREE NOT TO COMMENCE ANY SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING RELATING THERETO EXCEPT IN ANY OF SUCH COURTS: THE STATE COURTS OF THE COMMONWEALTH OF VIRGINIA, THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN THE CITY OF ROANOKE, VIRGINIA, OR THE STATE COURTS OR THE COURTS OF THE UNITED STATES OF AMERICA LOCATED IN ANY MUNICIPALITY WHEREIN AN OFFICE OF THE COMPANY IS LOCATED, IN WHICH OFFICE THE EXECUTIVE WAS PHYSICALLY PRESENT WHILE RENDERING SERVICES FOR THE COMPANY AT ANY TIME DURING THE 12 MONTHS IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE COMMENCEMENT OF SUCH SUIT, ACTION OR PROCEEDING OR IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING THE TERMINATION OF EXECUTIVE'S EMPLOYMENT, IF TERMINATED.
(l)
    
Waiver of Jury Trial.
EXECUTIVE AGREES TO WAIVE THE RIGHT TO A TRIAL BY JURY IN ANY ACTION OR PROCEEDING BASED UPON, OR RELATED TO, ANY LOYALTY OBLIGATIONS. THIS WAIVER IS KNOWINGLY, INTENTIONALLY, AND VOLUNTARILY MADE BY EXECUTIVE, AND EXECUTIVE ACKNOWLEDGES THAT, EXCEPT FOR THE COMPANY'S AGREEMENT TO LIKEWISE WAIVE ITS RIGHTS TO A TRIAL BY JURY (WHICH THE COMPANY HEREBY MAKES), THE COMPANY HAS NOT MADE ANY REPRESENTATIONS OF FACTS TO INDUCE THIS WAIVER OF TRIAL BY JURY OR IN ANY WAY TO MODIFY OR NULLIFY ITS EFFECT. EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS BEEN REPRESENTED (OR HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO BE REPRESENTED) IN THE SIGNING OF THIS AGREEMENT AND IN THE MAKING OF THIS WAIVER BY INDEPENDENT LEGAL COUNSEL, SELECTED OF EXECUTIVE'S OWN FREE WILL, AND THAT EXECUTIVE HAS HAD THE OPPORTUNITY TO DISCUSS THIS WAIVER WITH COUNSEL. EXECUTIVE FURTHER ACKNOWLEDGES THAT EXECUTIVE HAS READ AND UNDERSTANDS THE MEANING AND RAMIFICATIONS OF THIS WAIVER AND AS EVIDENCE OF THIS FACT SIGNS THIS AGREEMENT BELOW.
20.
    
Adherence to Company Policies
.
The Executive agrees to adhere diligently to all established Company policies and procedures, including but not limited to the Company's Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, Code of Ethics and Business Conduct and, if applicable, the Code of Ethics for Financial Professionals. The Executive agrees that if the Executive does not adhere to any of the provisions of such Guidelines and Codes, the Executive will be in breach of the provisions hereof.
21.
    
Representations
. The Executive agrees to execute any proper oath or verify any proper document required to carry out the terms of this Agreement. The Executive represents that Executive's performance of all the terms of this Agreement will not breach any agreement to keep in confidence proprietary information acquired by the Executive in confidence or in trust prior to the Executive's employment by the Company. The Executive has not entered into, and the Executive agrees the Executive will not enter into, any oral or written agreement in conflict herewith and the Executive's employment by the Company and the Executive's services to the Company will not violate the terms of any oral or written agreement to which the Executive is a party.
21
22.
    
Binding Effect of Execution
. The Company and the Executive agree that this Agreement shall not bind or be enforceable by or against either party until this Agreement has been duly executed by both the Executive and the Company.
[SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS]
    
22
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and the Executive have executed this Agreement as of the date first written above.
23
EXHIBIT A
TERMINATION CERTIFICATION
This is to certify that I do not have in my possession, nor have I failed to return, any material devices, records, data, notes, reports, proposals, lists, correspondence, specifications, drawings, blueprints, sketches, materials, equipment, other documents or property, or reproductions of any aforementioned items belonging to the Company.
I further certify that I have, to the best of my knowledge, complied in all material respects with all the terms of my Employment Agreement with the Company.
EXHIBIT B
LIST OF ASSOCIATIONS WITH RESTRICTED COMPANIES
____ None
____ Additional Sheets Attached
Signature of the Executive: _________________________________
Print Name of the Executive: ________________________________
Date: _______________________________
                


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130523084129.txt.gz
TIME:20130523084129
EVENTS:	Results of Operations and Financial Condition	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Results of Operations and Financial Condition
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
UNITED STATES
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
May 23, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 2.02 Results of Operations and Financial Condition.
On
May 23, 2013
, Advance Auto Parts, Inc., or the Company, issued a press release setting forth its financial results for its
first quarter
ended
April 20, 2013
. This release also includes forward looking statements related to the Company's 2013 fiscal year. The press release is attached as Exhibit 99.1 and incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01 Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
Note: The information contained in this Current Report on Form 8-K (including Exhibit 99.1) shall not be deemed to be filed for the purposes of Section 18 of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as amended, or otherwise subject to the liabilities of that section.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

ADVANCE AUTO PARTS REPORTS FIRST QUARTER FISCAL 2013 RESULTS
ROANOKE, Va, May 23, 2013
- Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (NYSE: AAP), a leading retailer of automotive aftermarket parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items, today announced its financial results for the first quarter ended
April 20, 2013
. First quarter earnings per diluted share (EPS) were
$1.65
which was a
7.8%
decrease versus the first quarter last year.
During the first quarter, as anticipated, our business continued to be constrained by the unseasonably warm weather last year which had deferred the maintenance on vehicles. Additionally, due to the impact of payroll tax increases on our core consumer, delayed income tax refunds and a very slow start to the spring selling season, our business was softer than anticipated with our comp store sales declining 3.2%,  said Darren R. Jackson, Chief Executive Officer.  However, we had our best performance the last two weeks of our first quarter.  During that period we saw our first week of positive transaction growth and strength across our major categories.    We are encouraged by the fact that we have continued to generate positive comp store sales growth so far through our second quarter. This is a clear sign that our market remains strong and consumers still have a willingness to invest in reliable transportation.
First Quarter Highlights
Total sales for the
first quarter
increased
3.0%
to
$2.02 billion
, as compared with total sales during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012. The sales increase was driven by the acquisition of BWP and the net addition of 163 new stores over the past 12 months, partially offset by a comparable store sales decrease of
3.2%
versus a comparable store sales increase of
2.1%
during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012.
The Company's gross profit rate was
50.0%
of sales during the
first quarter
as compared to
50.1%
during the
first quarter
last year. The
8
basis-point decrease in gross profit rate was primarily due to planned increases in supply chain costs related to the full operations of the Company's new distribution center and the impact of BWP sales, which have a lower gross margin rate as a result of the much higher mix of their sales to commercial customers. The decrease was partially offset by improved shrink rates.
The Company's SG&A rate was
39.9%
of sales during the
first quarter
as compared to
38.6%
during the same period last year. The
127
basis-point increase was primarily due to expense deleverage as a result of the Company's
3.2%
comparable store sales decline and increased new store openings. The SG&A rate increase was partially offset by lower advertising expense and a decrease in credit card fees as a result of the insourcing of the Company's commercial credit program.
The Company's operating income during the
first quarter
of
$204.1 million
decreased
9.1%
versus the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012. On a rate basis, operating income was
10.1%
of total sales as compared to
11.5%
during the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012.
Operating cash flow decreased
42.5%
to
$135.3 million
from
$235.4 million
through the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012. The
$105.6 million
usage of free cash flow versus the
$153.1 million
of free cash flow provided through the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012 was primarily due to the Company's acquisition of BWP which occurred at the beginning of the fiscal year. Capital expenditures were
$63.1 million
as compared to
$82.5 million
through the
first quarter
of fiscal 2012.
While we are never satisfied when we don't achieve our expectations, we were pleased with our team's disciplined focus on expense management during the quarter to respond to the softer sales environment. This allowed us to deliver a better bottom-line performance than we anticipated and communicated at the beginning of April, said Mike Norona, Executive Vice President and Chief Financial Officer. It is still early enough in the year that we are maintaining our annual outlook, but given the softness in our first quarter and the slow start to spring, we now expect to be at the lower end of our previously shared annual outlook of $5.30 to $5.45.
2
Store Information
    
During the
first quarter
, the Company acquired
124
BWP stores, opened
56
stores, including
7
Autopart International stores and closed
5
stores. As of
April 20, 2013
, the Company's total store count was
3,969
including
223
Autopart International stores.
Share Repurchase Program
During the
first quarter
, the Company repurchased approximately
767 thousand
shares of its common stock at an aggregate cost of
$58.8 million
, or an average price of
$76.72
per share.
As of
April 20, 2013
, the Company had approximately
$434 million
available on the Company's
$500 million
share repurchase program authorized by the Company's Board of Directors on May 14, 2012.
Dividend
On
May 21, 2013
, the Company's Board of Directors declared a regular quarterly cash dividend of
$0.06
per
share to be paid on
July 5, 2013
to stockholders of record as of
June 21, 2013
.
Annual Stockholders' Meeting Announcements
The Company held its annual meeting of stockholders on May 22, 2013. During the meeting, the following individuals were elected to serve on the Company's Board of Directors for the next year: John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray, Carlos A. Saladrigas and Jimmie L. Wade.
3
The Company's stockholders voted to approve the compensation of the Company's named executive officers, approved a proposal to amend the Company's certificate of incorporation to eliminate supermajority voting requirements and approved a proposal to amend the Company's certificate of incorporation to permit stockholders who have owned at least 25 percent of the Company's outstanding shares of common stock continuously for one year, to call a special meeting. The stockholders also ratified the appointment by the Company's Audit Committee of Deloitte & Touche LLP as its independent registered public accounting firm for 2013.
Investor Conference Call
The Company will host a conference call on Thursday, May 23, 2013, at 10:00 a.m. Eastern Time to discuss its quarterly results. To listen to the live call, please log on to the Company's website, www.AdvanceAutoParts.com, or dial (866) 908-1AAP. The call will be archived on the Company's website until May 23, 2014.
About Advance Auto Parts
Headquartered in Roanoke, Va., Advance Auto Parts, Inc., a leading automotive aftermarket retailer of parts, accessories, batteries, and maintenance items in the United States, serves both the do-it-yourself and professional installer markets. As of
April 20, 2013
, the Company operated
3,969
stores in
39
states, Puerto Rico, and the Virgin Islands. Additional information about the Company, employment opportunities, customer services, and online shopping for parts, accessories and other offerings can be found on the Company's website at www.AdvanceAutoParts.com.
Certain statements contained in this release are forward-looking statements, as that statement is used in the Private Securities Litigation Reform Act of 1995. Forward-looking statements address future events or developments, and typically use words such as believe, anticipate, expect, intend, plan, forecast, outlook or estimate. These statements discuss, among other things, expected growth and future performance, including store growth, capital expenditures, comparable store sales, SG&A, operating income, gross profit rate, free cash flow, profitability and earnings per diluted share for fiscal year 2013. These forward-looking statements are subject to risks, uncertainties and assumptions including, but not limited to, competitive pressures, demand for the Company's products, the market for auto parts, the economy in general, inflation, consumer debt levels, the weather, business interruptions, information technology security, availability of suitable real estate, dependence on foreign suppliers and other factors disclosed in the Company's 10-K for the fiscal year ended December 29, 2012 on file with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Actual results may differ materially from anticipated results described in these forward-looking statements. The Company intends these forward-looking statements to speak only as of the time of this news release and does not undertake to update or revise them as more information becomes available.
###
4
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated balance sheets have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared balance sheets filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by generally accepted accounting principles, or GAAP, for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of operations have been prepared on a basis consistent with our previously prepared statements of operations filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: These preliminary condensed consolidated statements of cash flows have been prepared on a consistent basis with previously prepared statements of cash flows filed with the Securities and Exchange Commission for our prior quarter and annual report, but do not include the footnotes required by GAAP for complete financial statements.
NOTE: Management uses free cash flow as a measure of our liquidity and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders of our ability to implement our growth strategies and service our debt. Free cash flow is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated statement of cash flows.
NOTE: Management uses ROIC to evaluate return on investments to the business and believes it is a useful indicator to stockholders given the future investments the Company plans to make in areas including information technology, supply chain and stores. ROIC is a non-GAAP measure and should be considered in addition to, but not as a substitute for, information contained in our condensed consolidated financial statements. Management believes our comparable results of operations are a useful indicator to stockholders for consistency purposes.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130529171614.txt.gz
TIME:20130529171614
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
May 22, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the
registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
At the 2013 annual meeting of stockholders of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) held May 22, 2013, the Company's stockholders re-elected John F. Bergstrom, John C. Brouillard, Fiona P. Dias, Darren R. Jackson, William S. Oglesby, J. Paul Raines, Gilbert T. Ray, Carlos A. Saladrigas and Jimmie L. Wade to serve as members of the Company's Board of Directors (Board) until the 2014 annual meeting of stockholders.
Item 5.07. Submission of Matters to a Vote of Security Holders.
There were 7,989,460 broker non-votes recorded for each nominee.
The compensation of the named executive officers was approved by the following non-binding advisory vote:
                            
The proposal to amend the Company's certificate of incorporation to eliminate supermajority voting requirements was approved by the following vote:
The proposal to amend the Company's certificate of incorporation to permit stockholders who have owned at least 25 percent of the Company's outstanding shares of common stock continuously for one year to call a special meeting:
Stockholders ratified the appointment of Deloitte and Touche LLP as the Company's independent registered public accounting firm for 2013. The vote on the proposal was as follows:
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130606101813.txt.gz
TIME:20130606101813
EVENTS:	Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers: Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
May 31, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.02  Departure of Directors or Certain Officers; Election of Directors; Appointment of Certain Officers; Compensatory Arrangements of Certain Officers.
 
On May 31, 2013, Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Company) and Michael A. Norona, the Company's Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer and Assistant Secretary, entered into a Third Amendment to the Employment Agreement between the Company and Mr. Norona dated as of June 4, 2008 (Third Amendment). The Third Amendment became effective as of June 4, 2013, and will continue for an initial one-year term, which will be automatically renewable for additional one-year terms unless either party provides notice of non-renewal at least 90 days prior to the end of the then effective term.
In addition to certain other minor changes, the Third Amendment provides that the Company shall reduce the payments to be made to Mr. Norona in connection with a Change in Control to the maximum amount that could be paid to Mr. Norona without giving rise to an excise tax if the aggregate after-tax amount payable to Mr. Norona would be greater after giving effect to such reduction. The Third Amendment also eliminates (i) the tax gross-up payment intended to make Mr. Norona whole for excise taxes that may be imposed on the Change in Control payments that was previously included in the Employment Agreement and (ii) the obligation to accelerate vesting of equity awards upon Change in Control and provides that the vesting of equity compensation in the event of Change in Control will be governed by the terms of the applicable award agreement or grant. The Third Amendment further amends the Employment Agreement to reflect Mr. Norona's current base salary and annual target bonus amounts and to provide that any incentive compensation granted to Mr. Norona by the Company is subject to the Company's Incentive Compensation Clawback Policy as adopted by the Company's Board of Directors or Compensation Committee from time to time. The Third Amendment clarifies that the vesting of Mr. Norona's equity grants upon termination of employment is controlled by the terms of the respective equity awards, and revises the Termination Bonus Payment, as defined in the Employment Agreement, to be the average of annual bonuses paid to Mr. Norona for the past five fiscal years rather three fiscal years.  
The foregoing description of the Third Amendment is not complete and is qualified in its entirety by the full text of the Third Amendment, which is filed as Exhibit 10.40 to this Current Report on Form 8-K and incorporated by reference into this Item 5.02.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 10.40
EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT
Third Amendment
THIRD AMENDMENT, dated as of June 4, 2013 (Third Amendment) to the EMPLOYMENT AGREEMENT, dated as of June 4, 2008, and previously amended as of January 1, 2010, and December 31, 2012, between Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (Advance or the Company), a Delaware corporation, and Michael A. Norona (the Executive) (the Agreement).
The Company and the Executive agree as follows:
1.
    
Amendment to Section 1 of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 1 of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the second paragraph thereof to read as follows
:
The term of the Executive's employment by the Company pursuant to this Third Amendment to the Agreement shall commence on June 4, 2013 (Commencement Date) and shall end on the day prior to the first anniversary of the Commencement Date, unless sooner terminated under the provisions of Paragraph 4 below (Employment Term); provided, however, that commencing on the first anniversary of the Commencement Date (Anniversary Date) the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to the Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end on the day prior to the Anniversary Date; and on each Anniversary Date thereafter the Employment Term shall be automatically extended for an additional period of one year unless, not later than 90 days prior to such Anniversary Date, either party shall have given notice to the other that it does not wish to extend the Employment Term, in which case the Employment Term shall end 90 days following such notice.
2.
    
Amendment of Section 2(b) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 2(b) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(b)
    
Other Activities.
During the Term of this Agreement, it shall not be a violation of this Agreement for the Executive to, and the Executive shall be entitled to (i) serve on corporate, civic, charitable, retail industry association or professional association boards or committees within the limitations of the Company's Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues, (ii) deliver lectures, fulfill speaking engagements or teach at educational institutions and (iii) manage personal investments, so long as the activities set forth in (i), (ii), and (iii) above (x) do not significantly interfere with the performance of the Executive's duties and responsibilities as required by this Agreement and do not involve a conflict of interest with the Executive's duties or responsibilities hereunder, (y) are in compliance with the Company's policies and procedures in effect from time to time, including the
Code of Ethics & Business Conduct
and the
Guidelines on Significant Governance Issues
, in each case as may be amended periodically, and (z) do not violate Section 1
9
of this Agreement.
3.
    
Amendment of Section 3 of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 3 of the Agreement is hereby amended by renumbering former Section 3(d) as 3(e) and revising the language of Sections 3(a) through 3(d) thereof to read in their entirety as follows:
(a)
    
Base Salary
.
During the Employment Term, the Company shall pay to the Executive a salary of $550,000 per annum, payable consistent with the Company's standard payroll practices then in effect (Base Salary). Such Base Salary shall be reviewed by the Compensation Committee of Advance's Board of Directors (hereinafter the Compensation Committee) at least annually, with any changes taking into account, among other factors, the Company and individual performance.
(b)
    
Bonus
. The Executive shall receive a bonus in such amounts and based upon achievement of such corporate and individual performance and other criteria as shall be approved by the Compensation Committee from time to time, with a target amount, if such performance and other criteria are achieved, of 90 percent (90%) of the Base Salary (the Target Bonus Amount), with a maximum payout of 180 percent (180%) of the Base Salary during the initial Term of this Agreement, which bonus shall be paid in a manner consistent with the Company's bonus practices then in effect. The Target Bonus Amount and the maximum payout for any subsequent renewal Term of the Agreement shall be determined by the Compensation Committee. To be eligible to receive a bonus, the Executive must be employed by the Company on the date the bonus is paid.
(c)
    
Incentive Compensation Clawback
. Any compensation provided by the Company to the Executive, excepting only compensation pursuant to Section 3(a) above, shall be subject to the Company's Incentive Compensation Clawback Policy as such policy shall be adopted, and from time to time amended, by the Board or the Compensation Committee.
(d)
    
Benefit Plans
. During the Employment Term, the Executive shall be entitled to participate in all retirement and employment benefit plans and programs of the Company that are generally available to senior executives of the Company. Such participation shall be pursuant to the terms and conditions of such plans and programs, as the same shall be amended from time to time. The Executive shall be entitled to four (4) weeks paid vacation annually. In addition, during the Employment Term, the Executive shall be provided with a Company-paid annual physical examination.
4.
    
Amendment of Section 4(a) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(a) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
2
(a)
    
Death
.
In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the Executive's employment shall be automatically terminated as of the date of death and a lump sum amount, equivalent to the Executive's annual Base Salary and Target Bonus then in effect, shall be paid, within 60 days after the date of the Executive's death, to the Executive's designated beneficiary, or to the Executive's estate or other legal representative if no beneficiary was designated at the time of the Executive's death. In the event of the death of the Executive during the Employment Term, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Unit, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards), as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to the provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant. The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any death, disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans and programs in which the Executive was participating at the time of his death. Except in accordance with the terms of the Company's benefit programs and other plans and programs then in effect, after the date of the Executive's death, the Executive shall not be entitled to any other compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
5.
    
Amendment of Section 4(b) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(b) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language of the first paragraph thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(b)
    
Disability
.
In the event of the Executive's Disability as hereinafter defined, the employment of the Executive may be terminated by the Company, effective upon the Disability Termination Date (as defined below). In such event, the Company shall pay the Executive an amount equivalent to thirty percent (30%) of the Executive's Base Salary for a one year period, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five days following the Executive's separation from service, as that term is defined in Section 409A of the Code and regulations promulgated thereunder, from the Company (his Separation From Service), provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executive's behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B). The foregoing benefit will be provided in addition to any disability or other benefits provided under the Company's benefit plans in which the Executive participates. The purpose and intent of the preceding two sentences is to ensure that the Executive receives a combination of insurance benefits and Company payments following the Disability Termination Date equal to 100% of his then-applicable Base Salary for such one-year period. In the event that Executive does not elect to participate in the Company's long-term and/or short-term disability insurance benefit plans, the Company shall not be obligated to pay the Executive any amount in excess of thirty percent (30%) of the Executive's Base Salary. In the event of the Disability of the Executive during the Employment Term, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR,
3
Restricted Stock, Restricted Stock Unit, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards), as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to the provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant. The Company shall also pay to the Executive a lump sum amount equivalent to the Executive's Target Bonus Amount then in effect, which amount shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five (45) days following the Executive's Separation from Service, provided that the Executive or an individual duly authorized to execute legal documents on the Executive's behalf executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B). Otherwise, after the Disability Termination Date, except in accordance with the Company's benefit programs and other plans then in effect, the Executive shall not be entitled to any compensation or benefits from the Company or hereunder.
6.
    
Amendment of Section 4(c)(i) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(c)(i) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language of the first paragraph thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(i)
    
a material breach by the Executive of the Executive's duties and obligations under this Agreement or violation in any material respect of any code or standard of conduct generally applicable to the officers of the Company, including, but not limited to, the Company's Code of Ethics and Business Conduct, (1) which is willful and deliberate on the Executive's part, (2) which is not due to the Disability of the Executive (within the meaning of Subsection 4(b) but without regard to the requirement that it continue for more than six months or 180 days within a 270-day period), (3) which is committed in bad faith or without reasonable belief that such breach is in the best interests of the Company, and (4) which, if curable, has not been cured by the Executive within 15 business days after the Executive's receipt of notice to the Executive specifying the nature of such breach or violations;
7.
    
Amendment of Section 4(d)(i) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(d)(i) of the Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the word and following subsection (A), deleting subsection (C) in its entirety and revising the language of the Subsection (B) thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(B)
    
an amount equal to the average value of the annual bonuses pursuant to Section 3(b) paid to Executive for the five completed fiscal years immediately prior to the date of such termination; provided, however, that if Executive has been employed by the Company for fewer than three complete fiscal years prior to the date of such termination, Executive shall receive an amount equal to the average value of the annual bonuses pursuant to Section 3(b) that the Executive has received during the period of the Executive's employment (the Termination Bonus Payment).
4
8.
    
Amendment of Section 4(d)(iv) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(d)(iv) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(iv)
Timing of Payments
.
The Termination Salary Payment shall be paid in one lump sum within forty-five (45) days following the date of the Executive's Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
 
9.
    
Amendment of Section 4(f)(i) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(f)(i) of the Agreement is hereby amended by inserting the word and following subsection (A) and deleting subsection (C) in its entirety.
10
.
    
Amendment of Section 4(f)(ii) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(f)(ii) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(ii)
Timing of Payments
.
The Change In Control Termination Salary Payment and the Change In Control Termination Bonus Payment shall be paid in lump sum payments within forty-five (45) days following the date of the Executive's Separation From Service, provided that the Executive executes and does not revoke within any applicable revocation period the release described in Section 4(j)(ii)(B) below.
11
.
    
Amendment of Section 4(f)(iv) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(f)(iv) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(iv)
Change In
Control
. For purposes of this Agreement, Change In Control shall mean the happening of any of the following events:
(A)
an acquisition by any individual, entity or group (within the meaning of Section 13(d)(3) or 14(d)(2) of the Exchange Act) (an Entity) of beneficial ownership (within the meaning of Rule 13d-3 promulgated under the Exchange Act) of 25% or more of either (x) the then outstanding shares of the common stock of the Company (the Outstanding Company Common Stock) or (y) the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities of the Company entitled to vote generally in the election of directors (the Outstanding Company Voting Securities); excluding, however, the following: (1) any acquisition directly from the Company, other than an acquisition by virtue of the exercise of a conversion privilege unless the security being so converted was itself acquired directly from the Company, (2) any acquisition by the Company, (3) any acquisition by any employee benefit plan (or related trust) sponsored or maintained by the Company or any corporation controlled by the Company, or (4) any
5
acquisition by any corporation pursuant to a transaction that complies with clauses (x), (y) and (z) of Section 4(f)(iv)(C);
(B)
a change in the composition of the Board on the effective date of this Agreement such that the individuals who, as of the effective date, constitute the Board (such Board shall be hereinafter referred to as the Incumbent Board) cease for any reason to constitute at least a majority of the Board; provided, however, that for purposes of this definition, any individual who becomes a member of the Board subsequent to the effective date, whose election, or nomination for election, by the Company's stockholders was approved by a vote of at least a majority of those individuals who are members of the Board and who were also members of the Incumbent Board (or deemed to be such pursuant to this proviso) shall be considered as though such individual were a member of the Incumbent Board; and provided further, however, that any such individual whose initial assumption of office occurs as a result of or in connection with either an actual or threatened solicitation with respect to the election of directors (as such terms are used in Rule 14a-12(c) of Regulation 14A promulgated under the Exchange Act) or other actual or threatened solicitation of proxies or consents by or on behalf of an Entity other than the Board shall not be so considered as a member of the Incumbent Board;
(C)
the consummation of a merger, reorganization or consolidation or sale or other disposition of all or substantially all of the assets of the Company (each, a Corporate Transaction), excluding however, any Corporate Transaction pursuant to which (x) all or substantially all of the individuals and entities who are the beneficial owners, respectively, of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, more than 50% of, respectively, the outstanding shares of common stock, and the combined voting power of the then outstanding voting securities entitled to vote generally in the election of directors, as the case may be, of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction (including, without limitation, a corporation or other Person that as a result of such transaction owns the Company or all or substantially all of the Company's assets either directly or through one or more subsidiaries (a Parent Company)) in substantially the same proportions as their ownership, immediately prior to such Corporate Transaction, of the Outstanding Company Common Stock and Outstanding Company Voting Securities, as the case may be, (y) no Entity (other than the Company, any employee benefit plan (or related trust) of the Company, such corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction or, if reference was made to equity ownership of any Parent Company for purposes of determining whether clause (x) above is satisfied in connection with the applicable Corporate Transaction, such Parent Company) will beneficially own, directly or indirectly, 25% or more of, respectively, the outstanding
6
shares of common stock of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction or the combined voting power of the outstanding voting securities of such corporation entitled to vote generally in the election of directors unless such ownership resulted solely from ownership of securities of the Company prior to the Corporate Transaction, and (z) individuals who were members of the Incumbent Board will immediately after the consummation of the Corporate Transaction constitute at least a majority of the members of the board of directors of the corporation resulting from such Corporate Transaction (or, if reference was made to equity ownership of any Parent Company for purposes of determining whether clause (x) above is satisfied in connection with the applicable Corporate Transaction, of the Parent Company); or
(D)
the approval by the stockholders of the Company of the complete liquidation or dissolution of the Company.
12.
    
Amendment of Section 4(f)(v) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(f)(v) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(v)
IRC 280G Net-Best
. Anything in this Agreement to the contrary notwithstanding, in the event it shall be determined that (A) any payment, award, benefit or distribution (or any acceleration of any payment, award, benefit or distribution) by the Company (or any of its affiliated entities) or any entity which effectuates a Change in Control (or any of its affiliated entities) to or for the benefit of Executive (whether pursuant to the terms of this Agreement or otherwise) (the Payments) would be subject to the excise tax imposed by Section 4999 of the Internal Revenue Code (the Excise Tax), and (B) the reduction of the amounts payable to Executive to the maximum amount that could be paid to Executive without giving rise to the Excise Tax (the Safe Harbor Cap) would provide Executive with a greater after tax amount than if such amounts were not reduced, then the amounts payable to Executive shall be reduced (but not below zero) to the Safe Harbor Cap. If the reduction of the amounts payable would not result in a greater after tax result to Executive, no amounts payable under this Agreement shall be reduced pursuant to this provision.
(A)
    
Reduction of Payments
. The reduction of the amounts payable hereunder, if applicable, shall be made by reducing first cash amounts payable under this Agreement (in contrast to benefit amounts), and applying any reduction to amounts payable in the following order: (A) first, any cash amounts payable to Executive as a Termination Payment or Change in Control Termination Payment under this Agreement, as applicable; (B) second, any cash amounts payable by Company for Outplacement Services on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement; (C) third, any amounts payable by Company on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement for continued Medical Coverage; (D) fourth, any other cash
7
amounts payable by Company to or on behalf of Executive under the terms of this Agreement: (E) fifth, outstanding performance-based equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax; and (F) finally, any time-vesting equity grants to the extent that any such grants would be subject to the Excise Tax.
(C)
    
Excess Payment/Underpayment
. If it is established pursuant to a final determination of a court or an Internal Revenue Service (the IRS) proceeding which has been finally and conclusively resolved, that Payments have been made to, or provided for the benefit of, Executive, which are in excess of the limitations provided in this Section (referred to hereinafter as an Excess Payment), Executive shall repay the Excess Payment to the Company on demand, together with interest on the Excess Payment at the applicable federal rate (as defined in Section 1274(d) of the Code) from the date of Executive's receipt of such Excess Payment until the date of such repayment. As a result of the uncertainty in the application of Section 4999
  
8
of the Code at the time of the determination, it is possible that Payments which will not have been made by the Company should have been made (an Underpayment), consistent with the calculations required to be made under this Section. In the event that it is determined (i) by the Accounting Firm, the Company (which shall include the position taken by the Company, or together with its consolidated group, on its federal income tax return) or the IRS or (ii) pursuant to a determination by a court, that an Underpayment has occurred, the Company shall pay an amount equal to such Underpayment to Executive within ten (10) days of such determination together with interest on such amount at the applicable federal rate from the date such amount would have been paid to Executive until the date of payment. Executive shall cooperate, to the extent the Executive's reasonable expenses are reimbursed by the Company, with any reasonable requests by the Company in connection with any contests or disputes with the IRS in connection with the Excise Tax or the determination of the Excess Payment. Notwithstanding the foregoing, in the event that amounts payable under this Agreement were reduced pursuant to paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) and the value of stock options is subsequently re-determined by the Accounting Firm within the context of Treasury Regulation 1.280G-1 Q/A 33 that reduces the value of the Payments attributable to such options, the Company shall promptly pay to Executive any amounts payable under this Agreement that were not previously paid solely as a result of paragraph 4(f)(v)(A) up to the Safe Harbor Cap.
13.
    
Amendment of Section 4(g) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(g) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the title of Section 4(g) as follows:
(g)
Voluntary Termination Without Good Reason
14.
    
Amendment of Section 4(h) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(h) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language of the second sentence thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
To the extent that any amount payable pursuant to Subsections 4(b), (d)(i), (d)(iii) or (f) constitutes a deferral of compensation subject to Section 409A (a 409A Payment), then, if on the date of the Executive's separation from service, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409A-1(h)(1), from the Company (his Separation from Service,), the Executive is a specified employee, as such term is defined in Treas. Reg. Section 1.409-1(i), as determined from time to time by the Company, then such 409A Payment shall not be made to the Executive earlier than the earlier of (i) six (6) months after the Executive's Separation from Service; or (ii) the date of his death.
9
15.
    
Amendment of Section 4(j)(ii)(B) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(j)(ii)(B) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(B) within 21 days (or such other period as required under applicable law) after presentation of a release in form and substance reasonably satisfactory to the Company and its legal counsel, execute said release, and within 7 days (or such other period as required under applicable law) after such execution not revoke said release, on behalf of the Executive and the Executive's estate, heirs and representatives, releasing the Company, its Related Entities and each of the Company's and such Related Entities' respective officers, directors, employees, members, managers, agents, independent contractors, representatives, shareholders, successors and assigns (all of which persons and entities shall be third party beneficiaries of such release with full power to enforce the provisions thereof) from any and all claims related to the Executive's employment with the Company; termination of the Executive's employment; all matters alleged or which could have been alleged in a charge or complaint against the Company; any and all injuries, losses or damages to Employee, including any claims for attorney's fees; any and all claims relating to the conduct of any employee, servant, officer, director or agent of the Company; and any and all matters, transactions or things occurring prior to the date of said release, including any and all possible claims, known or unknown, which could have been asserted against the Company or the Company's employees, agents, servants, officers or directors. Notwithstanding the foregoing, the form of release shall except out therefrom, and acknowledge the Executive's continuing rights with respect to, the following: (i) all vested rights that the Executive may have under all welfare, retirement and other plans and programs of the Company in which the Executive was participating at the time of his employment termination, including all equity plans and programs of the Company with respect to which equity awards were made to the Executive, (ii) all continuing rights that the Executive may have under this Agreement, and (iii) all rights that the Executive may have following the termination of his employment under the Company's Certificate of Incorporation and Bylaws, any applicable Company insurance and any indemnity agreements to which the Executive is a party which provide for indemnification, insurance or other, similar coverage for the Executive with respect to his actions or inactions as an officer, employee and/or member of the Board. Executive may, within five business days of receipt from the Company of the form of release, provide comments to the Company regarding material provisions of the form of release, which the Company in good faith will consider. For clarification, unless and until the Executive executes and does not, within any applicable revocation period, revoke the release, the Company shall have no obligation to make any Termination Payment to the Executive, and, even if the Executive does not execute the release, the Executive shall be bound by the post-termination provisions of this Agreement, including without limitation Section 19.
10
16.
    
Amendment of Section 4(l) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 4(l) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(l)
Employment at Will.
The Executive hereby agrees that the Company may terminate the Executive's employment under this Paragraph 4 at will, without regard to: (i) any general or specific policies (written or oral) of the Company relating to the employment or termination of employment of its employees; (ii) any statements made to the Executive, whether oral or in any document, pertaining to the Executive's relationship with the Company; or (iii) without a determination of Due Cause by the Company.
17.
    
Amendment of Section 5 of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 5 of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
5.
Accelerated Vesting of Equity Awards Upon Change In Control
. In the event of a Change in Control as defined hereinabove, the restrictions and deferral limitations applicable to any Option, SAR, Restricted Stock, Performance Unit, Deferred Stock Unit, Dividend Equivalent or any Other Stock Unit Awards (collectively Awards) as such Awards are defined in the 2004 LTIP (or any applicable successor plan of the Company), granted to the Executive shall be subject to such provisions regarding vesting and transferability in those circumstances as are set forth in the applicable award agreement or grant.
18.
    
Amendment of Section 18 of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 18 of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language of the third sentence thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
The Executive acknowledges that the Executive is fully aware of the Executive's right to the advice of counsel independent from that of the Company, that the Company has advised him of such right and disclosed to him the risks in not seeking such independent advice, and that the Executive fully understands the potentially adverse interests of the parties with respect to this Agreement.
19.
    
Amendment of Section 19(d) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 19(d) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
(d)
Notification of New Employer
. In the event that the Executive leaves the employ of the Company the Executive hereby grants consent to notification by the Company to the Executive's new employer (whether the Executive is employed as an employee, consultant, independent contractor, director, partner, officer, advisor, executive or manager) about the Executive's Loyalty Obligations specified under this Agreement.
11
20.
    
Amendment of Section 19(h) of the Agreement
. Effective June 4, 2013, Section 19(h) of the Agreement is hereby amended by revising the language of the first sentence thereof to read in its entirety as follows:
The Executive's post-termination of employment obligations under this Paragraph 19 shall cease upon the Company's failure to make any payments or benefits hereunder as a result of the termination of the Executive's employment when due if within 15 days after written notice from the Executive to the Company of such failure, the Company does not make the required payment.
21.
    
Full Force and Effect
. Except for those terms and provisions amended herein, all other terms and conditions in the Agreement shall remain unchanged and in full force and effect.
[SIGNATURE PAGE FOLLOWS]
12
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, the Company and Executive have executed this Third Amendment to the Agreement as of the date first written above.
13


</DOCUMENT>
<DOCUMENT>
FILE:AAP/AAP-8K-20130613150629.txt.gz
TIME:20130613150629
EVENTS:	Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year	Financial Statements and Exhibits
TEXT:
ITEM: Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year
ITEM: Financial Statements and Exhibits
SEC 873 (03/2003)
Potential persons who are to respond to the collection of information contained in this form are not
required to respond unless the form displays a currently valid OMB control number.
 
 
UNITED STATES
 
SECURITIES AND EXCHANGE COMMISSION
 
Washington, D.C. 20549
  
FORM 8-K
 
CURRENT REPORT
 
Pursuant to Section 13 or 15(d) of the
Securities Exchange Act of 1934
 
Date of Report (Date of earliest event reported)
June 7, 2013
 
 
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
(Exact name of registrant as specified in its charter)
 
 
 
Registrant's telephone number, including area code (540) 362-4911
 
Not Applicable
(Former name, former address and former fiscal year, if changed since last report)
 
Check the appropriate box below if the Form 8-K filing is intended to simultaneously satisfy the filing obligation of the registrant under any of the following provisions (see General Instruction A.2. below):
 
o
Written communications pursuant to Rule 425 under the Securities Act (17 CFR 230.425)
 
o
Soliciting material pursuant to Rule 14a-12 under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14a-12)
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 14d-2(b) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.14d-2(b))
 
o
Pre-commencement communications pursuant to Rule 13e-4(c) under the Exchange Act (17 CFR 240.13e-4(c))
INFORMATION TO BE INCLUDED IN THE REPORT
Item 5.03   Amendments to Articles of Incorporation or Bylaws; Change in Fiscal Year.
At the Annual Meeting of Stockholders of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the Company) held on May 22, 2013 (the Annual Meeting), stockholders of the Company approved amendments (the Amendments) to the Company's Restated Certificate of Incorporation, as amended (the Restated Certificate of Incorporation) to (i) eliminate the supermajority voting requirement contained in Article IX of the Restated Certificate of Incorporation and replace it with the voting standard required by Delaware law and (ii) permit stockholders who hold at least 25 percent of the outstanding common stock of the Company, continuously for at least one year, to call a special meeting of stockholders. The Amendments became effective upon the filing of the Certificate of Second Amendment to Restated Certificate of Incorporation with the Secretary of State of Delaware on June 7, 2013. A copy of the Certificate of Second Amendment is attached as Exhibit 3.1 and is incorporated by reference herein.
On February 5, 2013, the Board of Directors of the Company adopted an amendment to Section 2.03 of the Amended and Restated By-Laws of the Company, to become effective subject to the approval by stockholders of the amendment to the Restated Certificate of Incorporation with respect to the authority of stockholders to call a special meeting described above and the filing of the Certificate of Second Amendment with the Secretary of State of Delaware. Effective as of the filing date of the Certificate of Second Amendment to Restated Certificate of Incorporation, the first sentence of Section 2.03 of the Amended and Restated By-Laws has been amended to provide that stockholders who hold at least 25 percent of the outstanding common stock of the Company, continuously for at least one year, may call a special meeting of stockholders. A copy of the Amended and Restated By-Laws is attached as Exhibit 3.2 and is incorporated by reference herein.
Item 9.01. Financial Statements and Exhibits.
(d) Exhibits.
SIGNATURES
Pursuant to the requirements of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, the registrant has duly caused this report to be signed on its behalf by the undersigned hereunto duly authorized.
* Print name and title of the signing officer under his signature.
EXHIBIT INDEX

Exhibit 3.1
CERTIFICATE OF SECOND AMENDMENT
TO
RESTATED CERTIFICATE OF INCORPORATION
OF
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS, INC.
Advance Auto Parts, Inc. (the 
Corporation
), a corporation existing under the laws of the General Corporation Law of the State of Delaware (the 
General Corporation Law
), does hereby certify as follows:
1.
    
The name of the Corporation is Advance Auto Parts, Inc. The original Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation was filed with the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on August 1, 2001 and amended by the Corporation by the filing of a Certificate of Amendment of Certificate of Incorporation with the office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on August 8, 2001, which was further amended by the Corporation by the filing of a Restated Certificate of Incorporation with the office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on November 26, 2001, and the filing of a Certificate of Amendment of Restated Certificate of Incorporation in the office of the Secretary of State of the State of Delaware on May 19, 2004 (collectively, the Certificate).
2.
    
This Certificate of Second Amendment to Restated Certificate of Incorporation has been duly adopted by the Corporation in accordance with Section 242 of the General Corporation Law and the Certificate.
3.
    
This Certificate of Second Amendment to Restated Certificate of Incorporation has been duly approved by the required vote of the stockholders of the Corporation at the annual meeting of stockholders duly called and held on May 22, 2013, upon notice in accordance with Section 222 of the General Corporation Law.
4.
    
Article VII.B of the Certificate is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
Special meetings of stockholders may be called only by the Board of Directors, the Chairman of the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer, or stockholders who hold, continuously for at least one year, at least 25 percent, in the aggregate, of the outstanding common stock of the Corporation, and may not be called by any other person or persons.
5.
    
Article IX of the Certificate is hereby amended and restated in its entirety as follows:
The Corporation reserves the right at any time, and from time to time, to amend, alter, change or repeal any provision contained in this Restated Certificate of Incorporation, and other provisions authorized by the laws of the State of Delaware at the time in force may be added or inserted, in the manner now or hereafter prescribed by law; and all rights, preferences and privileges of whatsoever nature conferred upon stockholders, directors or any other persons whomsoever by and pursuant to this Restated Certificate of
1
Incorporation in its present form or as hereafter amended are granted subject to the rights reserved in this article.
6.
    
The Certificate, as amended, is hereby ratified and confirmed in all other respects.
IN WITNESS WHEREOF, this Certificate of Second Amendment to Restated Certificate of Incorporation of Advance Auto Parts, Inc. has been executed by its Senior Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary on June 7, 2013.
/s/ Sarah E. Powell
Sarah E. Powell
Senior Vice President, General Counsel
and Corporate Secretary
2

Exhibit 3.2
AMENDED AND RESTATED
BY-LAWS
OF
ADVANCE AUTO PARTS,
INC.
Effective June 7, 2013
1
TABLE OF CONTENTS
i
TABLE OF CONTENTS
(continued)
ii
I.
Offices
.
Section 1.01
Registered Office
. The Corporation shall maintain a registered office and registered agent within the State of Delaware at such place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors of the Corporation.
Section 1.02
Other Offices
. The Corporation may also have offices at such other places both within and without the State of Delaware as the Board of Directors may from time to time determine or as the business of the Corporation may require.
II.
Stockholders
.
  
Section 2.01
Place of Meetings
. Meetings of stockholders may be held at the principal executive office of the Corporation or at such other place as may be designated by the Board of Directors, the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation or the Chair of the Board of Directors.
Section 2.02
Annual Meetings
. An annual meeting of stockholders shall be held in each calendar year for the election of directors on such date and at such time as shall be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors. Any other proper business may be transacted at the annual meeting, provided that such business is properly brought before the meeting.
Section 2.03
Special Meetings
. A special meeting of stockholders, for any purpose or purposes, may be called only by the Chief Executive Officer, the Chair of the Board of Directors, the Board of Directors, or stockholders who hold, continuously for at least one year, at least 25 percent, in the aggregate, of the outstanding common stock of the Corporation, and may not be called by any other person or persons. Business transacted at any special meeting shall be limited to the purposes stated in the notice of the meeting sent by the Corporation subject to the nomination procedures for directors set forth in Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws.
Section 2.04
Notice of Stockholder Business and Nominations
.
(a)     Annual Meetings of Shareholders.
(1)     Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors and the proposal of other business to be considered by the stockholders may be made at an annual meeting of stockholders only (A) pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (or a supplement thereto) given by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, (B) otherwise properly brought before the meeting by or at the direction of the Board of Directors, or (C) properly brought before the meeting by a stockholder of the Corporation who (i) was a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws and at the time of the annual meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws as to such business or nomination; clause (C) shall be the exclusive means for a stockholder to make nominations or submit other business (other than matters properly brought under Rule 14a-8 under the Securities Exchange Act of 1934, as
1
amended (the Exchange Act) and included in the Corporation's notice of meeting) before an annual meeting of stockholders.
(2)     Without qualification, for any nominations or any other business to be properly brought before an annual meeting by a stockholder pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(1)(C) of these By-Laws, the stockholder must have given timely notice thereof in writing to the Secretary and such other business must otherwise be a proper matter for stockholder action.
(A)     To be timely, a stockholder's notice shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day and not later than the close of business on the 120th day prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting; provided, however, that in the event that the date of the annual meeting is more than 30 days before or more than 60 days after such anniversary date, notice by the stockholder to be timely must be so delivered not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day prior to the date of such annual meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the 120th day prior to the date of such annual meeting or, if the first public announcement of the date of such annual meeting is less than 130 days prior to the date of such annual meeting, the 10th day following the day on which public announcement of the date of such meeting is first made by the Corporation. In no event shall any adjournment or postponement of an annual meeting or the announcement thereof commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
(B)    To be in proper form, a stockholder's notice (whether given pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(2) or Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws) to the Secretary must set forth, as to the stockholder giving the notice and the beneficial owner, if any, on whose behalf the nomination or proposal is made, the following information together with a representation as to the accuracy of the information:
(i) the name and address of such stockholder, as they appear on the Corporation's books, and of such beneficial owner, if any,
(ii) the class or series and number of shares of the Corporation which are, directly or indirectly, owned beneficially and/or of record by such stockholder and such beneficial owner, if any,
(iii) a description of any option, warrant, convertible security, stock appreciation right, or similar right with an exercise or conversion privilege or a settlement payment or mechanism at a price related to any class or series of shares of the Corporation or with a value derived in whole or in part from the value of any class or series of shares of the Corporation,
2
whether or not such instrument or right shall be subject to settlement in the underlying class or series of capital stock of the Corporation or otherwise (a Derivative Instrument) directly or indirectly owned beneficially by such stockholder and any other direct or indirect opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation,
(iv) a description of any proxy, contract, arrangement, understanding, or relationship pursuant to which such stockholder has a right to vote any shares of any security of the Corporation,
(v) a description of any short interest in any security of the Corporation (for purposes of these By-Laws a person shall be deemed to have a short interest in a security if such person directly or indirectly, through any contract, arrangement, understanding, relationship or otherwise, has the opportunity to profit or share in any profit derived from any decrease in the value of the subject security),
(vi) a description of any rights to dividends on the shares of the Corporation owned beneficially by such stockholder that are separated or separable from the underlying shares of the Corporation,
(vii) a description of any proportionate interest in shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments held, directly or indirectly, by a general or limited partnership in which such stockholder is a general partner or, directly or indirectly, beneficially owns an interest in a general partner and
(viii) a description of any performance-related fees (other than an asset-based fee) that such stockholder is entitled to based on any increase or decrease in the value of shares of the Corporation or Derivative Instruments, if any,
(ix) a description of any arrangements, rights, or other interests described in Sections 2.04(a)(2)(B)(i)- (viii) of these By-Laws held by members of such stockholder's immediate family sharing the same household, and
(x) any other information relating to such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for, as applicable, the proposal and/or for the election of directors in a contested
3
election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
Such information shall be provided as of the date of the notice, and such information, as well as any other information reasonably requested by the Corporation after the date of the notice, shall be supplemented by such stockholder not later than 10 days after the record date for the meeting to disclose such ownership as of the record date.
(C)     If the notice relates to any business other than a nomination of a director or directors that the stockholder proposes to bring before the meeting, set forth:
(i) a brief description of the business desired to be brought before the meeting, the reasons for conducting such business at the meeting and any material interest of such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, in such business, and
(ii) a description of all agreements, arrangements and understandings between such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and any other person or persons (including their names) in connection with the proposal of such business by such stockholder.
(i) all information relating to such person that would be required to be disclosed in a proxy statement or other filings required to be made in connection with solicitations of proxies for election of directors in a contested election pursuant to Section 14 of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder (including such person's written consent to being named in the proxy statement as a nominee and to serving as a director if elected), and
(ii) a description of all direct and indirect compensation and other material monetary agreements, arrangements and understandings during the past three years, and any other material relationships, between or among such stockholder and beneficial owner, if any, and their respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the one hand, and each proposed nominee, and his or her respective affiliates and associates, or others acting in concert therewith, on the other hand, including, without limitation all information that would be required to be disclosed pursuant to Rule 404 promulgated under Regulation S-K if the stockholder making the nomination and any beneficial owner on whose behalf the nomination is
4
made, if any, or any affiliate or associate thereof or person acting in concert therewith, were the registrant for purposes of such rule and the nominee were a director or executive officer of such registrant.
(E)     With respect to each nominee for election or reelection to the Board of Directors, such stockholder shall include a completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 2.05 of these By-Laws. The Corporation may require any proposed nominee to furnish such other information as may reasonably be required by the Corporation to determine the eligibility of such proposed nominee to serve as an independent director of the Corporation or that could be material to a reasonable stockholder's understanding of the independence, or lack thereof, of such nominee.
(3)     Notwithstanding anything in Section 2.04(a)(2)(A) of these By-Laws to the contrary, in the event that the number of directors to be elected to the Board of Directors is increased and there is no public announcement by the Corporation naming all of the nominees for director or specifying the size of the increased Board of Directors at least 130 days prior to the first anniversary of the preceding year's annual meeting, a stockholder's notice required by Section 2.04 of these By-Laws shall also be considered timely, but only with respect to nominees for any new positions created by such increase, if it shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not later than the close of business on the 10th day following the day on which such public announcement is first made by the Corporation.
(b)
Special Meetings of Stockholders
.
(1)     Only such business shall be conducted at a special meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting. Nominations of persons for election to the Board of Directors may be made at a special meeting of stockholders at which directors are to be elected pursuant to the Corporation's notice of meeting (A) by or at the direction of the Board of Directors or (B) provided that the Board of Directors has determined that directors shall be elected at such meeting, by any stockholder of the Corporation who (i) is a stockholder of record at the time of giving of notice provided for in this By-Law and at the time of the special meeting, (ii) is entitled to vote at the meeting, and (iii) complies with the notice procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws as to such nomination. In the event the Corporation calls a special meeting of stockholders for the purpose of electing one or more directors to the Board of Directors, any such stockholder may nominate a person or persons (as the case may be) for election to such position(s) as specified in the Corporation's notice of meeting, if the stockholder's notice required by Section 2.04(a) of this By-Law with respect to any nomination (including the completed and signed questionnaire, representation and agreement required by Section 2.05 of these By-Laws) shall be delivered to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation not earlier than the close of business on the 150th day prior to the date of such special meeting and not later than the close of business on the later of the 120th day prior to the date of such special meeting or, if the first public announcement of the date of such special meeting is less than 130 days prior to the date of such special meeting, the 10th day following the
5
day on which public announcement is first made of the date of the special meeting and of the nominees proposed by the Board of Directors to be elected at such meeting. In no event shall any adjournment or postponement of a special meeting or the announcement thereof commence a new time period for the giving of a stockholder's notice as described above.
(c)     
General
.
(1)     Only such persons who are nominated in accordance with the procedures set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws shall be eligible to serve as directors and only such business shall be conducted at a meeting of stockholders as shall have been brought before the meeting in accordance with the procedures set forth in this By-Law. Except as otherwise provided by law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the Chair of the meeting shall have the power and duty to determine whether a nomination or any business proposed to be brought before the meeting was made or proposed, as the case may be, in accordance with the procedures set forth in these By-Laws and, if any proposed nomination or business is not in compliance with Section 2.04 of these By-Laws, to declare that such defective nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted.
(2)     For purposes of these By-Laws, public announcement shall mean disclosure in a press release reported by a national news service or in a document publicly filed by the Corporation with the Securities and Exchange Commission pursuant to Section 13, 14 or 15(d) of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations promulgated thereunder.
(3)     Notwithstanding the foregoing provisions of Section 2.04 of these By-Laws, a stockholder shall also comply with all applicable requirements of the Exchange Act and the rules and regulations thereunder with respect to the matters set forth in Section 2.04 of these By-Laws; provided, however, that any references in these By-Laws to the Exchange Act or the rules promulgated thereunder are not intended to and shall not limit the requirements applicable to nominations or proposals as to any other business to be considered pursuant to Section 2.04(a)(1)(C) or Section 2.04(b) of these By-Laws. Nothing in these By-Laws shall be deemed to affect any rights (A) of stockholders to request inclusion of proposals in the Corporation's proxy statement pursuant to Rule 14a-8 under the Exchange Act or (B) of the holders of any series of Preferred Stock if and to the extent provided for under law, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
(4)     The Chair of the meeting shall, if the facts warrant, determine and declare to the meeting that a nomination or business proposal was not made in accordance with the procedures prescribed by these By-Laws, and if he should so determine, he shall so declare to the meeting and the defective nomination shall be disregarded or that such proposed business shall not be transacted.
6
Section 2.05
Submission of Questionnaire, Representation and Agreement
. To be eligible to be a nominee by a stockholder for election or reelection as a director of the Corporation, a person must deliver (in accordance with the time periods prescribed for delivery of notice under Section 2.04 of these By-Laws) to the Secretary at the principal executive offices of the Corporation a written questionnaire with respect to the background and qualification of such person and the background of any other person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made (which questionnaire shall be provided by the Secretary upon written request) and a written representation and agreement (in the form provided by the Secretary upon written request) that such person:
(a)     is not and will not become a party to:
(1)     any agreement, arrangement or understanding with, and has not given any commitment or assurance to, any person or entity as to how such person, if elected as a director of the Corporation, will act or vote on any issue or question (a Voting Commitment) that has not been disclosed to the Corporation, or
(2)     any Voting Commitment that could limit or interfere with such person's ability to comply, if elected as a director of the Corporation, with such person's fiduciary duties under applicable law,
(b)     is not and will not become a party to any agreement, arrangement or understanding with any person or entity other than the Corporation with respect to any direct or indirect compensation, reimbursement or indemnification in connection with service or action as a director that has not been disclosed therein, and
(c)     in such person's individual capacity and on behalf of any person or entity on whose behalf the nomination is being made, would be in compliance, if elected as a director of the Corporation, and will comply with all applicable publicly disclosed corporate governance, conflict of interest, confidentiality and stock ownership and trading policies and guidelines of the Corporation.
Section 2.06
Notice of Meetings
. A written notice stating the place, date and hour of the meeting and, in the case of a special meeting, the purpose or purposes for which the meeting is called, shall be given not less than 10 nor more than 60 days before the date of such meeting to each stockholder of record of the Corporation entitled to vote at such meeting. Such notice shall be personally delivered or mailed and, if mailed, shall be deemed to be given when deposited in the mail, postage prepaid, addressed to the stockholder's mailing address shown upon the records of the Corporation.
Section 2.07
Waiver of Notice
. Notice of any meeting of stockholders may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by the person or persons entitled to the notice. Attendance of a person at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the person attends a meeting for the express purpose of objecting at the beginning of the meeting to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
7
Section 2.08
Quorum
. At each meeting of stockholders, except where otherwise provided by law or the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, the holders of a majority of the outstanding capital stock entitled to vote at the meeting, present in person or represented by proxy, shall constitute a quorum. If a quorum is once present at the meeting, the stockholders may continue to transact business until adjournment notwithstanding the withdrawal of enough stockholders to leave less than a quorum.
Section 2.09
Adjourned Meetings
. The stockholders present at any meeting may, by majority vote, adjourn the meeting from time to time to a later day or hour or to another place. The stockholders entitled to vote at any meeting at which a quorum is not present in person or represented by proxy may so adjourn the meeting until a quorum shall be present or represented. If any adjournment is for more than 30 days, or if after adjournment a new record date is fixed for the adjourned meeting, a notice of the adjourned meeting shall be given to each stockholder of record entitled to vote at the meeting. Otherwise, notice of any adjourned meeting need not be given if the time and place thereof are announced at the meeting at which the adjournment is taken. At an adjourned meeting at which a quorum is present or represented by proxy, any business may be transacted which might have been transacted at the meeting as originally convened.
Section 2.10
Voting
.
(a)
Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation, each stockholder entitled to vote at any meeting of stockholders shall have one vote for each share of stock having voting power upon the matter in question that is held by such stockholder and registered in the stockholder's name on the books of the Corporation as of the applicable record date. Shares of its own stock belonging to the Corporation or to another corporation, if a majority of the shares entitled to vote in the election of directors of such other corporation is held, directly or indirectly, by the Corporation, shall neither be entitled to vote nor be counted for quorum purposes; provided, however, that the foregoing shall not limit the right of the Corporation to vote stock, including but not limited to its own stock, held by it in a fiduciary capacity.
(b)
The vote upon any election or question before a meeting, other than the election of directors, need not be by written ballot, and need not be conducted by inspectors, unless otherwise determined by the Board of Directors or the officer presiding at the meeting or otherwise provided in Section 2.15. All such elections and questions at a meeting shall be decided by a majority vote of the shares entitled to vote on the subject matter, the holders of which are present in person or represented by proxy at the meeting at the time of the vote, except where otherwise required by the laws of Delaware, the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws.
(c)    Each director to be elected by stockholders shall be elected by the vote of the majority of the votes cast at any meeting for the election of directors at which a quorum is present, provided that if the number of nominees exceeds the number of directors to be elected, the directors shall be elected by the vote of a plurality of the shares represented in person or by proxy at such meeting and entitled to vote on the election of directors. For purposes of this Section 2.10(c), a majority of votes cast
8
shall mean that the number of shares voted for a director's election exceeds fifty percent (50%) of the number of votes cast with respect to that director's election. For purposes of this Section 2.10(c), votes cast shall include votes to withhold authority in each case and exclude abstentions and broker non-votes.
(d)    If a director has resigned and his or her resignation is accepted by the Board of Directors, or if a nominee for director is not elected and the nominee is not an incumbent director, then the Board of Directors, in its sole discretion, may fill any resulting vacancy pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.03 or may decrease the size of the Board of Directors pursuant to the provisions of Section 3.02.
 
Section 2.11
Proxies
.
(a)
Each stockholder entitled to vote at a meeting of stockholders may authorize another person or persons to act for him or her by proxy by an instrument executed in writing, provided that no such proxy shall be voted or acted upon after three years from its date, unless the proxy provides for a longer period. A stockholder may revoke any proxy that is not irrevocable by attending the meeting and voting in person or by filing with the Secretary of the Corporation an instrument in writing revoking the proxy or another duly executed proxy bearing a later date. A duly executed proxy shall be irrevocable if it states that it is irrevocable and if, and only as long as, it is coupled with an interest sufficient in law to support an irrevocable power.
(b)
A stockholder may sign or authorize the written authorization by telegram, facsimile or other means of electronic transmission setting forth or submitted with information sufficient to determine that the stockholder authorized such transmission. If it is determined that such telegrams, facsimiles or other electronic transmissions are valid, the inspectors or, if there are no inspectors, such other persons making that determination shall specify the information upon which they relied. Any copy, facsimile, telecommunication or other reproduction of the original writing or transmission may be used in lieu of the original, provided that it is a complete reproduction of the entire original.
(c)
If any written authorization designates two or more persons to act as proxies, a majority of such persons present at the meeting, or, if only one shall be present, then that one, shall have and may exercise all of the powers conferred by such written instrument upon all of the persons so designated unless the instrument shall otherwise provide.
Section 2.12
Fixing Date for Determination of Stockholders of Record
.
(a)
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to notice of or to vote at any meeting of stockholders or any adjournment thereof, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 nor less than 10 days before the date of any such meeting. If no record date is fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which notice is given, or, if notice is waived, at the close of business on the day next preceding the day on which the meeting is held. A determination of stockholders of record entitled to notice of or to vote at a meeting of stockholders shall apply to any adjournment of the meeting; provided, however, that the Board of Directors may fix a new record date for the adjourned meeting.
9
(b)
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to consent to corporate action in writing without a meeting, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 10 days after the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date for such written action is adopted by the Board of Directors. If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is not required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the first day on which a written consent signed by a stockholder is delivered to the Corporation by delivery to the registered office of the Corporation in Delaware (which shall be by hand or by certified or registered mail, return receipt requested), to the principal place of business of the Corporation, or to the officer or agent of the Corporation having custody of the Corporation's minutes of stockholders' meetings and proceedings. If no record date is fixed and prior action of the Board of Directors with respect to the subject of such written action is required by the Delaware General Corporation Law, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution taking such prior action.
(c)
For the purpose of determining the stockholders entitled to receive any dividend or other distribution or allotment of any rights, or to exercise any rights in respect of any change, conversion or exchange of stock, or for the purpose of any other lawful action not specified elsewhere in this Section 2.12, the Board of Directors may fix a record date not more than 60 days before any such action. If no record date is so fixed, the record date for such purpose shall be at the close of business on the day on which the Board of Directors adopts the resolution relating thereto.
(d)
In no event shall any record date fixed by the Board of Directors pursuant to this Section 2.12 precede the date upon which the resolution fixing the record date is adopted by the Board of Directors.
Section 2.13
Action by Written Consent of Stockholders
. Subject to the rights of the holders of any series of preferred stock with respect to such series of preferred stock, any action required or permitted to be taken by the stockholders of the Corporation must be effected at a duly called annual or special meeting of such stockholders and may not be effected by any consent in writing by such stockholders.
Section 2.14
Stockholder List
. The officer who has charge of the stock ledger shall prepare and make, at least 10 days before every meeting of stockholders, a complete list of the stockholders entitled to vote at the meeting, arranged in alphabetical order, and showing the address of each stockholder and the number of shares registered in the name of each stockholder. Such list shall be open to the examination of any stockholder, for any purpose germane to the meeting, during ordinary business hours, for a period of at least 10 days before the meeting, either at a place within the city where the meeting is to be held, which place shall be specified in the notice of the meeting, or, if not so specified, at the place where the meeting is to be held. The list shall also be produced and kept at the time and place of the meeting during the whole time thereof, and may be inspected by any stockholder who is present. Upon the willful neglect or refusal of the directors to produce such a list at any meeting for the election of directors, they shall be ineligible for election to any office at such meeting. The stock ledger shall be the only evidence as to who are the stockholders entitled to examine the stock ledger, the list of
10
stockholders or the books of the Corporation, or to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of stockholders.
Section 2.15
Voting Procedures and Inspectors of Elections
. The following provisions shall apply at such time as the Corporation shall have a class of voting stock that is (1) listed on a national securities exchange, (2) authorized for quotation on an inter-dealer quotation system of a registered national securities association, or (3) held of record by more than 2,000 stockholders.
(a)
The Corporation shall, in advance of any meeting of stockholders, appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting and make a written report thereof. The Corporation may designate one or more persons as alternate inspectors to replace any inspector who fails to act. If no inspector or alternate is able to act at a meeting of the stockholders, the person presiding at the meeting shall appoint one or more inspectors to act at the meeting. Each inspector, before entering upon the discharge of his or her duties, shall take and sign an oath faithfully to execute the duties of inspector with strict impartiality and according to the best of his or her ability.
(b)
The inspectors shall: (1) ascertain the number of shares outstanding and the voting power of each; (2) determine the shares represented at a meeting and the validity of proxies and ballots; (3) count all votes and ballots; (4) determine and retain for a reasonable period a record of the disposition of any challenges made to any determination by the inspectors; and (5) certify their determination of the number of shares represented at the meeting, and their count of all votes and ballots. The inspectors may appoint or retain other persons or entities to assist the inspectors in the performance of the duties of the inspectors.
(c)
The date and time of the opening and the closing of the polls for each matter upon which the stockholders will vote at a meeting shall be announced at the meeting. No ballot, proxies or votes, nor any revocations thereof or changes thereto, shall be accepted by the inspectors after the closing of the polls.
(d)
In determining the validity and counting of proxies and ballots, the inspectors shall be limited to an examination of the proxies, any envelopes submitted with those proxies, any information provided in connection with an appointment of proxy by electronic transmission, ballots and the regular books and records of the Corporation, except that the inspectors may consider other reliable information for the limited purpose of reconciling proxies and ballots submitted by or on behalf of banks, brokers, their nominees or similar persons which represent more votes than the holder of a proxy is authorized by the record owner to cast or more votes than the stockholder holds of record. If the inspectors consider other reliable information for the limited purpose permitted herein, the inspectors at the time they make their certification pursuant to clause (b)(5) of this Section shall specify the precise information considered by them including the person or persons from whom they obtained the information, when the information was obtained, the means by which the information was obtained and the basis for the inspectors' belief that such information is accurate and reliable.
11
III.
Board of Directors
.
Section 3.01
General Powers; Organization
. The business of the Corporation shall be managed by or under the direction of its Board of Directors, which may exercise all such powers of the Corporation and do all such lawful acts and things as are not by the Delaware General Corporation Law or by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws directed or required to be exercised or done by the stockholders. The Board of Directors may annually elect a Chair of the Board from among its members who shall preside at its meetings. The Secretary shall act as secretary of the meeting, but in his or her absence the chair of the meeting may appoint any person to act as secretary of the meeting. Any meeting of the Board of Directors may be held within or without the State of Delaware.
Section 3.02
Number, Qualification and Term of Office
. The number of directors constituting the Board of Directors shall be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors, but shall be not less than seven (7) nor more than twelve (12). Except as otherwise provided in the Certificate of Incorporation and except as provided in Section 3.03 of these By-Laws, the directors shall be elected at the annual meeting of the stockholders and each director elected shall hold office until his or her successor is elected and qualified. Directors need not be stockholders.
Section 3.03
Resignation and Removal; Vacancies
.
(a)
Any director may resign at any time upon giving written notice to the Secretary of the Corporation, such resignation to specify whether it will be effective at a particular time, upon receipt by the Secretary or at the pleasure of the Board of Directors. If no such specification is made, it shall be deemed effective at the pleasure of the Board of Directors. Directors may be removed only in accordance with the applicable provisions of the Delaware General Corporation Law and any applicable provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation.
(b)
Vacancies (whether existing or to take effect at a future date), and newly created directorships resulting from any increase in the authorized number of directors elected by all of the stockholders having the right to vote as a single class, may only be filled by a majority of the directors then in office (including those who have resigned from the Board effective as of a future date), in their sole discretion and whether or not constituting less than a quorum, and the directors so chosen shall hold office until the next election of directors and until their successors are duly elected and qualified, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal.
Section 3.04
Regular Meetings
. Regular meetings of the Board of Directors may be held without notice at such time and place as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
Section 3.05
Special Meetings
. Special meetings of the Board of Directors may be called from time to time by the Chair of the Board of Directors, if any, or the Chief Executive Officer, and upon request by any two directors, shall be called by the Chair of the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 3.06
Notice of Special Meetings
. Notice of each special meeting of the Board of Directors stating the place, date and hour of the meeting shall be given to each director by mail not less
12
than 48 hours, or personally or by telephone, telegram, facsimile or other electronic transmission not less than 48 hours before the date and hour of the meeting.
Section 3.07
Waiver of Notice
. Notice of any meeting of the Board of Directors may be waived either before or after such meeting in a writing signed by each director or directors to whom the notice was not duly given. Attendance of a director at a meeting also shall constitute a waiver of notice of such meeting, except when the director attends the meeting for the express purpose of objecting, at the beginning of the meeting, to the transaction of any business because the meeting is not lawfully called or convened.
Section 3.08
Quorum
. Unless otherwise specifically provided by the Certificate of Incorporation or these By-Laws, at all meetings of the Board of Directors a majority of the total number of directors shall constitute a quorum for the transaction of business, and the vote of a majority of the directors present at a meeting at which a quorum is present shall be the act of the Board of Directors. If a quorum shall not be present at any meeting of the Board of Directors, the directors present thereat may adjourn the meeting from time to time, without notice other than announcement at the meeting, until a quorum shall be present.
Section 3.09
Committees of Directors
.
(a)
The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate one or more committees, each committee to consist of one or more of the directors of the Corporation and to have such name as may be determined by the Board of Directors. The Board of Directors may designate one or more directors as alternate members of any committee, who may replace any absent or disqualified member at any meeting of the committee. In the absence or disqualification of a member of the committee, the member or members thereof present at any meeting and not disqualified from voting, whether or not such member or members constitute a quorum, may unanimously appoint another member of the Board of Directors to act at the meeting in place of any such absent or disqualified member.
(b)
Subject to subsection (c) of this Section 3.09 and to the Delaware General Corporation Law, any committee may exercise the powers and authority of the Board of Directors in the management of the business and affairs of the Corporation to the extent provided in the resolution designating the committee, and may authorize the corporate seal, if any, to be affixed to all papers that may require it.
(c)
No committee shall have the power or authority to amend the Certificate of Incorporation of the Corporation (except as permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law), to adopt an agreement of merger or consolidation under Section 251 or 252 of the Delaware General Corporation Law, to recommend to the stockholders the sale, lease or exchange of all or substantially all of the Corporation's property and assets, to recommend to the stockholders a dissolution of the Corporation or a revocation of a dissolution, or to amend the By-Laws of the Corporation; and, unless the resolution establishing the committee or the Certificate of Incorporation expressly so provides, no such committee shall have the power or authority to declare a dividend, to authorize the issuance of stock or to adopt a certificate of ownership and merger pursuant to Section 253 of the Delaware General Corporation Law.
13
(d)
Each committee shall keep regular minutes of its proceedings and report the same to the Board of Directors when required. Unless the Board of Directors otherwise provides, each committee may make, alter and repeal rules for the conduct of its business. In the absence of such rules each committee shall conduct its business in the same manner as the Board of Directors conducts its business pursuant to these By-Laws.
Section 3.10    
Lead Director
. The Board of Directors may, by resolution adopted by a majority of the total number of directors, designate a director to be a Lead Director. The Lead Director shall have the powers and duties as determined by the Board of Directors.
Section 3.11     
Conference Communications
. Directors may participate in any meeting of the Board of Directors, or of any duly constituted committee thereof, by means of a conference telephone or other comparable communications equipment which all persons participating in the meeting can hear and communicate with each other. For the purpose of establishing a quorum and taking any action at the meeting, such directors participating pursuant to this Section 3.11 shall be deemed present in person at the meeting.
Section 3.12     
Action by Written Consent of Directors
. Any action required or permitted to be taken at a meeting of the Board of Directors or any committee thereof may be taken without a meeting if all directors or committee members consent thereto in writing, manually or by electronic transmission, and the writing or writings are filed with the minutes of proceedings of the Board of Directors or the committee.
Section 3.13     
Compensation
. The Board of Directors shall have the authority to fix the compensation of directors.
IV.
Officers
.
Section 4.01
Number
. The Board of Directors shall elect a Chief Executive Officer, a President and a Secretary, and it may, if it so determines, elect a Chair of the Board from among its members. The Board of Directors may also choose a Treasurer, one or more Vice Presidents, one or more Assistant Secretaries, one or more Assistant Treasurers or any other officers or agents as the Board of Directors may designate. Any person may hold two or more offices.
Section 4.02
Election, Term of Office and Qualifications
. The Board of Directors shall elect the officers of the corporation, who shall hold their offices for such terms and shall exercise such powers and perform such duties not inconsistent with these By-Laws as shall be determined from time to time by the Board of Directors. All officers of the Corporation shall hold their offices until their respective successors are elected and qualified, or until their respective offices are eliminated by vote of the Board of Directors, or until their earlier resignation, retirement or removal. Officers may be, but need not be, directors.
Section 4.03
Compensation
. The salaries of the officers of the Corporation shall be fixed from time to time by the Board of Directors or a committee thereof or by the Chief Executive Officer if authorized by the Board of Directors or a committee thereof.
14
Section 4.04
Registration and Removal; Vacancies
.
(a)
Any officer may resign at any time upon written notice to the Corporation. Any such resignation, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of the Corporation as to such officer.
(b)
Any officer may be removed from office, with or without cause, by a vote of the Board of Directors. Any such removal, however, shall be without prejudice to any contract rights of such officer as to the Corporation.
(c)
Any vacancy occurring in any office of the Corporation may be filled by the Board of Directors.
Section 4.05
Chief Executive Officer
. If the Board of Directors has not otherwise designated a Chief Executive Officer, the Board of Directors may designate the Chair, if any, or the President as the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation. The Chief Executive Officer shall have the general powers and duties of management and supervision usually vested in and imposed upon the Chief Executive Officer of a corporation. During the absence or disability of the President, the Chief Executive Officer shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the President.
Section 4.06
Chair of the Board
. The Chair, if one is elected, shall preside at all meetings of the Board of Directors, except in the event that it is appropriate for the Lead Director to preside. The Chair shall preside at all meetings of the stockholders. During the absence or disability of the Chair, the Chief Executive Officer shall preside at meetings of the stockholders. During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer and the President, the Chair shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 4.07
President
. The President, subject to the control of the Board of Directors and the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, shall have general supervision of the business of the Corporation and shall see that all orders and resolutions of the Board of Directors and directives of the Chief Executive Officer are carried into effect. During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer, the President shall exercise all the powers and discharge all the duties of the Chief Executive Officer.
Section 4.08
Vice Presidents
. During the absence or disability of the Chief Executive Officer and the President, the Vice President (or in the event there be more than one Vice President, the Vice Presidents in the order designated by the Board of Directors or, in the absence of any designation, in the order they were first elected as Vice Presidents) shall perform the duties and have the authority of the President.
Section 4.09
Secretary
. The Secretary (or in the absence of the Secretary, any Assistant Secretary or other person appointed by the Chair to serve as Acting Secretary) shall keep the minutes of the meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and any committees in a book to be kept for that purpose. The Secretary shall maintain the stock ledger and prepare the stockholder list as required by these By-Laws. The Secretary shall duly give notice of all meetings of the stockholders, the Board of Directors and committees of the Board, if any.
15
Section 4.10
Treasurer
. The Treasurer, if any, shall keep accurate accounts of all moneys of the Corporation received or disbursed. He or she shall deposit all moneys, drafts and checks in the name of and to the credit of the Corporation in such banks and depositories as the Board of Directors shall from time to time designate. The Treasurer shall have power to endorse for deposit all notes, checks and drafts received by the Corporation. The Treasurer shall render to the Board of Directors or the Chief Executive Officer of the Corporation, whenever required, an account of all his or her transactions as Treasurer and of the financial condition of the Corporation.
Section 4.11
Authority and Other Duties
. All officers of the Corporation shall be subject to the supervision and direction of the Board of Directors and, in addition to the foregoing authority and duties, all officers of the Corporation shall respectively have such authority and perform such other duties in the management of the business of the Corporation as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors. Unless expressly prohibited by a resolution adopted by the Board of Directors, an officer elected or appointed by the Board may, without the approval of the Board, delegate some or all of the duties and powers of his or her office to other persons.
V.
Indemnification
.
Section 5.01
Indemnification
. The Corporation shall indemnify its officers and directors, and former officers and directors, for such expenses and liabilities, in such manner, under such circumstances, and to such extent, as required or permitted by the Delaware General Corporation Law, as amended from time to time. The determination of whether any such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made (1) by a majority vote of the directors who are not parties to such action, suit or proceeding, even though less than a quorum, or (2) if there are no such directors, or if such directors so direct, by independent legal counsel in a written opinion, or (3) by the stockholders; provided, however, that if a Change in Control (as defined below) has occurred and the person seeking indemnification so requests, a determination of whether such person is eligible for indemnification under this Section 5.01 shall be made in a written opinion rendered by independent legal counsel chosen by the person seeking indemnification and not reasonably objected to by the Board of Directors, and such determination shall be binding on the Corporation. The fees and expenses of such independent counsel shall be paid by the Corporation. For such purpose, (X) independent legal counsel shall mean legal counsel other than an attorney, or a firm having associated with it an attorney, who has been retained by or has performed services for the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification within the previous three years; and (Y) a Change in Control shall be deemed to have occurred if:
(i)
a majority of the directors of the Corporation shall be persons other than persons (A) who were directors of the Corporation on the date this Section was adopted, (B) for whose election proxies shall have been solicited by the Board of Directors or (C) who are then serving as directors appointed by the Board of Directors
-
to fill vacancies on the Board of Directors caused by newly-created directorships or the death or resignation (but not removal) of a director;
16
(ii)
thirty percent (30%) or more of the outstanding shares of voting stock of the Corporation is acquired or beneficially owned (as defined in Rule 13d-3 under the Exchange Act, or any successor rule thereto) by any person (other than the Corporation, a subsidiary of the Corporation or the person seeking indemnification) or group of persons, not including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert;
(iii)
the stockholders of the Corporation approve a definitive agreement or plan to (A) merge or consolidate the Corporation with or into another corporation (other than (1) a merger or consolidation with a subsidiary of the Corporation or (2) a merger in which the Corporation is the surviving corporation and no outstanding voting stock of the Corporation (other than fractional shares) held by stockholders immediately before the merger is converted into cash, securities, or other property), (B) sell or otherwise dispose of all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in one transaction or a series of transactions) or (C) liquidate or dissolve the Corporation, unless a majority of the voting stock (or the voting equity interest) of the surviving corporation or of any corporation (or other entity) acquiring all or substantially all of the assets of the Corporation (in the case of a merger, consolidation or disposition of assets) is, immediately following the merger, consolidation or disposition of assets, beneficially owned by the person seeking indemnification or a group of persons, including the person seeking indemnification, acting in concert; or
(iv)
the Corporation enters into an agreement in principle or a definitive agreement relating to an event described in clause (i), (ii) or (iii) above which ultimately results in an event described therein, or a tender or exchange offer or proxy contest is commenced which ultimately results in an event described therein.
Section 5.02
Insurance
. The Corporation may purchase and maintain insurance on behalf of any person who is or was a director, officer, employee or agent of the Corporation, or is or was serving at the request of the Corporation as a director, officer, employee, trustee or agent of another corporation, partnership, limited liability company, joint venture, trust, employee benefit plan or other enterprise, against any liability or expense asserted against or incurred by such person in or arising from that capacity, or arising out of his or her status as such, whether or not the Corporation would otherwise have the power or the obligation to indemnify the person against such liability or expense. The Corporation shall not be obligated under these By-Laws to make any payment in connection with any claim made against any person if and to the extent that such person has actually received payment therefore under any insurance policy or policies.
Section 5.03
Expenses Payable in Advance
. Expenses (including attorneys' fees and expenses) incurred by a director or officer, or a former director or officer, in defending, investigating, preparing to defend, or being or preparing to be a witness in, a threatened or pending action, suit, proceeding or claim against him or her, whether civil or criminal, shall be paid by the Corporation in
17
advance of the final disposition of such action, suit, proceeding or claim upon receipt by the Corporation of a request therefore and an undertaking by or on behalf of the director or officer, or former director or officer, to repay such amounts if it ultimately shall be determined that he or she is not entitled to be indemnified by the Corporation.
VI.
Stock
.
Section 6.01
Certificates for Stock
.
(a)
The shares of stock of the Corporation shall be either certificated or uncertificated.
(b)
Every holder of duly issued certificated shares of stock in the Corporation shall be entitled to a certificate, to be in such form as shall be prescribed by the Board of Directors, certifying the number of shares owned by him or her. The certificates for such shares shall he numbered in the order in which they shall be issued and shall be signed in the name of the Corporation by the Chair, the President or a Vice President, and by the Treasurer or an Assistant Treasurer, or the Secretary or an Assistant Secretary, and the seal of the Corporation, if any, shall be affixed thereto.
(c)
A certificate representing shares of stock issued by the Corporation shall, if the Corporation is authorized to issue shares of more than one class or series, set forth upon the face or back of the certificate, or shall state that the Corporation will furnish to any stockholder upon request and without charge, a full statement of the powers, designations, preferences and relative, participating, optional or other special rights of each class or series of stock and the qualifications, limitations or restrictions of such preferences and/or rights of each class or series authorized to be issued.
(d)
The Board of Directors may provide by resolution that some or all shares of any or all classes and series of the stock of the Corporation will be uncertificated. Any such resolution shall not apply to shares represented by a certificate until the certificate is surrendered to the Corporation.
Section 6.02
Issuance of Stock
. The Board of Directors is authorized to cause to be issued stock of the Corporation up to the full amount authorized by the Certificate of Incorporation in such amounts and for such consideration as may be determined by the Board of Directors. No shares shall be allotted except in consideration of cash, labor, personal or real property (or leases thereof), or a combination of the foregoing, or of an amount transferred from surplus to stated capital upon a stock dividend. At the time of such allotment of stock, the Board of Directors shall state its determination of the fair value to the Corporation in monetary terms of any consideration other than cash for which shares are allotted. The amount of consideration to be received in cash or otherwise shall not be less than the par value of the shares so allotted. Stock so issued shall be fully paid and nonassessable. Treasury shares may be disposed of by the Corporation for such consideration as may be fixed by the Board of Directors, or by the stockholders if the Certificate of Incorporation so provides.
Section 6.03
Partly Paid Stock
. The Corporation may issue the whole or any part of its stock as partly paid and subject to call for the remainder of the consideration to be paid therefore. The
18
total amount of the consideration to be paid for any partly paid stock and the amount paid thereon shall be stated upon the face or back of each certificate issued to represent any such partly paid stock (or, in the case of uncertificated stock, on the books and records of the Corporation), the total amount of the consideration to be paid therefore and the amount paid thereon shall be stated. The Board of Directors may, from time to time, demand payment in respect of each share of stock not fully paid, of such sum of money as the necessities of the business may, in the judgment of the Board of Directors, require, not exceeding in the whole the balance remaining unpaid on such stock, and such sum so demanded shall be paid to the Corporation at such times and by such installments as the directors shall direct.
Section 6.04
Registered Stockholders
. The Corporation shall be entitled to recognize the exclusive right of a person registered on its books as the owner of shares to receive dividends, and to vote as such owner, and to hold liable for calls and assessments a person registered on its books as the owner of shares, and shall not be bound to recognize any equitable or other claim to or interest in such share or shares on the part of any other person, whether or not it shall have express or other notice thereof, except as otherwise provided by the laws of Delaware.
Section 6.05
Transfer of Stock
. Transfers of stock on the books of the Corporation may be authorized only by the stockholder named in the certificate, the stockholder's legal representative or the stockholder's duly authorized attorney-in-fact and upon surrender of the certificate or the certificates for such stock. Upon surrender to the Corporation or the transfer agent of the Corporation of a certificate for shares duly endorsed or accompanied by proper evidence of succession, assignation or authority to transfer, it shall be the duty of the Corporation to issue a new certificate to the person entitled thereto, cancel the old certificate and record the transaction upon its books. No new certificate or certificates shall be issued in exchange for any existing certificate until such certificate shall have been so canceled, except in cases provided for in Section 6.06.
Section 6.06
Lost, Stolen or Destroyed Certificates
. Any stockholder claiming a certificate for stock to be lost, stolen or destroyed shall make an affidavit of that fact in such form as the Corporation may require and shall, if the Corporation so requires, give the Corporation a bond of indemnity in form, in an amount, and with one or more sureties satisfactory to the Corporation, to indemnify the Corporation against any claims which may be made against it on account of the alleged loss, theft or destruction of the certificate or issuance of such new certificate. A new certificate may then be issued for the lost, stolen or destroyed certificate.
Section 6.07
Facsimile Signatures
. Any or all of the signatures of the officers or agents of the Corporation on any stock certificate may be facsimiles. In case any officer, transfer agent or registrar who has signed or whose facsimile signature has been placed on any such certificate shall cease to be such officer, transfer agent or registrar before such certificate is issued, it nevertheless may be issued by the Corporation as though the person who signed such certificate or whose facsimile signature or signatures had been placed thereon were such officer, transfer agent or registrar at the date of issue.
19
VII.    
Miscellaneous
.
Section 7.01
Dividends
.
(a)
Subject to any restrictions contained in the Certificate of Incorporation, the Board of Directors may declare and pay dividends upon the shares of the Corporation's capital stock from the Corporation's surplus, or if there be none, out of its net profits for the current fiscal year and/or the preceding fiscal year. Dividends may be paid in cash, in property or in shares of capital stock of the Corporation, subject to the provisions of the Certificate of Incorporation. Upon the declaration of any dividend on fully paid shares, the Corporation shall declare a dividend upon partly paid shares of the same class, but only upon the basis of the percentage of the consideration actually paid thereon.
(b)
If the dividend is to be paid in shares of the theretofore unissued capital stock of the Corporation, the Board of Directors shall, by resolution, direct that there be designated as capital in respect of such shares an amount which is not less than the aggregate par value of par value shares being declared as a dividend and, in the case of shares without par value being declared as a dividend, such amount as shall be determined by the Board of Directors; provided, however, that no such designation as capital shall be necessary if shares are being distributed by the Corporation pursuant to a split-up or division of its stock.
Section 7.02     
Interested Directors and Officers
. No contract or transaction between the Corporation and one or more of its directors or officers, or between the Corporation and any other corporation, partnership, association, or other organization in which one or more of its directors or officers are directors or officers, or have a financial interest, shall be void or voidable solely for that reason, or solely because an interested director or officer is present at or participates in the meeting of the Board of Directors or committee thereof which authorizes the contract or transaction, or solely because his or her vote is counted for such purpose, if, (a) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the Board of Directors or the committee, and the Board of Directors or committee in good faith authorizes the contract or transaction by the affirmative vote of a majority of the disinterested directors, even though the disinterested directors be less than a quorum; (b) the material facts as to his or her relationship or interest and as to the contract or transaction are disclosed or are known to the stockholders entitled to vote thereon, and the contract or transaction is specifically approved in good faith by vote of the stockholders; or (c) the contract or transaction is fair as to the Corporation as of the time it is authorized, approved or ratified, by the Board of Directors, a committee thereof, or the stockholders. Common or interested directors may be counted in determining the presence of a quorum at a meeting of the Board of Directors or of a committee which authorizes the contract or transaction.
Section 7.03
Voting Securities Held by the Corporation
. Unless otherwise ordered by the Board of Directors, powers of attorney, proxies, waivers of notice of meeting, consents and other instruments relating to securities owned by the Corporation may be executed in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President or the Chief Financial Officer and any such officer may, in the name of and on behalf of the Corporation, take all such action as such officer may deem advisable to vote in person or by proxy at any meeting of security holders of other corporations in which the Corporation may hold securities, and at any such meeting such officer
20
shall possess and may exercise any and all rights and powers incident to the ownership of such securities that the Corporation might have possessed and exercised if it had been present. The Board of Directors may from time to time confer like powers upon any other person or persons.
Section 7.04
Execution of Instruments
.
(a)    All deeds, mortgages, notes, bonds, checks, contracts and other instruments pertaining to the business and affairs of the Corporation shall be signed on behalf of the Corporation by the Chair, Chief Executive Officer, President, Executive Vice President, Chief Financial Officer or any Vice President, or by such other person or persons as may be designated from time to time by the Board of Directors.
(b)    If a document must be executed by persons holding different offices or functions and one person holds such offices or exercises such functions, that person may execute the document in more than one capacity if the document indicates each such capacity.
Section 7.05
Advances
. The Corporation may, without a vote of the directors, advance money to its directors, officers or employees to cover expenses that can reasonably be incurred by them in the performance of their duties and for which they would be anticipated to be entitled to reimbursement in the absence of an advance.
Section 7.06
Fiscal Year
. The fiscal year end of the Corporation shall be the Saturday which occurs nearest the last day of December or such other date as may be fixed from time to time by resolution of the Board of Directors.
Section 7.07
Corporate Seal
. The corporate seal, if one is adopted by the Board of Directors, shall be circular in form and shall have inscribed thereon the name of the Corporation, the word Delaware and the words Corporate Seal. The seal may be used by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or reproduced or otherwise placed on any document requiring it.
Section 7.08
Form of Records
. Any records maintained by the Corporation in the regular course of its business, including its stock ledger, books of account, and minute books, may be kept on, or be in the form of, punch cards, magnetic tape, photographs, microphotographs, or any other information storage device, provided that the records so kept can be converted into clearly legible form within a reasonable time. The Corporation shall so convert any records so kept upon the request of any person entitled to inspect the same.
Section 7.09
Power to Amend
. These By-Laws may be altered, amended or repealed or new By-Laws may be adopted by the stockholders or by the Board of Directors, if such power is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation, at any annual meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors, or at any special meeting of the stockholders or of the Board of Directors if notice of such alteration, amendment, repeal or adoption of new By-Laws be contained in the notice of such special meeting. If the power to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws is conferred upon the Board of Directors by the Certificate of Incorporation it shall not divest or limit the power of the stockholders to adopt, amend or repeal these By-Laws except as otherwise provided in these By-Laws or the Certificate of Incorporation.
21


</DOCUMENT>
